Herein, the non-delusion is the cause, and that it establishes two ideas, namely the undistorted seeing in right view and the direct-addressing 1 in right mindfulness, this is its outcome.
The fruit of this divine life is the two kinds of deliverance, namely the heart-deliverance due to fading of lust and the understanding- deliverance due to fading of ignorance. This is the fruit.
So these three roots of the profitable have been demonstrated as to cause, as to outcome, and as to fruit.
This is how the kinds of the profitable can be penetrated as shared in common
Now here is a relevant verse:
( The Stilled One dropped the being-determinant That gives existence measured and unmeasured,
As to “ That gives existence measured and unmeasured “, the measured is the determined and the unmeasured is the undetermined.1
The unmeasured cannot be measured for two reasons :
The rejection 2 of the being- determinants known therein is non-greed.
The words “happy in himself and concentrated”, which deny distraction, signify non-hate.
So these are the three roots of the profitable.
“ That gives existence measured and unmeasured “ : this is non-delusion:
the greed for the being-determinants’ meeting together,1 which is the gratification due to right concentration , is the cause.
The breaking, happy in oneself, of the eggshell of ignorance is the outcome.
That is occurrence . 2 233. These three roots of the profitable have now been demonstrated as to cause, as to outcome, and as to fruit.
Up to this point this is both occurrence and stopping.1 It occurs by means of the roots of unprofit and it stops 2 by means of the roots of profit, thus all the unprofitable meets together with these three roots of profit.
For any 3 defilement verbally demonstrated in the True Idea, too, as say “craving”, or as anger, or as “ unawareness “ or “ underlying tendency “, as “ contempt “ or “ domineering “ as “ unmindfulness “ as “ envy “ or “ avarice “ ‘ ‘ ‘ as “ unknowing “, 4 can be demonstrated 5 by those three basic examples too, 5
of which defilement in general these two-term 6 Traces of the True Idea are demonstrated. In fact there is no defilement that comes to be combined and to meet together in these nine terms, 7
And the roots of unprofit like the roots of profit can be demonstrated in the opposite sense.1
Herein, what is that expressed in terms of bodily action?
( Let him do 1 profit by the body, His body being then restrained;
and (There are these three kinds of good bodily conduct:
abstention from killing breathing things, … from taking what is not given, abstention from misconduct in sensual desires ) 2 . This is expressed in terms of bodily action.
Herein, what is that expressed in terms of verbal action?
( The just say that what is well spoken is best ; And speak what is right and not wrong for the second;
and . This is expressed in terms of verbal action.
Herein, what is that expressed in terms of mental action?
(Let there be mental acts of profit, Let him be well restrained in mind,
and . This is expressed in terms of mental action.
These are unshared Threads.
Herein what are Shared Threads?
( Who guards his speech, is well restrained in mind, Does no unprofit through the body’s means,
and ( Bhikkhus, there are these three purities : purity of bodily action, purity of verbal action, purity of mental action.
Herein, what is purity of bodily action?
It is abstention from killing breathing things, abstention from taking what is not given, abstention from misconduct in sensual desires.
Herein, what is purity of verbal action?
It is abstention from false speech, … abstention from gossip.
Herein, what is purity of mental action?
It is non-covetousness, non-ill-will, right view ) .
This is the shared type of Thread.
That is how shared Threads and unshared Threads can be penetrated.
After penetrating them thus, the Thread’s meaning can be demonstrated as to speech and as to body.1
He is not one they call a pauper, His life has not been lived in vain) ,
and all of ,
and 2 the Blessed One … ) .
This is expressed in terms of the faith faculty.3
Herein, what is that expressed in terms of the energy faculty?
( Instigate yourselves, launch out, devote Yourselves in the Enlightened One’s Dispensation ,
and . This is expressed in terms of the energy faculty.
Herein, what is that expressed in terms of the mindfulness faculty?
( The mindful man has always 1 luck, Let there be luck for the mindful man.
One mindful always 1 comes off better, One mindful easily succeeds) ,
and  can be quoted in detail. This is expressed in terms of the mindfulness faculty.
Herein, what is that expressed in terms of the concentration faculty?
( Leader of men to be tamed, When you intend No gods or men or even all
The whole array Of breathing things can know what is Thought in your mind, Using the quiet concentration Without conflict) ,
and .
This is expressed in terms of the concentration faculty.
Herein, what is that expressed in terms of the understanding faculty?
 , in detail,
and . This is the type of Thread expressed in terms of the understanding faculty.
( One not without lust for sense desires And whose five faculties are blunt,1
Copy not such as him, o bhikkhu ; 2 For he is still attached thereto) 3 ,
and ,
namely the faith-faculty, etc., see the Indriya Samyutta, and
These are Threads expressed in terms of the faculties shared.
Whichever the faculty may be , whether its context 1 is that of profit or unprofit, the Thread in question  should be demonstrated by those terms of expression, no other idea than that should be demonstrated.
Herein, the shared is only the profitable, there is no profitable- unprofitable, as there are shared profitable roots and shared unprofitable roots , namely , and the right endeavours 1 are in  profitable and unprofitable contexts .2
Here is a mnemonic verse :
When a man is engrossed in thoughts, Also, when giving, a man is dear,
And then who always guards his speech 4 , And the three kinds of Purity.
Who in a Perfect One has faith, And what is taught in coarising ;
So in the Elder Maha-Kaccayana
and likewise in the case of prose-expositions .
And that
and that he dies without remorse : 2 this is the Outcome.
who in the world Takes to himself what is not given, Who goes too with another’s wife,
Who has the habit to indulge In drinking spirituous liquor),
 ,
 .
and he who indulges 1 in drinking spirituous liquor finds, like him who goes with another’s wife, 2 that enemies spring up.3
And likewise the false speech he speaks as already demonstrated is his state of a “speaker of the ill-spoken “.
This is expressed in terms of hate.1
and that on the dissolution of the body he reappears in hell is the fruit .
( Were one to go the round of births As much as a hundred, thousand aeons
Or even more than that besides, Travelling on from womb to womb
Never accepting the Buddhas’ word, Accepting determinations as self,
That one shall make an end of pain, Is utterly impossible) .
when he does so through hate, this is simply hate ;
and when he does so through delusion, this is simply delusion.
‘Where one is demonstrable, there 4 he demonstrates one, 4
( When a man strays from the True Idea Through will, hate, fear, or else delusion,
He finds his good fame wanes away As in its dark half does the moon) .
Knowing the right amount in eating,1 Faithful, and energetic too,
Him Mara sure no more can shake Than can the wind a rocky peak ) .
“Knowing the right amount in eating” 2 is the abandoning of craving for tastes.
The basis for non-greed is this .
namely” skilled”, just as it is owing to understanding that he is so described as “having understanding” and owing to wisdom that he is so described as” wise”.
that he is skilled is the outcome.
is the fruit.
<Best in the world is understanding, The kind that deals with penetration, 1
The kind that rightly understands 1 The exhaustion of birth and death ) .
and so it should be quoted for the rest of the four Truths.
and that he is taintless .
and the words “there is no more of this beyond” 3 refer to knowledge of non-arising.
 .
It is non-greed, non-hate, and non-delusion.
It is the eight rightnesses : right view, … down to … right concentration.
and that non-greed moulds the three kinds of action, namely the right intention, right effort, and right concentration, this is the outcome of the non-greed.
and that it founds right speech, right action, and right livelihood, this is its outcome.
both where there are two so shared and where there are three.
And happy in himself and concentrated, Self-existence he sundered like a mail-coat) .
Herein, there are two ideas which, as “measured”, are determined, namely gratification and disappointment, and they are measured as follows : “ In the case of sensual desires
the gratification is this much,
the disappointment is this much “, and he understands extinction thus “ in the case of this the escape is this “.
it is not measured as follows “ This is just so much, there is not more of it past this point “,
and then it is not measured in its wonderfulness by making some jewel reach it .2
Herein, the act-of-knowing and act-of-seeing that give existence to the profitable 1 are non-delusion.
which defilement is not greed and not hate and not delusion.
Leaving misconduct by the body, Let him pursue good bodily conduct) .
And speak what is kind, not unkind, for the third,· And speak what is trite and not false for the fourth) ,
Mental misconduct abandoning, Pursuing good conduct in the mind ) ,
Who purifies this triple course of action Will win the path the Seers have divulged) ,
( Who in a Perfect, One has faith Immovable and well established,
Herein, what is that expressed in terms of the faith faculty?
Whose own good virtue is the kind Desired and praised by Noble Ones,
With confidence in the Community, Whose seeing has been straightened too;
Scatter the armies of Mortality As does an elephant a hut of reeds ) ,
‘If that has been said by the Blessed One, sire, then it is so.’
so too, Mallika, no matter what the recluse Gotama says, you applaud it thus:
‘If that has been said by the Blessed One, sire, then it is so.’
quote the Thread in detail about the three kinds of confidence due to undergoing.
Someone who kills a breathing thing , Three characteristics of a fool ,
As much as a hundred thousand aeons , Also whatever monks or divines ,
Through will, hate, fear, or else delusion When going on the four bad ways ,
Who contemplating ugliness , And ugliness in signs as well ,
Should a man love a single creature , Lovingkindness if kept in being, 1
Best in the world is understanding , Three faculties there are, no less ,
The root of profit and unprofit , Gives being, measured and unmeasured .
When doing profit by the body , And then the three bodily misconducts;
The just call best what is well spoken, Good kinds of verbal conduct, too ;
By mind 2 let there be profit done , Good kinds of mental conduct, 3 too ;
the Rose-Apple-Wood dweller’s Pitaka-Disclosure
the third chapter called the “Thread’s Terms of Expression”.
And instigate yourselves, launch out , And then the state of right endeavour ;
The mindful man has always 5 luck, Makes mindfulness-foundations be ;
He has no knowledge though he wishes, And the three kinds of concentration ;
Best in the world is understanding , Three understandings are displayed;
Not without lust for sense-desires, And so too the five 6 faculties .
1. THUS have I heard.Once the Lord was staying at Savatthi, in Anathapindika’s park in the Jeta grove, in the Kareri hutment.
And among a number of monks who had gathered together after their meal, after the alms-round, sitting in the Kareri pavilion, there arose a serious discussion on former lives, as they said: ‘This is how it was in a former life’, or ‘That was how it was.’
2. And the Lord, with the purified divine-ear faculty sur¬passing the powers of humans, heard what they were talking about.
Getting up from his seat, he went to the Kareri pavilion, sat down on the prepared seat, and said: ‘Monks, what was your conversation as you sat together? What discussion did I interrupt?’
And they told him.
3. ‘Well, monks, would you like to hear a proper discourse on past lives?’
‘Lord, it is time for that! Well-Farer, it is time for that! If the Lord were to give a proper discourse on past lives, the monks would listen and remember it!’
‘Well then, monks, listen, pay close attention, and I will speak.’
‘Yes, Lord’, the monks replied,
4. ‘Monks, ninety-one aeons ago the Lord, the Arahant, the fully-enlightened Buddha Vipassi arose in the world.
Thirty- one aeons ago the Lord Buddha Sikhi arose;
And in this present fortunate aeon the Lords Buddhas Kakusandha,
And, monks, in this present fortunate aeon I too have now arisen in the world as a fully-enlightened Buddha.
5.’The Lord Buddha Vipassi was born of Khattiya race, and arose in a Khattiya family;
6.’The Lord Buddha Vipassi was of the Kondanna clan;
7.’In the time of the Lord Buddha Vipassi the life-span was eighty thousand years;
In my time the lifespan is short, limited and quick to pass: it is seldom that anybody lives to be a hundred.
8.’The Lord Buddha Vipassi gained his full enlightenment at the foot of a trumpet-flower tree;
9.’The Lord Buddha Vipassi had the pair of noble disciples Khanda and Tissa;
“The Lord Buddha Vipassi had three assemblies of disciples:
one of a hundred thousand, one of eighty thousand, and one of seventy thousand monks
—all Arahants;
— all Arahants;
“The Lord Buddha Vipassi`s personal attendant was the monk Asoka;
‘The Lord Buddha Vipassi’s father was King Bandhuma,
The Lord Buddha Sikhi’s father was King Arana,
The Lord Buddha Vessabhu’s father was King Suppatlta,
The Lord Buddha Kakusandha’s father was the Brahmin Aggidatta,
his mother was the Brahmin lady Visakha.
The Lord Buddha Konagamana’s father was the Brahmin Yannadatta,
The king at that time was Sobha;
The Lord Buddha Kassapa’s father was the Brahmin Brahmadatta,
The king at that time was Kiki;
And now, monks, my father was King Suddhodana, my mother was Queen Maya, and the royal capital was Kapilavatthu.’
Thus the Lord spoke, and the Well-Farer then rose from his seat and went to his lodging.
the way he recalls past Buddhas who have gained Parinibbana, having cut away the hindrances, cut off the road of craving, put an end to the round of becoming, overcome all suffering. He recalls their birth, their name, their clan, their life-span, the disciples and assemblies connected with him: “Being bom thus, these Blessed Lords were such-and-such, such were their names, their clans, their discipline, their Dhamma, their wisdom, their libera-tion.”
Well now, friends, how did the Tathagata come by the penetrative knowledge through which he remembers all this …? Did some deva reveal this knowledge to him?’
This was the conversation of those monks which came to be interrupted.
Then the Lord, rising from the seclusion of the rest-period, went to the Kareri pavilion and sat down on the prepared seat.
He said: ‘Monks, what was your conversation as you sat together? What discussion did I interrupt?’
And the monks told him.
‘The Tathagata understands these things…by his own penetration of the principles of Dhamma; and devas, too, have told him.
Well, monks, do you wish to hear still more about past lives?’
’ ‘Lord, it is time for that! Well-Farer, it is time for that! If the Lord were to give a proper discourse on past lives, the monks would listen and remember it.’
‘Well then, monks, listen, pay close attention, and I will speak.’
‘Yes, Lord’, the monks replied,
‘Monks, ninety-one aeons ago the Lord, the Arahant, the fully-enlightened Buddha Vipassi arose in the world.
He was bom of Khattiya race, and arose in a Khattiya family.
He was of the Kondanna clan.
The span of his life was eighty thousand years.
He gained his full enlightenment at the foot of a trumpet-flower tree.
He had the pair of noble disciples Khanda and Tissa as his chief followers.
He had three assemblies of disciples:
His chief personal attendant was the monk Asoka.
His father was King Bandhuma,
The king’s capital was Bandhumati.
and the Lord said:
in the same thirty-first aeon before this Lord Buddha Vessabhu arose.
Konagamana and
Kassapa arose in the world.
the Lord Buddha Sikhi likewise;
the Lord Buddha Vessabhu likewise;
the Lord Buddha Kakusandha was bom of Brahmin race, and arose in a Brahmin family;
the Lord Buddha Konagamana likewise;
the Lord Buddha Kassapa likewise;
and I, monks, who am now the Arahant and fully-enlightened Buddha, was bom of Khattiya race, and arose in a Khattiya family.
the Lord Buddah Sikhi likewise;
the Lord Buddha Vessabhu likewise;
the Lord Buddha Kakusandha was of the Kassapa clan;
the Lord Buddha Konagamana likewise;
the Lord Buddha Kassapa likwise;
I who am now the Arahant and fully- enlightened Buddha, am of the Gotama clan.
in the time of the Lord Buddha Sikhi seventy thousand;
in the time of the Lord Buddha Vessabhu sixty thousand;
in the time of the Lord Buddha Kakusandhu forty thousand;
in the time of the Lord Buddha Konagamana thirty thousand;
in the time of the Lord Buddha Kassapa it was twenty thousand years.
the Lord Buddha Sikhi under a white-mango tree;
the Lord Buddha Vessabhu under a sal-tree;
the Lord Buddha Kakusandha under an acacia-tree;
the Lord Buddha Konagamana under a fig-tree;
the Lord Buddha Kassapa under a banyan-tree;
and I became fully enlightened at the foot of an assattha-tree.
the Lord Buddha Sikhi had Abhibhti and Sambhava;
the Lord Buddha Vessabhu had Sona and Uttara;
the Lord Buddha Kakusandha had Vidhiira and Sanjiva;
the Lord Buddha Konagamana had Bhiyyosa and Uttara;
the Lord Buddha Kassapa had Tissa and Bharadvaja;
I myself now have the pair of noble disciples Sariputta and Moggallana.
one of six million eight hundred thousand, one of a hundred thousand, and one of eighty thousand monks,
and of these three assemblies all were Arahants;
the Lord Buddha Sikhi had three assemblies of disciples:
— all Arahants;
the Lord Buddha Vessabhu had three assemblies:
one of eighty thousand, one of seventy thousand, and one of sixty thousand monks
— all Arahants;
the Lord Buddha Kakusandha had one assembly:
the Lord Buddha Konagamana had one assembly: thirty thousand monks
— all Arahants;
the Lord Buddha Kassapa had one assembly: twenty thousand monks
I, monks, have one assembly of disciples, one thousand two hundred and fifty monks,
and this one assembly consists only of Arahants.
the Lord Buddha Sikhi’s was Khemankara;
the Lord Buddha Vessabhu’s was Upasannaka;
the Lord Buddha Kakusandhu’s was Vuddhija;
the Lord Buddha Konagamana’s was Sotthija;
the Lord Buddha Kassapa’s was Sabbamitta;
my chief personal attendant now is Ananda.
Herein, what is Investigation of Threads?
A Thread is thoroughly scrutinized as to the profitable and unprofitable ideas there according to consecutivity thus :
“ How then, did he instigate this Thread in its beginning  … etc.1 …? Is it construable with those Threads that are fully agreed upon, 2 or is it not so construable?”
According as the Blessed one teaches defilement there in the beginning ,1
it should be scrutinized as follows: “How then, is the abandoning of those defilements taught there too or is it not taught?” 2
If it is not taught, then the profitable ideas which bring about the abandoning of those defilements must be sought in the kind of divine life lived under the Blessed One .
If, in searching,1 one does not find where those unprofitable ideas come to their abandonment,
then those unprofitable ideas must be reserved 2 and inquired into further, taking the type of Thread in this case to be that Dealing with Corruption where no profit is explicitly taught.
So wherever on the level of any one of the four paths any defilements come to their abandonment, any defilements so far not construable as opposites of noble ideas there in that particular plane, say, that of Seeing, must be reserved. 254. If, when they are thus reserved,1 they give the construction,2
still that Thread must be inquired into herein in regard to those defilements as follows:
Or even if not capable of being demonstrated in thls way, still the Thread need not on that account alone be the object of uncertainty ,
Whatever the defilements, as to how they are abandonable
Just as in the case of the first statement 1 , namely that of defilement’s coming first, now again any noble ideas taught for the abandoning of any defilements must be investigated as to whether they are abandoned by these particular noble ideas or not.
If, when so scrutinized, they are construable, then they can be accepted as such ;
For noble ideas do not arrive at the abandonment of defilements that are future 2 to them. Neither does any noble idea alone indiscriminately bring about the abandoning of all defilements.
As for example, while loving- kindness is profitable and lust unprofitable, yet taking loving- kindness as profitable does not bring about the abandoning of lust; it is in fact ill will not lust that comes to abandonment by means of lovingkindness.
So both sorts of defilement have to be scrutinized,
If these namely ill will and lust in this case 5 are construed when reserved, then there is nothing more to be scrutinized.
Either the two defilements may be abandonable by the one noble idea, 6 or else either one of the two defilements may be abandonable by two noble ideas successively.7
Or alternatively, also when only one, on being scrutinized, is construed, herein it must be inquired into how it is construed, namely by which noble idea, or it must be inquired into why it is that the Thread cannot 1 be demonstrated ; for no Thread must remain an object of uncertainty .
Any defilement’s lapse 1 when any noble ideas that are taught must be scrutinized in both the ways indicated above for lovingkindness as follows:
Or conversely do these noble ideas lead to the abandonment of these defilements?
still not all unprofitable ideas come to abandonment indiscriminately by means of any profitable ideas indiscriminately.
nor, simply by taking a profitable idea in a given Thread, 4 in this case lovingkindness, does that lead to the abandonment of all defilements indiscriminately.
In fact, it is only when a noble idea belonging to a particular Thread is a defilement’s opposite that that defilement comes to be abandoned by means of that noble idea.”
Herein, when the profitable taught in a particular verse or prose-exposition in the Thread and the corruptions taught there do not construe or the noble ideas do not construe , these should be reserved in accordance with the parts of the formula for scrutinizing demonstrable in the Principal Appeals to Authority .1
Herein, if, with the defilements taught and with that noble idea among the noble ideas-, those defilements do come to abandonment,
For there is one defilement abandonable by only one 2 noble idea,2 not in any other way: while view and lust 2 are abandonable by Seeing in the first Path, not so ignorance which is only abandonable by Arahantship.
And if ignorance or ideas belonging to the plane of Keeping-in-Being i.e. the last three paths and second and third fruits are abandonable in this way regarded collectively under “Keeping-in-Being”,
it is precisely that ignorance, which belongs to the further side fetters, which is abandoned through the kind of non-attention that is due to the deliverance’s signless heart-concentration for the purpose of seeing the undetermined.
That is how the Thread should be scrutinized in order to verify that it is .
When defilements are of the kind abandonable by Seeing, then the noble idea is taught in the mood of Seeing, when they are of the kind abandonable by Keeping-in-Being, then the noble idea is taught in the mood of Keeping-in-Being. When of the kind abandonable 2 by right use of the four requisites of the bhikkhu’s life, then the noble idea is taught in the mood of right use ; and so on from those abandonable by removal down to the end of the Thread dealing with the seven kinds of taints , which can be quoted..
In so far as this defilement idea is abandonable in the various other stages than that of Seeing,1 the noble idea will be appro-priately taught in another mood, and so that noble idea must be sought otherwise according to the mood.
If this defilement-idea gives the construing 2 for one when one is seeking it thus, then in whichever mood that noble idea can be sought out, that is the mood in which the particular defilement is abandoned.
And so that noble idea must be scrutinized therein with respect to the seven moods mentioned above .
and in so far as it is construable it can be accepted,
but in so far as it is not construable it cannot be accepted : , which is demonstrable according to the prescribed way of searching in the Principal Appeals to Authority. What is taught by the Blessed One is according to how things are. 265. Whatever the idea taught, profitable as well as unprofitable, that idea’s condition must be sought out ;
for no idea arises unconditioned, without a condition.
Herein, what is the mood for the search?
Herein, this Thread to be sought must be inq11ired into as to whether this 1 idea in question has been stated with the cause and with the condition appropriate thereto.
And the condition is of three kinds: slight, medium, and outstanding.1
When the condition is slight, what is unoutstanding 1 owing to it must be sought.
What is the reason?
It may be that a certain condition 2 comes to occurrence 3 or fulfilment through other conditions.
Herein, whatever the idea taught in this Thread that is being scrutinized, the cause of that must be sought either through that idea or through a Path-function.4
And like the condition, the outcome of that idea must be sought by cause and by condition.
That condition should be sought in the way that one seeks how the basic state was demonstrated 1 in the terms of expression of the particular Thread ;
for there is no slight idea that has an outstanding outcome, nor 2 does any outstanding outcome have a slight condition-idea. If 3 the slight is construable of the slight, 4 the medi11m of the medium, and the outstanding of the outstanding, that can be accepted. But if 3 it does not so construe, it cannot be accepted.
And whatever idea the Blessed One instigates initially in order to teach a particular teaching, that he teaches also in the middle and the end of it : he demonstrates in the beginning the idea 1 according as it is given in the terms of expression of that particular teaching, and only that idea appears much in it and is that Thread’s end;
for it is in virtue of that idea that that Thread comes to be such as it is in type, whether verse or prose-exposition, whether small or large. 271. But as the fixing 1 is twofold, namely fixing that is in conformity as well as fixing the actual teaching,
And just as the restraining of the five faculties of the eye, etc., taught by the Blessed One, in having for its purpose the curbing of craving,
teaches that that idea conveys his wish 2 as 3 in the simile of the Cattle-herd Thread in the Anguttara , when tested also by means of other Threads that the Blessed One has uttered, namely the thought 4 in the Majjhima Nikaya , it conveys his wish.2 This is what is in conformity with the Blessed One’s teaching. So this idea has to be sought also in other prose-expositions ;
for it cannot be regarded as sought out in only a single Thread.
When it construes, it can be accepted.
Herein, what is the agreed ?
When any Thread whatever is not uttered by the Blessed One and that Thread is found among the Threads too,
That Thread must be inquired into as follows : “ How then, does this Thread allow of the Blessed One’s agreement or does it not allow of his agreement?” And some Threads allow of the Blessed One’s agreement 1 and some Threads do not allow of his agreement.2
When someone teaches what is the Ten Powered One’s 3 province, doing so altogether without giving a way of entry to the main ideas in _his teaching ,’ that Thread does not allow of the Blessed One’s agreement .
But there is also the kind of hearer who knows the Ten Powered One’s province, doing so either limitedly or unlimitedly, yet he does not know that power itself at all beyond the hearing of it; as for instance, in the case of the divine exhorted by the venerable Sariputta. Now that venerable one had no Knowledge of Variety in Faculties and Powers , hence by his not knowing the Encompassing of Other Persons,6 while the divine had more he could still have done i.e. by attaining the Noble Path, he was made to reappear after death in the world of High Divinity, and so the venerable Sariputta was not congratulated by the Blessed One .
And as for instance, in the case of the venerable Maha-Kassapa 8 when he advised his nephew, 7 though he the nephew was possessed of unprofitable action ripening straightway upon rebirth, 7 the Elder lighting a finger by a feat of supernormal power ; 8 but since no 9 knowledge of how things are by cause and instance in the case of all Undertaking of Action existed in that venerable one, hence the Blessed One 10 advised him, saying:
( Even, o Kassapa, if thou Wilt carry ten such luminaries,
And again like a messenger who informs a creature of the king’s word, so the mere emulator 11 teaches to others speech he does not himself understand.
A Thread which has the agreed approval can be accepted ;
that which has not the agreed approval cannot be accepted.
Herein, what is Mixing-Up of Threads?
If one type would requite,1 he teaches another, and he demonstrates in one type of Thread the meaning of another type of Thread.
Or he demonstrates a Thread’s meaning 2 in several moods 3
He demonstrates 6 in those dealing with Seeing the meaning of one dealing with Morality.
He demonstrates in the further-side fetters the meaning of higher-side fetters.
He demonstrates in Threads dealing with outstanding faculties  the meaning of those dealing with blunt and medi11m faculties .7
So this Thread is thus broken up by him. The breaking up as to cause, outcome and fruit,1 as to the blunt, medium and outstanding state , and as to meaning and phrasing, is what is called” Mixing-Up of Threads”.
The non-breaking-up is what is called “ Investigation of Threads “.
Herein, this is a mnemonic verse :
The Elder Maha-Kaccayana’s
If, when the defilements or any one of them-are thus reserved, they still do not give the construing,1 then the ideas belonging to the noble paths must be scrutinized as follows : “Do these particular defilements come to abandonment in these particular planes, namely those of Seeing and Keeping-in-Being or do they not 1 “
Now a certain specific number of defilements may be taught, e.g., the ten fetters,
without any correspondingly equal number of noble ideas being taught, e.g., the four paths.
“Do two or three or more 3 defilements come to their abandonment by means of any single Path?
If, when thus inquired into, they give the construction, then that Thread must be scrutinized therein in regard to those defilements as follows:
“What is the Thread’s meaning and what is not its meaning according to the traditional interpretation or by what is given in the texts?”
rather it should be further investigated according as to whether the iaeas in the beginning are profitable instead of unprofitable .
- they must be scrutinized,
whether the profitable comes first or whether it is arrived at through its opposite’s coming first. The teaching must be taken as having nothing lacking or superfluous.
but if they are not so construable, then any defilements that are not opposites of those particular noble ideas cannot be opposed to them.
and any idea so disclosed,3 whether profitable or unprofitable, must be reserved.4
It seems that these 2 particular defilements are taught in this verse or prose-exposition: How then, are these defilements abandoned by these noble ideas or are they not?
For although unprofitable ideas do come to abandonment by means of profitable ideas,
As for example while lovingkindness is profitable and lust unprofitable, yet, taking lovingkindness as profitable and lust as unprofitable, lust does not come to abandonment by means of lovingkindness ; it is in fact ill will not lust that comes 3 to abandonment by means of loving- kindness .
Consequently defilement does not come 3 to abandonment in a given Thread simply by taking it as ‘ defilement’ indiscriminately,
then it should also be scrutinized as follows:
“ In which Path-function are these defilements abandonable? In which Path-function 1 are these noble ideas taught?
In whichever mood that is, as Seeing or as one of the stages of Keeping-in-Being the noble ideas are taught, that is the aspect in which this defilement stands in relation thereto.
Then if it still does not construe, the meaning of the actual Thread itself which is being sought out by means of that already tested other Thread must be inquired into,
Herein, when the condition is slight, the idea conditioned must be taken as slight. That being so, 2 this condition is again of two kinds: condition in remote relation and condition in immediate proximity .
the fixing of that idea must also be sought as to whether it is in conformity 1 with other Threads.
then according as it is uttered by whomsoever it may be, so it should be borne in mind .
Not even then will he see forms : That eye does not exist in him) .
The Thread is fivefold: the type of Thread Dealing with Corruption, the type of Thread Dealing with Morality, the type of Thread Dealing with Seeing, the type of Thread Dealing with Keeping-in-Being, and the type of Thread Dealing with the Adept .
and in the establishing of the particular noble idea taught there he divulges 4 a meaning not there .5
fourth chapter called “the Investigation of Threads “.
 Untornness of the first , and then Condition for what comes to be,
And Outcome with 1 with Morality, Agreement , and then Thread-Mixing-Up .
his mother was Queen Bandhumati,
and King Bandhuma’s royal capital was Bandhumati.
his mother was Queen Pabhavati;
King Aruna’s capital was Arunavatl.
his mother was Queen Yasavafi;
King Suppatlta’s capital was Anopama.
The king at that time was called Khema;
his capital was Khemavatl.
his mother was the Brahmin lady Uttara.
his capital was Sobhavat.
his mother was the Brahmin lady Dhanavati.
his capital was Varanasi.
Soon after the Lord had gone, another discussion arose among the monks: ‘It is marvellous, friends, it is wonderful, the Tathagata’s great power and ability —
and the Lord said:
one of six million eight hundred thousand, one of a hundred thousand, and one of eighty thousand monks, all Arahants.
his mother was Queen Bandhumati.
And so, monks, the Bodhisatta Vipassi descended from the Tusita heaven, mindful and clearly aware, into his mother’s womb.
This, monks, is the rule.’
‘It is the rule, monks, that when a Bodhisatta descends from the Tusita heaven into his mother’s womb,
And whatever dark spaces lie beyond the world’s end, chaotic, blind and black, such that they are not even reached by the mighty rays of sun and moon, are yet illumined by this im-measurable splendid light surpassing the glory of the most powerful devas.
And those beings that have been reborn there recognise each other by this light and know: “Other beings, too, have been bom here!”
And this ten-thousandfold world-system trembles and quakes and is convulsed.
And this immeasurable light shines forth.
That is the rule.
‘It is the rule that when a Bodhisatta has entered his mother’s womb, four devas266 come to protect him from the four quar¬ters, saying: “Let no man, no non-human bei^§, no thing whatever harm this Bodhisatta or this Bodhisatta’s mother!”
That is the rule.
It is the rule that when a Bodhisatta has entered his mother’s womb, his mother becomes by nature virtuous, re¬fraining from taking life, from taking what is not given, from sexual misconduct, from lying speech, or from strong drink and sloth-producing drugs.
That is the rule.
‘It is the rule that when a Bodhisatta has entered his mother’s womb, she has no sensual thoughts connected with a man, and she cannot be overcome by any man with lustful thoughts.
That is the rule.
‘It is the rule that when a Bodhisatta has entered his mother’s womb, she enjoys the fivefold pleasures of the senses
That, is the rule.
‘It is the rule that when a Bodhisatta has entered his mother’s womb, she has no sickness of any kind,
Monks, it is as if a gem, a beryl, pure, excellent, well cut into eight facets, clear, bright, flawless and perfect in every respect,
And a man with good eyesight, taking it in his hand, would describe it as such.
Thus does the Bodhisatta’s mother, with no sickness, see him, complete with all his members and faculties.
That is the rule.
‘It is the rule that the Bodhisatta’s mother dies seven days after his birth and is reborn in the Tusita heaven.
‘It is the rule that whereas other women carry the child in their womb for nine or ten months before giving birth,
That is the rule.
‘It is the rule that whereas other women give birth sitting or lying down,
That is the rule.
‘It is the rule that when the Bodhisatta issues from his mother’s womb, devas welcome him first, and then humans.
That is the rule.
‘It is the rule that when the Bodhisatta issues from his mother’s womb, he does not touch the earth. Four devas receive him and place him before his mother, saying: “Rejoice, Your Majesty, a mighty son has been born to you!”
That is the rule.
‘It is the rule that when the Bodhisatta issues from his mother’s womb he issues forth stainless, not defiled by water, mucus, blood or any impurity, pure and spotless.
Just as when a jewel is laid on muslin from Kasi, the jewel does not stain the muslin, or the muslin the jewel.
Why not?
Be cause of the purity of both.
In the same way the Bodhisatta issues forth stainless…
‘It is the rule that when the Bodhisatta issues forth from his mother’s womb, two streams of water appear from the sky, one cold, the other warm, with which they ritually wash the Bodhisatta and his mother.
That is the rule.
‘It is the rule that as soon as he is bom the Bodhisatta takes a firm stance on both feet facing north, then takes seven strides and, under a white sunshade, he scans the four quarters and then declares with a bull-like voice: “I am chief in the world, supreme in the world, eldest in the world. This is my last birth, there will be no more re-becoming.”
That is the rule.
It is the rule that when the Bodhisatta issues from his mother’s womb there appears in this world… an immeasurable, splendid light… .
This is the rule.
there appears in this world with its devas, maras and Brahmas, its ascetics and Brahmins, princes and people an immeasurable, splendid light surpassing the glory of the most powerful devas.
and takes delight, being endowed and possessed of them.
she is at ease and without fatigue of body, and she can see the Bodhisatta inside her womb, complete with all his members and faculties.
were strung on a blue, yellow, red, white or orange cord.
That is the rule.
it is not so with the Bodhisatta’s mother, who carries him for exactly ten months before giving birth.
it is not so with the Bodhisatta’s mother, who gives birth standing up.
That is the rule.
whose father died…whose brother died…whose sister died…whose son died…whose daughter died…whose wife died.
whom she did not want.
whom I do not want.’
Herein, what is the Separate Treatment of the Modes of Conveying?
Where the sixteen Modes of Conveying a Communication are separately handled according to the letter,
Here is a verse for it: Profit? Unprofit? All Truths, or but one part of Truths?-1
Inquiring thus into a Thread, This Mode it is Conveys a Teaching.2
As shown in the presentation of Noble Truth ,1 there are four Truths shared and unshared .
These are the eighteen terms. 280. As to Suffering, there are in brief the seven terms with bodily and mental pain, association with the loathed, dissociation from the loved, and the three characteristics of the determined .
Herein, the three characteristics of the determined are the three kinds of painfulness . Arising-as-a-characteristic-of- the-determined is a painfulness in virtue of the painfulness-in- determinations ; subsidence 1-as-a-characteristic-of-the-determined is a painfulness in virtue of the painfi1lness-in-change ; alteration- of-what-is-steady-as-a-characteristic-of-the-determined is a pain- fulness in virtue of the painfulness-as-pain. 282. As to the three feeling-planes of these three characteristics of the determined, neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling is arising-as-a- characteristic-of-the-determined 1 and is a painfulness in virtue of the painfulness-in-determinations. Pleasant feeling is subsidence-as- a-characteristic-of-the-determined and is a painfulness in virtue of the painfulness-as-change. Painful feeling is alteration-of-what-is- steady-as-a-characteristic-of-the-determined and is a painfulness in virtue of the painfulness-as-pain. 283. So suffering can be sought for in these sixteen terms, that is, in these nine 1 terms and in the previous seven . Also a characteristic of suffering is demonstrated in the Book of Demonstrations by eleven kinds of painfulness .
Also the fifteen terms, namely “ Birth has the characteristic of causing to be manifest … down to … Decease-and- Reappearance has the characteristic of decease and manifestation” can be quoted in detail. 284. So this Truth is taught, and is taught how it comes to be, thus : shared and unshared Threads in the seven and in the ten 1 terms , and in the fiftyfold 2 “Pattern of the Dispensation “ , and in the eighteenfold 3 “ Terms of Expression of the Thread “ , and in the tenfold 4 “ Testings of the Thread” , and in the sixteenfold Modes of Conveying , and in the twenty-one-fold Investigation- Inquiry .5
This is called the Mode of Conveying a Teaching.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying an Investigation?
 Term ; questions ; asking ; what before, What after;
 Term: 1 first the term-
When the Blessed One was asked by the venerable Ajita, that can be taken thus: how many terms 2 are asked about? Like what? The verse: . How many terms are these? Four.3 So much is the asking for an answer.
The terms are answered by the Blessed One with the same number of terms as in the asking, and these are the explaining of the terms. This is what is called “ term “.
One, or two, or more than that ? These four terms are one question ; 1 for the phrasing is subordinate to the meaning . Although the terms are several, the meaning he asks about is only one.
That these four terms are subordinate is due to the phrasing, the question being only one.
For with the term “ Tell what is the world shut in by ? “ he asks with reference to the world. And with the terms “And whereby is it not displayed? And what is it besmeared with? Say” he asks about the same world, and with the term
“And what will be its greatest fear ? “ he asks about that same world.
That is how the phrasing is subordinate to the meaning and how the question is only one. Now “question” is of four kinds: declarable unilaterally, declarable after analysis, declarable by asking a counter-question, and unacceptable .
Herein, when it is asked”’ Is the eye impermanent? “ that is declarable unilaterally in the affirmative. When it is asked” Is what is impermanent painful?” that is declarable after analysis ; for there is what is impermanent and not an eye; and also the bases that are not the eye-base are also impermanent, not only the eye. This is what is declarable after analysis. When it is asked “ Does the eye guide 2 the eye faculty ? “ that is declarable by asking a counter-question. When it is asked “ Is that eye a Perfect One ? “ that is an unacceptable question,
and likewise “Is a Perfect One apart from the eye?”.
This is” questions “. 288. As to what the Blessed One is asked, : he is asked about the world’s corruption.
For what reason ?
Because corruption is of three kinds: corruption by craving, corruption by view, and corruption by misconduct .
Herein, with the reply  he teaches ignorance. By “ hankering “ he teaches craving. By “ greatest fear “ he teaches ripening of unprofitable action. What the Blessed One answers is this: “That such kind of ripening of action as is experienceable as pleasure shall be experienceable as pain, no such instance is found.” 290. When it was said by the Blessed One with four terms, namely “ By ignorance is the world shut in, … “,
then it was asked further1 , in which he asks four terms, and the Blessed One answers it with two terms as follows :
( Whatever streams are in the world They are shut, off by mindfulness;
What is this that is asked 1 1 What is asked about is the cleansing of that corrupted world. 292. The “streams” are the , which are demonstrated in the plural in virtue of all the six external bases.
With the question “ What is it that shuts off the streams?” he asks about the abandoning of obsession. With the question “ Whereby is it that streams are sealed? “ he asks about eradication of underlying tendencies .
Herein, the Blessed One teaches by way of mindfulness in the six doors; for when someone abides aware with mindfulness as doorkeeper his faculties beginning with that of the eye are 1 guarded.
Herein, the faculties being guarded,2 when there is any insight, that conduces to the complete abandonment of any streams and of that ignorance 8 whereby the world is shut in.
That is how the streams are sealed off.4 294. After that, he asked further
 , having come in order to ask 1 the Blessed One where name-and-form is set at rest. The Blessed One answered these four terms with one term:
( “ As to the question that you ask, Ajim, I shall tell you now:
With cessation of consciousness ‘Tis here that this is set at rest” ) .
What does he ask with this question!
He asks about 1 the element of extinction without trace left. The Blessed One answered him with the element of extinction without trace left.
Herein, with the first question he asks about corruption,
(“There are these Masters of ideas, 2 And several Initiates here:
Now how many questions are these?4 They are those about the Arahant “Masters of ideas” and about the “ Initiates “.
 “ What is before, what after” : the meaning is this: 1
“Herein, which does he ask about first and which last?”
He asks about the Arahant first
and about the ideas of the Initiate with the corresponding term. The Arahants are referred to by the phrase “Masters of ideas” while the Initiates are referred to by the phrase” the several”.
With the phrase” You have skill to tell me their “ he asks the Blessed One a term shared in common with both.
Now shared and unshared questions can be asked of him.
The Blessed One sometimes, as in this case, answers such questions
not in the same order as that in which the questions are asked.2 Here he answers afterwards what was asked first
And what is this that he asked? 3 He asks this: “What is the behaviour of those already purified and of those still being purified? “ That is answerable as follows : 299. (“Sensual desires he would not want,
He would be undisturbed in mind, … “ ) . Here the Blessed One shuts off the obsessions produced by the thought of sensual desires; but 1 there is also the obsession due to disturbedness by the other two kinds of thoughts namely those of ill will and cruelty as demonstrated among the in-shuttings .2
With the phrase “Skilled 3 in all ideas” he answers about the Arahant asked about first.
Now as to the verse beginning. , these are four terms in the whole verse.
The questions are four too.
What is the reason? It is because here the phrasing is not subordinate to the meaning 1 like Ajita’s first question , where the answers were not unilaterally plural, since the questions there, though plural in phrasing were only one in meaning. 2 Also, while in the first Ajita question the fourth was answered after he had already asked the other three questions and had been answered, it is not so here,3 since here it is a seeking out how things come to be, and accordingly one seeks the answers 4 as to how things come to be, doing so by the term-connexion.
As to the question 5 which he asks here again 6 in this way, herein, this is simply  a mood of the questioning. 6 301. Now the verse 1 beginning  must be traced out by means of the answer to this question.
How is it answered? Herein, the Blessed One answers with the
Herein, “keeping a pure heart in being” is quiet, while “keeping understanding in being “ is insight.
Herein, he infers as follows : The” inner tangle and the outer tangle” are any ideas abandoned by means of quiet and insight.
As to the answer herein, lust is abandoned by means of quiet and ignorance is abandoned by means of insight.
The lust which has what is in oneself for its ground is the “ inner tangle “ while the lust which has what is external for its ground is the “ outer tangle “.
And the embodiment-view with what is in oneself for its ground is the “ inner tangle “
while the sixty-one 2 types of view with what is external for their ground are the “outer tangle”. In fact whatever, due to lust and to view-type, will exist there regarding what is in oneself and what is external,3 this is the “tangle”.
So in brief any craving and view whatever with what is in oneself for their ground are the “ inner tangle “
And according as a deity asked the Blessed One, there is the verse: .
Herein, the Blessed One answered with the verse : .1 303. What the Blessed One answers with is the Way Leading to Cessation of Suffering.
With this answer the Blessed One infers the defilements here from what is demonstrable by the first verse.
For either the “ four wheels “ are the four hands and feet,
and the “ nine doors “ are the nine bodily orifices,
or else 1 the “ four wheels” are the four assumings-and with assuming as condition, being : with cessation of assuming, cessation of being ,
“Full of associated greed” is lust for the five strands of sensual desire.
Herein, it is “ the tie “ that is answered by craving
and “the trace” by conceit. “Evil greed for wishes” is lust for the five strands of sensual desire.
Herein, it is  he demonstrates as “ evil “.
“ Craving with its root “ 3 is . “Expelling” 3 is the abandoning of the craving rooted in unknowing and of view.
And again any other ideas leading to the roundabout whatever that construe 4 for that same reason in association with the “four wheels “ can all be demonstrated.
So 5 this verse-answer agrees with the question.6
 Now if there is any recapitulation with a summary,1 then this Investigation becomes an inquiry into a paraphrasing-verse together with its prose-exposition that it recapitulates, and this in order to see whether the Blessed One paraphrases in verse as many terms as he presents in the prose-exposition.
For example: 305. .
Now these eight meaning-terms presented here in this prose-exposition
the Blessed One paraphrases in verse by six terms 1 as follows :
(He is undismayed when come before A parliament assembly,
He does not lose his thread of Speech, He does not hide his mission’s aim,
He can expound views not his own, When questioned, he is undisturbed :
, and the paraphrasing-verse , can be quoted in detail. This where seven terms are presented in the prose the Blessed One paraphrases in verse by seven terms.
So sometimes the verse-paraphrases with more when the presentation in the prose has fewer terms, or when the prose presentation has more terms he verse-paraphrases with fewer.1
This is what was called “ and a verse-paraphrase’s investigation “ . This is the Mode of Conveying an Investigation.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Construing?
In the case of the Thread’s Conveyings’ Plane, resort, outcome,
Such inquiry as “ Does this question construe or does it not construe in the Threads?” 1 is Construing.
Now what 2 is the cause, what is the condition, for that path? 312. There are four 1 causes and four conditions for the Virtue Category of the Path:
 waiting on True Men and living in befitting places are a condition through assumptive conditionality.2
 When there is any old appropriate action,3 its ripening is a condition. And through that same conditionality, 4 there is right direction in self-guidance, which is a cause .
So the Path’s Virtue Category has a cause and has a condition. This is virtue belonging to worlds.
But as to virtue dissociated from worlds, that has three faculties as condition, namely the faith faculty, the energy faculty, and the concentration faculty. These are a condition.
The mindfulness faculty and the understanding faculty are a cause;
and also the virtue of the fruit of Stream-Entry. Hence these faculties are the cause, these are the condition.
Since, moreover, the “tranquillity” and “happiness “ and “ gladness “ are a condition for concentration,
and since the “ pleasure “ is a cause, hence the Concentration Category of the Path has a cause and has a condition.
And since “one who is concentrated understands how things are” this is understanding.
For that another’s utterance and reasoned attention in oneself are the cause and the condition . So these three categories of the Path have a cause and have a condition.
Inquiry thus” Does this construe or does it not construe?” in regard to Threads concerning what is declarable unilaterally or after analysis or by a counter-question  1
is the Mode of Conveying a Construing.
And that Mode of Conveying can also be seen in the four Principal Appeals to Authority .
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Footings?
The five faculties beginning with the eye are a footing for lust for form.
The mind faculty-is a footing for lust for being.
The five categories beginning with form are a footing for the embodiment-view.
The sixty-one 2 types of view are a footing for lust for views.
The sensual-desire element is a footing for lust for sensual desires.3
The formless element is a footing for lust for the formless.
Perception of pleasure is a footing for lust for sensual desires.
Perception of ill will is a footing for ill will.
Unawareness is a footing for confusion.
The nine grounds for annoyance are a footing for ill will.
The nine positions of conceit 4 are a footing for conceit.
Pleasant feeling is a footing for the underlying tendency to lust.
Painful feeling is a footing for the underlying tendency to resistance.
Neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling is a footing for the underlying tendency to ignorance .
Self-theory assuming and false speech are a footing for greed.
Killing breathing things and malicious speech and harsh speech are a footing for ill will.
Wrongness and gossip are a footing for delusion.
Inequality in existence and in property is a footing for I-making.
Appropriation of external objects is a footing for my-making.
Bodily crookedness is a footing for view.
Bodily fault is a footing for hate .5
Bodily coloration is a footing for greed.
Or in fact when any 1 idea arises by means of any object, whether the idea is expressed in terms of creatures 1 or expressed in terms of ideas , its footing is accordingly 1
Just as, when a man 1 finds a 2 footing for his foremost foot, he raises his second foot and brings it forward past that foot,
but if he 3 finds no footing for his second foot, he does not 3 raise the other foot
since there is no condition for it,
so too an idea, whether profitable or unprofitable or undeclared does not occur when it finds no footing,
owing to 4 non-obtainment 4 of a reason for the idea so 5 produced. This is called the Mode of Conveying Footings.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Characteristics?
When one idea is mentioned, all Ideas of like characteristic
Are by that mentioned : here abides The Mode Conveying Characteristics.
For example, when in the verse  mindfulness occupied with the body is mentioned, then mindfulness occupied with feelings, with cognizance, and with ideas are also mentioned by the single Fonndation of Mindfulness’s representing all four Foundations of Mindfulness ; 1
for cognizance does not occur in only a single Steadying-point for consciousness , it occurs in the different ways simultaneously, so when mindfulness occupied with the body is mentioned, then that occupied with feelings, with cognizance, and with ideas, is mentioned as well.
For it is not that when mindfulness occupied with the body is kept in being then the rest of the four Fonndations of Mindfulness do not 2 come to fulfilment by keeping in being.
So when any among like ideas 3 are mentioned then all those ideas with that same general characteristic are mentioned.
Again, in the verse “And purifying one’s own heart: This is the Buddhas’ Dispensation” ideas concomitant with cognizance are mentioned. And when “heart ” is mentioned form is also mentioned.
This is the name-and-form that is the Noble Truth of Suffering.
Consequently in the” purifying” of” one’s own heart ” what one purifies is Suffering,
what one purifies by is the Path,
what one purifies from is origin, and 1 the purifying is Cessation.
Again, . Herein, the conascent feeling, perception, choice, contact, and attention , are ideas with a single general characteristic in virtue of the characteristic of assuming.
He who 1 finds dispassion in form finds dispassion in feeling, and he also finds dispassion in perception,2 determinations, and consciousness.
So when any one of those ideas that have a single general characteristic is demonstrated, all the rest of those ideas with that same general characteristic are demonstrated too. This is called the Mode of Conveying Characteristics.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Fourfold Array?
 Language by way of phrasing, Purport, The Teaching’s Source,1 and
 Herein, what is Language? How is that to be seen?
According as it is said by the Blessed One 3 .
What is taught? past, future, and present,1
He 2 looks that Thread over as to phrasing and as to language-skill for the correctness or incorrectness of the Thread’s language thus: This should be inflected 3 thus,
This is called Skill in Language.
 Herein, what is Skill in Purport?
It is skill in knowing how a section of a Thread taught comes to be taught by the Blessed One with this particular intent .1
Like what 1 As follows: .2
What is the Blessed One’s Purport here?
It is that those who wish 3 for coolness 3 will abide diligent. This is the purport here .
Again : 1 No one turns back time for devotion, and while Feelings there are not yet overwhelming, let one keep in being
What is the Blessed One’s Purport here?
This is the Blessed One’s purport here.
So the Purport in what is taught by verse or by prose-exposition is the establishment 1 that through such a Thread one practises an idea in accordance with the True Idea. This is what is called the Teaching’s purport.
 Herein,1 what is Consecutive-Sequence ?
Since in a verse or in prose  Threads the terms are multiple 2 in this way or in that,3 the preceding terms and the subsequent terms belonging to such 4 verse or prose Threads must be taken together.
That sequence is known 1 as to its consecutivity as follows :
When one verse in two or three 2 is embarked upon for search, the meaning of the verse spoken 3 as one part thereof is 4 yet undemonstrated owing to some verses being still not spoken ; 3 what is still to be said 5 must be compared with that.
So while he who is searching has doubts about the search , that person has still 6 to search further in another of the descriptions still unspoken  .
This is what is called sequence by consecutivity.
Skill : 1 Skill in source as circumstance,
 skill in the teaching’s purport,
Herein, when a verse is searched for that in order to obtain the source, etc.,1
the meaning does not have to be demonstrated separately since skill in sources as circumstances is skill in meanings. When the meaning 2 is being sought out by means of these four terms it is sought out according to how it is.
And then all 3 that is, either the source as circumstance or the purport, the language as phrasing, and the sequence 3 is in consecutivity when not a conclusion.4 That is how it can be taught as to the Thread’s meaning.
This is the Mode of Conveying a Fourfold Array.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Conversion?
The Mode that, when there is one footing, Seeks out the footing that remains
Like what? For example, the verse : .
This 1 negligence, what is it the footing for?
Now the relinquishment of profitable ideas,2 what is that the footing for?
Using unprofitable ideas, what is that the footing for?
So in the case of negligence, 2 while it is view that sides 2 with delusion it is craving 2 that sides with will and lust.
The craving and the view herein are the four taints : the craving is the taint of sensual desire and the taint of being, while the view 1 is the taint of views and the taint of ignorance.
Herein, the view that there is self 1 in cognizance is the taint of views, 1 and that there is permanence in the concomitants of cognizance is the taint of ignorance ; 1 the taint of sensual desire is due to bias 2 towards sensual desires, and the taint of being consists in clutching at reappearance.
while the name-body is a footing for the taint of views and the taint of ignorance.
Herein, the characteristic of the taint of sensual desire is any sticking to and bias 1 towards the external five bases adhered to.2
The characteristic of the taint of being is the determining of a physical or mental body by aspiration, ties, and determinative acts. 3 The characteristic of the taint of views is insistence and misapprehension.
The characteristic of the taint of ignorance is non-penetration of the four Truths and unawareness of ideas.4
These four taints are the four assumings :
the taint of sensual desire is sensual-desire-assuming, the taint of being is being-assuming, the taint of views is view-assuming, and the taint of ignorance is self-theory-assuming. 343. With these four assumings there are the five categories.1
Herein, the taint of views 1 can be abandoned in cognizance; it is abandoned in one contemplating cognizance as cognizance.
The taint of ignorance 1 can be abandoned in ideas; it is abandoned in one contemplating ideas as ideas.
The taint of being can be abandoned in clutching at reappearance; it is abandoned in one contemplating feelings as feelings.
The taint of sensual desire can be abandoned in the five strands of sensual desire ; it is abandoned in one contemplating the body as a body.
Herein, contemplation of the body belongs with the Noble Truth of Suffering.
Contemplation of feelings, since the condition for the five affective faculties-for the pleasure faculty, pain faculty, joy faculty, grief faculty, and onlooking-equanimity faculty-is the approach thereto by craving as creatures’ defilement,1 belongs therefore with the Noble Truth of Origin.
Contemplation of cognizance belongs with Cessation.
Contemplation of ideas belongs with the Path.
And by this seeing of his in the four instances all his taints are abandoned which 1 were earlier demonstrated thus “And for the proud, the negligent, their taints increase “ ;
One seeks profitable 1 ideas in the sense opposite to the unprofitable and to like extent. One converts by the abandoning 2 of these defilements.3
Herein, the plane of the Mode of Conveying a Conversion is this: Mindfulness and its four Foundations ,1 and their opposites the four Perversions, and the four kinds of knowledge of the four Truths, the way leading to arising of embodiment and the way leading to cessation of embodiment.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying an Analysis?1
Anything at all that is “ declarable after analysis “ is called the Mode of Conveying an Analysis.
Like what? 2 , this being in no way the kind of question for further questioning. This is called the Mode of Conveying an Analysis.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Reversal?
Any demonstration of an opposite is called the Mode of Conveying a Reversal,
according as it is said by the Blessed One ,1 which can be quoted in detail in regard to all the remaining path-factors.
This is called the Mode of Conveying a Reversal.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Synonyms?
Displayed by many synonyms: So synonyms this Mode conveys.
As for example, when the venerable Siriputta was praised in one instance namely that of understanding by the Blessed One with variously stated synonyms thus : . These are synonyms for understanding.
And as for example the meaning of outlet in the Magga- Vibhanga ,1 where each path-factor is demonstrated by synonyms.
So too the synonyms for ignorance,
which is one of the unprofitable roots, and which, while it remains that same unprofitable root, people understand by means of this or that synonym in such and such countries ;
In the passage  sensual desires are called by that synonym for them.
In the passage 1 he calls 2 those same sensual desires “ mire “ .1
In the passage 3 those same sensual desires he calls 2 “ dirt “.
So when any such idea is taught in the Thread 1 thus, the search is as follows : What 1 idea is this a name for 1
This is the Mode of Conveying Synonyms.
When he demonstrates a Thread thus , that is a description in terms of presentation.
Description in terms of origin is as follows: 1
(If there is will and there is lust … for physical nutriment … down to … a standing-point
By  he describes a description in terms of abandoning.
Now by the verse  he describes craving by a description in terms of the agreeable; 2
but with a description in terms of the agreeable thus it is still the same one idea the Blessed One describes ;
for while taking it that craving is the origin of suffering, nevertheless craving is not demonstrable as origin in every instance,3 as for example in the passage
 , which is a description in terms of rejection.6
So for all ideas, both profitable and unprofitable. 362. And whatever is a particular idea’s own field, it is only 1 that idea that occurs there,
For this description is of two kinds: description-in-terms-of- dependence-on-another and description-in-terms-of-self-dependence.2
What is the description in terms of self-dependence?
( Bkikkhus, keep concentration in being.One who is concentrated … understands how it is …
“ Form is impermanent “ : that is how he understands how it is ) : this is a description in terms of self-dependence 1 when applied to the concentration category. And that 1 description is also a description in terms of dependence- on-another when applied to the associated Path-categories of understanding and virtue. As for example, in the passage ,
while that statement has the concentration faculty outstanding, the other four faculties are blunt and they, in fact,2 are dependent-on-another with respect to that concentration. In the case of the three 2 kinds of confidence due to undergoing which are faith’s field the concentration faculty is dependent-on-another namely faith. In the case of the four Truths, the four faculties of faith, energy, mindfulness, and concentration are dependent- on-another 3 namely understanding, and the understanding faculty which has the Truths for its field is then not dependent-on-another. In the case of the Foundations of Mindfullness, the mindfulness faculty 4 is not dependent-on-another, and in the case of the Right Endeavours, the energy faculty is not.
So when any idea has self-dependence in its own footing and its own field ,1 that idea should be described with respect thereto.
The counteraction of it can be demonstrated from its opposite.
Here in this Mode of Conveying description has many moods, which is why this idea is described thus.
This is called Description.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Ways of Entry?
In what six?
There is no Thread, whether verse or prose-exposition,
that does not exhibit one or other of these 2 six ideas.
For the whole extent of the Teaching 3 is about either the Categories or the Bases or the Faculties 4 or the Truths or Dependent Arising. 367. Herein, it is the feeling category that, among the five categories, is the footing for lust, hate, and delusion.
Herein, there are three kinds of feeling in that feeling category, wherein the pleasant feeling has the approach with joy,1 the painful has the approach with grief,1 and the neither-painful-nor-pleasant has the approach with onlooking-equanimity.1
Again, whatever is felt there among these three kinds of feeling is the Truth of Suffering . 368. Now as to the determinations category among the categories: herein, a body occurs for one 1 who has acted negligently. And that negligent action is included among determinations ; and action is a way of entry to the factors of being 2 in two ways. And the three kinds of determinations-determinative acts of merit, determinative acts of demerit, and determinative acts of imperturbability -are a root-cause for all kinds of personalities with lust,8 though not for the lust-free; 4 And likewise the determinative acts of hate. It is one not without lust who “ chooses and determinatively acts “ ; it is one without lust 4 who cc neither 5 chooses nor determinatively acts” 6 .
Just as a hot thunderbolt falling on a log or a tree or elsewhere splits and burns it, so does choice with lust choose and determinatively act; as a cold 7 thunderbolt neither splits nor burns it, so lust-free choice neither chooses nor determinatively acts.8
Herein, there is one among the five categories which belongs to the kind of physical frame without faculties, namely the perception category.1
Herein, when the ten elements having form are being taught, the form category can be demonstrated, which is the Noble Truth of Suffering .
Also when the six bodies of consciousness with the mind as seventh are being taught, there the consciousness category can be demonstrated, which is the Noble Truth of Suffering.
The idea element is the meeting-place of the different 1 ideas, and that idea can be demonstrated by cause and outcome and fruit , and by function and word, whichever applies,
whether that idea element is profitable or unprofitable or undeclared or undetermined .
Of the twelve Bases, ten bases have form namely the first five pairs, and these can be demonstrated as the Noble Truth of Suffering,1
The idea base is the meeting-place of the different ideas.
Herein, ideas belonging to those with faculties can be demonstrated among those with faculties, and ideas belonging to those without faculties can be demonstrated among those without faculties,1
And as the idea element, so the idea base can be sought out ;
for what the idea element is that the idea base is too, neither less nor more .
Herein,1 there is Dependent Arising in three ways, there is that in four ways, and there is that in two ways.
Herein, there is Dependent Arising in three ways as cause, fruit, and outcome .
Then ignorance, determinations, craving, and assuming, are the cause ; consciousness, name-and-form, the sixfold base, contact, and feeling, are the fruit ; 1 being, birth,1 and ageing-and-death are the outcome.
How in four ways? As cause, condition, ripening, and outcome,
ignorance and craving, determinations and assuming : these are the cause.
Consciousness is name-and-form’s condition,
Being is the ripening.1
How is there Dependent Arising in two ways?
Ignorance, determinations, cravings, and assuming, are Origin.
Consciousness, name-and-form, the sixfold base, contact, feeling, being, birth, ageing-and- death are Suffering.
But since with cessation of ignorance, cessation of determinations, etc., these, as the opposites, are the other two Truths.
Therefore whatever Dependent Arising can be made a way of entry by, that is what it can be demonstrated by.1
Herein, the twelve faculties,2 that is, the eye-faculty, … down to 8 … the grief faculty, are Suffering.
it then becomes subject to lust in oneself :
this is I-making. Being thus lustful, it seeks an object externally: this is my-making. Likewise the female. Herein, the pleasure faculty and the joy faculty are sub-ordinate 6 to the masculinity faculty.
When the man’s ideas of greed have their purport fulfilled, they increase the unprofitable ;
but if his purport fails to be fulfilled,
But if he keeps onlooking-equanimity 7 in being, the onlooking-equanimity faculty has parallel occurrence with the masculinity faculty, 7
So there are seven faculties, neither more nor less ,1 due to assuming an object for defilement, namely feeling of all five kinds and and the femininity faculty and masculinity faculty.
Herein, the eight faculties, namely the faith faculty … down to … the final-knower faculty are the way leading to Cessation of Suffering.
Of the twelve 1 faculties, the five faculties 1 beginning with that of the eye are a footing for lust for sensual desires,
Herein, whatever faculty a Thread,” whether verse “ or prose, can be made a way of entry by, that is what it can be demonstrated by.
That is how ways of entry can be found in the cases of the Categories, Elements, Bases, Faculties Truths, and moods of Dependent Arising . This is the Mode of Conveying Ways of Entry.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Clearing Up?
Several verses may express a single instigation.1
Like what? For example the verse: .2 This single verse has yet to be demonstrated.3
What is the reason? There is still expectation of more to come owing to the instigations not having yet been stated.4
( The wise, then, recognizing this As diligence’s rare distinction,
In diligence rejoice, delighting In the way of Noble Ones) .
Also this verse’s meaning has yet to be demonstrated.3
What is the reason? There is still something remaining unstated there too, namely the verse ·
 .So when these verses 5 are collated, then the meaning can be demonstrated.
So when a single indication is stated in regard to Threads, whether verse or prose-expositions, not yet heard,
any inquiry is an examination with the following task: 1 “This Thread has been stated ; is its synonym 2 demonstrated yet or not?”,
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Terms of Expression?
It is unity and diversity.
Herein, the description in terms of operator 1 and the description in terms of operation 1 are respectively the unity and the diversity.
For example, what is a description i.e. a “ making- understood “  according to the single synonym as a unity is, according to diversity,2 expressible as follows” It understands , thus it is understanding , and that understanding is, in the sense of dominance,
the understanding faculty , 3
and, in the sense of non-lapse , 4 the understanding power.
When made to exist accordingly , the mindfulness cultivating a triple province,1 which is recollection of the three Jewels, namely Recollection of the Enlightened One, Recollection of the True Idea, and Recollection of the Community, is a diversity, but it is a unity as a state of undistorted recollection.
Briefly what are the four Paths as unity and diversity? It is with non-confounding of the basic idea, namely” path” that they are a unity, just as water when combined with heat is “hot water “ and when combined with cold it is “ cold water “, “ biting water”, and “frozen water” : this is the unity and the diversity.1
Again, there is the type of idea that is a bringing together 1 of different ideas combined together, as for instance form, 2 which consists of the four obstructibles,3 is a unity as “form”
That is how all the four_ elements are a unity as “form “ but are a diversity as” the element of earth” and” the elements of wate are a diversity as “the element of earth” and “the elements of water, fire, and air “.
“ Earth element “ : by its specific characteristic of hardness  is a unity, but it is a diversity as the physical basis namely the body,
where the 32 parts are mixed up; for whatever the specific characteristic, that is all a unity as” earth element”,
That is how all four elements, as” forms”, are a unity,
Again, there is the type of idea that through its diversity gets another name,
as for instance Contemplation of the Body as the “Nine Perceptions”, namely perception of a corpse as “discoloured”, perception of it as” bloated”, … : this is “ perception of ugliness “, and so that which by perception of ugliness is a unity is a diversity 1 in virtue of its object. 398. That same 1 perception in one contemplating disappointment in feelings is, when expressed in such terms, the concentration faculty. And that same perception as “perception of not-self” 2 in ideas is, as keeping-in-being, the energy faculty and it is contemplation of ideas as ideas, and in one abandoning perception of self in cognizance it is the understanding faculty and it is contemplation of cognizance as cognizance. 399. So any 1 access to knowledge whatever is in all cases, as understanding, understanding of a particular province : this is the diversity. Likewise” lust for sensual desires”,” lust for being”, and” lust for views”, are the diversity in the case of craving, which as such is a unity.
So any knowledge, inquiry, or examination,1 concerning unity and diversity
Herein, what is the mode of Conveying Requisites?
Cleansing and corruption too Are both with cause and with condition ; The search for both of these is called The Mode Conveying Requisites.
So the cause for ideas-with-a-cause must be sought out and the condition for those with a condition must be sought out.
Herein, what is the difference between the cause and the condition ?
The same-essence is the cause and the other-essence is the condition ;
The generator is the cause while the receiver is the condition.
The resident is the cause while the visitor is the condition.
The unshared is the cause while the shared is the condition.
The cause is one only while the condition has distant consecutivity ;
Herein, the condition is twofold as 1 condition-in-immediate- proximity and condition-in-remote-relation .
The cause is also twofold as cause-in-immediate-proximity and cause-in-remote- relation.
Herein, what is the condition-in-remote-relation?
if there is cessation of ignorance in the beginning, 2 there is also cessation of name-and-form.
Herein, why immediate succession 1 (Because the condition-in-remote-relation is procured 3 through 4 the condition-in-immediate-proximity. This is as to condition.
Herein, what is cause-in-remote-relation?
for when something generates something next to it, it is its cause too. With cessation of ignorance,1 cessation of determinations ; 1 with cessation of determinations, cessation of consciousness.1
And 1 that condition 1 is dependently arisen.1 As ignorance is a condition, what is its condition? That is unreasoned attention.
And ignorance is a condition for what? For determinations. So it i.e. ignorance is a condition and is dependently arisen. 407. What is its cause? Ignorance itself;
for it is in this way that “ no past beginning is evident “ .
Herein, ignorance as underlying-tendency is the cause of ignorance as manifest- obsession: the prior is the cause for the subsequent.1 That second kind of ignorance is also a condition for determinations for four reasons, namely by conditionality-through-conascence, by conditionality-through-immediate-proximity, by conditionality- through-drenching, 2 and by conditionality-through-standing- point.3
Herein, as to” determinations” : they are those which, having become established in the triple relationship of condition, 1 and having obtained a plane of existence, being mainly 2 arisen with ignorance,2 proceed to maturity, growth, and abundance. 410. Understanding is lost through four reasons.
What four?
 Underlying-tendency, manifest obsession, fetter, and assuming.
Herein, from 1 the underlying-tendency is born 1 the manifest obsession. When obsessed, one is fettered. When fettered, one assumes. With assuming as condition,1 being.
So these determinations, being triply arisen, and arrived at a plane of being, and mainly 1 not stopped 1 by the Path, it is said that . 412. That is how there is also 1 a condition 1 for determinations in the sense of being arisen with a cause. 413. But the condition, so far treated disregarding any demonstrated profitable or unprofitable aspect, must have the profitable and unprofitable aspects inserted, and the ideas ripening from the condition, so far treated, without any statable-unstatable 1 aspect, must have the statable and the unstatable aspects inserted. Except for that which exceeds the range of being; 2 the whole Thread can be encompassed,
not excluding the ten Powers of a Perfect One and the four Intrepidities , which are kinds of merit.3 414. Now when ignorance is a condition, by immediate-proximity-conditionality, for determinations, and when there is the cognizance called “arisen” immediately proximate to that cognizance wherewith the ignorance was co-arisen, 1 then the previous cognizance is a condition, by cause-conditionality, 2 for the subsequent cognizance. Hence, ignorance being in virtue of that previous cognizance the cause of arising 3 of the subsequent, no knowledge arises with the latter because it has no opportunity made for it.
Since its element of diligence is drenched by ignorance, 4 hence the perversions 5 arise, taking it that there is beauty in the ugly, that there is pleasure in the painful, etc.. 415. Herein, the determinations that arise are the choice in one affected by lust, by hate, and by delusion, 1 r respectively through obsession by lust, through obsession by hate, or through obsession by delusion. The Perversion of View is demonstrable in the demonstration of the four grounds for perversion. In as much as one with perverted cognizance cognizes, this is the Perversion of Cognizance. In as much as perverted perception apprehends, this is the Perversion of Perception.
And in as much as the perverted view insists, this is the Perversion of View .
Then the eight Wrongnesses increase, and in the unreasoned attention the three Unprofitable Roots make wrong knowledge and wrong deliverance arise.1
And being mainly 2 unpenetrated, they are determinations that bring renewal of being.
So that is how ignorance is a condition for determinations by conditionality-through-conascence and by conditionality- through-immediate-proximity .
How is ignorance a condition for determinations in the mood of drenching ?
How is ignorance a condition for determinations in the sense of standing-point ?
That is how ignorance is a condition for determinations in the sense of standing-point.
Again, being is generated in relinking 1 by the ripening of action 2 that was accompanied by lust. It is when that is firmly 8 insisted upon through lack of knowledge of action 2 and its ripening that determinations are called . In this way too there are determinations with ignorance as condition.
Again, among the five kinds of persons, namely those who 1 are Initiate 2 persons, those who have entered upon the non-percipient attainment, those seeking to be 3 and inside the egg , 3 those who 1 are moisture-born, or any others 4 not yet come to be : 4 these  5 so what do their determinations have for their condition?
They still have previously 8 made determinations 8 and assuming 8 unabolished 6 in their cognizance ; as long as 8 the unripened ripening is uneradicated 6 through the condition for its ripening being unsevered they still have a destination.6
In this way too there are determinations with ignorance as condition .
Again, those persons : may have neither that assuming nor those determinations,1 yet their seven underlying tendencies are still uneradicated and unsevered, and  :
In this way too there are determinations with ignorance as condition.
Again,1 those persons: - whatever kind of action leads to setting-up, it is all determinatively acted through ignorance and stuck to by craving, and also it is owing to lack of knowledge that they do not know the disappointment therein.
That same action is , that same craving is the moisture) for the seed’s growth,
and that same ignorance is the stand-point) .2
In this way too there can be said to be determinations with ignorance as condition.
So ignorance is a condition for determinations in these moods.
Herein, ignorance’s cause is prior ignorance 1 and unreasoned attention is its condition.
Where 2 there is non-interruption 2 this is continuity 2 there ; the fruit is generation ;
Just as, when a cloak,1 or a sheet, is in the presses 11 and they are screwed down 3 by two people,’ or by one strong man,’ it would not, however, get dry in the presses,
For those 10 who attain that rely on it, are in touch with it, and through craving for it they do not come to abandonment of craving.
Herein, that non-eradication 1
That in turn becomes an obsession as the inability of such impeded cognizance to penetrate how things are. That is the taint of ignorance, which becomes consciousness-as-seed .
What is a seed is a cause if not severed. When unsevered, it causes relinking.
When relinking, it does not come to eradication.
The non-eradication binds cognizance down. 2 One whose cognizance is bound down does not understand how things are. 427. So this consciousness as seed  1 has the meaning of being affected by taints, the meaning of cause, the meaning of non-interruption,2 the meaning of non-stopping, 3 the meaning of fruit, the meaning of relinking, the meaning of renewal of being, the meaning of non-eradication, 4 the meaning of underlying tendency, the meaning of manifest obsession, the meaning of non-penetration.
At this point the field of ignorance has been demonstrated.
This is called the Mode of Conveying Requisites.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Coordination?
Regarding what has been condensed,1 The proper synonym 2 *//*and manner Of detail should be known as varied : 3
Herein, the demonstration of the name condenses,1 the demon-stration of the example is the synonym, and the actual example is the detail.
*/But the detail has to be stated./* 2 Like what? 430. For example: in the passage .1 This is a condensation.2
Herein, what is the coordination?
And what should be “ abandoned”? 3 (Will and lust 4 for form should be abandoned … down to …
As to ignorance, that can be described by simile.
Again for example: .1 And what is the “support”? Craving and view.
Herein, the view is ignorance and the craving is determinations.
Herein, to say “with view as condition, craving” is the same as saying “with ignorance as condition, determinations”.
Herein, what is “supported” is consciousness, and that implies” with determinations as condition, consciousness; … down to … ageing-and- death “, When this 2 has been briefly stated thus the remainder of the passage follows, 3 namely
 , which is thus the abandoning of the view and the craving. Herein, with cessation of ignorance as view, consciousness no longer, as it did before, 4 lets go 5 this or that idea provocative of lust 6 in order to seize 7 another idea, as in the Monkey Simile , but rather since it has no will and lust for even the least ideas provocative of lust, 6 how is there to be any dislodgement 1 In the outstanding creatures the Arahants cognizance has done with insistence, 8 and consciousness, being without a standing-point, ceases for want of nutriment. With cessation of consciousness, cessation of name-and-form; … down to … cessation of ageing-and-death.
This is a Coordination.
Herein, consciousness’s dislodgement comes about through lust. When there is no dislodgement, then the former approach to defilement,1 along with its chattels, which was threefold, has its fires tranquillized.
Hence he said .
Herein, the coordination is this : ( One whose body is tranquil feels pleasure. When he is pleased his cognizance is concentrated …
down to … there is the knowing and seeing “ I am liberated “ ) .
The deliverance being due to the exhaustion of taints, he no more 1 reappears.
With his reappearance’s having no actual coming or going, 2 there is ( no here or beyond or in between ;
This is only what is coordinated in the middle part of this Thread, and it is only its construing in Dependent Arising and in Deliverance ; but this does not analyse in detail the meaning of what was stated in brief.1
Also 1 the ideas in 2 the type of Thread dealing with Corruption must be coordinated only 2 with the type dealing with Corruption, not with any other.3
Likewise in the case of that dealing with Morality and that dealing with Penetration . This is the Mode of Conveying a Coordination.
These are the sixteen Modes of Conveying.
in the valiant Maha-Kaccayana the Rose-Apple- Wood dweller’s Pitaka-Disclosure is accomplished.
there in the beginning is the Mode of Conveying a Teaching.
What is taught?
 and a verse-paraphrase’s 1 Investigation : this demonstrates The Mode Conveying Investigation.
what is the meaning of that?
 Questions : these four terms
- how many questions are ?
The streams’ restraint I tell, whereby They can be sealed, is understanding ) .
He answered those four terms with two terms. 2
with the second question he asks about cleansing,
with the third question he asks about the extinction element without trace left, 1
and with the fourth question he asks further 2 about the extinction element with trace left.3 297. In addition to that third question he asked further: 1
Good sir, if asked, you have the skill To tell me their 3 behaviour”) .
He asks these four terms.
and answers first what was asked afterwards.
verse 1 .
while any craving and view whatever with what is external for their ground are the “ outer tangle “.
and the “ nine doors” are the nine positions of conceit ; for the suffering born of conceit is the position for conceit  in the three triads that follow in the Vibhanga text.
Herein, the Blessed One does not 1 paraphrase in the verse with as many terms as he presents in the prose.
A bhikkhu such as this will be One on a mission fit to go) .2
That which is demonstrated of the sixteen Modes of Conveying as Teaching and as Investigation is the demonstration.
Looking for right and wrong construing demonstrates The Mode Conveying a Construing.1
As for example , and the path to that purification is this
 ,1 which prose-exposition 1 can be cited.
for understanding generates 6 the virtue that leads to penetration 8
The victor teaches an idea, And also what has that idea As Footing :
so with all ideas : This is the Mode Conveying Footings.1
The five strands of sensual desires are a footing for lust for sensual desires;
for it is said that “In whomsoever lust for sensual desires arises, has arisen, or will arise, the footing for that lust for sensual desires is in those five external bases that have form beginning with visible forms, and not apart from them “.1
That is why the five strands of sensual desire are the footing for lust for sensual desires.
that whereby 1 that idea arises with an object.
 the Thread-Meaning As a Consecutive-Sequence : This Mode Conveys a Fourfold Array.
by means of the feminine-gender designation, the masculine-gender designation, and the neuter-gender designation. All according to the Thread demonstrated as .
this should not be inflected thus.
The path proclaimed by the Seer which is the state of safety From suffering that has shaken off dirt and taints .
It is that those who are afflicted 2 by pain will instigate energy 3 for the exhaustion of suffering.’
 skill in language as phrasing,
 skill in sequence by consecutivity .
And converts to the opposites Is that Conveying a Conversion.
For the relinquishment of profitable ideas.2
For using unprofitable ideas.2
For using objects of defilement.
Herein, the form-body is a footing for the taint of sensual desire and the taint of being,
for he has exhausted taints when he knows and sees in the four instances namely Suffering, Origin, Cessation, and Path.2
That is how unprofitable ideas should be sought out.2
That is how white ideas come to be sought out too
by arrival through profitable ideas.
Knower of Threads is he that knows 1 ‘ A single idea in the Thread 2
for it does not thereby become 1 another 1 even when called” reliance “.2
Because whatever the language of any inhabitants of any country , however it goes, it is by means of that that the Omniscient One teaches , and so the synonym for that has to be sought.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Descriptions?
By  he describes a description in terms of eradication.
there 2 consciousness finds ) , whereby he describes a description in terms of giving being.3
the remaining ideas being subordinate to it.
Ways of entry can be found in six ideas.
In the Categories, the Elements, the Bases, the Faculties, the Truths, and the two moods of Dependent Arising.1
Herein, as to the Elements , there are the eighteen elements.
and as the form category, while the mind base can be demonstrated as the consciousness category which is also the Noble Truth of Suffering.
and they can be made ways of entry indirectly .
and name-and-form when it arises is a condition for the sixfold base, and so contact, and feeling: these are the condition.
Birth and ageing-and-death are the outcome.
Likewise the twenty-two faculties.1
The masculinity faculty and the femininity faculty 4 are a footing for craving.5
For as soon as the male has to do with women, 4
then the pain faculty occurs in him and the grief faculty,
and also hate as a root of unprofit increases.
and non-delusion as a root of profit increases.
the mind faculty is a footing for lust for being,
the five faculties 2 beginning with forms are a footing for lust for form,
and the femininity faculty and the masculinity faculty are a footing for the description 3 in terms of creatures.
Herein, the meaning of one of such verses so stated cannot be demonstrated so long as the remaining ones are still unstated.1
What is the reason?
That meaning has not yet been stated ; it being not yet stated, it cannot yet be demonstrated .
What has not yet been stated is this .
and such inquiry is called the Mode of Conveying a Clearing Up.
Right view as such is a unity while it is a diversity as the investigation-of-ideas enlightenment factor both as the investigating of ideas and as acquaintance with supernormal power due to directing cognizance thereto .1
but a diversity as “the element of earth”, and “the elements of water, fire, and air”.
but as “head-hairs, body-hair, nails, teeth, cuticle-hide” 1 it is a diversity.
but as “sounds, odours, flavours, and tangibles”, they are a diversity.
constitutes the Mode of Conveying Terms of Expression.2
but, though it is the same-essence’s cause that is the other-essence’s condition, nevertheless when the causality 1 is regarded as a condition for any other-essence at all it is not called “ cause “, it is called “condition”.
The in-onself is the cause while the external is the condition.
for the condition is the cause’s aid when the procuring-cause 2 is procurable.
Ignorance is name-and-form’s condition-in-remote-relation,1 while consciousness is its condition through conditionality-in-immediate-proximity ;
Ignorance 1 is consciousness’s 1 cause by causality-in-remote-relation while determinations 1 are its cause by causality-in-immediate-proximity ;
This is how the cause too is twofold.
How is ignorance a condition, by conditionality-through- conascence, for determinations?
It is so for any cognizance obsessed 1 by lust. Herein, owing to the obsession by lust, it destroys all understanding’s province.
In this way and no other do unprofitable determinations come successively to maturity and abundance.
That ignorance drenches,1 extends through, those determinations :
just as when a waterlily, or a lotus, is growing in water, and, being drenched and extended through 2 with cool water, it reaches maturity, growth, and abundance,3
so too is ignorance a condition for determinations in the sense of drenching.
Those determinations reach maturity, growth, and abundance in dependence on ignorance:
just as a waterlily, or a lotus, reaches maturity, growth, and abundance in dependence on earth by its having earth for its standing-point,
so too these determinations reach maturity, growth, and abundance in dependence on ignorance by their having ignorance for their standing-point.
with consciousness as condition, name-and-form; … .
the relinking is renewal of being ; obsession in the sense of non-eradication is underlying tendency.
so too, although attainment by concentration has the Acme of Being 8 for its ultimate, still it does not conduce to the eradication of the formless.8
since the moist water- element still lurking 5 there cannot be dried out
without 6 the heat-element’s coming; 6 if it were put again in the open outside the presses it would mostly keep moist with the seeping of the remaining moisture; for it cannot come to be completely dried out 7 without the fire-element’s coming ;
is the underlying tendency to ignorance, and that is an impediment for cognizance.
This Mode Conveys Coordination.
for consciousness 4 …) can be given in detail .
this is the end of suffering) ,8 which is the element of extinction without trace left.
This is called the Mode of Conveying a Coordination.
The fifth chapter
how far the Blessed One penetrates with wisdom and sees with wisdom!
for Tathagatas do not speak untruth.”
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living in the Bhagga country at Sumsumaragira in the Bhesakala Grove, the Deer Park.
Now on that occasion a palace named Kokanada had recently been built for Prince Bodhi, and it had not yet been inhabited by any recluse or brahmin or any human being at all.816
Then say this: ‘Venerable sir, let the Blessed One together with the Sangha of bhikkhus consent to accept tomorrow’s meal from Prince Bodhi.’“
“Yes, sir,” Sanjikaputta replied, and he went to the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.
And he says this: ‘Let Master Gotama together with the Sangha of bhikkhus consent to accept tomorrow’s meal from Prince Bodhi.’“
The Blessed One consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Blessed One had consented, Sanjikaputta rose from his seat, went to Prince Bodhi, and told him what had happened, adding:
Then, when the night had ended, Prince Bodhi had good food of various kinds prepared in his own residence, and he had the Kokanada Palace spread with white cloth down to the last step of the staircase. Then he addressed the brahmin student Sanjikaputta thus: “Come, my dear Sanjikaputta, go to the Blessed One and announce that it is time thus: ‘It is time, venerable sir, the meal is ready.’“
“Yes, sir,” Sanjikaputta replied, and he went to the Blessed One and announced that it was time thus: “It is time, Master Gotama, the meal is ready.”
Then, it being morning, the Blessed One dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, went to Prince Bodhi’s residence.
Now on that occasion Prince Bodhi was standing in the outer porch waiting for the Blessed One.
When he saw the Blessed One coming in the distance,
But the Blessed One stopped at the lowest step of the staircase.
Prince Bodhi said to him: “Venerable sir, let the Blessed One step on the cloth, let the Sublime One step on the cloth, that it may lead to my welfare and happiness for a long time.”
When this was said, the Blessed One was silent.817
The Blessed One looked at the venerable Ananda.
The venerable Ananda said to Prince Bodhi: “Prince, let the cloth be removed. The Blessed One will not step on a strip of cloth;
So Prince Bodhi had the cloth removed, and he had seats prepared in the upper apartments of the Kokanada Palace.
The Blessed One and the Sangha of bhikkhus ascended the Kokanada Palace and sat down on the seats that had been prepared.
Then, with his own hands, Prince Bodhi served and satisfied the Sangha of bhikkhus headed by the Buddha with the various kinds of good food.
When the Blessed One had eaten and had withdrawn his hand from the bowl, Prince Bodhi took a low seat, sat down at one side,
“Prince, before my enlightenment, while I was still only an unenlightened Bodhisatta, I too thought thus: ‘Pleasure is not to be gained through pleasure; pleasure is to be gained through pain.’
“Later, prince, while still young, a black-haired young man endowed with the blessing of youth, in the prime of life… 
“Now three similes occurred to me spontaneously, never heard before…
“I considered: ‘This Dhamma that I have attained is profound’…
“Then the bhikkhus of the group of five, not long after being thus taught and instructed by me, by realising for themselves with direct knowledge, here and now entered upon and abided in that supreme goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the home life into homelessness.”
When this was said, Prince Bodhi said to the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, when a bhikkhu finds the Tathagata to discipline him, how long is it until by realising for himself with direct knowledge, he here and now enters upon and abides in that supreme goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the home life into homelessness?”
“As to that, prince, I shall ask you a question in return.
Answer it as you choose.
What do you think, prince? Are you skilled in the art of wielding a goad while riding an elephant?”
“Yes, venerable sir, I am.”
“What do you think, prince? Suppose a man came here thinking: ‘Prince Bodhi knows the art of wielding a goad while riding an elephant; I shall train in that art under him.’
If he had no faith, he could not achieve what can be achieved by one who has faith;
What do you think, prince? Could that man train under you in the art of wielding a goad while riding an elephant?”
“Venerable sir, even if he had one of those deficiencies, he could not train under me, so what of the five?”
“What do you think, prince? Suppose a man came here thinking: ‘Prince Bodhi knows the art of wielding a goad while riding an elephant; I shall train in that art under him.’
If he had faith, he could achieve what can be achieved by one who has faith;
What do you think, prince? Could that man train under you in the art of wielding a goad while riding an elephant?”
“Venerable sir, even if he had one of those qualities he could train under me, so what of the five?”
“So too, prince, there are these five factors of striving.
What five?
Here a bhikkhu has faith, he places his faith in the Tathagata’s enlightenment thus: ‘That Blessed One is accomplished, fully enlightened, perfect in true knowledge and conduct, sublime, knower of worlds, incomparable leader of persons to be tamed, teacher of gods and humans, enlightened, blessed.’ “Then he is free from illness and affliction, possessing a good digestion that is neither too cool nor too warm but medium arid able to bear the strain of striving. “Then he is honest and sincere, and shows himself as he actually is to the Teacher and his companions in the holy life. “Then he is energetic in abandoning unwholesome states and in undertaking wholesome states, steadfast, launching his effort with firmness and persevering in cultivating wholesome states. “Then he is wise; he possesses wisdom regarding rise and disappearance that is noble and penetrative and leads to the complete destruction of suffering.
These are the five factors of striving.
“Prince, when a bhikkhu who possesses these five factors of striving finds a Tathagata to discipline him, he might dwell seven years until by realising for himself with direct knowledge, he here and now enters upon and abides in that supreme goal of the holy life for the sake of which clansmen rightly go forth from the home life into homelessness.
“Let alone seven years, prince.
When a bhikkhu who possesses these five factors of striving finds a Tathagata to discipline him, he might dwell six years…five years…four years…three years…two years…one year…
“Let alone one day and night, prince.
When a bhikkhu who possesses these five factors of striving finds a Tathagata to discipline him, then being instructed in the evening, he might arrive at distinction in the morning; being instructed in the morning, he might arrive at distinction in the evening.”
When this was said, Prince Bodhi said to the Blessed One: “Oh the Buddha! Oh the Dhamma! Oh, how well proclaimed is the Dhamma!
For one instructed in the evening might arrive at distinction in the morning, and one instructed in the morning might arrive at distinctibn in the evening.”
When this was said, the brahmin student Sanjikaputta said to Prince Bodhi: “Master Bodhi says: ‘Oh the Buddha! Oh the Dhamma! Oh, how well proclaimed is the Dhamma! ‘ But he does not say: ‘I go to Master Gotama for refuge and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus.’“
“Do not say that, my dear Sanjikaputta, do not say that.
I heard and learned this from my mother’s lips:
Then my mother, who was pregnant, went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, she sat down at one side
Let the Blessed One remember the child as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge for life.’
There was also an occasion when the Blessed One was living here in the country of the Bhaggas at Sumsumaragira in the Bhesakala Grove, the Deer Park.
Then my nurse, carrying me on her hip, went to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him,
Let the Blessed One remember him as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge for life.’
Now, my dear Sanjikaputta, for the third time I go to the Blessed One for refuge and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus.
Let the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge for life.”
Then Prince Bodhi addressed the brahmin student Sanjikaputta thus: “Come, my dear Sanjikaputta, go to the Blessed One and pay homage in my name with your head at his feet, and ask whether he is free from illness and affliction and is healthy, strong, and abiding in comfort, saying: ‘Venerable sir, Prince Bodhi pays homage with his head at the Blessed One’s feet, and he asks whether the Blessed One is free from illness…and abiding in comfort.’
When this courteous and amiable talk was finished, he sat down at one side
and said: “Master Gotama, Prince Bodhi pays homage with his head at Master Gotama’s feet and asks whether he is free from illness…and abiding in comfort.
“The recluse Gotama has consented.”
he went out to meet him and paid homage to him; and then, allowing the Blessed One to precede him, he proceeded to the Kokanada Palace.
A second time…A third time Prince Bodhi said to him: “Venerable sir, let the Blessed One step on the cloth,
let the Sublime One step on the cloth, that it may lead to my welfare and happiness for a long time.”
the Tathagata has regard for future generations.”818
and said to the Blessed One: “Venerable sir, we have thought thus: ‘Pleasure is not to be gained through pleasure; pleasure is to be gained through pain.’“819
The Dispensation of the Enlightened Ones, the Blessed Ones, comes into comprehension under three headings, namely Categories, Elements, and Bases .
Herein, the Categories are five, namely the Form Category, … down to … the Consciousness Category .
The ten 1 Bases having form, namely eye-cum-forms, … down to … body-cum-tangibles, are the form category.
Herein, the six bodies of feeling are the feeling category. These are eye-contact-born feeling, … down to … mind-contact-born feeling. This is the feeling category.
Perception of forms, … down to … perception of ideas, which are the six bodies of perception, these are the perception category.
Herein, the six bodies of choice are the determinations category. Choice of forms, … down to … choice of ideas. These are the six bodies of choice. These are the determinations category.
Herein, the six bodies of consciousness are the consciousness category. Eye consciousness, … down to … mind consciousness. These are the consciousness category.
What is the diagnosis of them?
Impermanent, void, 1 painful, not-self. This is the diagnosis of them.
Herein, what is the meaning of “ category” ?
The meaning of mass is the meaning of category, the meaning of aggregate is the meaning of category, the meaning of class is the meaning of category.
That also which, among categories , is the comprehensive meaning, such as” material mass” , “woodland mass” , “mass of fire “ , “ trunk of timber” , “ mass of water” , “wind mass” , is the meaning of category.
Herein, the eighteen Elements are : the eye element, form element, eye-consciousness element ; … etc …. the mind element, idea element, mind-consciousness element.
These are the eighteen elements.
What is the diagnosis of them? Impermanent, void, painful, not-self. This is the diagnosis of them.
Herein, what is the meaning of “ element “ ?
It may be said that the meaning of component is the meaning of element.
“ Component “? The eye’s clarity 1 is the eye element ;
and so with the five elements. Again, the meaning of cutting off lust is the meaning of element ;
so with the five. Again, as it is said, the meaning of simple nature 2 is the meaning of element;
Herein, what are the twelve Bases?
They are the six in oneself and the six external :
These are the twelve bases.
What is the diagnosis of them?
Impermanent, void, painful, not-self. This is the diagnosis of them.
Furthermore, the diagnosis is twofold, namely diagnosis as knowledge and diagnosis as abandoning.1
Herein, diagnosis as knowledge is this : Impermanent, void, painful, not-self; this is diagnosis as knowledge.
But diagnosis as abandoning is the abandoning of will and lust ; this is diagnosis as abandoning.
Herein, what is the meaning of “base” ?
Again, it has been said 3 that the meaning of provision-of-a-way-of- access is the meaning of base ;
There are four noble Truths : Suffering, Origin, Cessation, and Path.
Suffering as a compound is any behaving not 2 according to the True Idea and like mentality; Origin as a compound is ignorance and craving ; Cessation as a compound is science and deliverance ; the Path as a compound is quiet and insight.
Herein, what are the thirty-seven ideas siding with enlightenment?
They are the four Foundations of Mindfulness, … down to … the Noble Eight-Factored Path.
That is how these ideas siding with enlightenment are thirty-seven, which ideas, being those that conduce to extinction in the case of Fully Self-Enlightened Ones, Hermit Enlightened Ones, and Enlightened Ones’ disciples , whether past, future or presently arisen,1 constitute the Path.2 448. (Four Foundations of Mindfulness:
What four?
Here a bkikkhu abides contemplating the body as a body, …) . 449. Also the fourfold , the fourfold , the five beginning with faith, and the five beginning with faith . 450. Herein, what is the meaning of faculty ?
The meaning of ruler is the meaning of faculty, the meaning of dominance is the meaning of faculty, the meaning of clarity is the meaning of faculty, the meaning of function unshared with any other is the mea.ning of faculty.1 451. The meaning of unshakability 1 is the meaning of power, the meaning of firm is the meaning of power, the meaning of upholding 2 is the meaning of power, the meaning of stiffening is the meaning of power.
Herein, what are the seven Enlightenment Factors?
They are the Mindfulness Enlightenment Factor, … down to … the Onlooking-Equanimity Enlightenment Factor .
Herein, what is the Eight-Factored Path?
It is Right View, … Down to … Right Concentration .
Herein, the Eight-Factored Path has three categories, namely the Virtue Category, the Concentration Category, and the Understanding Category .
Herein, the right speech, right action and right livelihood are the Virtue Category ;
Likewise, these three categories are the three Trainings .
So with the three moods there are the ten terms … etc ….1
Herein, when a devotee is steadied in the Virtue Category he he does not assume unprofitable hate, he eradicates the underlying tendency to hate, he extracts the barb of hate, he diagnoses painful feeling, and he surmounts the element of sensual desire.
When he is steadied in the Concentration Category he does not assume unprofitable greed, he eradicates the underlying tendency to lust, he extracts the barb of greed, he diagnoses pleasant feeling, and he surmounts the element of form.
When he is steadied in the Understanding Category he does not assume unprofitable delusion, he eradicates the underlying tendency to ignorance, he extracts the barbs of delusion and view, he diagnoses neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, and he surmounts the formless element.
So with these three Categories he does not assume the three unprofitable roots, he extracts the four barbs, he diagnoses the three kinds of feeling, and he surmounts the triple element.
Herein, what is ignorance?
It is of the four Noble Truths , which can be quoted in detail as 1 is done in the case of the steps of the staircase.2
Herein, what is consciousness?1
The six bodies of consciousness. 460. Feeling, perception, choice, contact, and attention, are name.
Herein, what is form?
The four great entities, and any description of form assuming the four great entities.
So this name already mentioned and this form are together called name-and-form .
Herein, the sixfold base? The six bases in oneself, namely the eye as a base in oneself, … down to … the mind as a base in oneself .
Contact? The six bodies of contact, namely eye contact, … down to … mind contact .
The six bodies of feeling are feeling .
The six bodies of craving are craving .
Assuming? The four kinds of asstiming, namely sensual-desire assuming, virtue-and-duty assuming, view assuming, and self-theory assuming, are assuming 1 .
Being? The three kinds of being, namely sensual-desire being, being with form, formless being .
Herein, what is birth?
Any first arising of categories, first arising of elements, first arising of bases, any birth, coming to birth, finding a footing, generating, manifesting of categories, this is birth .
Herein, what is ageing?
Any brokenness of teeth, grey- ness of hair, wrinkledness of skin ,1 totteringness,2 discolouration of the four great entities, doubled-up-ness, 3 ageing, waning, outwane, wane of life-span, waning away, dissolving of faculties, overripening of essentials of existence : 4 this is ageing.
Herein, what is birth?
In the various orders of creatures any creature’s decease, deceasing, death, completion of time, corpse- bloatedness,5 dissolution of body, severance of life-faculty: this is death .
So this ageing already mentioned and this death are together called ageing-and-death.
Herein, ignorance, as murk and gloom, has the characteristic of not understanding how things are ; it is the footing for determinations.
Det£rminations have the characteristic of determinative acts, and their manifestation is implanting, amassing, and renewal of being ;
Consciousness has the characteristic of causing the physical body to give intimation; 1 it is the footing for name-and-form.
Name-and-form has the characteristic of plurality of dependence ; it is the footing for the sixfold base.
The sixfold base has the characteristic of causing the separate defining 2 of the faculties beginning with the eye ; it is the footing for contact.
Contact has the characteristic of causing occurrence of the three namely pair of bases and appropriate consciousness; it is the footing for feeling.
Feeling has the characteristic of the co-existing of pleasure, etc. ; it is the footing for craving.
Craving has the characteristic of cleaving to; 3 it is the footing for assuming.
Assuming has the characteristic of destroying 4 by consumption of what is taken up ; it is the footing for being.
Being has the characteristic of flinging into one or other among the different types of destination; it is the footing for birth.
Birth has the characteristic of causing manifest being of the categories ; it is the footing for ageing.
Ageing has the characteristic of overripening of essentials of existence; 5 it is the footing for death .
Death has the characteristic of exhausting the life-span and causing life’s surcease ; it is the footing for pain.
Pain has the characteristic of oppressing the body; it is the footing for grief.
Grief has the characteristic of oppressing cognizance ; it is the footing for sorrow.
Sorrow 8 has the characteristic of sorrowing ; it is the footing for lamentation.
Lamentation 8 has the characteristic of speech-utterance ; it is the footing for despair.
Despairs are any kinds of hopelessness .7
There are nine terms wherein all the unprofitable comes to be comprised 1 and meets together.
What nine terms?
The two root- defilements, the three unprofitable roots, and the four perversions .
Herein, the two root-defilements are ignorance and craving-for-being . The three unprofitable roots are greed, hate and delusion.
 the four perversions perversion of perception, perversion of cognizance, and {c) perversion of view, of the impermanent that it is permanent; the perversion of perception, perversion of cognizance, and perversion of view, of the painful that it is pleasant; the {a) perversion of perception, perversion of cognizance, and perversion of view, of the not-self that it is self; and the perversion of perception, perversion of cognizance, and perversion of view, of the ugly that it is beautiful.
Herein , what is called ignorance is unknowing of how things are in the four noble Truths ; this is ignorance.
What is called cravingjor-being is lust, lustfulness,1 wish, infatuation, aspiration, relish, cleaving, not giving up, with regard to the types of being; this is craving for being .
Herein, what is greed as a root of unprofit?
What is called greed is any greed, greediness, wish, infatuation, aspiration, relish, cleaving, not giving up, with regard to others’ lands, others’ materials, others’ places, others’ belongings,1 others’ chattels ; this is greed as a root of unprofit.
What is it the root of?
It is the root of greed-born unprofitable bodily and verbal and mental action, and in the same way also for the cognizance and cognizance-concomitant ideas associated therewith.
Herein, what is hate as a root of unprofit?
It is annoyance with creatures, impatience, irritation, ill will, hatred,1 desire for harm, 2 resistance of the heart ; this is hate as a root of unprofit.
What is it the root of?
It is the root of hate-born unprofitable bodily and verbal and mental action, and for the cognizance and cognizance-concomitant ideas associated therewith.
Herein, what is delusion as a root of unprofit?
It is the non- actualizing of the four noble Truths, non-apprehending-by-entering-upon,1 non-penetration, of them, and it is delusion, deluding, confusion, confusing, ignorance, gloom, dark, obstruction, hindrance, covering up, concealing, non-arrival-at-verification , 2 regarding profitable ideas ; this is delusion as a root of unprofit.
What is it the root of?
It is the root of delusion-born unprofit- able bodily and verbal and mental action, and for the cognizance and cognizance-concomitant ideas associated therewith.
Herein , the perversion has to be known, the object of perversion has to be known,
Herein, there are: one perversion, three that are perverted, and four objects of perversion .1
permanence in the impermanent, pleasure in the painful, self in the not-self, beauty in the ugly .
What are the four objects of perversion?
The body, feelings, cognizance, and ideas ; these are the four objects of perversion .
What are the three perverted?
 Perception, cognizance, and view.
These three are perverted .1
Herein, when an agreeable object has either come within the horizon of the faculties (beginning with that of the eye or fails to do so , any seizing of it as a sign 1 is the perversion of perception.
Herein, when one whose cognizance is distorted finds intimation 2 in an object, this is the perversion of cognizance.
Herein, when one whose cognizance is distorted has, in regard to form that is ugly, any liking, preference, way of regarding , formulating, pondering of views, 3 adjudgment, that it is beautiful, etc., this is the perversion of view .
Herein, these perversions become twelve as the three 1 in each of the four objects,
namely three in a body, three in a feeling, three in a cognizance, 2 and three in an idea ; so there are four perversions of perception, four perversions of cognizance,3 and four perversions of view. And when applied to the six bases, 4 the four perversions become six dodecads as follows : twelve perversions as above with respect to forms in the case of one possessing eye- perception, 5 … down to … twelve perversions with respect to ideas in the case of one possessing mind-perception.8
But as to difference of object, 7 since creatures are ungauged and incalculable the perversions are ungauged and incalculable 8 by way of the inferior, superior, and average.
Herein, the five categories are the four grounds for selfhood.1
That is how the five categories are the four grounds for selfhood.
Herein, it is with respect to the body, which is ugly, that there is the perversion that it is beautiful ;
Herein, ignorance, which is murk and gloom, has the characteristic of non-penetration ; its 1 footing is the perversions.
Craving has the characteristic of cleaving to; its 1 footing is a dear likeable form.
Greed has the characteristic of converting 1 to one’s own bias ; its footing is taking-what-is-not-given.
Hate has the characteristic of quarrelling here; its footing is killing-breathing- things.
Delusion has the characteristic of mis-theorizing about an object; its footing is wrong theory.
Perception of permanence has the characteristic of apprehending non-destruction of determined ideas ; its footing is determinations.
Perception of pleasure has the characteristic of approaching contact affected by taints ; its footing is my-making.
Perception of self has the characteristic of approaching wrong theory  about ideas; its footing is I-making.
Perception of beauty has the characteristic of apprehending colour ; its footing is lack of faculty restraint.
By these nine terms’ being indicated, all the unprofitable side is demonstrated. And that can be known by one who has learnt much, not by one who has learnt little, by one with understanding, not by one without understanding, by one devoted, not by one undevoted.
There are nine profitable terms wherein all the profitable side comes to be comprised 1 and meets together .
What nine terms?
Herein, what is quiet?
Cognizance’s steadiness, shaping, stability, steadying, steadying on, establishment, concentration, concentrating, non-distraction, non-remorse, peace of mind, unification of cognizance ; this is quiet.
Herein, what is insight?
A:n.y investigation into how things are, re-investigation, inquiry, re-inquiry, prehension, apprehension, re-prehension, consolidating by the mind,1 estimating, scrutiny, knowledge; or it is any science, discovery, wit, understanding, illumination, light, radiance, luminosity, sword, javelin, investigation-of-ideas enlightenment-factor, right view as path-factor, concerning categories or elements or bases or name-and-forms or dependent-arising factors or dependently arisen ideas or kinds of suffering or kinds of origin or cessation or path or ideas profitable and unprofitable or blameable and blameless or black and white or cultivatable and uncultivatable : this is why it is called insight.
Or it is called insight since it occurs in the various ways of seeing 1 impermanence, pain, and not-self.
For this twofold seeing 1 is called insight into ideas : by its means one sees twofold, namely the beautiful -and ugly, the black and white, the cultivatable and uncultivatable, action and ripening, bondage and liberation, setting-up and dispersal, occurrence and non-occurrence,2 corruption and cleansing : that is why it is called insight.
Or alternatively “in-” is a prefix, “sight” being the meaning: 3 that is why it is called insight . This is insight.
Herein, creatures have two ailments, namely ignorance and craving-for-being . Two medicines have been stated by the Blessed One for the counteraction 1 of these two ailments, namely quiet and insight.
Those who make use of these two medicines verify two kinds of non-ailment, namely the heart-deliverance due to fading of lust and the understanding-deliverance due to fading of ignorance.
Herein, quiet is the medicine for the ailment of craving, whose non-ailing is the heart-deliverance due to fading of lust,
while insight is the medicine for the ailment of ignorance, whose non-ailing is the understanding-deliverance due to fading of ignorance.
For the Blessed One said as follows : .
Herein, one who keeps quiet in being diagnoses form. When he diagnoses form he abandons craving. When he abandons craving he verifies the heart-deliverance due to fading of lust. One who keeps insight in being diagnoses name. When he diagnoses name he abandons ignorance.
When a bhikkhu has diagnosed the two ideas, namely name and form, then likewise he has abandoned the two ideas, namely ignorance and craving-for-being.
Two ideas have been kept in being, namely quiet and insight, while two ideas have been verified, namely science and deliverance.
At this point the bhikkhu is one who has done his task.
This is the extinction element with trace left.
With the termination of his live-span, with the surcease of his life-faculty, this suffering ceases and no other suffering arises.
Herein, the cessation, the pacification, of these categories, elements, and bases, and the non- relinking, the non-manifestation, of other categories, elements, and bases, is the extinction element without trace left .
Herein, what is non-greed as a root of profit?
It is non-greed about any element,1 non-greediness, non-greedifiedness, unwishing, unaspiration, unwanting, uncleaving :
this is non- greed as a root of profit.
What is it the root of?
It is the root of non-greed-born profitable bodily and verbal and mental action and of cognizance and cognizance-concomitant ideas associated therewith.
Or alternatively, since the Noble Eight-factored Path is called” profitable”, this non-greed is the root of three path factors.
Of which three? Of right intention, right effort, and right concentration. It is the root of these. That is why it is called a root of profit.
Herein, what is non-hate as a root of profit?
Any unannoyance, non-resistance, non-ill-willing, non-ill-will; non-hate, lovingkindness, kindly-loving, desire for good,1 desire for welfare, confidence of heart, with respect to creatures or determinations , is non-hate as a root of profit.
What is it the root of?
It is the root of non-hate-born profitable bodily and verbal and mental action and for cognizance and cognizance-concomitant ideas associated therewith.
Or alternatively, it is the root of three path factors.
Of which three?
Of right speech, right action, and right livelihood. It is the root of these three path factors. That is why it is called a root of profit.
Herein, what is non-delusion as a profitable root?
Any knowing and seeing with respect to the four Noble Truths how they come to be, any actualizing, apprehending by entering upon 1 penetration, non-delusion, non-confusing, non-confusion, science, displaying, light, non-obstruction of initiates’ profitable ideas : this is non-delusion as a root of profit.
What is it the root of?
It is the root of non-delusion-born profitable bodily and verbal and mental action, and for cognizance and cognizance-concomitant ideas associated therewith.
Or alternatively, it is the root of two path factors.
Of which two?
Of right view and right mindfulness. It is the root of these two path factors. That is why it is called a root of profit.
That is how the eight-factored Path can be construed with the three roots.
Herein, what is perception of impermanence?
Any perception, perceiving, defining, taking it, that , this is perception of impermanence.
What is its outcome?
When perception of impermanence is kept in being, made much of, then with respect to the eight Worldly Ideas cognizance does not keep inking up, does not Jink, does not shape itself thereto, but rather onJooking- equanimity or else repulsiveness is what it shapes itself to.1 This is the outcome.
Herein, what is perception of pain?
Any perception, perceiving, defining, apprehending, that <All determinations are painfitl) , this is perception of pain.
What is its outcome?
When perception of pain is kept in being, made much of, then with respect to sloth,1 negligence, and hypocrisy, cognizance does not keep linking up, does not link, does not shape itself thereto, but rather onlooking-equanimity or else repulsiveness is what it shapes itself to. This is the outcome.
Herein, what is perception of not-self?
Any perception, perceiving, defining, apprehending, that , this is perception of not-self.
What is its outcome? When perception of not-self is kept in being, made much of, then with respect to I-making 1 cognizance does not keep linking up, does not link, does not shape itself thereto, but rather onJooking-equanimity or else repulsiveness is what it shapes itself to. This is the outcome.
Herein, what is perception of ugliness?
Any perception, perceiving, defining, apprehending, that , this is perception of ugliness.
What is its outcome?
When perception of ugliness is kept in being, made much of, then with respect to the sign of beauty cognizance does not keep linking up, does not link, does not shape itself thereto, but rather onlooking-equanimity or else repulsiveness is what it shapes itself to. This is the outcome.
Herein, the diagnosis of the five categories is taught by the Blessed One, and herein, any 1 perception of ugliness is diagnostic of the form category, perception of pain is diagnostic of the feeling category, perception of not-self is diagnostic of the perception category and of the determinations category, and perception of impermanence is diagnostic of the consciousness category.
Herein, one eradicates craving by quiet, one eradicates ignorance by insight. One eradicates greed by non-greed, 1 one eradicates hate by non-liate, one eradicates delusion by non-delusion. One eradicates perception of permanence by perception of impermanence, one eradicates perception of pleasure by perception of pain, one eradicates perception of self by perception of not-self, and one eradicates perception of beauty by perception of ugliness.
Quiet has the characteristic of preventing distraction of cognizance; its footing is the Meditations.
Insight has the characteristic of penetrating how all ideas come to be ; 1 its footing is all the knowable.
Non-greed has the characteristic of removing wishes; its footing is abstention from taking-what-is-not-given.
Non-delusion has the characteristic of not wrongly theorizing 1 about an object; its footing is right theory.
Perception of impermanence has the characteristic of grasping determined ideas’ destruction ; its footing is rise-and-subsidence.
Perception of pain has the characteristic of perceiving contact affected by taints ; its footing is feeling.
Perception of not-self has the characteristic of not approaching wrong theory about all ideas ;1 its footing is perception of ideas.
Perception of ugliness has the characteristic of apprehending the discoloured, the festering and the bloated corpse-stages ; 2 its footing is dispassion.
When these nine terms are disclosed, all the profitable is disclosed.1 And that can be known by one who has learnt much, not by one who bas learnt little, by one with understanding not by one without understanding, by one devoted, not by one undevoted.
Herein, perception of impermanence does not become established in one who, believing in perception of permanence, does not review continuity in the consecutive occurrence of cognizance.I Perception of pain does not become established in one who, believing in the gratification offered by pleasure in the five strands of sensual desire, does not review the discomfort of the postures.2 Perception of not-self does not become established in one who, believing in self in the categories or elements or bases, does not review the resolution into the different elements and many elements. Perception of ugliness does not become established in one for whom, delighting in colour and shape and believing in beauty in the body, it remains concealed.
Faith has the characteristic of non-remorse; its manifestation is placing faith ;
its footing is the four factors of Stream-Entry
as stated by the Blessed One .
The energy faculty has the characteristic of not dissipating vigour : its manifestation is the instigation of energy ; 1
the footing for its being there 2 is the four right endeavours,
as stated by the Blessed One .
Mindfulness has the characteristic of remembering; its manifestation is non-forgetting; 1
the footing for its being there 2 is the four foundations of mindfulness
as stated by the Blessed One .
Concentration has the characteristic of unification; its manifestation is non-distraction; its footing is the four meditations,1
as stated by the Blessed One .
as stated by the Blessed One .
Four Blessings : living in befitting places as a blessing, waiting on true men as a blessing, right disposition in self-guidance as a blessing, and having in the past made merit as a blessing .
Herein, living in befitting places has the characteristic of dependence on Noble Ones ; it is the footing for waiting on true men.
Waiting on True Men has the characteristic of seeing 1 Noble Ones ; it is the footing for right disposition in self-guidance.
Right disposition in self-guidance has the characteristic of right practice; it is the footing for the kinds of merit.
Merit has the characteristic of amassing profitable ideas ; it is the footing for all the kinds of excellence.
The eleven Ideas Rooted in Virtue are these :  .1
Herein, virtue has the characteristic of abstention ; it is the footing for non-remorse.
Non-remorse has the characteristic of no-self-blame; it is the footing for gladness.
Gladness has the characteristic of gladde1ling ; it is the footing for happiness.
Happiness has the characteristic of mental elation; it is the footing for tranquillity.
Tranquillity has the characteristic of wieldiness; it is the footing for pleasure.
Pleasure has the characteristic of non-affliction ; 1 it is the footing for concentration.
Concentration has the characteristic of non-distraction; it is the footing for knowing and seeing how things are .
Knowing and seeing how things are 2 has the characteristic of undistorted judgment ; it is the footing for dispassion. Dispassion has the characteristic of non-reliance; it is the footing for fading of lust.
Fading of lust has the characteristic of non-corruption; it is the footing for deliverance.
Deliverance has the characteristic of seclusion from unprofitable ideas; it is the footing for knowing and seeing of deliverance.3
There are four noble planes and four fruits of the monk’s state.
Herein, when someone “ understands how things are “ this is the plane of seeing.
And it is the fruit of Stream-Entry. Having understood how things are he “ finds dispassion “ ; this is the footing for attenuation of lust for sensual desire 1 and of the kinds of ill will,
and for the fruit of Once- Return. When his subtle 1 sensual lust and ill will fade this is the heart-deliverance due to fading of lust,
and it is the fruit of Non-Return. When with the fading of ignorance he is liberated this is (g} the plane of Him Who has Done, 1
and it is Arahantship . 531. Fruits of the monk’s state : what is the word-meaning? The noble eight-factored path is the “monk’s state”. These things mentioned above, being its fruits, are called 1 fruits of the monk’s state.
Why are they called fruits of the divine state also?
The “divine state” is the noble eight-factored path. These, being its fruits, are called fruits of the divine state.
Herein, how is he a Stream-Enterer?1
With the actualizing of Truth three fetters are abandoned for a noble hearer , namely embodiment-view, uncertainty, and misapprehension-of-virtue-and-duty . .
Herein, what is the embodiment-view ?
 . In regard to these five categories, either he is a self- apprehender or a self’s-property-apprehender thus  in one of them, taking it as the power- wielder, 1 mover , 2 helper, lyer-alongside-limb-for-limb 3 .
When treating it thus,’ any liking, preference, way of regarding , way of arguing a case, liking for pondering views 5 , or seeing , 5 on his part is called “ embodiment-view “.
Herein in this embodiment-view five of the twenty kinds belong with annihilationism.
Which 6 five?
 down to that is, the first of each of the five sets of four positions. These five belong with annihilationism. The remaining fifteen that is, the remaining three in each of the five sets belong with eternalism .
So with the abandoning of the embodiment-view the sixty-two 7 types of view are abandoned .
The abandoning 8 belongs neither to annihilationism nor to eternalism.
So with the abandoning of annihilationism and eternalism the noble hearer has no type of view at all except 9 right view dissociated from worlds .
But how does the embodiment-view not come to be?
 and the whole white side can be quoted down to etc. . When he sees thus he has no embodiment-view.
How does uncertainty not come to be ?
Here a noble hearer does not 1 doubt, is not uncertain, is confident, that the Enlightened One  and all the rest of the passage.
He does not 1 doubt, is not uncertain, … about the True Idea …
with all the passage down to … Exhaustion of cramng, fading, ceasing, extinction ) ; he possesses this second undoubtable 2 idea.
He does not 1 doubt, … about the Community … down to … 3 , he possesses this third undoubtable 2 idea.
He does not doubt, is not uncertain, believes, is confident, that ) .
He does not doubt, is not uncertain, … that craving is the origin of suffering.4
He does not doubt, is not uncertain, … that there is cessation of suffering with cessation of craving.
He does not doubt, is not uncertain, believes, is confident, that the noble eight-factored path is the way leading to cessation of suffering.
In so far as concerns the Enlightened One or the True Idea or the Community or Suffering or Origin or Cessation or the Path , any doubting, vagueness, uncertainty, ambivalence, … , vacillation, oscillation, 5 indefiniteness, inconclusiveness, ununilateralness, ununilaterality all that he has .6
Herein, Misapprehension-of-virtue-and-duty is of two kinds : that with regard to virtue and that with regard to one purified.
Herein, as to misapprehension-of-virtue-and-duty with respect to virtue: when someone misapprehends thus  and ,
then any 1 liking, preference, belief, way of regarding, way of arguing a case, liking for pondering views, or seeing, on the part of one such as that, this is misapprehension-of-virtue-and-duty
When someone has recourse to an uncleansing and unliberating idea as cleansing and liberating thus and so on 
and , then any liking, preference, belief , way of regarding, way of arguing a case, pondering of views, or seeing, on the part of one such as that is misapprehension-of-virtue-and-duty with respect to one purified.
Now the noble hearer has abandoned both these kinds of misapprehension … down to … . He is virtuous possessing the kinds of virtue desired of noble ones, that are untorn, … down to… conducive to peace) .
With the abandoning of these three fetters a well taught and all the rest .
“With the actualizing of truth “ : what is the word- meaning?
There are four kinds of actualizing : actualizing by diagnosing, actualizing by abandoning, actualizing by verifying, and actualizing by keeping in being.1
Herein, a noble hearer actualizes Suffering by means of the actualizing by diagnosing, he actualizes Origin by means of the actualizing by abandoning, he actualizes Cessation by means of the actualizing by verifying, and he actualizes the Path by means of the actualizing by keeping-in- being.2
For what reason
is there the actualizing of Suffering by diagnosis, the actualizing of Origin by abandoning, the actualizing of Cessation by verification, and the actualizing of the Path by keeping-in-being ?
Because of quiet and insight. 539. How does he actualize?
Having anchored cognizance on the object, he sees the five categories as suffering.
Herein, any anchoring 1 is quiet
When he sees the five categories as suffering, then his reliance on the five categories, his attachment, approaching , cleaving, wish, infatuation, disposition, aspiration, concerning them are abandoned.
Herein, the five categories are suffering ;
Thus these four Truths have their actualization at one time, at one moment, in one cognizance, neither before nor after .
That is why the Blessed One said “ With the actualizing of Truth three fetters are abandoned for a noble hearer” .
Herein, when quiet and insight occur coupled together he performs four functions at one time, at one moment, in one cognizance : he actualizes suffering by means of the actualizing by diagnosing, … down to … he actualizes the Path by means of the actualizing by keeping-in-being.
What is the reason?
Because the actualizing of suffering is done by diagnosis … down to … the actualizing of the Path by keeping-in-being.
Because it can be regarded 1 as follows : Just as a boat going on the water performs four functions; it causes one to reach the further shore, it leaves the hither shore, it carries a cargo, and it cleaves the stream-so too, when quiet and insight occur coupled together he performs four functions at one time, at one moment, in one cognizance : he actualizes suffering by means of the actualizing by diagnosing, … down to … he actualizes the Path by means of the actualizing by keeping-in-being.
Or just as the sun rising performs four functions at one time, neither before nor after ; it dispels darkness, makes light manifest, shows form, and terminates cold-so too, when quiet and insight occur coupled together … etc …. 542. Or just as a lamp burning performs four functions at one time, neither before nor after : it dispels darkness, makes light manifest, shows form, and uses up fuel -so too, when quiet and insight occur coupled together … etc ….
 this is the plane of seeing, and it is the fruit of Stream-Entry.1
Being steadied in the fruit of Stream-Entry, when he further keeps quiet and insight in being, and when they occur coupled together, then with the abandoning of the greater part of lust for sensual desires and of ill will the noble hearer
 . This is the plane of attenuation,
and it is the fruit of Once- Return.2 545. Being steadied in the fruit of Once-Return, when he further keeps quiet and insight in being, he abandons without remainder both lust for sensual desires and ill will together with the underlying- tendencies to both, and when both lust for sensual desires and ill will are abandoned without remainder, then the five hither-side fetters are abandoned, namely embodiment-view, misapprehension-of- virtue-and-duty, uncertainty, will-for-sensual-desires, and ill-will. . This is the plane of the Lust-Free, and it is the fruit of Non-Return.1
Being steadied in the fruit of Non-Return, when he further keeps quiet and insight in being he abandons the five further-side fetters, namely lust-for-form, lust-for-being, conceit, agitation, and ignorance.
With the abandoning of these five further-side fetters the noble hearer . This is the plane of Him Who Has Done,1
and it is Arahantship.1 54: 7. This is the element of extinction with trace left.
But with the exhaustion of his life-span, with the surcease of his life-faculty, this suffering too ceases and no other suffering arises.
The cessation, pacification, of this suffering and the non-manifestation of any other is the element of extinction without trace left .
These are the two elements of extinction .
So the Truths have been stated ,
Actualizing of the Truths has been stated , Definition of Defilement has been stated , Abandoning has been stated , the Planes have been stated , the Fruits have been stated , and the Elements of Extinction have been stated .
So when these have been stated all the ideas siding with Enlightenment are stated.
The task to be done is here.
Herein, what are the nine successive attainments?
They are the four Meditations, the four Formless Attainments, and Cessation Attainment.1
 can be quoted in detail.
Herein, what are the four Formless Attainments?
 1 down to Cessation Attainment can be quoted in detail.
These are the nine successive attainments.
Herein, what is the First Meditation?
It is that dissociated from five factors and associated with five factors .
What five factors is it dissociated from?
From the five Hindrances.
Herein, what are the five Hindrances?
They are  , which can be given in detail.
 Herein, what is will for sensual desires?
It is will-and-lust, love, attachment, cleaving, wish, infatuation, aspiration, non- giving-up, underlying-tendency, manifest-obsession, with regard to the five strands of sensual desire ; this is the hindrance of will for sensual desires.
 Herein, what is the hindrance of ill will?
It is annoyance with creatures and with determinations … etc …. as demonstrated 1 under hate . This is the hindrance of ill will.
 Herein, what is drowsiness?
It is dulling of cognizance, heaviness of cognizance, unwieldiness of cognizance, shirking of cognizance, sleepiness, nodding, blinking, winking,1 this is drowsiness.
Herein, what is lethargy?
*//* It is any bodily lethargicness, di1llness, heaviness of body, untranquillity of body.
So 2 this lethargy and the drowsiness mentioned before are together called the hindrance of lethargy-and-drowsiness .
 Herein, what is agitation?
Any disquiet of cognizance is agitation.
Herein, what is worry?
Any mental erasing, guilt, guiltiness,1 heart-erasing, remorse, this is worry.
This worry and the agitation mentioned above are together called the hindrance of agitation-and-worry .
 Herein, what is the hindrance of uncertainty ?
Any doubt, uncertainty, about the Enlightened One, about the True Idea, about the Community, … etc. … this is uncertainty.
Furthermore, there are five kinds of uncertainty, namely entirely 1 obstructive, partly obstructive, obstructive to attainment of quiet, obstructive to the Path, and obstructive to heaven; these are the five 2 kinds of uncertainty.
Here, however, what is intended 3 is uncertainty obstructive to attainment of quiet.
Herein, as to “ hindrances “, what is the word-meaning? What do they hinder from?
They hinder from all the profitable side.
How 1 do they hinder?
Will-for-sensual-desires hinders from perception of ugliness, ill will hinders from lovingkindness, lethargy hinders from tranquillity, drowsiness hinders from instigation of energy, agitation hinders from quiet, worry hinders from non- remorse,2 and uncertainty hinders from understanding as that of dependent arising.
Another way:
Will-for-sensual-desires hinders from non-greed as a root of profit, ill will hinders from non-hate, lethargy-and- drowsiness hinders from concentration, agitation-and-worry hinders from the foundations of mindfulness, and uncertainty hinders from non-delusion as a root of profit.
Another way :
Three abidings, namely the heavenly abiding, the divine abiding, and the noble abiding .
The heavenly abiding is the four meditations. The divine abiding is the four measureless states, and the noble abiding is the thirty-seven ideas that side with enlightenment .
Herein, will-for-sensual- desires and agitation-and-worry hinder from the heavenly abiding, ill will hinders from the divine abiding, and lethargy-and-drowsiness and uncertainty hinder from the noble abiding.
Another way:
Will-for-sensual-desires, ill will, and agitation- and-worry hinder from quiet, and lethargy-and-drowsiness and uncertainty hinder from insight. That is why these are called hindrances.
The first meditation is dissociated from these five factors.
What five factors is the first meditation associated with?
With thinking and exploring, with happiness, with pleasure, and with unification of cognizance .
With 1 the arousing, obtaining, possessing and verifying of these five factors the first meditation is said to be obtained:
having aroused, perfected, these five factors, he abides, that is why it is said that with the heavenly abiding.
Herein, the second meditation possesses four factors with happiness and pleasure, with unification of cognizance , and with confidence in oneself. Having aroused, perfected, these four factors, he abides, that is why it is said that .
Herein, the third meditation possesses five factors with mindfulness, awareness, pleasure, unification of cognizance , and onlooking-equanimity. Having aroused, perfected, these five factors, he abides, that is why it is said that .
Herein, the fourth meditation possesses four factors with onlooking-equanimity, purity of mindfulness, neither- painful-nor-pleasant feeling, and unification of cognizance . The fourth meditation possesses these four factors.
So with 1 the arousing, obtaining, possessing, and verifying of these four factors the fourth meditation is said to be obtained. Having aroused, perfected, these four factors, he abides, that is why it is said that ).2
Having aroused, perfected, these four meditations he abides, that is why it is said that 
The meaning of pressure is the meaning of impermanent, the meaning of fleeting, the meaning of making reach an end, the meaning of seclusion from permanence, is the meaning of impermanent. This is the meaning of impermanent.
Herein, what is the meaning of painful?
The meaning of repressing is the meaning of painful, the meaning of oppressing, the meaning of sense-of-urgency, the meaning of sickness. This is the meaning of painful.
Herein, what is the meaning of void?
The meaning of unsullied1 is the meaning of void, the meaning of non-constraint , 2 the meaning of non-torment,3 the meaning of standstill. This is the meaning of void.
Herein, what is the meaning of not-self?
The meaning of unamenability to lordship-rule is the meaning of not-self, the meaning of unsusceptibility to the wielding of power the meaning of unsusceptibility to be done with as one wants, the meaning of being secluded 1 from identification. This is the meaning of not-self.
The Pitaka chapter, called “Compendium of the Threads’ Meaning” in the Actual Presence,2 is completed.
for the eye element is cut off ;
for it can be said that “just as this man is by nature choleric, phlegmatic, volatile, or of complex nature “,3 so the ten beginning with the eye element and also in all the faculties … etc. 4 … the meaning of dissimilar is the meaning of element.
the eye base … down to … the mind base are those in oneself; the form base … down to … the idea base are the external.
It may be said that the meaning of aspect 1 is the meaning of base;
like the handsome aspect and ugly aspect; 2 for just as such and such oxen stand out with those two aspects,
so with these the oxen of cognizance and cognizance-concomitants stand out with the defilement of action and inseparably from the idea of suffering.
for just as the way-of-access to a king is through the provisions-for-ways- of-access , so the meaning of provision-of-a-way-of-access is the meaning of base.
the right mindfulness,1 right effort,1 and right concentration are the Concentration Category ;
and the right intention 1 and right view 1 are the Understanding Category.
they are the footing for consciousness.
and what is pervertable has to be known.1
What is the one perversion? It is that distortion into the opposite by which the perverted 1 perception, etc., seizes
The form category is the body-as-a-ground-for-selfhood,
the feeling category is feeling-as-a-ground-for-selfhood,
the perception category and determinations category are ideas-as-a-ground-for-selfhood,1
and the consciousness category is cognizance-as-a-ground-for- selfhood.
so too with respect to feelings … cognizance … ideas that there comes to be the perversion that they are self.1
Herein, it is for the purpose of the four perversions’ eradication that the Blessed One teaches and describes the four foundations of mindfulness : when someone abides contemplating the body as a body, he eradicates his perversion that there is beauty in the ugly. So it can be stated too with respect to feelings, cognizance, and ideas.
Quiet and insight ; non-greed, non-hate, and non-delusion ; perception of impermanence, perception of pain, perception of not-self, and perception of ugliness.
Non-hate has the characteristic of non-ill-will ; its footing is abstention from killing-breathing-things.
Understanding has the characteristic of act-of-understanding ; 1 its manifestation is judging how a meaning is; its footing is the four noble Truths,
with respect to one purified?
and any fathoming 2 is insight.
any reliance thereon, attachment, approaching, cleaving, wish, infatuation, disposition, or aspiration, is Origin ; the abandoning of that is Cessation ; the quiet and insight are the Path.
Herein, what are the four Meditations?
Herein,1 what is the meaning of impermanent?
Meditation 1 is fading of lust.
The four meditations can be cited in detail .2
They are of two kinds: dissociated from enlightenment factors and associated with enlightenment factors.
Herein, those dissociated from enlightenment factors belong to those outside the Enlightened Ones’ dispensation while those associated with enlightenment factors belong to persons ennobled by obtainment of the Eight- Factored Path.
Herein, there are these 1 six personal roots namely lust and the rest. By presenting them as in one of lusting temperament, of hating temperament, of deluded temperament, of lusting-hating temperament, of lusting-deluded temperament, of hating-deluded temperament, and of lust-hate-and- delusion-tending-to-be-quieted temperament,2 there are thus these seven types of persons who have the :five hindrances 3 to their entry upon meditation.
The opposite, according to capacity to resist them, counteracts the three roots of unprofit 4 as follows: by means of the profitable root non-greed it counteracts covetousness and agitation and drifting-about, which are due to the unprofitable root greed ; worry and uncertainty are on the side of delusion, and it counteracts that by means of non-delusion :
Herein, for the fulfilling of non-greed he thinks renunciation- thinking.
Herein, for the fulfilling of non-hate he thinks non-ill-will- thinking.
Herein, for the fulfilling of non-delusion he thinks non-cruelty-thinking.
Herein, for the fulfilling of non-greed he is .
Herein, for the fulfilling of non-hate and for the fulfilling of non-delusion he is . And so .
“ Thinking “ : there are three kinds of thinking, namely renunciation-thinking, non-ill-will-thinking, and non-cruelty-thinking ..
Herein, “ thinking “ is the first instance 1 while “ exploring “ is the exploration of what is got thus.
Just as, when a man sees a man coming in the distance he does not yet know whether it is a woman or a man; but when he has got the perception that “it is a woman” or that “it is a man” or that” it is one of such colour ” or that” it is one of such shape ”, then when he is thinking this he further scrutinizes as follows “How then, is he virtuous or unvirtuous, rich or poor 1 “,such is exploring.
In thinking he fixes, 1 in exploring 2 he wanders about his fixed object and turns it over.
And just as a winged bird 1 first accumulates speed and afterwards no more accumulates speed, when gliding, so too, thinking is like the accumulation of speed, and like the out-stretchedness of the gliding bird’s wings is exploring,
Such thinking is the opposite of perception of sensual desires ; such exploring is the opposite of perception of ill will and of perception of cruelty.
The action 1 of such kinds of thinking is non-attention to the unprofitable. The action of such kinds of exploring is the restraining of the “ forerunners “.2
Thinking is like a text-reciter 1 who does his recital silently: exploring is like his simply contemplating it.
Thinking is like non-diagnosis ;
Thinking is the Discrimination of Language and the Discrimination of Perspicuity ; exploring is the Discrimination of Ideas and the Discrimination of Meanings .
Thinking is cognizance’s skill in health; exploring is cognizance’s skill in directive-guidance.
Thinking is about this being profitable, this unprofitable, about this to be kept in being, this to be abandoned, this to be verified ; 2 exploring is like the abandoning, the keeping in being, the verifying.2
The twofold, bodily and mental, pain does not arise in one steadied in these types of thinking and explaring, and the twofold pleasure, bodily and mental, does arise.
The mental pleasure thus sprung 1 from thinking is happiness, 2 while the bodily pkasure is bodily 2 feeling .
The unification here is concentration .
That is how the first meditation has abandoned five factors and possesses five factors .
With constant cultivation of this same thinking and exploring his mentality becomes inclined thereto.
Then the thinking and exploring seem 1 gross to him,
His heart which in the first meditation had exploring’s object
The two ideas, namely thinking and exploring, need no longer be recollected,1
It is through that singleness that the happiness comes to fulfilment.
The happiness is the mental joy faculty, 3 while the pleasure is the bodily pleasure faculty,
So that second meditation possesses four factors .
 has abandoned 1 what is comprised by wetness.1
But joy-cognizance still arises 2 there, and when he investigates that, he attends with only  conascent onlooking-equanimity :
And the unification of cognizance is concentration.5 So that third meditation possesses five 6 factors .
hate and lethargy- and-drowsiness are on the side of hate, and it counteracts that by means of non-hate.
which keeps preserving the thinkings 2 and keeps preserving the explorings.
exploring is like diagnosis.
and the renunciation-born 2 pleasure- of-happiness also is gross,
and so concentration-born happiness and delight are born instead.
becomes confident in itself with the pacification of these namely thinking and exploring.
and what now can be served 2 is the presently arisen
singleness due to their quieting, which singleness is unification.
the unification of cognizance is concentration.
 ;
and as he still feels with the body the pleasure induced by the happiness he abides aware,3
by means of which mindfulness 4 and awareness the onlooking-equanimity comes to fulfilment.
so .
Herein, the onlooking- equanimity was as yet unclarified 3 owing to the presence of the four faculties, namely the pain faculty, grief faculty, pleasure faculty, and joy faculty.
With the cessation of these there is onlooking-equanimity and awareness. Herein, it was owing to the pleasure faculty and the joy faculty that there was unmindfulness, and with their cessation he becomes possessed of mindfulness ; and it is owing to the pain faculty and the grief faculty that there was unawareness, 4 and with their cessation he becomes aware. So with the clarification 5 due to onlooking-equanimity, which is accompanied by neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he becomes mindful and aware, and there is unification of cognizance . This is called the fourth meditation.
Herein, the person of lusting temperament has the pleasure faculty and the joy faculty. The person of hating temperament has the pain faculty and the grief faculty. The person of deluded temperament has unmindfulness and unawareness.
Herein, the lusting-temperament person’s approval ceases in the third meditation and in the fourth. The hating-temperament person’s resistance ceases in the first meditation and in the second. The deluded-temperament person’s unawareness ceases in the first meditation and in the second
while his uninindfulness ceases in the third meditation and in the fourth. That is how these three types of persons’ four meditations arrive at their cleansing.
Herein, the person of lusting-hating temperament has unmindfulness and unawareness 1 and approval and resistance, hence his meditation is of the kind dealing with diminution .
Herein, the person of lusting-deluded temperament has the trio with approval 1 , and he is one who sees gratification ; hence his meditation is of the kind dealing with diminution.
Herein, the person of hating-deluded temperament has the trio with resistance, 1 and he is one who sees disappointment ; hence his meditation is of the kind dealing with diminution.
Herein, It is the person of lusting-hate-and-delusion- tending-to-be-quieted temperament  …  1 who has the kind of meditation that deals with distinction .1 That is how 2 these four meditations can be demonstrated among these seven types of’ persons .
Also 1 as regards the four kinds of concentration in the four bases for success: the first meditation is through concentration due to will, the second meditation is through concentration due to energy, the third meditation is through concentration due to cognizance, and the fourth meditation is through concentration due to inquiry.
Again the first meditation is through the Dispositionless, the second meditation is through the Void, the third meditation is through the Signless, and the fourth meditation is through Mindfulness of Breathing.
Again the first meditation is through the pacification of sensual-desire thinking and ill-will , the second meditation is through the pacification of thinking and exploring, the third meditation is through the pacification of the pleasure faculty1 and the grief faculty,1 and the fourth meditation is through the pacification of the bodily determinations, namely in-breath and out-breath .
Again the first meditation is through the Expression of Generosity, the second meditation is through the Expression of Truth, the third meditation is through the Expression of Understanding, and the fourth meditation is through the Expression of Peace.1
These four meditations are now demonstrated by a brief demonstration.1 599. It is here that the concentration faculty comes to fulfilment,
the other four faculties there being subordinate to it. Herein, he who reaches exhaustion of taints by depending on the first meditation has gone by the painful I Way with sluggish acquaintance, with the grief faculty in opposition.
He who reaches exhaustion of taints by depending on the second meditation has gone by the painful 1 Way with swift acquaintance, with the pain faculty in opposition.
He who reaches exhaustion by depending on the third meditation has gone by the pleasant Way with sluggish acquaintance, with the joy faculty in opposition.
He who reaches exhaustion of taints by depending on the fourth meditation has gone by the pleasant ‘Vay with swift acquaintance, with the pleasure faculty in opposition.
Miscellaneous Demonstration.2
 The accessories are these . With these accessories, the condition for its coming about is this . The stipulate for its coming about is this . The keeping of the stipulate in being is this .
 With that keeping of it in being, the disappointment is this .
 The falling away through this disappointment is this 3 .
 Whose falling away? Falling away of a meditator who resorts to that meditation .
through that distinction the gratification is this. Whose gratification is it? The “ thoroughbred” meditator’s 4 . This “ thoroughbred “ meditator has steadied that meditation in skill in health . When that steadied meditation comes to non-lapse 6 it is the meditation power . When steadied in the meditation power the perfection 6 is this . When the meditation has reached perfection its factors are these .6 ‘ 601. Now he who has undisturbed intention 1 keeps the meditation factors in being in the first meditation ;
and precisely because he is one who recollects that fact , happiness too 2 is a meditation factor in the first meditation; and also because, when he possesses the factors,3 his ideas are drenched 4 by that happiness .
In the second meditation 6 too happiness is a meditation- factor; but rather is it so as the essential idea here, owing to the very pleasantness of the meditation-factor ideas that accompany meditation occurring in this second way. Confidence in oneself is a meditation-factor in the second meditation owing to clarification of the mind, and it is owing to its being drenched 6 by that clarification
that the happiness is also a meditation-factor in the second meditation; for it is happiness concentrated 1 by the confidence in oneself that is a meditation-factor in the second meditation. Singleness of heart 8 is also a meditation-factor in the second meditation . The state of contact accompanied by onlooking-equanimity is a meditation-factor in the third meditation, and pleasure is a factor of it too .
Singleness of heart 8 is also a meditation- factor in the third 9 meditation. Onlooking-equanimity and neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling are also 10 meditation-factors in the fourth meditation; but the onlooking-equanimity is that belonging to the plane of directive-management.11
Purity-of-mindfulness is a meditation- factor in the fourth meditation; but purity-of-mindfulness itself alone is a meditation-factor in more than one plane unassociated with happiness.12 Singleness of heart is also a meditation-factor in the fourth meditation .
 Herein, what is the Meditation-Plane ?
In the first meditation with thinking and with exploring the meditation-plane is that which goes with seclusion.1
In the third meditation the meditation-plane is that which has no happiness 3 since it has abandoned 3 excitement due to pleasure.
In the fourth meditation the meditation-plane is that unaccompanied 4 by pleasure or pain and accompanied by directive-management.5
In the second meditation, the meditation-plane is that accompanied by those Bases for Transcendance 7 which are found among those percipient of form in themselves, namely the first two such Bases.
In the third meditation, the plane of meditation is that accompanied by the Liberations among those having the eight  Liberations.8
The plane of the fourth meditation is rightly that which has bodily-determinations unaccompanied by in-breath and out-breath .
9 603. Herein, what is the meditation-distinction?
It is that when “quite secluded from sensual desires, secluded from evil unprofitable ideas” there is surmounting of the sensual- desire element, which surmounting is accompanied by cognizance and cognizance-concomitants, this is a meditation-distinction.
That perception and attention 1 take place without thinking and without exploring and are accompanied by happiness owing to their being accompanied by mindfulness with happiness,
That also in the plane without thinking and without exploring perception and attention 1 that go with mindfulness accompanied by onlooking-equanimity take place,
That perception and attention 1 accompanied by purity of mindfulness take place, and that, having entered upon that plane, he abides in it, this is a meditation-distinction.
That perception and attention 1 accompanied by the Base- Consisting-of-Non-Owning take place on the plane of that accompanied by the Base-Consisting-of-Infiniteness-of-Consciousness,3 and that, having entered upon that plane, he abides in it, this is a meditation-distinction.4
 Meditation-Accessories? The state of purporting removal of sensual-desire thinking is the accessory consisting in renunciation thinking.
The state of purporting removal of ill-will thinking is the accessory consisting in non-ill-will thinking.
The state of purporting removal of cruelty thinking is the accessory consisting in non-cruelty thinking.
The state of abiding without action 1 as door-guardedness in the five faculties beginning with the eye is the accessory consisting in fewness-of-wishes, and it is purified livelihood as accessory of the four attainments.
The state of right practice is the accessory consisting in the path.
The state of meditation’s having been generated 2 is the accessory consisting in the fruit.
 The Meditation’s Coming About? 1 Meditations 2 that have come to be originated in any instance whatever 3 with the profitable as cause. These come about when they have reached renunciation.
They come about when there is the concentration due to cessation of objective-support of thinking and exploring .4
They come about with the absence of happiness.5
They come about with the abandoning of the pleasure faculty and joy faculty and with the absence of affection.6
they come about with non-fever.
This is the meditation’s coming about.8
 Herein, what is the stipulate? 1
Close relationship with the good is a stipulate for meditation.
Door-guardedness in the faculties beginning with the eye is a stipulate for meditation.
Discontent 2 with mere profitable ideas is a stipulate for meditation.
Hearing the true object of faith is a stipulate for meditation.
The measure-gauge 3 of one who has a sense of urgency with regard to an urgent instance,3
 Herein, what is the keeping in being?
Cultivation of lovingkindness is the keeping of non-ill-will thinking in being.
Cultivation of compassion 1 is the keeping of non-cruelty thinking in being.
Keeping gladness in being is the state of one who acts with happiness, pleasure, and awareness.
There is keeping onlooking- equanimity in being as productivity 2 and there is keeping onlooking-equanimity in being as unproductivity , 2 which are respectively onlooking-equanimity and looking on at. There is keeping perception of ugliness 3 in being which is the painful way with sluggish acquaintance, such acquaintance being that tied to existence belonging to those tied to existence . 4 That keeping in being in the six ways 5 is kept in being, made much of, established, made the basis, made the vehicle, 6 consolidated, 6 and thoroughly well instigated. 6
Likewise 1  : in the first meditation the grief faculty 2 ceases,
and in the second meditation the pain faculty ceases ,
 The Meditations are four and their respective Factors are these. The particular mass 1 of these factors is, with any factor of that mass, 2 the Meditation Plane. What 3 is its distinction 1 It is the distinction of this meditation .
 When he reviews that meditation as to superiority,3 the distinction being this ),
In the second meditation without thinking and without exploring the meditation-plane is that which goes with the happiness born of confidence in oneself.2
Again the first meditation, the meditation-plane is that accompanied by the Measureless States 6 and has creatures for its object.
this is a meditation-distinction.
and that in virtue of the essential idea of this meditation mindfulness is established,2
and that, having entered upon that plane, he abides in it, this is a meditation-distinction.
They come about with non-burning,7
Having a good friend is a stipulate for meditation.
this is a stipulate for meditation.
 For one who keeps it in being thus, the disappointment is as follows.1
In the case of the first meditation: this idea possesses determinations, this idea is still unpurified , 2 and 2 has taints,
this idea has this habit and has a near-opposite, this idea has sensual desire to shadow and haunt it,3 and it is the grossest of all the attainments. It has thinking and exploring
which still disturb cognizance,4 and the body still gets tired there, and when the body gets tired cognizance is harrassed, 5
and the body is unamenable to directive management for the five worldly kinds of supernormal acquaintance. These are the disappointments in the first meditation.
In the case of the second meditation the disappointments are these : this idea is accompanied by the extension 1 of happiness ; while cognizance is no longer accessible to disturbance 2 by thinking and exploring 2
yet this idea still has a danger that has access 3 to it, for this idea has grief for its enemy;
and this idea is at the mercy 4 of the happiness belonging to the associated ideas there, and accordingly it has difficulty 5 in avoiding the plane of anxiety about the non-occurrence of the ceased happiness, and this idea, in regard to the four kinds of painfulness, is interpenetrated by them, namely by the painfulness in fear, 5 by the painfulness in impediment, 6 by the painfulness in acquaintance, 7 and by the painfulness in lust. These are the disappointments in the second meditation.
Herein, what is the disappointment in the third meditation?
Owing to its state of being accompanied by pleasure-due-to- onlooking-equanimity, 1 this idea is subordinate 1 to the onlooking- equanimity pleasure belonging to the perceptions 1 possessing the liking there(?
), hence the pleasure there is constantly perceived as accessible to pain, and so on account of the disturbance of cognizance it goes with 1 pleasure and pain,
What is the disappointment in the fourth meditation?
Up to the Non-Owning Attainment these ideas have further co-attainments,1 and on that plane various types of views arise in foolish ordinary men who like them .
And the meditations are interpenetrated 2 by gross and subtle perceptions of form. Always a sentimental lovingkindness 4 etc. is shared ) with each fraction and sub-fraction of meditation, and all the four accessories are difficult. And these meditations come about through something else , each coming about in dependence on another below it,
and when come about here these ideas are still uncompleted,
and with the sign not properly taken up 6 these ideas fall away.
And since these ideas are cessative , 6 they do not arouse emergent qualities. 7 The meditations belonging to these ideas have factors of successive cessation, and the signs 8 may not be conformable with the meditation-sign perception,
and that perception comes about as something not previously obtained and only in virtue of the right type of meditator.9
 With these disappointments the falling away from the meditation is this.
In one who has some residual perception while in the fourth Formless State, by his not deliberating upon the cessation- attainment 1 , perception and attention 2 accompanying the Base Consisting of Non-owning which is the third Formless State take place in him, and so he falls away from the cessation-attainment .
In one who, being percipient of imperturbability 3 , has entered upon the Non-percipient Base , perception and attention 2 accompanying the Base-Consisting-of-Non-Owning 3 take place’ in him, and since he does not understand that plane he falls away from it.
In one who has entered upon the third Formless State, namely the Base-Consisting-of-Non-Owning perception and attention 2 accompanying the Base-Consisting-of-Infiniteness-of-Consciousness take place in him, and since he does not understand that plane he falls away from it.
In one who has entered upon the second Formless State, namely the Base-Consisting-of-Infiniteness-of-Consciousness perception and attention accompanied by perception of form 4 …
 For whom does it fall away? In “ colt meditation “ 1 the meditator meditates as a “colt “,1 he meditates misapprehending,2 he meditates interrupting, he meditates destroying , 3 he meditates accumulating action, 4 he meditates without consolidating anything , he meditates overrunning, 6
he meditates slighting, he meditates without tranquillizing 8 the bodily determination, he meditates without knowing the escape from obsession, he meditates while still overcome by hindrances. 614. It is when the meditator gives attention to his having attained meditation that there is the gratification of the meditation. And the abandoning of the obsession by lust for sensual desires 1 is the gratification of meditation. While they owe their origin 2 to ideas whose cause is lust for sensual desires, the meditations have in the first instance factors cessative 3 of those ideas, and, beyond the first, of the pleasure by means of which the happiness is abandoned, and so it is the abandoning of defilements due to sensual desire and to action 4 that is the gratification. 615. Again the gratification of meditation is as follows: that while still in the life-in-a-world oppressed as it is by the major kinds of habit there may yet come about an opportunity for non-constraint,1 this is the abandoning offered by meditation; 2
nevertheless this benefit of meditation here in the life-in-a-world, which consists in obstructing and disobstructing,3 does not have the benefit of abandoning the roundabout of births for creatures who are involved in the roundabout that evolves without ultimate goal . This is the gratification of meditation.6 616. Gratification for whom? 1 For the “ thoroughbred” meditator ; 1
for a meditator who has meditated as a “ thorough- bred “ meditates without misapprehending what he has meditated as a “thoroughbred”, and the clauses for the “colt” meditator (§ 613} can be set up in parallel fashion in the opposite sense.
 Herein, what is skill in meditation?
Now this, also 6 in one as just described and who does not apprehend 6 any sign in the object externally, 6 is the Directive-Management Power for supernormal acquaintance. The signs of unification of cognizance 6 are well apprehended by the Quiet Power, and it is in meditation made to occur by the quiet due to the Path and its Fruit that there is no more foundering. 6 Concentration’s purity 6 that is due to onlooking-equanimity, which is that in one who apprehends well the consecutivity of the signs, 6 is the Mindfulness Power. Insight 6 with respect to ideas made to occur thereby is the Understanding Power 6 .
 Herein, what is meditation-perfection?
Lovingkindness brought to thorough perfection … 1 … 1 620. Now as to the verse: 1 . 621. By the Mode of Conveying a Teaching,1 two truths are demonstrated here in This Thread, namely Suffering and Origin.2 622. - By the Mode of Conveying an investigation, that those who see 1 nothing blameworthy in ideas provocative of fetters will cross the flood, no such instance is found ;
and on account of its still going with pleasure and pain, cognizance is still unamenable to directive management 1
for the verification of the five worldly supernormal acquaintances, and all these ideas, in regard to the first three meditation-attainments, are interpenetrated 1 by the four painfulnesses, namely by the painfulness in fear, 1 by the painfulness in impediment, by the painfi1lness in acquaintance, and by the painfulness in lust.1 These are the disappointments in the third meditation.
in detail down to … in the first meditation perception of sensual desire … can be cited.
Skill in attaining is skill in meditation, skill in distinction of meditations is skill in meditation, skill in succession of meditations is skill in meditation, skill in emerging from attainment is skill in meditation, skill in the meditations’ individual essences is skill in meditation, skill in the meditations’ disappointments is skill in meditation, skill in escape in the case of the meditations is skill in meditation.1 618. Through the Meditation Power 1 skill in means is obtained.2 Through the Meditation Power the non-falling-away that is the essential idea of a power in the Deliberating Power 3 is obtained and also the higher meditation dealing with distinction that is due to playing 4 with the meditation already generated 6 is obtained.
that they will not cross, such an instance is found. 2 There is this Construing and Investigation. 623. What is this the Footing for? “ Clung to desires” is the five strands of sensual desires ; that is the footing for craving for sensual desires.
“ Seeing nothing blameworthy in fetters” is the footing fo: ignorance. “Assuredly those clung with fetter-clinging 1 never cross the vast abounding flood “ is the footing for assuming.
“ Clung to desires” : sensual desires are twofold, namely sensual desire as thing and sensual desire as defilement . 625. Herein, sensual desire as defilement is craving for sensual desires as things; when craving for sensual desires is stated,1 craving for form and craving for being are stated 1 under the Mode of Conveying Characteristics. 626. “ Seeing nothing blameworthy in Fetters “ :
Any will and lust herein, for the fetter,1 what is the footing for that?
Now when pleasant feeling is admitted, the three kinds of feeling are admitted.
When the feeling category is admitted all the five categories are admitted.
When sensual desires as things- forms, sounds, odours, flavours, tangibles 1-are admitted, all the six external bases are admitted.
When the in-oneself and external bases are admitted all the existent is admitted. 2 This is called the Mode of Conveying Characteristics. 628. Herein, he 1 who becomes free from lust for a gross defilement resided in does not thereby become necessarily free from lust for all the defilements subtler than that .
Herein, the external fetter is “ mine “ while the fetter in oneself is “ I “.
Herein, what is the Blessed One’s Purport?
“ Clung to desires” Those who cling 1, the things to which they cling, those who do not cling,1 and that whereby they do not 1 cling : this mood is fourfold.
Herein, what are the three footings for the perversions? 2
is met with as the footing for the action of a doer of what is inferior and superior,
Then when persevering with the protection, guarding and preservation of those important persons, even while assuming 3 ill will towards that other, he still sees to the safety of the important persons.
In their safety being seen to, when he assumes 4 ill will towards him who might misbehave towards them,
he performs action born of hate,
which is a hindrance due to an improper faculty .5 Then any 6 perception 6 herein of their freedom from fear as an offering is action 7 of a doer of what 7 is superior, but 7 any 7 ill will regarding the misbehaviour 8 towards them is action of a doer of what 9 is inferior. Greed and hate are terms for hindrances.10 These are the four assumings. When anyone-whether woman or man-has assuming in virtue of these four assumings, their five categories are Suffering,11 while that same assuming is Origin. This Suffering and this Origin are also the Mode of Conveying a Teaching.12
Herein, those who do not 1 cling 1 to sensual desires do not 1 cling owing to contemplation of disappointment.
So desirousness to renounce with respect to this element of sensual desire 1 is called will for renunciation ;
any determinative act 2 that does not upset any 2 whether frail or firm 2 is will for non-ill-will,
and which does not 2 show cruelty is will for non- cruelty.2
Herein, will for renunciation is non-greed, will for non- ill-will is non-hate, and will for non-cruelty is non-delusion.
These three roots of profit, when produced in the eight Rightnesses ,1 conduce to cessation of those same four assumings.
Or if one should again do action, whether black or white, they conduce to the diminution of its ripening :
this is the neither-black- nor-white kind of action that conduces to exhaustion of action .
Herein, cessation of the three roots of unprofit is Cessation,
“ Clung to desires “ : those who are Initiates cling only in one 1 mood,
while those who are ordinary men cling in two moods. Therefore 2 this question must be called one declarable after analysis .
Although the Stream-Enterer still clings, it is in using, not in insisting ; for he 1 exerts himself for dispersal, not for amassing.
The Initiate still uses sensual desires with defilement ,2
but the ordinary man uses sensual desires in order to mould defilement.
That is why 3 the question, namely “One who clings 4 to sensual desires will not 4 cross the fourfold flood “ is one that is declarable after analysis. This is Analysis.
Reversal? Those who are not 1 clung to sensual desires and not bound by fetters will cross over the vast abounding flood.
This is the opposite of this Thread.
Synonyms? one who is clinging to sensual desires, and the strand of sensual desires there: a synonym therefore is this 1 term “ creature who clings” .
Herein, synonyms for sensual desires are as follows: mire,2 dirt , barb,3 boil, calamity, 4 menace, 5 or any other synonyms;
also for this 1 term “creature who clings” the synonyms are:
namely “ creature who clings, … much abiding in, or any other “ ,
Ways of Entry 1 with this verse, the way of entry is  dependent arising, suffering and origin,
the defilements, the determinations, and the fetters : in the case of the Categories, the determinations category is the way of entry, in the case of the Bases,1 the unprofitable ideas are the idea base,1 in the case of the faculties, the pleasure faculty and joy faculty. This is the way of entry by faculties.2
Clearing Up?
Terms of Expression? some of these ideas are described by a unity and some by a diversity,
In the case of those who “cling” to the five strands of sensual desires, the obsessions and perversions are described in terms of a diversity.
“ Cross the vast abounding flood”: ignorance is described in terms of a unity.
Requisites? what is the cause, what the condition, for that?
The strands of sensual desire  are 1 a condition by object-conditionality,
This is the cause, this is the condition.
Coordnation? the opinion 1 that “those who have clung to sensual desires have a good destination, are fair of form “,2 this is will and lust for the sense-desire element. That is determinations consisting of demerit.
What have they for their condition?
They have ignorance of their condition.
What are they a condition for?
So, with ignorance as condition, determinations ;
with determinations as condition, consciousness ; ….down to … ageing and death ; that is how there is an origin to this whole great 3 category of suffering. One Thread is gone.4
The Thread dealing with the five Hindrances can be quoted .
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Teaching?
 Covetousness and ill will and agitation are craving.
 Lethargy and drowsiness and worry and uncertainty are wrong view.
But although unwieldiness of the body is drowsiness, yet it is not a defilement by its individual essence.1 Accordingly stickiness of cognizance 2 and unwieldiness of body 2 are an imperfection by what they side with, not a defilement by their own individual essence.
Herein, the kind of lethargy belonging to cognizance obeying 3 perception of self is weariness, while worry is stickiness of cognizance . So these are the five hindrances. Four hindrances are defilements by their individual essence, but lethargy-and-drowsiness is an imperfection by its siding with the hindrances.
Just as the four taints are taints through their being taints by their own individual essences (as such, not through cognizance’s taintedness,
nevertheless, while these are the four taints that are through their own individual essences
as such, there are also taints that are taints only through the taintedness of what they side with .
But then it was said: 4 Whatever any 5 taints are associated with or dissociated from in the Thread-of-Argument concerned, it is by that alone that they can be called tainted or untainted.
It is pleasant feeling, and the two faculties, namely the pleasure faculty and the joy faculty.
It is that those who desire to cross the flood will abide contemplating disappointment in ideas provocative of fetters : this is the Blessed One’s purport here.
The three unprofitable roots are the footing for the perversion of cognizance, for the perversion of view, and for the perversion of perception * *.1
The three unprofitable roots are the footing for the action of a doer 1 of what is inferior and superior
and for the four kinds of assuming. For instance the unprofitable root hate
as when someone gives freedom from fear to a mother or a father or 2 some important bhikkhu,
and someone else might misbehave towards them by body or by speech.
So three kinds of will are directed to renunciation: will for renunciation, will for non-ill-will, and will for non-cruelty.
and the way thereto 1 is the Path, so these are two Truths : these are the four Truths . This is the Mode of Conveying a Conversion
clung , bound, 8 infatuated, seized, cleaved to, implicated in sensual desire, not released, 7 much abiding in,
or any other synonyms. This is Synonyms.
Sensual desires 1 are described by a description in terms of indulging in sensual desires,1 and by a description in terms of the province of defilement . The synonyms are varied,2
and these sensual desires 1 described by a description in terms of indulging in sensual desires and by a description in terms of province of defilement, are also described by a description in terms of seed , described by a description in terms of the fetter of determinations. The assuming is described by a description in terms of cause. The person is described by a description in terms of the ordinary man.
the Thread’s meaning is demonstrable as having this much instigation.
of which ideas 1 any 1 external sensual desires are described by a diversity.
and unreasoned attention is a condition by the conditionality of dependence, 2
ignorance is a condition by immediate-proximity conditionality,
the underlying tendency to lust is a condition by cause-conditionality.
They are a condition for consciousness.
Herein, what is the Investigation?
 Covetousness is craving for sensual desires, craving for form, and craving for being,
or anything that comes under cleaving-to. And the nine Grounds for Annoyance can be cited thus, namely how tainted lovingkindness-contemplators,1 of someone coveted think about someone (He is working
-has work-will work for his harm ),2 and arouse 3 ill will therefor.
 Such defilement of this contemplator of ill will in the form of fever, 4 bodily weariness or unwieldiness is drowsiness,
 Disquiet due 6 thereto is agitation,
 Any judgment 8 similar to that is uncertainty.
Herein,9 ignorance and craving: there is this.10 And obsession,
 ill will is the footing for obsession for ill will,
Obsession by lust for sensual desires is the footing for the fetter of approval.1
Obsession by ill will is the footing for the fetter of resistance.
Obsession by lethargy-and-drowsiness is the footing for the fetter of conceit.2
Obsession by ignorance and obsession by uncertainty are the footing for the fetter of views.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Characteristics?
When obsession by lust-for-sensual-desires is stated, all obsessions are stated.
When any one of the fetters is stated, all fetters are stated.
This is the Mode of Conveying Characteristics.
Herein, what is the Fourfold Array?
These five Hindrances are the opposites of the Meditations ; they are the Origin of Suffering.
Any fruit thereof is Suffering.
Herein, renunciation-thinking is the opposite of will-for-sensual-desires, non-ill-will- thinking is the opposite of ill will, non-cruelty-thinking is the opposite of the three remaining hindrances.
These are the three kinds of right thinking.
Renunciation-thinking belongs with the Concentration Category,1
These are the three Categories.
The Noble Eight-Factored Path occurs with abandoning of the Hindrances.
Any abandoning of hindrances is Cessation.
These are the four Truths.
This is the Mode of Conveying a Fourfold Array.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Conversion?
The five Hindrances are ten.
What one lusts for in oneself is a hindrance,
what one lusts for externally is a hindrance ; … and so down to … uncertainty.. These are ten hindrances.
There is defilement concerning what is in oneself and what is external ; that is two kinds of fetter, namely fetter in oneself and fetter externally.
Herein, “ I “ is that in oneself while “ mine “ is the external.
The embodiment view is that in oneself while the sixty-one types of view are the external.
Any will and lust 1 regarding what is in oneself is not without lust, not without will for form, 1 …
Any cleaving to the six external bases and to the kinds of being is craving for the external.
These are two Truths, namely the fetters and the ideas provocative of fetters.
Herein, any contemplation of dispassion in regard to ideas provocative of fetters is the Path,
This is the Mode of Conveying a Conversion.
Herein, what is the Mode of Coveying an Analysis?
“The fetter of conceit 1 deals with views “ : this is not unilaterally always so. For one does not abandon conceit by depending on abandoning views ;
and although the conceit that belongs to the further-side fetters may be on the side of views,
nevertheless the abandoning of only the hither-side fetters does not bring about its abandoning,
since the I-making is still left intact .
Again, when it occurs to someone thus , while this is covetousness, it is not the first hindrance.
Again, an Arahant has the drowsiness of bodily defilement that finds a footing in him, but that is not the third hindrance, so when it is said” lethargy-and-drowsiness is a hindrance to one”,
This is the Mode of Conveying an Analysis.
Reversal? the five hindrances come to abandonment by means of the five-factored Meditation ;
this is their opposite. It cannot be assessed in any’ other way than this that “So-and-so’s hindrances 1 are abandoned”. The ultimate aim is in-oneself . 2 This is the Reversal.
Herein, what are the Synonyms?
Will-for-sensual-desires, will-and-lust, love, attachment, are synonyms.
Hindrance, covering up, imperfection, obsession, are synonyms.
Descriptions? covetousness 1 is described 2 by a description in terms of function, ill will is described 3 by a description in terms of distraction , lethargy-and-drowsiness is described 4 by a description in terms of non-eradication.
In this way too these five hindrances 5 in this Thread are described 6 by a description in terms of presentation.6
Herein, what is the Way of Entry?
These five hindrances are ignorance and craving. Herein, hindrances have ignorance for their root;
for any craving is determinations, and they have ignorance for therr condition. These two ideas are included in the determinations category among the five categories, in the idea base among the bases, the idea element among the elements, while in the case of the faculties, the footing for these ideas is that  of the pleasure faculty and the joy faculty and the femininity faculty and the masculinity faculty.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Clearing Up?
This Thread is presented according to its instigation; that meaning is stated by these five terms.
This is the Mode of Conveying Terms of Expression.
Herein, what is the Requisite?
Will-for-sensual-desires has for its condition unreasoned attention and a beautiful object,1 and for its cause a sign of beauty.
Ill will has for its condition unreasoned attention and the grounds for annoyance, and for its cause the underlying tendency to resistance.
Lethargy-and- drowsiness has for its condition paralysis,2 and for its cause the motionlessness due to weariness in occurrence.3
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Coordination?
It is in regard to only these external ideas that a Thread comes under the description” Thread dealing with corruption “ .
This is the Mode of Conveying a Coordination.
The type of Thread dealing with Corruption has been demonstrated.
while a cognizance-contemplator’s 5 resistance or demurring is lethargy-and-drowsiness.
while the state of wondering what to do 7 is worry.
obstruction, hindrance, covering up, imperfection: there is this. 10 652. Will for sensual desires is thefooting for obsession by lust for sensual desires,
 lethargy-and-drowsiness is the footing for obsession by lethargy- and-drowsiness,
 agitation-and-worry is the footing for obsession by ignorance,
 uncertainty is the footing for obsession by uncertainty.
non-ill-will-thinking belongs with the Virtue Category,
non-cruelty-thinking belongs with the Understanding Category.
and so down to … 2 for consciousness.
and any abandoning of fetters is Cessation.
“Fetter” : this is not unilaterally always so.
that is not unilaterally so always.
Herein, will for stinsual desires and ill will and uncertainty are not described by a unity, and “ sensual desires” is not described by a unity; on the contrary, it is described by a diversity.
Agitation-and-worry has for its condition a lust-provoking, delightful,4 and gratifying 4 faculty and knowledge that is not yet fulfilled, and for its cause perception of sensual desires and the underlying tendency to wrong view.5
Uncertainty has for its condition the underlying tendency to conceit whose object is the nine ways of behaviour of conceit, and for its cause the underlying tendency to uncertainty.6
These five ideas arise with cause and with condition.
These five hindrances are also the four taints and also craving and also the barbs and also the assumings.
’Monks, when Prince Vipassi was bom, they showed him to King Bandhuma and said: “Your Majesty, a son has been bom to you. Deign, Sire, to look at him.”
The king looked at the prince and then said to the Brahmins skilled in signs: “You gentlemen are skilled in signs, examine the prince.”
The Brahmins examined the prince, and said to King Bandhuma: “Sire, rejoice, for a mighty son has been born to you. It is a gain for you, Sire, it is a great profit for you, Sire, that such a son has been bom into your family.
Sire, this prince is endowed with the thirty-two marks of a Great Man. To such, only two courses are open.
If he lives the household life he will become a ruler, a wheel-turning righteous monarch of the law, conqueror of the four quarters, who has established the security of his realm and is possessed of the seven treasures.
These are:
He has more than a thousand sons who are heroes, of heroic stature, conquerors of the hostile army.
He dwells having conquered this sea-girt land without stick or sword, by the law.
But if he goes forth from the household life into homelessness, then he will become an Arahant, a fully-en- lightened Buddha, one who draws back the veil from the world.”
“‘And what, Sire, are these thirty-two marks…
On the soles of his feet are wheels with a thousand spokes.
He has projecting heels.
He has long fingers and toes.
He has soft and tender hands and feet.
His hands and feet are net-like.
He has high- raised ankles.
His legs are like an antelope’s.
Standing and without bending, he can touch and mb his knees with either hand.
His male organs are enclosed in a sheath.
His complexion is bright, the colour of gold.
His skin is delicate and so smooth that no dust adheres to it.
His body-hairs are separate, one to each pore.
They grow upwards, bluish-black like collyrium, growing in rings to the right.
His body is divinely straight.
He has the seven convex surfaces.
The front part of his body is like a lion’s.
There is no hollow between his shoulders.
He is proportioned like a banyan-tree: his height is as the span of his arms.
He has a perfect sense of taste.
He has jaws like a lion’s.
He has forty teeth.
His teeth are even.
His canine teeth are very bright.
His tongue is very long.
He has a Brahma-like voice, like that of the karavtka-bird.
His eyes are deep blue.
He has eye¬lashes like a cow’s.
The hair between his eyebrows is white, and soft like cotton-down.
His head is like a royal turban.”
‘ “Sire, this prince is endowed with the thirty-two marks of a Great Man. To such, only two courses are open.
If he lives the household life he will become a ruler, a wheel-turning righteous monarch of the law…
the Wheel Treasure, the Elephant Treasure, the Horse Treasure, the Jewel Treasure, the Woman Treasure, the Householder Treasure, and, as seventh, the Counsellor Treasure.
His bust is evenly rounded.
There are no spaces between his teeth.
But if he goes forth from the household life into homelessness, then he will become an Arahant, a fully-enlightened Buddha, one who draws back the veil from the world.”
He has feet with level tread.
‘Then King Bandhuma, having clothed those Brahmins in fresh clothes, satisfied all their wishes.
‘And King Bandhuma appointed nurses for Prince Vipassi.
Some suckled him, some bathed him, some carried him, some dandled him.
A white umbrella was held over him night and day, that he might not be harmed by cold or heat or grass or dust.
And Prince Vipassi was much beloved of the people.
Just as everybody loves a blue, yellow or white lotus, so they all loved Prince Vipassi.
Thus he was borne from lap to lap.
‘And Prince Vipassi had a sweet voice, a beautiful voice, charming and delightful.
Just as in the Himalaya mountains the karavtka-bird has a voice sweeter, more beautiful, charming and delightful than all other birds, so too was Prince Vipassl’s voice the finest of all.
‘And owing to the results of past kamma, the divine eye was present to Prince Vipassi, with which he could see for a league day and night alike.
‘And Prince Vipassi was unblinkingly watchful, like the Thirty-Three Gods.
And because it was said that he was unblinkingly watchful, the prince came to be called “Vipassi”.
When King Bandhuma was trying a case, he took Prince Vipassi on his knee and instructed him in the case.
Then, putting him down from his knee, his father would carefully explain the issues to him.
And for this reason he was all the more called Vipassi.
‘Then King Bandhuma caused three palaces to be built for Prince Vipassi, one for the rainy season, one for the cold season, and one for the hot season, to cater for all the fivefold sense-pleasures.
There Prince Vipassi stayed in the rainy-season palace for the four months of the rainy season, with no male attendants, surrounded by female musicians, and he never left that palace.’
End of first recitation-section 
1. ‘Then, monks, after many years, many hundreds and thousands of years had passed, Prince Vipassi said to his charioteer: “Harness some fine carriages, charioteeft We will go to the pleasure-park to inspect it.”
The charioteer did so, then reported to the prince: “Your Royal Highness, the fine carriages are harnessed, it is time to do as you wish.”
And Prince Vipassi mounted a carriage and drove in procession to the pleasure-park.
2 ‘And as he was being driven to the pleasure-park, Prince Vipassi saw an aged man, bent like a roof-beam, broken, leaning on a stick, tottering, sick, his youth all vanished.
At the sight he said to the charioteer: “Charioteer, what is the matter with this man?
His hair is not like other men’s, his body is not like other men’s.”
“‘Prince, that is what is called an old man.”
“But why is he called an old man? “
“‘He is called old, Prince,
‘“But am I liable to become old, and not exempt from old age?”
“Both you and I, Prince, are liable to become old, and are not exempt from old age.”
“Well then, charioteer, that will do for today with the pleasure-park.
Return now to the palace.”
“Very good, Prince”, said the charioteer, and brought Prince Vipassi back to the palace.
Arrived there, Prince Vipassi was overcome with grief and dejection, crying: “Shame on this thing birth, since to him who is bom old age must manifest itself! “
because he has not long to live.”
3. ‘Then King Bandhuma sent for the charioteer and said: “Well, did not the prince enjoy himself at the pleasure-park?
Wasn’t he happy there?”
“Your Majesty, the prince did not enjoy himself, he was not happy there.”
“What did he see on the way there?”
So the charioteer told the King all that had happened.
4. ‘Then King Bandhuma thought:
5 ‘After many hundreds of thousands of years Prince Vipassi ordered his charioteer to drive to the pleasure-park .
6. ‘And as he was being driven to the pleasure-park, Prince Vipassi saw a sick man, suffering, very ill, fallen in his own urine and excrement, and some people were picking him up, and others putting him to bed.
At the sight he said to the charioteer: “What is the matter with this man?
His eyes are not like other men’s, his head is not like other men’s.”
“‘Prince, that is what is called a sick man.”
“But why is he called a sick man? “
‘“Prince, he is so called because he can hardly recover from his illness.”
‘“But am I liable to become sick, and not exempt from sickness?”
“Both you and I, Prince, are liable to become sick, and not exempt from sickness.”
‘“Well then, charioteer, return now to the palace.”
Arrived there, Prince Vipassi was overcome with grief and dejection, crying: “Shame on this thing birth, since he who is bom must experience sickness! “
7. ‘Then King Bandhuma sent for the charioteer, who told him what had happened.
“ So the King provided for Prince Vipassi to have even more enjoyment of the fivefold sense-pleasures, in order that he should rule the kingdom and not go forth from the household life into homelessness…
Thus the prince continued to live indulging in, and addicted to the fivefold sense-pleasures.
“Prince Vipassi must not renounce the throne, he must not go forth from the household life into homelessness — the words of the Brahmins learned in signs must not come true!”
8. “The king provided Prince Vipassi with even more sense- pleasures, in order that he should rule the kingdom and not go forth from the household life into homelessness…
‘And as he was being driven to the pleasure-park, Prince Vipassi saw a large crowd collecting, clad in many colours, and carrying a bier.
At the sight he said to the charioteer: “Why are those people doing that?”
“Prince, that is what they call a dead man.”
“Drive me over to where the dead man is.”
“Very good, Prince, said the charioteer, and did so.
And Prince Vipassi gazed at the corpse of the dead man. Then he said to the charioteer: “Why is he called a dead man?”
“‘Prince, he is called a dead man
‘“But am I subject to dying, not exempt from dying?”
“Both you and I, Prince, are subpfet to dying, not exempt from it.”
‘“Well then, charioteer, that will do for today with the pleasure-park.
Return now to the palace…
‘Then King Bandhuma sent for the charioteer,
9 ‘After many hundreds of thousands of years Prince Vipassi ordered his charioteer to drive to the pleasure-park.
because now his parents and other relatives will not see him again, nor he them.”
Arrived there, Prince Vipassi was overcome with grief and dejection, crying: “Shame on this thing birth, since to him who is bom death must manifest itself!”
who told him what had happened.
“The king provided Prince Vipassi with even more sense-pleasures…
‘After many hundreds of thousands of years Prince Vipassi ordered his charioteer to drive to the pleasure-park.
‘And as he was being driven to the pleasure-park, Prince Vipassi saw a shaven-headed man, one who had gone forth, wearing a yellow robe.
And he said to the charioteer: “What is the matter with that man?
His head is not like other men’s, and his clothes are not like other men’s.”
‘“Prince, he is called one who has gone forth.”
“Why is he called one who has gone forth? “
‘“Prince, by one who has gone forth we mean one who truly follows Dhamma, who truly lives in serenity, does good actions, performs meritorious deeds, is harmless and truly has compassion for living beings.”
“‘Charioteer, he is well called one who has gone forth…
“Very good, Prince”, said the charioteer, and did so.
And Prince Vipassi questioned the man who had gone forth.
’ “Prince, as one who has gone forth I truly follow Dhamma,
Drive the carriage over to where he is.”
“You are well called one who has gone forth…”
…and have compassion for living beings.”
‘Then Prince Vipassi said to the charioteer: “You take the carriage and drive back to the palace.
But I shall stay here and shave off my hair and beard, put on yellow robes, and go forth from the household life into homelessness.”
“Very good, Prince”, said the charioteer, and returned to the palace.
And Prince Vipassi, shaving off his hair and beard and putting on yellow robes, went forth from the household life into homelessness.
‘And a great crowd from the royal capital city, Bandhumati, eighty-four thousand people,heard that Prince Vipassi had gone forth into homelessness.
And they thought: “This is certainly no common teaching and discipline, no common going-forth, for which Prince Vipassi has shaved off hair and beard, donned yellow robes and gone forth into homelessness.
If the Prince has done so, why should not we?
“ And so, monks, a great crowd of eighty-four thousand, having shaved off their hair and beards and donned yellow robes, followed the Bodhisatta Vipassi into homelessness.
And with this following the Bodhisatta went on his rounds through villages, towns and royal cities.
‘Then the Bodhisatta Vipassi, having retired to a secluded spot, had this thought: “It is not proper for me to live with a crowd like this. I must live alone, withdrawn from this crowd.”
So after a while he left the crowd and dwelt alone. The eighty-four thousand went one way, the Bodhisatta another.
‘Then, when the Bodhisatta had entered his dwelling alone, in a secluded spot, he thought: “This world, alas, is in a sorry state: there is birth and decay, there is death and falling into other states and being reborn. And no one knows any way of escape from this suffering, this ageing and death. When will deliverance be found from this suffering, this ageing and death? “.
‘And then, monks, the Bodhisatta thought: “With what being present, does ageing-and-death occur? What conditions ageing-and-death?”
And then, monks, as a result of the wisdom born of profound consideration the realisation dawned on him: “Birth being present, ageing-and-death occurs, birth conditions ageing-and-death. “
‘Then he thought: “What conditions birth?”
And the realisation dawned on him: “Becoming conditions birth”…
… “Clinging conditions becoming”
And then the Bodhisatta Vipassi thought: “With what being present, does consciousness occur. What conditions consciousness?”
And then, as a result of the wisdom bom of profound consideration, the realisation dawned on him: “Mind-and- body conditions consciousness.”
‘Then, monks, the Bodhisatta Vipassi thought: “This consciousness turns back at mind-and-body, it does not go any further.
To this extent there is birth and decay, there is death and falling into other states and being reborn, namely: Mind-and-body conditions consciousness and consciousness conditions mind-and-body, mind-and-body*conditions the-six sense-bases, the six sense-bases-condition contact, contact conditions feeling, feeling conditions craving, craving conditions clinging, clinging conditions becoming, becoming conditions birth, birth conditions ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and distress.
And thus this wljole mass of suffering takes its origin.”
And at the thought; “Origin, origin”, there arose in the Bodhisatta Vipassi, with insight into things never realised before, knowledge, wisdom, awareness, and light.
‘Then he thought: “What now being absent, does ageing-and-death not occur?” With the cessation of what comes the cessation of ageing-and-death?”
And then, as a result of the wisdom born of profound consideration, the realisation dawned on him: “Birth being absent, ageing-and-death does not occur.
With the cessation of birth comes the cessation of ageing-and-death”… “With the cessation of what comes the cessation of birth?”
… “With the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth”
‘Then the Bodhisatta Vipassi thought: “I have found the insight way to enlightenment, namely: “‘By the cessation of mind-and-body consciousness ceases, by the cessation of consciousness, mind-and-body ceases; by the cessation of mind-and-body the six sense-bases cease; by the cessation of the six sense-bases contact ceases; by the cessation of contact feeling ceases; by the cessation of feeling craving ceases; by the cessation of craving clinging ceases; by the cessation of clinging becoming ceases; by the cessation of becoming birth ceases; by the cessation of birth ageing and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and distress cease.
And thus this whole mass of suffering ceases.”
And at the thought: “Cessation, cessation”, there arose in the Bodhisatta Vipassi, with insight into things never realised before, knowledge, vision, awareness, and light..
‘Then, monks, at another time the Bodhisatta Vipassi dwelt contemplating the rise and fall of the five aggregates of clinging: “Such is the body, such its arising, such its passing away; such is feeling…; such is perception…; such are the mental formations…; such is consciousness, such its arising, such its passing away.” And as he remained contemplating the rise and fall of the five aggregates of clinging, before long his mind was freed from the corruptions without remainder.’
…And I sat down there thinking: “This will serve for striving.’
…as happens in one who abides diligent, ardent, and resolute.
“What conditions becoming?”
… “Craving conditions clinging”
… “Feeling conditions craving”
… “Contact conditions feeling”
… “The six sense-bases condition contact”
… “Mind-and-body conditions the six sense- bases”
… “Consciousness conditions mind-and-body.”
… “With the cessation of mind-and-body comes the cessation of consciousness.”
…“With the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of mind-and-body”
… “With the cessation of clinging comes the cessation of becoming”
… “With the cessation of craving comes the cessation of clinging”
… “With the cessation of feeling comes the cessation of craving”
… “With the cessation of contact comes the cessation of feeling”
… “With the cessation of the six sense-bases comes the cessation of contact”
… “With the cessation of mind-and-body comes the cessation of the six sense-bases”…”
1. ‘Then, monks, the Blessed Lord, the Arahant, the fully- enlightened Buddha Vipassi thought: “Suppose now I were to teach Dhamma?”
And then he thought: “I have attained to this Dhamma which is profound, hard to see, hard to grasp, peaceful, excellent, beyond reasoning, subtle, to be apprehended by the wise.
But this generation delights in clinging, rejoices in it and revels in it.
But for those who so delight, rejoice and revel in clinging this matter is hard to see, namely the conditioned nature of things, or dependent origination.
Equally hard to see would be the calming of all the mental formations, the abandonment of all the substrates of rebirth,the waning of craving, dispassion, cessation and Nibbana.
And if I were to teach Dhamma to others and they did not understand me, that would be a weariness and a trouble to me.”
2. ‘And to the Lord Buddha Vipassi there occurred spontaneously this verse, never previously heard:
“This that I’ve attained, why should I proclaim?
Those full of lust and hate can never grasp it.
Leading upstream this Dhamma, subtle, deep,
Hard to see, no passion-blinded folk can see it.”
‘As the Lord Buddha Vipassi pondered thus, his mind was inclined to inaction rather than to teaching the Dhamma.
And, monks, the Lord Buddha Vipassi’s reasoning became mentally known to a certain Great Brahma. And he thought: “Alas, the world is perishing, it will be destroyed because the mind of Vipassi, the Blessed Lord, the Arahant, the fully- enlightened Buddha is inclined to inaction rather than to teaching the Dhamma! “
3. ‘So this Great Brahma, as swiftly as a strong man might stretch his flexed arm, or flex it again, disappeared from the Brahma world and reappeared before the Lord Buddha Vipassi.
Arranging his upper robe over one shoulder and kneeling on his right knee, he saluted the Lord Buddha Vipassi with joined hands and said: “Lord, may the Blessed Lord teach Dhamma, may the Well-Farer teach Dhamma! There are beings with little dust on their eyes who are perishing through not hearing Dhamma: they will become knowers of Dhamma! “
4. ‘Then the Lord Buddha Vipassi explained why he inclined to inaction rather than to teaching the Dhamma.
And just as in a pool of blue, red or white lotuses some are bom in the water, grow in the water, and, not leaving the water, thrive in the water;
7. ‘Then, knowing his thought, the Great Brahma addressed the Lord Buddha Vipassi in these verses:
“As on a mountain-peak a watcher sees the folk below,
So, Man of Wisdom,298 seeing all, look down from Dhamma’s heights!
Free from woe, look on those
Arise, hero, victor in battle, leader of the caravan,
Teach, О Lord, the Dhamma,
and they will understand.”
And the Lord Buddha Vipassi replied to the Great Brahma in verse:
“Open to them are the doors of the Deathless!
Let those that hear now put forth faith.2
For fear of trouble I did not preach at first
The excellent Dhamma for men, Brahma! “
Then that Great Brahma, thinking: “I have been the cause of the Lord Buddha Vipassl’s preaching Dhamma”, made obeisance to the Lord Buddha, and, passing by to his right, vanished there and then.
some are born in the water and reach the surface;
while some are born in the water and, having reached the surface, grow out of the water and are not polluted by it,
in the same way, monks, the Lord Buddha Vipassi, surveying the world with his Buddha-eye, saw some beings with little dust on their eyes.
6.’And the Great Brahma appealed a second and a third time to the Lord Buddha Vipassi to teach…
Then the Lord Buddha Vipassi, recognising Brahma’s appeal and moved by compassion for beings, surveyed the world with his Buddha-eye.
And he saw beings with little dust on their eyes and with much dust, with faculties sharp and dull, of good and bad disposition, easy and hard to teach, and few of them living in fear of transgression and of the next world.
who are sunk in grief, oppressed with birth and age.
traverse the world!
8. ‘Then the Lord Buddha Vipassi thought: “To whom should I first teach this Dhamma? Who would understand it quickly?”
Then he thought: “There are Khanda the King’s son and Tissa the chaplain’s son, living in the capital city of Bandhumati. They are wise, learned, experienced, and for a long time have had little dust on their eyes.
If now I teach Dhamma first to Khanda and Tissa, they will understand it quickly.”
And so the Lord Buddha Vipassi, as swiftly as a strong man might stretch out his flexed arm, or flex it again, vanished there and then from the root of that tree of enlightenment, and reappeared in the royal capital of Bandhumati, in the deer-park of Khema.
9. ‘And the Lord Buddha Vipassi said to the park-keeper: “Keeper, go to Bandhumati and say to Prince Khanda and the chaplain’s son Tissa: ‘My lords, Vipassi the Blessed Lord, the Arahant, the fully-enlightened Buddha, has come to Bandhumati and is staying in the deer-park of Khema. He wishes to see you.’“
“‘Very good, Lord”, said-the park-keeper, and went and delivered the message.
“Then Khanda and Tissa, having harnessed some fine carriages, drove out of Bandhumati
They took the carriages as far as they would go, then alighted and continued on foot till they came to the Lord Buddha Vipassi.
When they reached him, they made obeisance to him and sat down to one side.
‘And the Lord Buddha Vipassi delivered to them a graduated discourse on generosity, on morality, and on heaven, showing the danger, degradation and corruption of sense-desires, and the profit of renunciation.
And when the Lord Buddha Vipassi knew that the minds of Khanda and Tissa were ready, pliable, free from the hindrances, joyful and calm, then he preached the Buddhas’ special sermon in brief: on suffering, its origin, its cessation, and the path.
And just as a clean cloth from which all stains have been removed receives the dye perfectly, so in Prince Khanda and Tissa the chaplain’s son, as they sat there, there arose the pure and spotless Dhamma-Eye, and they knew: “Whatever things have an origin must come to cessation.”
‘And they, having seen, attained, experienced and penetrated the Dhamma, having passed beyond doubt, having gained perfect confidence in the Teacher’s doctrine without relying on others, said: “Excellent, Lord, excellent!
It is as if someone were to set up what had been knocked down, or to point out the way to one who had got lost, or to bring an oil- lamp into a dark place, so that those with eyes could see what was there.
Just so the Blessed Lord has expounded the Dhamma in various ways.
We go for refuge to the Lord, and to the Dhamma.
May we receive the going-forth at the Lord’s hands, may we receive ordination! “
‘And so Prince Khanda and Tissa the chaplain’s son received the going-forth at the hands of the Lord Buddha Vipassi, and they received ordination.
Then the Lord Buddha Vipassi instructed them wifh a discourse on Dhamma, inspired them, fired them and delighted them, showing the danger, degradation and corruption of conditioned things and the profit of Nibbana.
And through their being inspired, fired and delighted with this discourse, it was not long before their minds were freed from the corruptions without remainder.
making for the deer-park of Khema.
‘And a great crowd of eighty-four thousand people from Bandhumati heard that the Lord Buddha Vipassi was staying in the deer-park of Khema, and that Khanda and Tissa had shaved off their hair and beards, donned yellow robes, and gone forth from the household life into homelessness.
And they thought: “This is certainly no common teaching and discipline… for which Prince Khanda and Tissa the chaplain’s son have gone forth into homelessrtess.
If they can do this in the presence of the Lord Buddha Vipassi, why should not we?”
And so this great crowd of eighty-four thousand left Bandhumati for the deer-park of Khema where the Lord Buddha Vipassi was. When they came to him they made obeisance to him and sat down to one side.
‘And the Lord Buddha Vipassi delivered to them a graduated discourse
‘And those eighty-four thousand received the going- forth at the hands of the Lord Buddha Vipassi, and they received ordination.
And the Lord Buddha Vipassi instructed them with a discourse on Dhamma…
The verse : .
Herein,1 what is the Mode of Conveying a Teaching?
What is the meaning in the case of this Thread? It teaches the consciousness category under the definition by categories, the mind-consciousness element under the definition by elements, the mind base under the definition by bases, and the mind faculty under the definition by faculties.
What 2 ideas are heralds?
Briefly six ideas are heralds : the roots of profit and the roots of unprofit. But 3 here 3 the unprofitable roots 3 are not implied ; in this Thread only the profitable roots are taught.
Herein, how 4 are ideas heralded by mind?
The mind is their herald: as a king is an army’s herald , so too is mind ideas’ herald.
Herein, mind-heralding occurs in three ways: 5 as will for renunciation, as will for non-ill-will, and as will for non-cruelty.
As will for renunciation, the mind-heralding is that of non-greed,
Herein, “mind heralds them” : these ideas are made emergent 6 by mind, or they are created by mind.
And mind being the head of these ideas, mind alone is the senior head of these ideas, mind alone effects the domination of these ideas, thus “ mind heads them” 7 .
there ideas go, thus they are mind-made.1
and there is the sevenfold bodily and verbal good conduct. These are the ten profitable courses of action.
Herein, “If someone with a placid mind.. is mental action,
“is wont to speak” is verbal action,
With these in this Thread the ten profitable courses of action, being ultimate , are settled , 4 the virtue and duty are creditable.5
The type of Thread dealing with morality consists in prosperity , 5 not in the outlet from the world provided by the Path.
This is the teaching.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying an Investigation?
“Ideas are heralded by mind”: the profitable roots and the eight-factored Rightness-
Construing? the ripening of the ten profitable courses o action is to be felt as pleasure, they being heralded by non-ill-will.1
“As does his shadow keep him company” : this ripening goes along with him. There is this construing.
Footings? mind is the footing for the eighteen kinds of mental approach.1
“Ideas are heralded by mind” : these ideas are the footing for all the profitable side.
“ If someone with a placid mind” : the placidity of cognizance is the footing for the faith faculty.
“Is wont to speak” is the footing for right speech,
Characteristics? ideas heralded thus by consciousness are also heralded by feeling ; and these are also heralded by perception and also heralded by determinations.
And whatever ideas are conascent with the feeling, etc., all are heralds for these ideas heralded by consciousness and the rest.
“Then bliss sure follows after him” : joy follows after him too: as a most pleasant shadow, so does that bliss follow after him.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Fou1fold Array?
“Heralded by mind” : this is not the singular number.1
Because these are all the six bodies of consciousness. 673. What is the Blessed One’s purport in this Thread?
Those who seek bliss make the mind placid .1 This is the Blessed One’s purport in this Thread.
The meaning has already been demonstrated .
The three 1 profitable roots are the cause of the eight Rightnesses; this is the eight-factored Path.1
The 2 ten instances ) are the teaching’s causes , the teaching’s conditions , and the demonstration .2
Herein,3 mind is Suffering. That together with name-and-form is conditioned by consciousness, so while the unprofitable root is being abandoned factor by factor, the plane of the unabandoned is Suffering’s Origin.
The abandoning of these factors  is Cessation.
These are the four Truths.
This is the Mode of Conveying a Conversion.
Analysis?
But that is not unilaterally always so of a monk or of a divine
with wrong view; 2 for when his cognizance is placid in his own aim, 2 and when he” is wont to speak or act” with that kind of placid cognizance, then bliss does not “surely follow after him as does His shadow keep him company”, but only suffering follows after him,
and that . So this is declarable after analysis
that the bodily action and verbal action if done with a placid mind is to be felt as pleasure on ripening : when rightly done,3 it is to be felt as pleasure, but when wrongly done, it is to be felt as pain. This is the analysis.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Reversal?
“ Ideas are heralded by mind “ : that when  suffering is his companion 1-these two Threads being as they are stated-this is the opposition.
Synonyms? that is to say, mind, cognizance, consciousness, mind faculty, mind-consciousness element.
Descriptions? “Ideas are heralded by mind” : This mind is described by a description in terms of function.1
“Ideas” : this is described by a description in terms of the profitable courses of action.
“Mind heads them”: this is described by a description in termsofwhatisdistinguished.
“Mind-made”: 2 this is described by a description in terms of the conascent.3 “Cognizance” : 4 this is described by a description in terms of renunciation.
“ If someone with a placid mind” : this is described by a description in ter1ns of faith.
“ If someone with a placid mind “ : this is described by a description in terms of undisturbed intention in the second meditation.
“ If someone with a placid mind “ : this is described by a description in terms of the opposite of the faithless.
“ Is wont to speak “ : this is described by a description in terms of right speech.
“ Or act “ : this is described by a description in terms of right action.
“ Then bliss Sure follows after him “ : this is the concentrating of meditation.
In the case of the faculties, the way of entry here is the mind faculty ;
“Ideas are heralded by mind”: lovingkindness and gladness are the ways of entry in the case of the Divine Abidings, and in the case of the Meditations, the second meditation and the third.
In the case of the Categories, it is included in the determinations category,1
These ideas, which are dependently arisen with contact as condition, have contact to be felt as pleasant. In the case of the eighteen mental approaches,3 pleasant feeling is the approach with joy. In the case of the thirty-six positions for creatures, 4 the six kinds of joy based on renunciation.5
This is the Mode of Conveying Ways of Entry.
Herein, what is the mode of Conveying a Clearing Up?
The meaning instigated by which this Thread was stated
This is the Mode of Conveying a Clearing Up.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Terms of Expression?
as placidity due to eradication by the Path and placidity due to suppression by the Meditations. As deterrence 4 of obsession by ill will,
the placidity is due to the root namely non-hate ), or also the placidity is the root itself
owing to its deterrence of what accompanies ill will.4
“ Then bliss sure follows after him “ : bliss is bodily and mental. Dissociation from the loathed and association with the loved and pleasure of renunciation and pleasure of ordinary men and the happiness enlightenment factor are mental pleasure ;
and when one whose body is tranquil feels pleasure 5 that is bodily pleasure.
And that is the footing for the mental  pleasure as stated by the description. That pleasure of profitable ideas is not misapprehended.6
“Follows” : absorption is shown, 7 and this absorption- concentration does not follow one who is given over to ill will.8
This Thread can be expressed by two moods:
Requisite? together with five hundred bhikkhus the Blessed One entered the city of Rajagaha.
There a poor man served the Blessed One. Placidity arose in him with a profitable root and connected 1 with previous devotion.
To others he announced, 2 he spoke this pronouncement : “ It is gain for them whose dwelling the Blessed One enters, and if that happens to us, we too shall gain placidity in the Blessed One.”
Then extending his hands palms together towards where the Blessed One was : “Honour to the Blessed One! Honour to the Blessed One l “ he said with no ill will in mind, and he stood at one side.
Thereupon the Blessed One uttered this Thread : “ Ideas are heralded by mind … “,3
namely the whole Thread.4 683. That he the poor man spoke to others in this way 1 is verbal action,
Herein, in that he displays and speaks praise to others,
In that his heart has lovingkindness towards the Blessed One, therein is manifest in him the profitable root non-hate.
In that he extends his hands palms together and deters conceit, therein is manifest in him the profitable root non-delusion.
In that he obtains especial understanding, this is his abandoning of the perversion of view ;
There being any suppression owed to 2 defilements, the perversions are then a condition through object- conditionality,3 and the profitable roots are a condition through co-support conditionality, 4 and that reasoned attention is the cause; 5 so with this 5 cause and this condition this 5 cognizance is arisen.
Herein, this 6 cognizance that has occurred with the Teacher 7 as its object is the Recollection of the Enlightened One ;
Herein, mindfulness and awareness are the cause, and they are the condition ;
With the bodily determination, 9 the active determining of the action is either the cause and not the condition,10 or 11 it is both  the cause 11 as the amassing of the action to be felt as pleasant and the condition for the action.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Coordination?
“ If someone with a placid mind “ : 1 here only one who is mindful is placid. Furthermore, it is with cleansing of cognizance that creatures are liberated, hence 2 herein also the kinds of choice, being cognizance-heralded by placid cognizance, are liberated 2 from resistance; this is placidity of the kinds of choice. The 2 placidity whereby his , that is the placidity whereby his perception 2 is 2 undistorted. This placidity, which is fivefold 3 is here placidity as suppression ; the placidity as tranquillization of the body too 4 is dependent on cognizance, but the cognizance was placid previously as well.
also placidity of the rest of the five.3
For it is not owing to the existence of a self that the action’s ripening follows.
It is that the means to that ripening goes along with the action, and 1 when with that action as condition 1 joy arises, that is also the non-remorse 8 that follows after.
This is the Coordination.
The Thread of Mahanama the Sakyan can be cited in detail, namely how he asked
 1
For what reason?
Others have said 1 that faith has the characteristic of making purification of qualities reach the goal , and still others that faith has the characteristic of accepting statements.
Another way: If for himself someone trusts thus “I know nothing” and “Herein, by agreement I am no knower “,1
Another way: there is the contemplation of disappointment in the sixty-one types of views as impermanent, painful, not-self,
This is called faith,
Another way: some ordinary being likes non-insistence 1 upon the twenty-based 1 embodiment-view,1
though this non-insistence is not yet the kind of understanding that belongs to finding a footing in rightness ; 1 for on the contrary it is only owing to right view of howthings are that by means of all the five faculties even though blunt, the defilements coefficient with wrong view 1 come to be
 It is on that same plane that the Initiate’s virtue is called “the support of Noble Ones”,
and it is on that same plane that even blunt understanding is called “the understanding faculty”.
the more so too since there may be 2 the faithlessness that belongs to a distorted view, and owing to that the essentials of existence are undertaken and completed; 2
but herein the Expression of Generosity is not merely relinquishment of such evident evils as the decision “I shall indulge in sensual desires” the while the faith faculty is still placed there in those essentials of existence.3 The Expression of Understanding is due to the Understanding faculty, while the Expression of Peace is due to virtue.4
Now it is when these ideas, namely faith, virtue, generosity, and understanding,1 imbue cognizance 2 that
and then the virtue is diligence,
the generosity is action with understanding,
and the understanding is the understanding faculty. And herein, the faith faculty
the understanding is that of the Truths, and any mindfulness there is conducive to all good.
That Initiate has an auspicious destination,3 he has auspicious prospect .
Even when he dies 4 with mindfulness forgotten, 4 it is not through that state of forgotten mindfulness 5 that those faculties or that profitable root have their ripening.
Teaching? herein, there are the four ideas, namely faith, virtue, generosity, and understanding.1
The faith and the understanding are mental good conduct,
So when cognizance is admitted the five categories are admitted.
The good conduct in virtue of these four ideas is the Noble Truth of Suffering and the footing for the Path.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying an Investigation?
This faith and this virtue, and the rest,
why does he do that?
It is through faith that he recollects the Blessed One, even were he to meet with a mad elephant saying  “Master Hound” 1 and all the rest of the passage . It is through virtue that he does not transgress 2 any instance either by body or speech, and so is one free from remorse. It is through generosity 3 that his understandingness is established.
When his virtue is untorn 4 then even when forgetfulness is arisen 4 no cognizance that is unprofitable or accompanied by wrong view arises in him. This is the Mode of Conveying an Investigation.
One who asserts the True Idea will have an auspicious destination: 1 there is this construing.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Footings?
The faith is his undisturbed intention, and that is the footing for the second Meditation.
There are the three kinds of confidence due to undergoing, and the virtue is that desired of Noble Ones which together are the four factors of Stream-Entry : that is the footing for the Virtue Category of the Noble Path.
The understanding is the footing for the Understanding Category.
And these ideas and this cognizance are the footing for the concentration become singleness.
Faith is the footing for the faith faculty.
Generosity is the footing for the concentration faculty.
Understanding is the footing for the understanding faculty.
Faith and understanding are the footing for insight.
Virtue and generosity are the footing for quiet.
Faith and understanding are the footing for the understanding-deliverance due to fading of ignorance.
Virtue and generosity are the footing for the heart-deliverance due to fading of lust.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Characteristics?
When consciousness is stated as imbued by faith, etc.,1 all the five categories are stated.
When faith is mentioned, all the seven kinds of riches are mentioned, namely faith as riches, … and so on. When the virtue category is stated the concentration category and understanding category are stated too.
That when this cognizance has been long imbued it will not 2 have parallel occurrence therewith at the last moment 2 of life, no such instance is found.
Herein, perception too has parallel occurrence therewith,
namely perception of forms and choice, contact 3 and attention occupied with forms, and likewise in the case of each body of consciousness in regard to the rest of the six bases. This is the Mode of Conveying Characteristics.
Herein, what is the Fourfold Array?
What is the Blessed One’s purport in this Thread?
And other creatures, even if they do not encounter a Perfect One face to face, 2 will, by hearing 3 the True Idea, complete their term free from remorse.
as will for non-ill-will the mind-heralding is that of non-hate,
as will for non-cruelty the mind-heralding is that of non-delusion.
“And they are mind-made” : I where mind goes
Just as the wind goes swiftly, and any other swift goer is called “wind-sped “,1 “a wing-goer,” so too these ideas being produced by mind, where the mind goes 2 there these ideas go, thus they are mind-made.1
They are procured by will in three ways: the threefold thinking is undisturbed,3
and “or act” is bodily action.
these are what is stated.1
and “ or act” for right action and for right effort.2
What is the reason?
( Ideas are heralded by mind, Mind heads them, and they are mind-made,1
If someone with a placid mind Is wont to speak or act,
then bliss Sure follows after him as does His shadow keep him company) .
in the case of Dependent Arising it is consciousness.
in the case of the elements, the idea element, in the case of the Bases, the idea base,
and in the case of the faculties, the pleasure faculty and joy faculty that are profitable are the ways of entry.2
is the meaning that concludes it; 1 the Thread is instigated by that meaning .
“Ideas are heralded by mind” is a description in terms of synonyms, not a description in terms of a unity.1
“ Ideas “ is a unity, 2 not a description in terms of synonyms.
“If someone with a placid mind”: this unity, namely placidity is as a diversity twofold, namely non-suppression 3 of non-ill-will in oneself and as trust externally.
This placidity in oneself is twofold
on generosity, on morality, and on heaven, showing the danger, degradation and corruption of sense-desires, and the profit of renunciation.
he who is placid- minded through the cause, and he who has what is to be felt as pleasure 9 through the ripening.
And just as a clean cloth… receives the dye perfectly, so in those eighty-four thousand, as they sat there, there arose the pure and spotless Dhamma-eye, and they knew: “Whatever things have an origin must come to cessation.”
‘Then the first eighty-four thousand who had gone forth heard: “The Lord Buddha Vipassi has come to Bandhumati and is staying in the Khema deer-park, teaching Dhamma.”
-21. ‘And all happened as before…
that he extended his hands palms together is bodily action,
that he was placid in mind is mental action.
And it was not long before their minds were freed from the corruptions without remainder.
and with all his utterance namely “For them whose dwelling enters the Blessed One” 2
therein is manifest in him the profitable root non-greed.
in that he has suchlike restraint, this is his abandoning of the perversion of perception ;
in that he has placidity of mind, this is his abandoning of the perversion of cognizance : thus there is the unprofitable perversion’s abandoning by suppression.3 684. The condition for all this
is the three profitable roots.1 The intention in the undisturbed cognizance is what is called his reasoned attention.
and in that he gives attention to the Blessed One’s qualities, this is the Recollection of the True Idea in him.
feeling and perception 8 are the cause, and thinking and exploring are the condition.
This coordination is thus
“Then bliss sure follows after him”: what is the Blessed One describing?
and the Blessed One’s reply .2
undisturbedness of intention is faith.
 Faith is confidence of the heart;
Demonstration of the Thread’s Meaning . What does he show by faith, virtue, generosity, and understanding? 1
Because of the characteristic of being undisturbed ;
for faith has the characteristic of being undisturbed.
this is faith.
and that belongs to the worlds.
and thereby it is well seen; 1 just as a man with good eyesight 2 sees water in a deep well without his being able to reach it with the body,
so too he has a view of the noble ideas 3 by means of liking for pondering upon them, 4 without his having yet verified them for himself.
abandoned by means of the path of seeing, which is why this faith
is called” fulfilled” only on the plane of the heading of Stream-Entry factors.1
 On that same plane the non-seeking 1 of categories by desiring rebirth is generosity;
and it is by that non-seeking that faith can be demonstrated through the Expression of Generosity,
herein one ,
is that in the three kinds of Confidence due to Undergoing ,
the generosity is that in the four Meditations,
This is the demonstration of the Thread’s Meaning.6
the virtue is bodily and verbal good conduct,
while the generosity is a cognizance-concomitant, namely good conduct as non-greed.
That his cognizance has for long been imbued with faith, virtue, generosity, and understanding, is, through concentration,1 the footing for the first Meditation.
and also the ideas born therefrom have parallel occurrence therewith,
It is that those who want an auspicious destination 1 and an auspicious prospect will give attention to faith, virtue, generosity, and understanding : this is the purport.
‘And at that time, in the royal capital of Bandhumati, there was a vast gathering of six million, eight hundred thousand monks.
And when the Lord Buddha Vipassi had withdrawn into seclusion, he thought: “There is now this great gathering of monks here in the capital. Suppose I were to give them permission: ‘Wander abroad, monks, for the good of the many, for the happiness of the many, out of compassion for the world, for the welfare and happiness of devas and humans. Do not go two together, monks, but teach the Dhamma that is lovely in its beginning, lovely in its middle, and lovely in its ending, both in the letter and in the spirit, and display the holy life fully complete and perfect.
There are beings with little dust on their eyes who are perishing through not hearing Dhamma: they will become knowers of Dhamma.
But at the end of six years precisely you are to come together to the royal capital of Bandhumati to recite the disciplinary code.’“
‘Then a certain Great Brahma, having divined the Lord Buddha Vipassi’s thought, as swiftly as a strong man might stretch his flexed arm, or flex it again,
Arranging his robe over one shoulder and saluting the Lord with joined palms, he said: “Just so, О Lord, just so, О Well- Farer!
Let the Lord give permission to this great gathering to wander abroad for the good of the many … out of compassion for the world…
There are beings with little dust on their eyes, who are perishing through not hearing Dhamma: they will become knowers of Dhamma.
And we too will do the same as the monks: at the end of six years we will come together to the royal capital of Bandhumati to recite the disciplinary code.”
‘Having spoken thus, that Brahma made obeisance to the Lord Buddha and, passing by to his right, vanished there and then.
—25. ‘So the Lord Buddha Vipassi, emerging from the seclusion of his rest-period, told the monks what had occurred occurred.
‘“I allow you, monks, to wander abroad for the good of the many, for the welfare and happiness of devas and humans. Do not go two together, monks, but teach the Dhamma that is lovely in its beginning, lovely in its middle, and lovely in its ending, both in the letter and in the spirit, and display the holy life fully complete and perfect.
There are beings with little dust on their eyes who are perishing through not hearing Dhamma: they will become knowers of Dhamma.
But at the end of six years precisely you are to come together to the royal capital of Bandhumati to recite the disciplinary code.”
And the majority of those monks left that very day to wander about the country.
‘And at that time there were eighty-four thousand religious residences in Jambudlpa.
And at the end of one year the devas would proclaim: “Gentlemen, one year has passed, five remain.
At the end of five years you are to return to Band-humati to recite the disciplinary code”, and similarly at the end of two, three, four, five years.
“ And those monks, some by their own psychic powers and some by that of the devas, all in one day came to Bandhumati to recite the disciplinary code.
‘And then the Lord Buddha Vipassi gave to the assembled monks the following precepts:
“Patient forbearance is the highest sacrifice,
Supreme is Nibbana, so say the Buddhas.
He’s not ‘one gone forth’ who hurts others,
No ascetic he who harms another.
Not to do any evil, but cultivate the good,
To purify one’s mind, this the Buddhas teach.
Not insulting, not harming, restraint according to rule,
Moderation in food, seclusion of dwelling,
Devotion to high thinking, this the Buddhas teach.”
vanished from the Brahma world and appeared before the Lord Buddha Vipassi.
And when six years had passed, the devas announced: “Gentlemen, six years have passed, it is now time to go to the royal capital of Bandhumati to recite the disciplinary code!
‘Once, monks, I was staying at Ukkattha in the Subhaga grove at the foot of 3 great sal-tree.
And as I dwelt there in seclusion it occurred to me: “There is no abode of beings easily accessible that has not been visited by me for so long as that of the devas of the Pure Abodes.
Suppose I were to visit them now?”
And then, as swiftly as a strong man might stretch his flexed arm, or flex it again, I vanished from Ukkattha and appeared among the Aviha devas.
And many thousands of them came to me, saluted me and stood to one side.
Then they said: “Sir, it is ninety-one aeons since the Lord Buddha Vipassi appeared in the world.
‘“The Lord Buddha Vipassi was bom of Khattiya race, and arose in a Khattiya family;
The Lord Buddha Vipassi’s renunciation was like this, his going-forth like this, his striving like this, his full enlightenment like this; his turning of the wheel like this.
“‘And we, sir, who lived the holy life under the Lord Buddha Vipassi, having freed ourselves from sense-desires, have arisen here.” 3.30. ‘In the same way many thousands of devas came… .
They said: “Sir, in this fortunate aeon now the Lord Buddha has arisen in the world.
He was bom of Khattiya race…;
He gained his full enlightenment under an assattha-tree;
Such was the Lord’s renunciation, such his going- forth, such his striving, such his full enlightenment, such his turning of the wheel.
And we, sir, who have lived the holy life under the Lord, having freed ourselves from sense-desires, have arisen here.”
—32. ‘Then I went with the Aviha devas to see the Atappa devas, and with these to see the Sudassa devas, and with these to see the SudassI devas, and with all of these to see the Akanittha devas.
he was of the Kondanna clan;
in his time the life-span was eighty thousand years;
he gained his full enlightenment under a trumpet-flower tree;
he had the pair of noble disciples Khanda and Tissa;
he had three assemblies of disciples,
one of six million eight hundred thousand,
one of a hundred thousand,
and one of eighty thousand monks,
all of whom were Arahants;
his chief personal attendant was the monk Asoka,
his father was King Bandhuma,
his mother was Queen Bandhumati,
and his father’s royal capital was Bandhumati.
he is of the Gotama clan;
in his time the life-span is short, limited and quick to pass: it is seldom that anybody lives to be a hundred.
he has a pair of noble disciples Sariputta and Moggallana;
he has one assembly of disciples, one thousand two hundred and fifty monks
who are all Arahants;
his chief personal attendant is Ananda;
his father is King Suddhodana, .
his mother was Queen Maya,
and his royal capital is Kapilavatthu
‘And so it is, monks, that by his penetration of the fundamentals of Dhamma the Tathagata remembers the past Buddhas who have attained final Nibbana, cutting through multiplicity, blazing a trail, have exhausted the round, have passed by all suffering; he- recalls their births, their names, their dan, their life-span, their twin-disciples, their assemblies of disciples: “These Blessed Lords were born thus,
And there many thousands of devas came, saluted me and stood to one side,
saying: “Sir, it is ninety-one aeons since the Lord Buddha Vipassi appeared in the world…” {as verses 29—30).
were called thus, thus was their clan, thus was their morality, their Dhamma, their wisdom, their dwelling, thus was their liberation.’“
Thus the Lord spoke,
and the monks, delighted, rejoiced at his words.
…and the six of us lived on what those two bhikkhus brought back from their almsround.
if he had much illness, he could not achieve what can be achieved by one who is free from illness;
if he was fraudulent and deceitful, he could not achieve what can be achieved by one who is honest and sincere;
if he was lazy, he could not achieve what can be achieved by one who is energetic;
if he was not wise, he could not achieve what can be achieved by one who is wise.
if he was free from illness, he could achieve what can be achieved by one who is free from illness;
if he was honest and sincere, he could achieve what can be achieved by one who is honest and sincere;
if he was energetic, he could achieve what can be achieved by one who is energetic;
if he was wise, he could achieve what can be achieved by one who is wise.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Conversion?
Among these four ideas, faith and understanding slay faithlessness and ignorance,
while virtue and generosity and craving 1 slay hate.
Thus two roots are still to be  abandoned in him.
And the suffering on the plane of the unabandoned which he is stopping now is the two-rooted five-categories.2
Thus two Truths, namely Origin and Suffering. The quiet and insight
This is the Mode of Conveying a Conversion.
Herein, what is the Analysis?
As to this “ cognizance imbued with faith”, etc.: if it can not be said unilaterally also of an ordinary man that his destination 1 on rebirth will be auspicious, that is because his action either turns out 2 to be that with only ripening here and now in this existence ;
or else it is that some past unprofitable action of his was ready manifested for ripening and that these now become the conditions for that ripening, like those instances in the Mahakammavibhanga Sutta . Hence this demonstration that one who walks in the True Idea has an auspicious destination 1 is one to be declared only after analysis.
Herein, what is the Reversal?
Faithlessness, unvirtuousness, avarice, and stupidity, are abandoned by their opposites. This is the Reversal.
Herein, what are the Synonyms?
The cognizance that has long been so imbued is cognizance, mind, consciousness, … etc. The faith is the faith faculty, faith power. As to virtue, good conduct, refraining, constraint, taming, untornness,1 are synonyms for it.
Generosity is relinquishment, non-greed, loosing-hold, Expression of Generosity.2
Understanding is understandingness,3 understanding-luminosity, understanding faculty, understanding power.
Herein, what are the Descriptions?
The faith is described by a description in terms of confidence.
The virtue is described by a description in terms of good conduct.
The generosity is described by a description in terms of making merit.
The understanding is described by a description in terms of inquiry.
These three ideas, namely faith, virtue, and generosity, come to purification in one possessed of understanding.
Herein, what are the Ways of Entry?
The four ideas are included in the determinations category in the case of the categories, … etc…. in the case of the elements, … in the case of the bases….1
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Terms of Expression?
This cognizance, described by a diversity, is not imbued with unprofitable cognizances. “ Imbued “ : any cognizances again so imbued, and also what is so described by assumption of the others ; also all these four ideas are described by a unity.
Herein, what are the Requisites?
For cognizance the faculties of the eye, etc., are a condition by dominance-conditionality and attention
For faith worldly understanding is a condition by cause-conditionality
For virtue living in befitting places is a condition
and right disposition in self-guidance is the cause.
For generosity non-greed is the cause
For understanding 1 another’s utterance and reasoned attention in oneself are the cause and the condition.
Herein, what is the Coordination?
The cognizance has for long been imbued, and also the concomitants of cognizance.
Here all ideas being thus imbued, the destination 1 will be auspicious, and auspicious the reappearance in a future existence.
So those human uses of possessions are all an auspicious destination,2 too. This is the Coordination.
For example, the verse: .
The Thread’s Meaning. Herein, what is “ Above”?
Beyond this is what will be, future ; 1 this is “ above” .
Herein,1 conjecturors about a retrospective finiteness by means of the past have the eternalist-view, while some conjecturors about prospective finiteness have the annihilationist-view. These said conjecturors have these two views,1 namely the annihilationist-view and the eternalist-view.
and they favour perception, in the way stated 1 as follows : 2 , and likewise three each with feeling, perception, determinations, and consciousness.
As to the annihilationist-view, the remaining five terms 3 belong to annihilationism,
That is how, in the case of the five categories, fifteen tenns of the twenty-based embodiment-view belong to retrospective finiteness
Herein, one who sees 1 thus, namely “ I am this” , when he sees form as self, he has the annihilationist-theory, but when he sees thus, namely , he has the eternalist-theory.2 The annihilationist-view treats in terms of self-identification with the particular category, and the eternalist-view treats in terms of retrospective finiteness.
When he does not see “ I am this “,
his taints of wrong view come to abandonment .
When by this door, by this instrumentality, by this means, namely “ Above, below, in every way without lust,1 And seeing not at all that ‘I am this’ “ , it is thus demonstrated in the several instances 2 in retrospective finiteness and prospective finiteness in the three temporal periods, then this is the Plane of Seeing and the Fruit of Stream- Entry, and so this noble means occurs for non-renewal of being 3 through the Roundabout’s becoming non-extant, thus, there being any noble means at all in the guise of one of the four paths, for non-renewal of being 4 it is the five faculties beginning with faith, whether blunt, medium, or outstanding, that occur 5 for all 6 non-renewal of being.
“I” is the flood of views, the flood of sensual desire, the flood of being, the flood of ignorance, according to limitation.7
Herein, as to the four Truths by the Mode of Conveying a Teaching: with the five faculties beginning with faith and with the fruit of Stream Entry there are respectively two Truths, namely the Path and Cessation.
And with embodiment 1 and its origin there are two Truths, namely Suffering and its Origin. This is the Mode of Conveying a Teaching.
Herein, what is the Investigation?
When he does not see “I am this”, he abandons the three fetters to be abandoned by Seeing.1
Persons are of three types, namely one type gains knowledge by a condensed statement, one gains knowledge by an expanded statement, and one is guidable .
The type that gains knowledge by a condensed statement has keen faculties, the type that gains knowledge by an expanded statement has blunter faculties than that, and the guidable type has still blunter faculties 1 than that.
Herein, the type that gains knowledge by a condensed statement, after his coming to the plane of seeing with keenness in his faculties, reaches the fruit of Stream-Entry and becomes a Single-Seed :
The type that gains knowledge by an expanded statement, after his coming to the plane of seeing with blunter faculties, reaches the fruit of Stream-Entry and becomes a Clan-to-Clan:
Herein, the guidable type, after his coming to the plane of seeing, reaches the fruit of Stream-Entry and becomes a Seven- times-at-Most:
this is the third kind of Stream-Enterer.
There is this construing. Whether he verifies the blunt or medium or outstanding plane 2 with blunt or medium or outstanding faculties, he abandons all the types of views w~th the abandoning of the embodiment-view.3
Herein, the embodiment- view is the footing for all wrong view.
Embodiment is the footing for name-and-form.
Name-and-form is the footing for the embodiment-view.
The five faculties having form beginning with the eye are the footing for lust for form.
The sixfold base is the footing for I-making.
Herein, what are the Characteristics?
When two kinds 1 of view are abandoned, herein the sixty-one 2 types of view come to abandonment
When he sees in the plane born of that view its specific conditionality 4 by seeing how the view comes to be ,
This is the Mode of Conveying Characteristics.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Fourfold Array?
It is that any creatures who will not 1 delight in lust-provoking things will make efforts 1 for the abandoning of views.
This is the Blessed One’s purport here.
This is the Mode of Conveying a Fourfold Array.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Conversion?
They eradicate covetousness and ill will 1 altogether with the means of keeping-in-being fby the Non-Return Path, faith being a power then in virtue of the Initiate’s deliverance. When they come to belong to the further side, faith is then a power in virtue of the Arahant’s Right View, because exerted by the energy faculty 3 and based on memory by the mindfulness faculty 3 and it reaches 4 the goal.
Herein, the faculties are the Path, and the abandoning of defilement
is Cessation. What is no more inseparable from the idea of future arising is Suffering.
This is the Mode of Conveying a Conversion.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying an Analysis?
Herein, one acquires outstandingness in the plane born of that embodiment-view in five moods: by virtue, duty, much learning, concentration, and pleasure in renunciation.
Herein, one who perceives something as reached when it is not reached overestimates.3
And it was on account of this very need arisen 4 that the Blessed One delivered this Thread:
Herein, when he is one who perceives something as reached when it is not reached, his concentration is materialistic, it is that cultivated by trivial men, and it is ordinary men that are called “ trivial men”.
And this 6 materialistic concentration belongs to the worlds 5 and is ignoble 6 through its not having come to the Noble Path, that is why such concentration is ignoble and of the kind cultivated by trivial men.
But he who understands and sees 6 in the noble mood how this is abandons overestimation. 7 He 8 is guided 8 by the noble concentration cultivated by untrivial men and unmaterialistic. Herein, it is noble persons that are called “ untrivial men “,
and the concentration cultivated by them is what is called concentration cultivated by untrivial men.
Therefore this 9 is declarable after analysis, namely the passage 9 “ Seeing not at all 9 that ‘ I am this ‘ “.
Herein, what is the Reversal?
It is owing to this plane of seeing that defilements are abandor1able ; for they 1 are abandonable here. Both any 1 not demonstrated in this Thread by the Blessed One and any 1 demonstrated by the Blessed One here can be demonstrated 1 here.
Herein, what are the Synonyms?
Any embodiment- view, of self-view
Defilements abandonable
are abandoned 1 also when undemonstrated by the Blessed One . They are for instance the eternalist-view and the annihilation-view,
The annihilationist-view is the non-existence-of-giving-etc.-view,
These are synonyms.
Craving is described by a description in terms of fetters,
Herein, what are the Ways of Entry?
Embodiment is Suffering; what is abandonable by seeing
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Clearing Up?
The instigation, instigated whereby the Blessed One uttered this Thread, has been completed.1
Name-and-form has cause and condition; consciousness is the cause as seed;
What has to be stopped is the renewal of being 2 in a further existence 2 and the 2 individual-essence as cause 2 and the other-essence as condition 2 .
For any 2 such right view another’s utterance and reasoned attention are the condition, and any understanding that is aroused is the cause, since from the right view right intention has its being and so right view is the requisite.
Herein, what is the Coordination?
He who “ sees not at all that ‘I am this”’ sees it as painful as an ailment, … etc…. with the eleven 1 terms.
(” The virtues, Blessed One, what is their aim, what is their reward?”
“ The virtues, Ananda, have non-remorse for their aim, … down to … deliverance “ ) .
Herein, “aim ” is twofold: man’s aim 1 and word’s aim .
Herein, what is the man’s aim ?
That there is no subsequent regret, this is the “ non-remorse” ; this is the man’s aim .
As for instance when someone fosters this aim, cultivates it, he might say 2 “ Whatever it is I am dependent on, that is the aim for which I instigate this task” .2
Herein, what is the word’s aim ?
 The kinds of virtue, whether bodily or verbal good conduct, have non-remorse for their aim .
Herein, it is only the radiance of virtue and duty 3
as good conduct due to the state of action well done,3 nothing else, that is the “non-remorse” here.
And so, down to “deliverance” , there are the two aims , the man’s aim and the word’s aim, in the case of each term in the text. And as in this Thread, so in all Threads, there are the two aims .4
And the ultimate aim , the supreme aim ,1
is this, namely what can be verified for oneself 2 on one’s own, depending on what is verifiable 3 as extinction: this is called one’s own aim effected.4
This again is a synonym. That one understands, 5
by this synonym the concluded aim referred to, 6 this is the word’s aim .
Herein, of whatever aim the hearer wants
the actual obtaining is the man’s aim ,
is the word’s  aim . Herein, non-remorse is the aim and the reward of the kinds of virtue.
And the reward is this, namely that one does not go to a bad destination,
according as it is said by the Blessed One § 153). This is the aim :
that a man associated with power 7 on the plane of mastery 7 has been instigated by virtue. And so down to “deliverance”. 735. Likewise the Three Categories : 1
herein, both the non- remorse demonstrated by means of underlying tendency and that virtue are the Virtue Category.
And in virtue of the concentration faculty the gladness, happiness and tranquillity are the Concentration Category.
And that one concentrated 2 understands how this is, this is the Understanding Category.
These are the three Categories: Virtue, Concentration, and Understanding. 736. Likewise 1 in the case of the Faculties when he fulfils virtue: the energy faculty is the reason whereby he fulfils virtue and makes efforts for the non-arising of the unarisen unprofitable, for the abandoning of the arisen unprofitable, for the arising of the unarisen profitable, and for the increase of the arisen profitable, thus the Energy Faculty is demonstrated.
And herein, the concentration category is the Concentration Faculty,
and the understanding category is the Understanding Faculty. That can also be seen in the case of the four Right Endeavours
likewise: for when someone makes eftorts for the non-arising of unarisen unprofit, this is the first Right Endeavour,
These are the four Right Endeavours.3 737. Also it can be seen in the case of the four Meditations
likewise : First Meditation: With the virtue category, there comes the renunciation element as the beginning i.e. renunciation of sensual- desire, and the three kinds of thinking, namely renunciation- thinking, non-ill-will-thinking, and non-cruelty-thinking,
and the non-distraction there is concentration.
This is the five-factored first meditation .
Second Meditation: What is the mental tranquillity? Any obstruction 1 with the thinking and exploring, which is defilement and fever, has ceased in the first meditation;
and any such 2 tranquillization of defilement in the first meditation), and any 3 tranquillization of thinking and exploring in the second meditation, this is tranquillization of both these ideas.4
Herein, any 4 pleasure and pleasing of the body and of cognizance, this is the tranquillity of one who has happiness and pleasure,
So the confidence in oneself and the singleness of cognizance and the happiness and the pleasure are the four- factored second meditation .
Third Meditation : As to 1 tranquil feels pleasure) , after dispensing 2 with that outstanding bodily pleasure only mental pleasure remains, this being fading 3 of happiness ;
with the fading of happiness he obtains onlooking-equanimity, 4
and also unification of cognizance.4 This is the five-factored third meditation .
Fourth Meditation: As to pleased, his cognizance is concentrated ) , this is unification. Now 1 this 1 unification, of the kind dealing with meditation,1 is there also in the first meditation, but owing to its being accompanied 1 there 1 by pleasant 1 feeling it does not 1 come altogether to fulfilment
there as in the fourth meditation. Accordingly, onlooking-equanimity, purified mindfulness,1 neither-painful-nor- pleasant feeling,1 and unification, these are the fourth meditation .
And just as the Concentration Faculty can be shown thus in the four Meditations, so too the Understanding Faculty can be shown in the four Truths.
For as to concentrated understands how it is ) , this act- of-understanding is fourfold, namely understanding as ugly, as impermanent, as painful, and as not-self, and then its object is the Noble Truth of Suffering. Then as to finds dispassion) and his lust fades), this is the Path. When 1 liberated) , the abandoning accordingly of the taint of sensual desire, the taint of being, the taint of view, and the taint of ignorance, on reaching Arahantship, is the Noble Truth of Cessation. The Origin of taints is on the plane of unabandoned defilement.
This is how the Understanding Faculty can be seen as the four Noble Truths.
Likewise with the 4 Paths and Fruits : as to “He who is concentrated understands how it is “, this is the plane of seeing.
And then when he understands how the fruit of Stream-Entry is he finds dispassion, and this is then the attenuation 1
of lust for sensual desires and of ill will f1rrnished by the Path of Once-Return. And when he finds dispassion, and his lust fades, for the Fruit of Once-Return, this is the first plane of keeping meditation in being as the heart-deliverance due to fading of lust and it is the Fruit of Non-Return.
What is called “ deliverance “ is the understanding-deliverance, and it is Arahantship.
Now these are the kinds of non-remorse; and the Energy Faculty and the four right endeavours are also the kinds of non-remorse. 744. And what follows down to 1 the concentration which is the four meditations in this way is the Concentration Faculty…745. As to “ he who is concentrated understands how it is “,1
this is the four foundations of mindfulness. 2 Consequent upon the fulfilment of virtue due to its being connected with generosity, they provide an undisturbed state of mind 3 for signs penetrative of the Truths. This is the Mindfulness Faculty, namely the four foundations of mindfulness.
Again, the faculty that, owing to this teaching of the True Idea, is, in the three instances,1 without inclusion 2 of wrong views, and has the virtue that is only the Initiate’s owing to the abandonment of only a portion 3 of what is given up by the Arahant is the Faith Faculty.
And these are the four factors of Stream-Entry. The fruits
as the concentration faculties 4 that are accompanied by what is deferred till higher 4 in the subsequent attainments  can be demonstrated in all Threads .
 Knowledge in one who remembers that the obtaining of meditation is got only through energy is understanding consisting in what is heard .
The concentration possessing illumination of the successive signs in their due order 1 owing to non-lapse in procedure is understanding consisting in cogitation. And since one who is thus “ concentrated understands how it is”, this is understanding consisting in keeping-in-being.
This is a demonstration of the Thread.
This Thread is one dealing with penetration. It requites a discoverer, it can be discovered;
it is by means of the factors with which it is endowed that it will be discovered ; its factors will discover ; hence Enlightenment Factors .
Accordingly in so far as at the beginning of this Thread it is said 1 , how does he fulfil the kinds of virtue?
Energy for the non-arising of the unarisen unprofitable, for the abandoning of the arisen unprofitable, for the arousing of the unarisen profitable, and for the increase of the arisen profitable, is a factor 2 for that virtue’s being brought to enlightenment ,
It is owing to this energy that there are the two ideas stated at the beginning of this Thread, namely non-remorse and gladness; and again, any 1 happiness with the non-remorse as condition and with the gladness as condition is the Happiness Enlightenment Factor.
and the abandoning of the roots :
these are two Truths, namely Cessation and the Path.
The cognizance is described by a description in terms of seed.1
The imbuing is described 2 by a description in terms of morality.
The cognizance is the consciousness category in the case of the categories, the mind- consciousness element in the case of the elements, the mind base in the case of the bases.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Clearing Up?
This, which was the Blessed One’s utterance when questioned by Mahanama the Sakyan: all in the question has been concluded with the answer.
“Auspicious destination” : 1 even for an enjoyer of sensual desires the form element, the formless element, and the human state are all 11 described by a unity 2 as “ an auspicious destination “.1 This is the Description.
is a condition by cause-conditionality.
and reasoned attention is a condition.
and non-remorse is the cause-condition .
“ Below” is what is bygone, past. The above and the below are called the extent .2
Herein, as to this eternalist-view, the following fifteen of the twenty terms of the embodiment-view belong to eternalism,
and they 4 see that , taking it that  and similarly with the other four categories. Such is the fourfold Embodiment-view as annihilationism and eternalism.
with the eternalist-view and five clauses belong to prospective finiteness with the annihilationist-view.
This is the investigation.
Herein, what is the Construing?
this is the first kind of Stream-Enterer .
this is the second type of Stream- Enterer.
This is the Construing.
Herein, what are the Footings?
he grasps all dependent arising.
both “above” and “below” , and he is “ without lust “,3 that is, without lust for all things provocative of lust.
What is the Blessed One’s Purport in this Thread?
The five faculties beginning with faith, when blunt, are five hither-side 1 faculties.
“And seeing not at all that ‘ I am this ‘ “ : 1 this is not unilaterally always so; for when someone 1 does this merely by outstanding intellectual effort in the plane of the worlds, he certainly has not abandoned the embodiment-view by the noble instrumentality ,
his effort being merely that which is called outstandingness 2 in the plane born of that embodiment- view .
 .
this is the plane.
the latter being the finitist-view and the infinitist-view the eternalist-view.
and the eternalist-view is the no-need-for-action-view.
Herein, what are the Descriptions?
the Path is described by a description in terms of obtaining,
the faculties are described by a description in terms of obtaining.
is its Origin is which is the Path.1
Such faculties as are demonstrated can be similarly made ways of entry and likewise in the cases of the categories, elements, and bases.
Herein,1 what are the Requisites?
through it ignorance and determinations are the condition.
This is the man’s aim .
while the intimation of the aim of whatever idea the Blessed One teaches
and that for the abandoning of the arisen is the second,2 and so on.
accompanied by exploring.1
Then the happiness 2 that is born 2 in one happy-minded 2 through gladness is happiness ; 2 and the bodily pleasure induced through the tranquillization of the body 2 is pleasure;
and also any singleness 5 of cognizance and confidence i1i oneself due to that singleness, this is the fourth meditation factor in the second meditation).
and he feels pleasure,
and he obtains mindfulness and awareness,
Let alone one year, prince,
thus this is the Energy Enlightenment Factor.
…he might dwell seven months
…six months…five months…four months…three months…two months…one month…half a month
…Let alone half a month, prince,
As to happy his body becomes tranquillized) ,
this is the Tranquillity Enlightenment Factor.
The bodily pleasure induced thereby since pleased his cognizance is concentrated) is the Concentration Enlightenment Factor.
As to concentrated understands how it is) , this is the Investigation-of-Ideas Enlightenment Factor.
That, owing to the virtue, the employment of a sign 1 that is in conformity with the arising 2 of the five enlightenment factors so far mentioned is accompanied by their non-floating- away when partaking of steadiness 3 and partaking of distinction, and does not come to lapse, 4 this is the Mindfulness Enlightenment Factor.
As to the clause he ” understands how it is” : he works over-energetically ;
this being censured as the plane of idleness, he becomes, by means of these factors, enlightened about how the course of the eye understanding coupled with quiet is onlooking-equanimity ; 2
This is the Thread-Demonstration.
Herein, what is the Teaching?
In this Thread the four noble Truths are taught.
Herein, what is the Investigation?
In the case of each clause from “No virtuous man has to choose how shall I have no remorse? ‘ “ down to “deliverance” : he framed 1 the reply to the question” what is the aim of …? “ ,1 thus each asking having two terms and each answer two terms, the two terms by means of which there are the two instances of getting acquainted 2 are the very two terms by which the answer is given. What is he asking about? About a penetrative bodily plane for action; 3 for it is accordingly that the standing-point arouses the ideas that belong to the Adept.
Herein, what is the Construing?
One who is virtuous has no remorse . How? He is without wilfulness 1 and has fading of lust. There is this construing.
Herein, what are the Footings?
Energy is the footing for the energy faculty,
Energy is the footing for non-hate,
The energy faculty is the footing for three path-factors, for right effort,1 right action, and right livelihood ;
Herein, what are the Characteristics?
When the virtue category is stated all the categories are stated.1 “ Whose cognizance is kept in being, like this, How shall suffering come to him 1 “ : 3 because virtue is itself like a rock . Just as a rock cannot be made to shudder 4 by any kind of opposition at all, so too such cognizance does not “shudder” with any defilement at all : this is non-delusion.
When one idea siding with enlightenment is stated all the ideas that arrive at enlightenment are stated.
Herein, what is the mode of Conveying a Fourfold Array?
What is the Blessed One’s Purport in this Thread?
It is that those with will for non-remorse are fulfillers of virtue, those with will for gladness are fulfillers of non-remorse, … and so on…. This is the Blessed One’s purport here. This is the Mode of Conveying a Fourfold Array.
Herein, what is the Conversion?
This Thread is one dealing with penetration.
Penetration is Cessation,
This is the Conversion.1
“ The virtuous man has no remorse “ is a statement declarable after analysis. For  ;
so although that is so nevertheless even when such good conduct misapprehended is well done, still he has no gladness due to non-remorse … down to deliverance. So the statement “The virtuous man has no remorse” is one declarable after analysis. This is the Mode of Conveying an Analysis..,
Herein, what is the Reversal?
By means of these seven excellences in the stipulate 1 when abandoning abandon the eleven failures 2 in the stipulate. This is the Reversal.
Herein, what are the Synonyms?
These are synonyms for the following noble ideas, namely the Powers, Enlightenment Factors, Liberations, Concentrations, and Excellences.
Herein, what are the Descriptions?
“The virtuous man has no remorse “ is described under the Virtue Category by a description in terms of renunciation and by a description in terms of relinquishment. Thus there are ten factors each described by two factors.
Herein, what are the Ways of Entry?
This as a Thread dealing with penetration provides a way of entry in the five faculties  : just as 1 was demonstrated above 1 ) with faculties, etc., so too they can be demonstrated in categories, elements, and bases.
(13} Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Clearing Up?
When “ The virtuous man has no remorse “ is said the instigation 1 is not yet cleared up, and when “he who has no remorse is glad” is said the instigation is not yet cleared up, but when the eleven terms have been taught then the instigation is cleared up. This is the Clearing Up.
Herein, what are the Terms of Expression?
It is described in terms of diversity of virtue. Thus the ten remaining terms 1 are all the reward of the virtue category. 770. Requisites?  And for these 1  is the condition and the cause. For the concentration category the “pleasure” is the cause and the “ tranquillity “ the condition, on which account, there being also conascence with meditation, in that jnstance 3 they are meditation factors. 771. Another way : For concentration, contemplation of disappointment in sensual desires is the condition and the state of seeing reward in renunciation is the cause.
Herein, what is the Coordination?
The energy faculty is the virtue category.
The virtue consists in the four ideas that are basic for the meditations, 1
any practice of ideas in accordance with the True Idea being restraint by Patimokkha-Rule.
The verse : . 774. The Thread’s Meaning. As to the simile 1 “as a rock” : just as a rock neither shudders with the wind nor wavers with heat or with cold,
as do many choiceless inanimate things; while they wither with heat, shrivel with cold and flгtter with the wind, not so a rock.
“ Is free from lust for lust-provoking things, Untroubled too by trouble “ : 2 cognizance thus free from lust for lust- provoking things through fading-of-lust 2 is untroubled by trouble.2
What is the reason?
Reversal? as to “ How shall suffering come to him 1 “, there is no mental pleasure in the case of the extinction element without trace left,1but there is in the case of that with trace left.1
The pleasure that one who has entered upon the attainment of cessation of perception and feeling has does not belong to the actual occasion.”4 This distinction is the Reversal here.
Herein, what are the Synonyms?
“ Whose cognizance is thus kept in being “ : kept in being, well kept in being, established, made the basis, well instigated .
“ Cognizance “ : mind,1 consciousness, mind faculty, mind-consciousness element.
Herein, what are the Descriptions?
Suffering is described by a description in terms of what is annihilated.
Herein, what are the Ways of Entry?
When cognizance is demonstrated the five categories are demonstrated; this is the way of entry in the case of the categories. When the mind- consciousness element is demonstrated the eighteen elements are demonstrated; this is the way of entry in the case of the elements.
When the mind base is demonstrated all the bases are demonstrated.
Herein, the mind base as consciousness1 is the footing for name- and-form;
Herein, what is the Clearing up? The instigation is already cleared up.
Herein, what are the Terms of Expression?
The keeping of the sixth 1 faculty in being is described 1 by a unity, through being based on the sixth 1 the body is described by a unity.
Herein what is the Requisite?
The prior cause for the arising of cognizance is attention and a leaning thereto since it is owing to not keeping ideas partaking of distinction in being that cognizance goes on continuously in the unconcentrated plane.1 The cause of concentration is pleasure and its condition is non-remorse . This 2 is the Requisite..
Herein, what is the Coordination?
“Whose cognizance is thus kept in being” : the ideas to be coordinated with that are as follows :
the body, the virtue, the understanding, and the cognizance, kept in being. They being each uninflected,1 undefiected,1 unsuperfiuous,1 undeficient,1 their attainability unclungto, this is the right concentration that belongs to the Adept Monk’s State,1 not to that of the Initiate. So all the Adept’s ten Arahant-ideas have been demonstrated.
The type of Thread dealing with the Adept.
 . In this Thread 3 there are two terms 3 this venerable one disclaims and two terms he claims : they are abandonment of craving in keeping cognizance in being and abandonment of views in keeping the body in being.3 The first simile he gives is thus : (
Earth is neither distressed nor disgusted with the impure and the pure nor does it gain happiness and gladness therefrom ; so too I 4 abide with an abundant 6 measureless 6 heart without risk and ill will) .
Demonstration of the Thread. What is it that the venerable-one claims? He claims abandoning of the bodily-pleasure faculty through keeping the body in being i.e. contemplation of the body as a body and he claims abandoning of the mental joy faculty through keeying cognizance in being i.e. contemplation of cognizance as cognizance.
Bodily pleasant feeling is underlain 1 by the underlying tendency to lust and that kind of pleasure faculty he rejects,
And while the contemplation of the body as a pleasant abiding here and now,3
with the body the ground 1 for defilement,1 and with cognizance cognizance’s dependence i.e. the body. With cognizance well kept in being he claims to abide in the seven attainments.2
…he might dwell seven days and nights
…six days and nights…five days and nights… four days and nights…three days and nights…two days and nights…one day and night.
this being taken as the plane of agitation, he drives it over-slackly ; 1
hence, taking it that it is on this account that the onlooking-equanimity is a factor of that enlightenment,3 it is called the Onlooking-Equanimity Enlightenment Factor.
There was an occasion when the Blessed One was living at Kosambi in Ghosita’s Park.
concentration is the footing tor the concentration faculty,
understanding is the footing for the understanding faculty.
concentration is the footing for non-greed,
and said to him: ‘Venerable sir, the prince or princess in my womb, whichever it may be, goes to the Blessed One for refuge and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus.
understanding is the footing for non-delusion.
the concentration faculty is the footing for three path-factors, for right intention, right speech, and right concentration ;
the understanding faculty is the footing for two path-factors, for right mindfulness, and right view.
she stood at one side and said to him: ‘Venerable sir, this Prince Bodhi goes to the Blessed One for refuge and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus.
When virtue 2 is stated, since virtue is the cause and condition for all the remaining ten ideas in this Thread, all those ideas are stated too.
Herein, what is the Analysis?
that whereby he finds dispassion is the Path,
that which ceases is Suffering, and that which is abandoned by the path leading to penetration is Origin.
That it is “ free from lust for lust-provoking things “ is non-greed. 5
That it is” untroubled too by any trouble” is non-hate.
Herein, the profitable root non-delusion is understanding, the non-greed is simply non-greed, and the non-hate is simply non-hate.
One steadied in the Initiate’s plane by these three profitable roots arouses the Adept’s path.
He arouses ideas that surmount the Initiate’s plane,1 and these are the ten ideas belonging to Arahantship, namely the Adept’s right view, … down to … his right concentration, right deliverance, and knowing and seeing of the taste 2 of deliverance .
Herein, with the eight-factored path the fourfold keeping-in- being is also obtained,
namely keeping virtue in being, keeping the body in being, keeping cognizance in being, and keeping understanding in being .
Herein, the body is kept in being by right action and right livelihood,
virtue is kept in being by right speech and right effort,
cognizance is kept in being by right intention and right concentration,
and understanding is kept in being by right view and right mindfulness.
With this fourfold keeping-in-being two ideas come to fulfilment through keeping in being,1 namely cognizance 2 and understanding.
Through the keeping-in-being the cognizance becomes Quiet, and through the keeping-in-being the understanding becomes Insight.
Herein, cognizance is made unadulterated 1 by imperfections with the abandoning of ignorance that is owed to understanding.2
The keeping of cognizance in being is itself brought to complete fulfilment by the keeping of the Arahant’s understanding in being.
When his cognizance is well “ kept in being, like this, How shall suffering come to him 1 “.
Furthermore, that venerable one 1 believed in the element of non-ill-will, and also he had entered upon a higher attainment when the spirit 2 gave him the blow, so no pain was felt in his physical frame when attacked 2 by the spirit. This is the Thread-meaning.
Herein, what is the Teaching?
In this Thread the ten ideas of Arahantship belonging to the Adept are taught, and keeping of measureless 1 concentration in being.
Herein, what is the Investigation?
The state of being like a rock : whatever ideas are included in what can be felt as pleasure and pain 1 have all been left behind for those who contemplate only the unformed. The requisite for what is felt as a body not being made to occur, he does not feel pain.
Herein, what is the Construing? “ Whose cognizance is thus kept in being, How shall suffering come to him?” .
There are three kinds of keeping-in-being in which cognizance does not suffer pain,
namely in keeping cognizance 1 in being which is the Meditations, in keeping Cessation in being which is the Paths, and in keeping straight-resulting concentration in being which is the Paths’ Fruits.
So” Whose cognizance is thus kept in being”, this is the footing for the fruit of the concentration.
Herein, what are the Characteristics?
“ Whose cognizance is thus kept in being “ is the four 1 kinds of what is kept in being demonstrated above , namely understanding, virtue, body, and cognizance. Virtue is well kept in being, and because he is bodily and mentally “ steady “ he does not “ shudder “ , and so also feeling and perception and determinations.”
How shall suffering come to him?” : also no pleasure follows after him, and no neither-pain-nor-pleasure comes.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Fourfold -Array?
What is the Blessed One’s Purport here?
It is that those who are beyond suffering abide in such attainments as these.
This is the Blessed One’s purport here.
And it is that those with no confidence will become confident, and when they are confident 1 they will have happiness and gladness. This is the Blessed One’s purport here.
Conversion? there is no plane of conversion here.
Analysis 1 As to” Whose cognizance is thus kept in being, How shall suffering come to him?”, the demonstration is twofold as demonstration of the cause of suffering and as demonstration of the opposite.
What is the cause of suffering?
No grief 2 about what is hate-provoking 2 makes it hate ; not hating, it will not be troubled ; hence it is untroubled by trouble. It is that from which suffering comes. And as to the demonstration of the opposite,1 it is demonstrated thus : “ How will suffering come to one such as this 1”
Again at the same time, however, they have said 2 thus: “At that moment, at that period, in both cases it is not felt in that with trace left 3 nor in that without trace left.3
Cognizance is described by a description in terms of pacification of mind- determinations.1
Concentration is described 2 by a description in terms of the Adept.
with name-and-form as condition, the sixfold base; …
so in the case of dependent arising
this is the way of entry.
but not the whole feeling category.2 Any mental pleasant feeling that arises there does so with the obtaining of the concentration attainment as condition;
Herein, under the four Great Entities 1 he mentions the abandoning of approval 2 and resistance in regard to the form category ;
he rejects the joy that is the mental pleasure, but not all feeling born of mind-contact.2
and the sensual desires as well as the form, and that too in the Adept’s plane.
it is through power and through activity, 4 that there is abandoning of all kinds of attention.4 799. With the similes of the Grease-Pot 1 and the Man Fond of Ornaments,2 there is shown his reviewing of this body given its being by a mother and a father. 3 800. With the body and with contemplation of the body, and with cognizance and with contemplation of cognizance, he remembers two ideas:
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the venerable Maha Kaccana was living at Madhura in the Gunda Grove.814
Now a good report of Master Kaccana has been spread to this effect: ‘He is wise, discerning, sagacious, learned, articulate, and perspicacious; he is aged and he is an arahant.
It is good to see such arahants.’“
Then King Avantiputta of Madhura had a number of state carriages made ready, and mounting a state carriage, he drove out from Madhura with the full pomp of royalty in order to see the venerable Maha Kaccana.
He went thus as far as the road was passable for carriages, and then he got down from his carriage and went forward on foot to the venerable Maha Kaccana.
He exchanged greetings with him, and when this courteous and amiable talk was finished, he sat down at one side
What does Master Kaccana say about that?”
“It is just a saying in the world, great king, that ‘Brahmins are the highest caste…heirs of Brahma.’
And there is a way whereby it can be understood how that statement of the brahmins is just a saying in the world.
“What do you think, great king? If a noble prospers in wealth, grain, silver, or gold, will there be nobles who rise before him and retire after him, who are eager to serve him, who seek to please him and speak sweetly to him, and will there also be brahmins, merchants, and workers who do likewise?”
“There will be, Master Kaccana.”
“What do you think, great king? If a brahmin prospers in wealth, grain, silver, or gold, will there be brahmins who rise before him and retire after him, who are eager to serve him, who seek to please him and speak sweetly to him, and will there also be merchants, workers, and nobles who do likewise?”
“There will be, Master Kaccana.”
“What do you think, great king? If a merchant prospers in wealth, grain, silver, or gold, will there be merchants who rise before him and retire after him, who are eager to serve him, who seek to please him and speak sweetly to him, and will there also be workers, nobles, and brahmins who do likewise?”
“There will be, Master Kaccana.”
“What do you think, great king? If a worker prospers in wealth, grain, silver, or gold, will there be workers who rise before him and retire after him, who are eager to serve him, who seek to please him and speak sweetly to him, and will there also be nobles, brahmins, and merchants who do likewise?”
“There will be, Master Kaccana.”
“What do you think, great king? If that is so, then are these four castes all the same, or are they not,
“Surely if that is so, Master Kaccana, then these four castes are all the same:
“That is a way, great king, whereby it can be understood how that statement of the brahmins is just a saying in the world.
“What do you think, great king? Suppose a noble were to kill living beings, take what is not given, misconduct himself in sensual pleasures, speak falsely, speak maliciously, speak harshly, gossip, be covetous, have a mind of ill will, and hold wrong view. On the dissolution of the body, after death, would he be likely to reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell, or not,
“If a noble were such, Master Kaccana, he would be likely to reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
That is how it appears to me in this case, and thus I have heard from the arahants.”
“What do you think, great king? Suppose a brahmin…a merchant… a worker were to kill living beings…and hold wrong view. On the dissolution of the body, after death, would he be likely to reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell, or not,
“If a brahmin…a merchant…a worker were such, Master Kaccana, he would be likely to reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, even in hell.
That is how it appears to me in this case, and thus I have heard from the arahants.”
“What do you think, great king? If that is so, then are these four castes all the same, or are they not,
“Surely if that is so, Master Kaccana, then these four castes are all the same:
“That is also a way, great king, whereby it can be understood how that statement of the brahmins is just a saying in the world.
“What do you think, great king? Suppose a noble were to abstain from killing living beings, from taking what is not given, from misconduct in sensual pleasures, from false speech, from malicious speech, from harsh speech, and from gossip, and were to be uncovetous, to have a mind without ill will, and to hold right view. On the dissolution of the body, after death, would he be likely to reappear in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world, or not,
“If a noble were such, Master Kaccana, he would be likely to reappear in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
That is how it appears to me in this case, and thus I have heard from the arahants.”
“What do you think, great king? Suppose a brahmin…a merchant… a worker were to abstain from killing living beings… and to hold right view. On the dissolution of the body, after death, would he be likely to reappear in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world, or not,
“If a brahmin…a merchant…a worker were such, Master Kaccana, he would be likely to reappear in a happy destination, even in the heavenly world.
That is how it appears to me in this case, and thus I have heard from the arahants.”
“What do you think, great king? If that is so, then are these four castes all the same, or are they not,
“Surely if that is so, Master Kaccana, then these four castes are all the same:
“That is also a way, great king, whereby it can be understood how that statement of the brahmins is just a saying in the world.
“What do you think, great king? Suppose a noble were to break into houses, plunder wealth, commit burglary, ambush highways, or seduce another’s wife, and if your men arrested him and produced him, saying: ‘Sire, this is the culprit;
“We would have him executed, Master Kaccana, or we would have him fined, or we would have him exiled, or we would do with him as he deserved.
Why is that?
Because he has lost his former status of a noble, and is simply reckoned as a robber.”
“What do you think, great king? Suppose a brahmin…a merchant…a worker were to break into houses…or seduce another’s wife, and if your men arrested him and produced him, saying: ‘Sire, this is the culprit;
“We would have him executed, Master Kaccana, or we would have him fined, or we would have him exiled, of we would do with him as he deserved.
Why is that?
Because he has lost his former status of a brahmin…a merchant…a worker, and is simply reckoned as a robber.”
“What do you think, great king? If that is so, then are these four Castes all the same, or are they not,
“Surely if that is so, Master Kaccana, then these four castes are all the same;
“That is also a way, great king, whereby it can be understood how that statement of the brahmins is just a saying in the world.
“What do you think, great king? Suppose a noble, having shaved off his hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and gone forth from the home life into homelessness, were to abstain from killing living beings, from taking what is not given, and from false speech. Refraining from eating at night, he would eat only in one part of the day, and would be celibate, virtuous, of good character.
How would you treat him?”
“We would pay homage to him, Master Kaccana, or we would rise up for him, or invite him to be seated; or we would invite him to accept robes, almsfood, resting place, and medicinal requisites; or we would arrange for him lawful guarding, defence, and protection.
Why is that?
Because he has lost his former status of a noble, and is simply reckoned as a recluse.”
“What do you think, great king? Suppose a brahmin…a merchant… a worker, having shaved off his hair and beard…and would be celibate, virtuous, of good character.
How would you treat him?”
“We would pay homage to him, Master Kaccana, or rise up for him, or invite him to be seated; or we would invite him to accept robes, almsfood, resting place, and medicinal requisites; or we would arrange for him lawful guarding, defence, and protection.
Why is that?
Because he has lost his former status of a brahmin…a merchant…a worker, and is simply reckoned as a recluse.”
“What do you think, great king? If that is so, then are these four castes all the same, or are they not,
“Surely if that is so, Master Kaccana, then these four castes are all the same;
“That is also a way, great king, whereby it can be understood how that statement of the brahmins is just a saying in the world.”
When this was said, King Avantiputta of Madhura said to the venerable Maha Kaccana: “Magnificent, Master Kaccana! Magnificent, Master Kaccana!
Master Kaccana has made the Dhamma clear in many ways, as though he were turning upright what had been overthrown, revealing what was hidden, showing the way to one who is lost, or holding up a lamp in the dark for those with eyesight to see forms.
From today let Master Kaccana remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge for life.”
“Do not go to me for refuge, great king.
Go for refuge to that same Blessed One to whom I have gone for refuge.”
“Where is he living now, that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened, Master Kaccana?”
“That Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened, has attained to final Nibbana, great king.”
“If we heard that that Blessed One was within ten leagues, we would go ten leagues in order to see that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened.
If we heard that that Blessed One was within twenty leagues…thirty leagues…forty leagues…fifty leagues…
a hundred leagues, we would go a hundred leagues in order to see that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened.
From today let Master Kaccana remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
King Avantiputta of Madhura heard: “The recluse Kaccana is living at Madhura in the Gunda Grove.
*/And 1 in the simile of the Householder , just as, were a householder’s son to have a clothes-chest full of variously dyed clothes, then whatever pair of clothes he wanted in the morning he would put on 2 in the morning, and similarly at noon and in the evening, so too, because this venerable one’s cognizance is well kept in being, whatever kind of abiding he wants to abide in in the morning, such he abides in in the morning, and similarly at noon and in the evening.
With this 3 simile there is stated by that same venerable one the following fivefold 3 unsurpassed Keeping of Faculties in Being . /* 1
*//* 1 With cognizance kept in being that venerable one claims this eightfold keeping in being, namely the keeping of the body in being in the similes of the four Great Entities and the keeping of cognizance in being in the similes of the bull,1 the savage, the man, and the grease-pot,1 , doing so in virtue of these kinds of keeping in being.1 With the former kind of keeping in being he implies fulfilment of quiet,1
and with the latter four he implies the fulfilment of understanding.
The body is by nature repulsive. 2 Perception of the bloated corpse-stage in the body, etc., in brief, the nine corpse-stage perceptions , these are repulsive ideas. And this venerable one, undisgusted with the repulsive, abides devoted to the pursuit of keeping in being Mindfulness Occupied with the Body ; for his cognizance has no repulsion through his having abandoned disgust.
 How does he abide percipient of the repulsive in unrepulsive ideas?
To all the world the body is unrepulsive. This venerable one abides with perception of it as ugly.
That is how he abides percipient of the repulsive in unrepulsive ideas.
 How does he abide percipient of the unrepulsive in repulsive-and-unrepulsive ideas? It is repulsive 1 to all the world 1 that 1 shaven and with bowl in hand there wanders for alms among the clans this venerable one with golden-coloured 1 unrepulsive 1 body. Therein 1 he is percipient of the unrepulsive with cognizance accompanied by dispassion.1 That is how he abides percipient of the unrepulsive in repulsive-and-unrepulsive ideas.
 How does he abide percipient of the repulsive 1 in unrepulsive-and-repulsive ideas?
In the case of ideas such as the female form that are un-repulsive 2 to one percipient of beauty therein, and in the case of ideas such as the discoloured and festering corpse-stages that are repulsive to one disgusted by them, therein this vene,able one abides percipient of the repulsive.
 How does he avoid both the repulsive and unrepulsive and abide in onlooking-equarumity mindful and aware 1 1 In the case of ideas such as the female form that are unrepulsive to one percipient of beauty therein,
That is how he avoids both and abides in onlooking- equanimity mindful and aware.
Another way.
 All foolish ordinary men have perception of the unrepulsive in life-in-a-world in the triple element 1 of existence.
Herein, the venerable Sariputta abides percipient of the repulsive.2
That is how he abides percipient of the repulsive in unrepulsive ideas.
 How does he abide percipient of the unrepulsive in repulsive ideas?
With regard to that world one who has reached the plane of Him Who Has Done 2 and has verified the fruits of concentration abides percipient of the unrepulsive.
What is the reason?
Because there is no longer any reason why he should arouse perception of the repulsive 3 for the purpose of abandoning any world since that has been completed by him.
 How does he abide percipient of the repulsive in repulsive-and-unrepulsive 1 ideas?
That is how he abides percipient of the repulsive in repulsive-and- unrepulsive 1 ideas.
 How does he abide percipient of the unrepulsive in repulsive-and-unrepulsive ideas?
Whatever there is from another of verbal modes 1 ill-spoken 1 and unwelcome , that speech is repulsive 1 to the ordinary hearer  but as to the speaker,1 with regard to such 1 speech such a person has perception of the unrepulsive.
With regard to that kind of speech the venerable Sariputta, having verified it by direct acquaintanceship, abides percipient of the unrepulsive. That is how he abides percipient of the unrepulsive in repulsive-and-unrepulsive ideas.
 How does he avoid both the repulsive and the unrepulsive 1 and abide in onlooking-equanimity mindful and aware?
Herein, the venerable Sariputta considers thus: “Ideas consisting in misconduct have unwished-for ripening ;
Then again: 1 he abides percipient of the repulsive in repulsive-and-unrepulsive ideas.
Craving is a repulsive idea. What is the reason?
It is because creatures are clung by two ideas : they are clung to physical nutriment by craving for taste, and they are clung to contact by perception of pleasure.
Herein, the venerable Sariputta abides percipient of the repulsive in physical nutriment and he abides percipient of pain in contact .
That is how he abides percipient of the repulsive in repulsive-and-unrepulsive ideas.
 How does he abide percipient of the unrepulsive in repulsive ideas? 1
Herein the venerable Sariputta has perception of unrepulsiveness 3 and perception of non-ill-will, having seen for himself 4 with understanding. That is how he abides percipient of the unrepulsive in repulsive ideas.
 How does he abide percipient of the unrepulsive in repulsive-and-unrepulsive ideas?
There are those who 1 are percipient of the repulsive in extinction and are percipient of the unrepulsive in fame and renown.2
 How does he avoid both the repulsive and the unrepulsive 1 and abide in onlooking-equanimity
+//+ 1 This is the fivefold unsurpassed Keeping of the Faculties in Being .
This is the Thread-Demonstration.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a teaching?
Herein, what is the Investigation?
When people abide contemplating the body, their cognizance does not abide with approval 1 and resistance, and when someone does not 2 delight in approval and resistance his cognizance will become even ,3 so this is the power of keeping in being. This is the Mode of Conveying an Investigation.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Construing?
Owing to keeping the body in being and owing to keeping cognizance in being he will not slight companions in the divine life 1 at all.
There is this construing. This is the Mode of Conveying a Construing.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Footings?
Herein, what are the Characteristics?
What does “as even as earth” mean?
This is the Characteristic.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Fourfold Array?
This is the purport.
Herein, what is the Conversion?
There is no plane of conversion.
Herein, what is the Analysis?
What is the reason?
Those who have their virtue tom, etc., rent, etc.,1 do not obtain cognizance as even as earth;
but all mindfulness occupied with the body ends in  extinction and the fruit of the Path in the Initiate’s keeping-in- being. This is the Analysis.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Reversal?
Those who will abide contemplating the body, for them too may arise taints and fever of distress with the body as condition . This is the Mode of Conveying a Reversal.
Herein,1 what are the Ways of Entry?
In the case of creatures 2 the five categories are made ways of entry, and the twenty-two 2 faculties likewise.
The mind faculty is the mind element and mind base ; the concentration faculty is the idea element and the idea base.
This is the Mode of Conveying Ways of Entry.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Clearing Up?
The four that should be kept in being by the mind have all been kept in being. That which can be reached 1 by the mind in abandoning has all been reached, 2 and since the instigation was for the purpose of that, 2 that purpose has been cleared up.
This is the Mode of Conveying a Clearing Up.
Herein, what are the Terms of Expression?
for the five faculties with form beginning with the eye are the form-body,
These are the Terms of Expression.
Requisite? skill in attainment and skill in steadiness 1 are the cause,
Pleasure is the cause and non-affliction the condition.3
This is the Requisite.
Herein, what is the Coordination?
As earth remains indifferent whether what is pure is thrown on it or whether what is impure is thrown on it, so the body remains indifferent to both agreeable contacts and disagreeable contacts , and so cognizance remains indifferent to resistance-contact 1 or to pleasant feeling.
This Thread is analysed with its similes 2 by an analysis for a person who gains knowledge from what is condensed.
Herein, there is no opportunity for a coordination.
Herein, what is the type of Thread dealing with corruption and dealing with morality?1
How one does not grow, 2 does not increase, in profitable ideas, this disappointment the Blessed One teaches with the words But then What is open it soddens not, 3 , so one should open out so as to be safe from that disappointment. 833. It is in virtue of three ideas that there is no rain-soddening : 1 in virtue of perception of ugliness one is not rain-soddened 2 by lust,
in virtue of lovingkindness one is not rain-soddened 2 by hate,
In this way, whatever idea is the opposite of that unprofit, in such ideas one will reach fullfilment,
Another way.
It is the ideas where emergence from transgression is not possible by oneself 1 that are taught by the phrase
“Rain soddens what is covered up”, though they have that means 2 whereby they can be emerged from. Again, in the second part of the verse it is taught how also to keep in being,3 to purify, the cognizance of one who tends, leans and inclines to seclusion from defilement so that he enters upon maturity, growth, and abundance in profitable ideas. Like a blue or a white or a red lotus in water when  the moon comes in the bright half then  through the day or through the night only its increase is to be expected, not its diminution; in suchwise is this kind of cognizance not rain-soddened.4
Another here also. An uncheating, unfraudulent, undeceitful, straight, man reveals himself as he is.
Herein, it is when someone conceals unprofitable ideas that overrun his cognizance
that “rain soddens what is covered up “. But when one who is an unfraudulent, uncheating, undeceitful, straight man reveals himself as he is,
his cognizance is not rain-soddened 1 by unprofitable ideas. This is the Thread’s meaning.
Herein, what is the Teaching?
according as was said by the Blessed One .
Herein, what is the Investigation?
Whose cognizance is thus rain-soddened,1 that would be an ordinary man’s ; 1 but one who has the straight-resulting concentration 1 would open it? up 1 for the purpose of emergence therefrom again .1 This is the Investigation.
Herein, what is the Construing?
Cognizance that is not being rain-soddened 1 thus emerges 2 from the defilement,
and being emerged, it becomes established in profitable ideas. There is this construing.
Footings? “Rain soddens what is covered up: “ the covered up is the footing for the kinds of non-restraint. “ But what is open it soddens not: “ the uncovered-up is the footing for the kinds of restraint.
“ So open out what is covered up That rain may never sodden you: “ is the footing for confession.1
Characteristics?” Rain soddens what is covered up : “ whatever ideas have a single characteristic with the covered-up cognizance are all rain-soddened.1
“But what is open it soddens not: “ whatever ideas have a single characteristic with the uncovered are all not rain-soddened. This is the Mode of Conveying Characteristics.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Fourfold Array?
What is the Blessed One’s Purport in this Thread?
Those who have confessed 1 unprofitable ideas in their cognizance will make amends according to the True Idea. This is the Blessed One’s purport herein.
This is the Fourfold Array.
Conversion? What is covered up is of two kinds : it is that in the case of the negligent 1 i.e. ordinary men and of those incapable 1 of concealment 1 through their having
the straight- resulting concentration 1 i.e. Initiates .
Herein, when there is lack of faith 2 conceit increases taints. And through lack of faith one comes to negligence. Through negligence one despises and comes to pride.
And this is said by the Blessed One . Now these are the four assumings and the four assumings are the five categories of assuming :
These are the truths of Suffering and Origin.
That is why one should “open what is covered up “. of the 3 cause by which the taints increase
with the abandoning the taints are abandoned.
Herein, lack of faith is abandoned through diligence, and pride 4 through the abandoning of agitation-and- worry. In him two ideas, namely quiet and insight, come 6 to fulfilment: this is the Path.
The exhaustion of those taints is Cessation.
These are the four Truths. This is the Conversion.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying an Analysis?
“ Rain soddens what is covered up” is not unilaterally always so.1
What is the reason?
Although his 4 i.e. the Initiate’s cognizance may be affected by hindrances through these evil acts,
yet that can be demonstrated as not a condition for rain-soddening in his case.4 This is the Mode of Conveying an Analysis.
Herein, the Reversal?
This is the Mode of Conveying a Reversal.
Herein, what are the Synonyms?
The “ covered up “ is the shut in, shut off, sealed off, closed off, covered over, buried away .1 “ But what is open it soddens not : “ he who has abandoned these ideas has removed them, 2 not endured them, made an end of them. This is the Mode of Conveying Synonyms.
Herein, what are the Descriptions?
“Rain soddens what is covered up “ is described in terms of what deals with corruption. “ But what is open it soddens not” is any function connected with the True Idea described by a description in ter1ns of the way.1 “ So open out what is covered up “ is described by a description in terms of instruction. “ That rain may never sodden you “ 2 is described by a description in terms of source .3 This is the Mode of Conveying Descriptions.
“ Rain soddens what is covered up : “ There are three defilements, namely lust, hate, and delusion. In the case of the categories these are the deter1ninations category, … etc…. ; these are as demonstrated earlier in the cases of the categories, elements, and bases. This is the Mode of Conveying Ways of Entry.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Clearing Up?
The instigation with which this Thread was uttered has been completed.
Terms of Expression 1 “Rain soddens what is covered up” is described by a unity.
What is the reason?
Herein, what are the Requisites?
These are the two causes ; and unreasoned attention, and relinquishment 8 of profitable ideas, these are the two conditions.
 How does he 1 abide percipient of the unrepulsive in repulsive ideas?
and in the case of ideas such as the discoloured and festering corpse-stages that are repulsive to one disgusted by them, avoiding both these, he abides seeing them thus: .
All Initiates are percipient of here-where ? 1- in the triple element, in all the world.
In the case of life-in-a-world in the triple element there is that constancy of repulsion which 2 Non-Returners without lust for the plane of the sensual-desire world 2 have towards that world, and constancy of unrepulsion they have towards the form-element and formless element:
and as to that the venerable Sariputta abides percipient of the repulsive.
When someone does not see ideas consisting in misconduct as such,2 those are unrepulsive 2 to him.
ideas consisting in good conduct lead to amassing,”
but after taking good conduct to lead to dispersal 3 and by taking misconduct to have unwished-for ripening, avoiding both these, he abides in onlooking-equanimity.
Exhaustion of craving is the unsurpassed extinction: therein 2 foolish ordinary men have perception of repulsiveness and perception of being killed.
The venerable Sariputta, who understands 3 with right understanding of how the gratification, the disappointment, and the escape come to be, herein abides *//* 4 percipient of the unrepulsive.
mindful and aware? According as he sees it, approval is an unrepulsive idea, +/ 2 and according as he sees it, /+ 2 resistance is a repulsive idea ; herein the venerable Sariputta, owing to his abandoning of approval and resistance,3 */ 4 avoiding both the repulsive and the unrepulsive, /* 4 abides in onlooking-equanimity mindful and aware.
What is taught 1 in this Thread?
Herein, it can be stated that a pleasant abiding here and now is taught, likewise liberated cognizance and reviewing, and the idea of the higher understanding 2 is taught.
Cognizance’s being as even as earth 3 is the footing for the contemplation of impermanence.
Keeping the body in being 1 is the footing for the first Foundation of Mindfulness.2
In that he abides with cognizance as even as earth, he abides also 1 contemplating himself as even as earth.
Like those unassociated with shuddering 2 owing to resemblance to a rock, so, too, this venerable one is as even as earth owing to ashamedness of this body.8
What is the venerable one’s Purport in this prose-exposition?
It is that all Arahants who wish for the keeping of the Faculties in Being will arouse earth evenness.
That he who abides contemplating the body will obtain cognizance as even as earth is unilaterally always so.
This concentration is described by a unity. The six bodies are described by a unity;
the six bodies of feeling are the feeling-body,
the six bodies of perception are the perception-body,
the six bodies of choice are the choice-body,
and the six bodies of consciousness are the consciousness-body;
and all these are the “idea-body” as it is called.
and skill in resort and skill in health are the condition ;
skill in emerging 2 is the cause and the health the condition.
in virtue of insight one is not rain-soddened 2 by delusion.
and any unprofitable idea which is the opposite of that idea, by that one will not be rain-soddened.2
Here the ten unprofitable courses of action are taught in rain-soddening 1 and the ten profitable courses of action in non-rain-soddening. 2 For one is not purified by unprofitable ideas,
Someone may have stopped,2 as in the Initiates’ case,
according as is said by the Blessed One :
(Although the Initiate can still do evil By body or by speech or by the mind,
Yet he can never hide it, and this fact Is of one who has seen the State of Peace .8
“ Rain soddens what is covered up : “ when someone has any such  ideas, all that are not opened up 1 are rain-soddened. “ But what is open it soddens not : “ rain does not sodden what is uncovered.2
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Ways of Entry?
Since this diversity,1 namely that rain soddens, and for him it rain-soddens and thus it rain-soddens, is described by characteristics that are qualities 2 shared in common, the description is in terns of a unity.
There are two causes and two conditions 1 for its being rain-soddened : concern with what is unprofitable, and delight in having oneself well  spoken of.2
Herein, what is the Coordination?
“ Rain soddens what is covered up:” he sees indecision in whether not to accept that not to confess the covered-up is of no concern.1 Now with the unprofitable root delusion thus unevident, owing to wondering, 2 and with craving, these defects 3 increase. So interpreting it thus, these are determinations consisting in determinative-acts.5
With determinations as condition, consciousness ; … down to … ageing-and-death. This is the coordination.
And 6 again, while with the teaching thus in the form of Arising his unprofitable ideas attain maturity, growth, and abundance, nevertheless with Cessation of his determinations … This is the Coordination.6
 Four types of persons: the dark with a dark supreme value, … ) . 853. The Thread’s Meaning. Herein, what is “ dark “?
“ Dark “ is gloom, as stated by the Blessed One , so too, as to unknowing there is dark as gloom; there one has no faith about evil with its action and its ripening ) .
So it is any thus-characterized unknowing, dark, ignorance, delusion, whereby creatures 1 do not understand 1 how it is. So it is called “dark”.
And that is dark for the three eyes, namely for the fleshly eye, for the heavenly eye, and for the eye of understanding: for these three eyes. Here dark is demonstrated as unknowing.
Herein, what is unknowing? It is unseeing
in the eight 1 instances, namely unknowing about the four Noble Truths, unknowing about past finiteness, unknowing about future finiteness, unknowing about past-and-future finiwness, unknowing about specific conditionality in the forms of unknowing about cause and unknowing about condition.1
just as he is called “ deluded “, so this .3
 */ Herein what is the “ dark with a bright supreme value “?
*//* 1 He comports himself in that kind of understanding. When he comports himself thus, he has that for his supreme value.”5
This type of person is called “ dark with a bright supreme value “. 6.
Herein, how does that type of person have a “ bright supreme value”?1
Herein, the light of knowledge that is inseparable from the idea of one willing to hear 2 about an idea that is a guide-line of the opposite kind to that same dark 3 is what is called “ bright “. This 3 is the type of person that is “ dark with a bright supreme value “ . 857. Herein, it may be stated as follows : This 1 type of person, who is “ dark with a bright supreme value “, if he obtains a good friend such as will keep him from unprofit and encourage him in only keeping what is profitable in being,2
“ These ideas are profitable, these ideas are unprofitable ;
these ideas should be entered upon and abode in, these ideas should not be entered upon and abode in ;
these ideas should be given attention, these ideas should not be given attention.”
He is willing to hear those ideas,1 he gives ear, prepares his cognizance for knowledge, and he likes pondering 2 those ideas. Being possessed of understanding-consisting-in-what is heard, he 3 comports himself with that 3 kind of understanding. When he comports himself thus 3 he comes to have that as the ultimate, to have that for supreme value .
This is called the “dark person with a bright supreme value “.4
 Herein, what is the “ bright person with a dark supreme value “?
The light of knowledge that is inseparable from the idea of one willing to hear 1 about an idea that is a guide-line of the opposite kind to that same dark 2 is what is called “ bright “.
In regard to understanding, he is called” wise” : he understands thus : “
But here he cultivates evil friends, obeys the power of evil friends, he increases unprofitable ideas and abandons profitable ideas.
Owing to this negligence, giving no attention to perception of conditions, he cultivates unmindfulness and unawareness.
He increases the dark, which is the opposite of that same light;
This is called the type of person that is “bright with a dark supreme value”.
 Herein, what is the” bright person with a bright supreme value “?
Herein, it may be stated as follows : This 1 type of person, with a good friend for his support, is one who is an able 2 seeker after what is profitable.2 Approaching good friends, he asks, he questions 3 thus : “
How is there a tether i.e. bond of responsibility for action? How is there liberation?
How is there an origin to embodiment? How is there a cessation to embodiment?
“, and it being taught how it appears established here, when he practises rightly accordingly, he understands thus: “
These ideas are profitable, these ideas are unprofitable ; …
and so on down to … how there is an origin to embodiment ; how there is a cessation to embodiment” to be given in detail.
He rightly practises 6 those ideas, and thus he increases vision , 1 knowledge, science, light.
That type of person comes to have that as the ultimate, that as supreme value. This is called the “ bright person with a bright supreme value “.
 Herein, what is the “dark person with a dark supreme value “?
He is one who illustrates the unprofitable idea,
who, owing to keeping that in being, shows reappearance in inferior destinations. He comes to have that as the ultimate, that as supreme value.
This is called the “ dark person with a dark supreme value “.
 Herein, the “ dark person with a bright supreme value “?
By the dark he shows the ripening of unprofitable action,
Herein, since he shows reappearance in the superior destinations, having that as the ultimate, he is therefore said to have a “ bright supreme value “.
 Herein, the “bright person with a dark supreme value”
Yet 1 by association with bad friends, by waiting on bad friends, hy obeying the power of bad friends, he increases the unprofitable idea. Owing to the keeping of that in being he shows reappearance in inferior destinations,
he comes to have that as the ultimate, hence he is called” bright with a dark supreme value “.
 Herein, the “ bright person with a bright supreme value “? Owing to brightenedness he shows reappearance in superior destinations, he comes to have that as the ultimate,
hence they say that he is “ bright with a bright supreme value “.
By the “dark” he shows the eight wrongnesses,
By the “ bright with a dark supreme value “ he shows the ten unprofitable courses of action ;
This is the Thread-Meaning.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Teaching?
Herein it may be stated that in this Thread profitable and unprofitable ideas are taught
This is the Mode of Conveying a Teaching.
- Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying an investigation?
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Footings?
By the “bright” type of person he shows the footing for reviewing,
By the “dark with a bright supreme value “ he shows the footing for diligence. By the “dark” he shows the footing for ignorance and for wrong view.
By the “ bright with a dark supreme value “ he shows the footing for negligence and wrong view.
These are the Footings.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Characteristics?
With the “dark with a dark supreme value”, when cognizance is demonstrated as “ dark “ all defiling ideas are demonstrated.
With the “bright 1 with a bright supreme value”, when science is demonstrated all ideas siding with enlightenment are demonstrated.
By the “ bright with a dark supreme value “, negligence is demonstrated.
By the “ dark with a bright supreme value “, diligence is demonstrated.
This is the Mode of Conveying Characteristics.
What is the Blessed One’s Purport in this Thread?
It is this: even 1 those creatures that belong to low-born clans, on hearing this will undertake and carry out profitable ideas,
This is the Mode of Conveying a Fourfold Array.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Conversion?
The craving given existence 1 by ignorance is the Origin of Suffering.
The “ dark with a dark supreme value “ is Suffering.
These are two Truths, namely Suffering and Origin. Whatever Thread-idea the “ bright “ is described by, that idea is the footing for the understanding faculty.
By means of such non-delusion the three profitable roots come to fulfilment, which is the footing for heaven.
“ Dark with a dark supreme value” is not unilaterally always so.
What is the reason?
There is the “dark” kind, and yet its existence is in a state with future reappearance 1 as the “bright” type of person owing to profitable action to be felt in some future period ;
and there is the “bright” kind, and yet its existence is in a state with future rearising as the “dark” type of person owing to unprofitable action to be felt in some future period . 871. Reversal? In the case of the “ dark “ types, the opposite is the “ bright” types .1
Herein, what are the Synonyms?
He who is “ dark “ is thus practising for his own aflliction through lack of faith, is a fool, unskilled in profit, unexpert, uncontemplating of disappointment.
He who is “ bright “ is practising for his own welfare, is wise, skilled in profit, expert, and a contemplator of disappointment.
These are the Synonyms.
Herein, what are the Descriptions?
This ” dark” person is described by a description in terms of ripening ; he is described by a description in terms of the state of being gripped in the unprofitable.
The “ bright “ type is described by a description in terms of reappearance due to profitable ideas 1 and by a description in terms of ripening of profitable ideas.1
Ways of Entry? With ignorance as condition, determinations; … down to … ageing-and-death; and ignorance is the footing by demonstration. With the arising of science, … down to … cessation of ageing-and-death : 1 this is the way of entry by dependent arising. And these two ideas are included in the determinations category.
The idea element and the idea base are the footing, by demonstration, in the case of the elements, etc..
Herein, what is the Clearing Up?
It is the instigation of this Thread as taught.
Terms of Expression? When the Blessed One spoke of the” dark” type for instance he does not teach a single type of person;
but rather in so far as creatures have destiriation he demonstrates as “ dark “ in the plural those who have reappeared there through an action consisting in misconduct.
“ Bright “ is reappearance due to profitable actions in the case of all creatures, and all that is what he refers 1 to as “ bright “. With this unity 2 as condition this is a description in terms of reasoned attention of the four persons as principal entity-types.
Herein, what are the Requisites?
For unprofit having evil friends is the condition 1 and unreasoned attention the cause ;
Herein, what is the Coordination?
Here someone is born again 1 in a low-born clan. Being born again 1 in a low-born clan, he has reappeared among inferior unprofitable 2 forms, sounds, odours, flavours, and tangibles, and all human use of possessions.
The “ bright “ type has reappeared among superior profitable kinds and all human use of possessions.
Herein, what is the type of Thread dealing with corruption and dealing with penetration?
An example is the verse: .
For what reason is that bond not 1 strong?
For four reasons: One can get free from it by one’s own lordly position, or by riches, or else through another by petitioning, or by legal procedure.2
But as to the bond consisting in “lusting for jewels and gems And concern for a wife and for children as well “ , they are a mental bond for one,
from which one cannot get free by one’s own lordly position or by riches or else through another by petitioning or by legal procedure,2
divine or human, to whom one could say “Get me free 4 from the bond with this “. 881. By means of the underlying tendency to lust, this bond binds one to the six external bases :
He who is bound here in the world of this life is guided 2 to the next world bound,
He can never get free except by way of the Noble Path. For it is through finding this bond 3
and the state of dying and the state of reappearing to be fearful that he comes to abandon will and lust.
By abandoning will and lust he surmounts
Herein, the abandoning of determinations that are due to bondage is elsewhere stated thus 1 … With chattels a Stilled One remains unbesmirched) ,1
since in regard to chattels consisting in children and wives he ; 2 and one such as this shows the abandoning of that same craving
with the abandoning of the craving’s root.3 883. He does so ; 1 for it is owing to negligence that sensual desire occurs. He who delights in the renunciation due to their abandoning is one who abides diligent.
And it is with his abandoning of hope 2 from these that he hopes neither for this world nor for a next world.3
He does not wish for anything endearing and gratifying that has this world for its support,4
nor does he wish for anything endearing and gratifying that has another world for its support.4 Hence it is said that .
His abandoning is the “ severance “ . 884. Now the “ Stilled One” thus demonstrated in the Chapter of Octets 
is the “ steadfast” one here ; 1 and the “non-hoping “ demonstrated in the Chapter of Octets is the “unconcern “ here .
So, since 1 all these sensual desires have been taught in the first verse alone with craving for the chattel as an objective sensual desire,
So in the case of all verses and prose- expositions . The Thread has been demonstrated.
Herein, what is the Teaching?
With what purport is this Thread taught?
Those creatures that are of lusting temperament will abandon sensual desires: this is the Blessed One’s purport.1
He who had the ten- grounded 1 defilements has outstripped 2 them, rejected them, put them away.8
How 8 are these 8 sensual desires as defilement tenfold? As hither-side and further-side fetters and as the ten-grounded bases eye-cum-forms, … body-cum-tangibles . This is the Investigation.
Herein, what is the Construing?
Those who lust are bound 1 by the strong bond. This is the construing.
Herein, what are the Footings?
That someone “lusts after jewels and gems ,,.is the footing for my-making.
“Concern” is the footing for lust for past things.
“ But that too they sever “ is the footing for keeping in being.
Herein, what are the Characteristics?
One whose cognizance lusts after jewels and gems is attached in regard to I-making, attached in regard to my-making, and also he who lusts after children and wives,
This is the Mode of Conveying Characteristics.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Fourfold Array?
What is the Blessed One’s Purport here ?
It is that those who have the will for extinction will abandon craving for children and wives.
This is the Blessed One’s purport.
*//* 1 892. Herein, what is the Conversion?
Craving for children and wives is Origin.
As to categories assumed, these are simply 1 the form-chattels in external forms ; this is Suffering. The severance of craving 2 is Cessation.
That whereby it is severed 3 is the Path.
Analysis? There is no plane of analysis. 894. Reversal? The opposite has already been demonstrated. in the two parts of the verse.
Herein, what are the Synonyms?
The synonyms have already been demonstrated..
1 Herein, what are the Ways of Entry?
Where 2 there is craving, there determinations 2 are made the way of entry.2 With that as condition, consciousness ; … down to … ageing-and-death.
What is not found 2 is ignorance: with the arising of science, cessation of ignorance ; … down to … ageing-and-death.
Herein, what is the Clearing Up?
The verse’s instigation has already been cleared up.
Herein, what are the Terms of Expression?.
“The steadfast will never call that a strong bond” is described by a unity, not by a diversity.
There are four kinds of lust, namely lust for sensual desires, lust for form, lust for being, and lust for views, which are described by a unity.
Herein, what are the Requisites?
When people have “ lust for jewels and gems “ the cause of that is perception of beauty, and apprehending of the sign of beauty through personal features 1 is its condition.
Perception of ugliness is the cause whereby they are severed, and removal of apprehension of signs is the condition.
Herein, what is the Coordination?
Those “lusting after jewels and gems “ are confused and affected by hate 1 as well. “But that too they sever and wander in freedom” : that is abandoned 2 because of its having being diagnosed and because of its having being avoided. 2 This is the Coordination.
When someone is possessed 2 of this unknowing, the outcome is this : that he does not know “ This should be cultivated, … for filling out see § 857) … this should not be given attention “.
It is by that kind of dark that he is demonstrated as “ dark “ ;
Now the dark by which that type of person is called
“ dark “ is the dark by which, when uneradicated, when unsevered, he comes to have that for the ultimate, has that for his supreme value, which is why this type of person is called “ dark with a dark supreme value “ .
/* 1 The True Idea is the only supreme value 2 to be given attention . Hearing it he gives ear,3 prepares his cognizance for knowledge.
And he likes pondering those ideas.
He sees with understanding-consisting-in-what-is-heard.
and teach him the true object of faith thus :
these ideas are blameworthy, these ideas are blameless ;
these ideas are to be cultivated, these ideas are not to be cultivated ;
these ideas are to be kept in being,3 these ideas are not to be kept in being ; 3
these ideas should be entered upon and abode in, these ideas should not be entered upon and abode in;
these ideas should be given attention, these ideas should not be given attention”;
and when the mindfulness faculty 4 ripens with perception according as this this is perceived to be so, then he understands thus : “
These ideas are profitable, these ideas are unprofitable ;
these ideas are blameworthy, these ideas are blameless ;
these ideas are to be cultivated, these ideas are not to be cultivated ;
these ideas are to be kept in being, these ideas are not to be kept in being ;
What is he called?
These ideas are profitable, these ideas are unprofitable ;
these ideas are blameworthy, these ideas are blameless ;
these ideas are to be cultivated, these ideas are not to be cultivated ;
these ideas are to be kept in being, these ideas are not to be kept in being ;
these ideas should be entered upon and abode in, these ideas should not be entered upon and abode in ;
these ideas should be given attention, these ideas should not be given attention.”
overcome by dark, he has a dark supreme value, has dark as the ultimate.
How is there occurrence? How is there arising?
What is profitable? What is unprofitable?
What is blameworthy? What is blameless?
What is to be cultivated? What is not to be cultivated?
What is to be kept in being? What is not to be kept in being?
What should be entered upon and abode in? What should not be entered upon and abode in?
What should be given attention? What should not be given attention?
How is there corruption? How is there cleansing?
yet he 1 may have a good friend through whom he abandons unprofitable ideas and increases profitable ideas.
shows the ripening of profitable action.
 By 1 the “dark” person he shows the ripening of unprofitable kinds of action ;
by the “ bright “ 2 one he shows the ripening of profitable action.2
by the “ bright “ he shows the eight rightnesses.
by the “ bright with a bright supreme value “ 3 he shows superiority ;
by the “ dark with a bright supreme value “ he shows the idea not to be mortified ;
by the “ dark 4 with a dark supreme value “ he shows the idea to be mortified.
What is taught in this Thread?
and the ripening of profitable and unprofitable ideas is taught,
and the occasion for the difference in the destinations 1 of inferior and superior creatures is taught.
He who exists coessentially with the ripening of unprofitable action
is steadied therein through having assumed unprofitable ideas : such investigation is construable.1
He who exists coessentially with the ripening of profitable action
is steadied therein through having assumed unprofitable ideas: such investigation is construable.1
This is the Investigation and the Construing.
while by the “ dark “ type of person he shows the footing for non- contemplation of disappointment in dark.1
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Fourfold Array?
and those creatures that belong to high-born clans, on hearing this teaching of the True Idea, will so much the more undertake and carry out profitable ideas.
Herein, what is the Analysis?
for profit having good friends is the condition 2 and reasoned attention the cause.
and there is no agent,3
craving for forms binds one to forms, … down to 1 … craving for ideas to ideas.
is born bound, dies bound,
and goes from this world to the next bound.
both this world and the other world that is its double.3
hence the Blessed One teaches in the verse that follows .2
The demonstration of this 1 verse has been twofold : as demonstration by collation fwith another verse and demonstration by occasion . Just as this verse as an answer to the question asked in the Sarpyutta is the type of Thread dealing with corruption and dealing with penetration, so too the answer to the question asked in that verse in the Chapter of Octets is the type of Thread dealing with corruption and dealing with penetration.
Herein, what is the Investigation?
who lusts after fields and lands.
*/ These are the four Truths /*.4
 1 indetail 1 in the three paragraphs. 902. As to “ what is chosen “, this is a condition 1 for bodily and verbal action.
What is the reason?
It is because what is chosen is choice, and that is called “mind-action”. That choice as action is the mental kind, and that and the bodily and verbal kinds are the three kinds of action demonstrated.
Now though the bodily action and the verbal action that one instigates may in themselves be profitable, when one misapprehends them this is what is called “ misapprehension of virtue and duty”.
“Asserting” 1 is the threefold determinations, namely those consisting in merit, those consisting in demerit, and those consisting in imperturbability . With those as condition, consciousness: thus these are an “object whereby consciousness has a steadying-point “ .
“Any perception of beauty, perception of permanence, perception of pleasure, and perception of self,
is what is chosen.”1
That consciousness passing on 1 by means of form is steadied with form as its object, with form as its standing-point , comes to growth, increase, and abundance through its being infected with relishing : this is “ asserting “.2 907. When thus steadied in the steadying-points for consciousness, the first generating of consciousness is an assuming by way of an object ; that is what is called “ chosen “.1
Then any attachment, cleaving to, on the part of the formless steadied thereon is what is called” asserted “.1 909. Concern for agreeable forms that are agreeable and pleasing is “what is chosen “.1
For  among the wished-for 2 and agreeable is the Body-Tie of covetousness,3 and among those provocative 4 of resistance it is the Body-Tie of ill will, … and so all four Body-Ties. 910. This is cognizance’s first instance in the five strands of sensual desires. When someone is a contemplator of gratification therein in those sensual desires then owing to that choice of his 1 many evil unprofitable ideas have parallel occurrence 2 with his cognizance.
For when a person is bound by lust through sensual desire as defilement 3 he can be done with as Mara desires . This is the “asserting” in the case of the Flood of Sensual Desires,
and so with all four Floods.
In so far as he abides associated with these sensual desires, with them kept in being ,1 cleaved to them, this is “choice”.
In so far likewise as,1 when someone is not without lust, has a propensity for loving, when any change and alteration arise for him, then with the sorrow and lamentation, pain, grief, and despair consequent thereon in him, that consciousness of his has parallel occurrence with pain 2 as the thought-arising that what is remembered is inseparable from the idea of its subsidence grips his cognizance ; this is called “ asserting”.
He “ chooses “ and “ asserts “ for each single 1 steadying-point for consciousness, and that steadying-point is twofold, namely steadying-point-as-object and steadying-point-as-nutriment.
Herein, the steadying-point-as-object is a condition for name-and-form;
and for the steadying-point-as-nutriment 2 and for any steadying-point for that generated renewal of being and for any steadying-point as renewal of being.2 Hence 3 it is said that in the Thread (That becomes the object
whereby consciousness has a steadying-point ) .3 With that consciousness as condition, name-and- form ; … down to … ageing-and-death. 914. Again, he does not 1 choose and does not assert 1 in order that that steadying-point may not give renewal of being in a future physical basis : this opposite is demonstrated as follows in the Thread:
 1 , the demonstration here being the second.1
What he had formerly “chosen “ 1 and had “asserted “ is still uneradicated, and with that as condition there is still this steadying-point for consciousness.
Or else his underlying tendencies reveal themselves, and with that as condition renewal of being is generated for him.
Or else 1 he does not bother to assert any preference for houses with a refined living-standard . Since he does not bother to assert it, he is thus re-born in houses of low standard .
That guides him to assert preference. Any such determinations chosen and asserted are objects, both the choice and the assertion for the purpose of generating a physical basis being an object for consciousness.1 917. As 1 by choice and by assertion 1 aspiring creatures “ that already are” choose 1 and assert,1
not so those “that yet seek to be” 1 , who neither choose nor assert.
What are the “creatures that already are”?
They are those actually born, and the egg-born 2 already broken out of the egg, and the moisture-born, all so long as they have not yet reached dissolution of the body ; it is these that “ already are “
What are those “that yet seek to be”? They are those traversing the roundabout while still in the womb or in the egg ; it is these latter that “ neither choose nor assert “ :
Those “that already are “ are “ frail “,4 while those “ that yet seek to be “ are “ firm “ .
It is the” frail” that choose 5 and assert, 5
Another way:
Another way:
there are subtle breathing things 1 in the soil and in water that do not come within the eye’s horizon ; 2 and they neither choose nor assert,3 yet they pursue the roundabout owing to underlying tendency.3
Another way:
all outsider mendicants 1 are over- estimators . They neither choose nor assert, 2 and yet they pursue the roundabout owing to underlying tendency.2 921. (If one no more chooses, and no more asserts and no more lets tendencies underlie,1
then there is no 2 object whereby consciousness might have a steadying- point) .
With the words “He no more chooses” he shows eradication of obsession,3
With “ he no more chooses “ he shows abandoning of gross defilements,
With “ he no more chooses” he shows the plane of seeing , 4 with “he no more asserts” 5 he shows the Once-Returner and the Non-Returner, and with “he no more lets tendencies underlie “ the arahant. With “ he no more chooses “ he shows abandoning by means of the Virtue Category’s opposition, with “he no more asserts” 6 he shows abandoning by means of the Concentration Category’s opposition, and with “ he no more lets tendencies underlie” he shows abandoning by means of the Understanding Category’s opposition. With “ he no more chooses “ he shows abandoning of determinations consisting in demerit, with “ he no more asserts “ 6 he shows abandoning of determinations consisting in merit, and with “ he no more lets tendencies underlie “ he shows abandoning of determinations consisting in imperturbability. “He no more chooses” is the I-shall-come-to-know-finally-the- as-yet-not-finally-known faculty, “he no more asserts “ 6 is the final-knowledge faculty, and “ he no more lets tendencies underlie “ is the final-knower faculty.
“ He no more chooses “ is a blunt 7 Keeping of Faculties in Being , “he no more asserts” 6 is a medium Keeping of Faculties in Being, and “ he no more lets tendencies underlie “ is an outstanding Keeping of Faculties in Being.
This is the Thread-meaning.
Herein, what is the Teaching?
Here the four Truths are taught in the Thread.
- “ What is chosen and what is asserted “ : There is, still that object Whereby cognizance finds 1 a standing-point: such investigation 2 is construable.
 “ He does not choose and does not assert “ : 3 there is still that object in the underlying tendency whereby consciousness has 4 a standing-point : such investigation 2 is construable. “He no more chooses and no more asserts “ : 3
with the abandoning of underlying tendencies he does not seek 5 any steadying-point 6 for consciousness: such investigation is construable.
This is the Investigation and the Construing.
Herein, what are the Footings?
The previous obsession of choice is the footing for the subsequent obsession of choice.
The asserting 1 is the footing for assuming.
The underlying tendency is the footing for obsession.
The keeping in being of destruction of will and lust for these is the footing for the abandoning of lust for being.
Herein, what are the Characteristics?
“What is chosen” 1 is what is felt , “ what is asserted” is what is taken up, cognized,2 the consciousness of that, also the object, also the condition.
Herein, what is the Fourfold Array?
Here in the Thread what is the Blessed One’s Purport?
It is that those who do not wish for renewal of being will not choose and will not assert. 1 This is the purport.
Conversion? The choosing, the asserting,1 and the underlying tendency on the one hand, and the abandoning of the steadying-points for consciousness 2 on the other are two Truths, respectively Origin and Path.
Analysis? There is no plane of Analysis.
Reversal, however, is the Thread with the opposition contained in its three paragraphs.
Herein, what are the Synonyms?
The Choice is mind- choice of forms down to 1 mind-choice of ideas .
“ Underlying tendency” is the seven underlying tendencies .
Descriptions? “ Choice” I is described by a description in terms of obsession.1
“Steadying-point for consciousness “ is described by a description in terms of cause-of-rearising.3
The severance 4 of the choice and assertion and underlying tendency is described by a description in terms of the outguiding of will and lust.
With the first 6 two paragraphs 6 of the three in this Thread dependent origination and specific conditionality are described respectively; by the last one, stopping.7
Ways of Entry? With the first two paragraphs there are Suffering and Origin.1 With the last one,2 the Path and Cessation.
Clearing Up? The Thread’s instigation is cleared up 1 already.
Terms of Expression? As expression , “what is chosen “ is all described by a unity.
As assuming, “ what is asserted “ 1 is described by a unity.
“Consciousness “ is described by a unity.
Requisites? A beautiful 1 object and unreasoned attention given to it are a condition by cause-conditionality for the choice.2
Herein, what is the Coordination?
This Thread deals with what is perceived .1 Herein, “he chooses..can be demonstrated as cognizing.2
Then owing to its having a steadying-point,3 with consciousness as condition, name-and-form; … down to … ageing-and-death. This is the coordination.
As to” there is no object whereby consciousness might have a steadying-point “ it can be demonstrated thus : With cessation of consciousness, cessation of name-and-form; … down to … cessation of ageing-and-death.
The words  1
deal with corruption. The words <It is by depending on the essentials of existence that this suffering has actual being … down to 1 … His craving for being comes to be abandoned, And he no more expectantly relishes non-being ) deal with penetration.1 The words (That bhikkhu being quenched, through not assuming, no more his being comes to be renewed…
down to … one such as this outstrips all kinds of being) deal with the Adept.
Herein, “ born to anguish “ : the anguish is that it is born to lust, born to hate, and born to delusion,
and thus with the words “ the world is born to anguish “ he shows how these creatures stand.
The “ contact “ is threefold, namely to be felt as pleasure, to be felt as pain, and to be felt as neither-pain-nor- pleasure.
Herein, contact to be felt as pleasure brings the anguish of lust, that to be felt as pain brings the anguish of hate, and that to be felt as neither-pain-nor-pleasure brings the anguish of delusion.
And according as the Blessed One said to Hatthaka Alavaka 1 in the Anguttara 2 .
“It is sickness that it calls self” 1 : he who is anguished by these kinds of anguish obtains the threefold perversion, namely perversion of perception, perversion of cognizance, and perversion of view.
Herein, perversion of perception is that there is beauty in the ugly,
perversion of cognizance is that there is pleasure in the painful, and
Similarly, the perversion of cognizance and those of perception and view, these are the threefold logical  thinking: thinking based on the affective state of cognizance is a perversion, thinking based on perception is a perversion, and thinking based on view is a perversion, too.
Herein, the plane for the perversions’ province of predominance is ignorance; 1 for according as ignorance  perceives it, according as it cognizes, according as it perceives and cognizes,
Thus the words “it is sickness that it calls self” are a conversion to the opposite;
“Maintaining its being otherwise than it conceives:” ‘ while being, it aspires to future being; hence it is said here that it “ clings to being “.5
“ Expectantly relishes only being, but what it relishes brings fear : “ 1 by this he demonstrates 2 the five categories ;
Up to this point corruption.
“Now this divine life is lived in order to abandon being “ :
while “ it is by depending on 1 the essentials of existence that this suffering has actual being” , since that pain will be kept in being for anyone who relishes being, he stated the abandoning of that pain thus “
Of that the first perversion is sensual-desire assumption, the second is view-assumption, while the third is virtue-and-duty assumption and self-theory assumption. Their exhaustion is pain’s having no more actual being, and with this he states the cessation of pain that has the essentials of existence for its source.3
“So when a man thus sees with right understanding how this is, his … “ : he has no craving for being.4
By “ He no more expectantly relishes non-being “ he alludes to the plane of seeing. By “ That is the utter exhaustion 6 … extinction “ he explains two deliverances : fading of lust and fading of ignorance.
By “That bhikkhu … no more his … “ he alludes to the extinction element without trace left.
This is the demonstration of the Thread’s meaning.
- Herein,1 what is the Investigation?
When someone has a fever 2 then while he is feverish he has no seeing 3 how it is and finds no dispassion. This is the Investigation and the Construing.
Footings 1 lust-born 1 fever is the footing for the pleasure faculty and for the joy 2 faculty,
hate-born fever is the footing for the pain 8 faculty and for the grief faculty,
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Characteristics?
“Subject to painful contact” implies also subject to feeling and subject to perception and subject to determinations. “For however it conceives it” : 1 whether by the sign of beauty, or by the sign of pleasure, or by the sign of permanence, or by the sign of self, it conceives that there is beauty in the ugly, and all the rest. 2 When lust-born fever 3 is stated all the four fevers are stated,
namely the lust-born, the hate-born, the delusion-born, and the view-born. “ It is sickness that it calls self” :4
it calls all the fifty terms - impermanent, painful, and so on - self.5
Herein, what is the Fourfold Array?
What is the Blessed One’s Purport in the Thread here?
Those who do not 1 remain 1 with fever do not expectantly relish being ; 1
This is the Purport.
and yet their renewal of being is generated by underlying tendency.3
while the “firm” neither choose 6 nor assert; and yet they still pursue the roundabout owing to underlying tendency.6
there are the Noble Persons who are Initiates. Herein, they neither choose nor assert,1 yet they appear again owing to underlying tendency .1
and with “he no more lets tendencies underlie” he shows eradication of underlying tendencies.
and with “ he no more lets tendencies underlie “ he shows abandoning of subtle defilements.
“Asserting” 2 is described 2 by a description in terms of assuming.
“Underlying tendency” is described by a description in terms of cause.
For consciousness the idea that is its steadying-point is a condition by object-conditionality,
while attention is a condition for it by cause-conditionality.
Herein, what is the type of Thread dealing with corruption, dealing with penetration, and dealing with the Adept?
perversion of view is that there is permanence in the impermanent and that there is self in the not-self.
and according as liking 2 chooses, these four as the three perversions whereby creatures call “ self” the fourfold ground for selfhood that is in fact a sickness and a boil.
for” however it conceives it ‘Tis ever otherwise than that” , it conceives that there is beauty, which is not so,3 and likewise pleasure, permanence, and self.
for sorrow, lamentation and pain with that fear as condition will be kept in being 3 for him.
The outguiding of will and lust is the abandoning of the three kinds of being.
With the exhaustion 2 of all kinds of assumption suffering has no actual being “ : what he calls “ assumption “ as demonstrated here is the four perversions.
delusion-born fever is the footing for the onlooking-equanimity faculty and for the grief faculty.
those who do not expectantly relish being 1 will attain extinction.
Herein, what is the Conversion?
With the section) dealing with corruption he demonstrates Suffering and Origin.
With that dealing with penetration, the Path and Cessation .
Herein, what is the Analysis?
“ Born to anguish “, born to sickness, “ it is sickness that it ca~ 1 self” : that is not uni1aterally always so ; for there may be one who is born to anguish through inattention yet he does not call the sickness self.2
It is with the reversal of plane 1 for the purpose of showing the proposition and its opposite.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Synonyms?
“It is sickness that it calls self” : it is a barb that it calls self, …
Herein, what are the Descriptions?
“Born to anguish” is the footing for grief ;
“ It is sickness that it calls self” : he describes the perversions 2 by a description in terms of defilement.
Herein, what are the Ways of Entry?
“ Born to anguish “ is the three unprofitable roots. They, being determinations, are included in the determinations category; in the case of the elements, the idea element ; in the case of the bases, the idea base ;
in the case of the faculties, the femininity faculty and masculinity faculty.1
The Thread’s instigation has been cleared up already.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Terms of Expression?
Fever : 1 Those worlds described fust by a description in tenns of a unity as “clinging to being” are the worlds described in the middle by a description in terms of a diversity, doing without the clinging.
Herein, what are the Requisites?
“Born to anguish” : unreasoned attention is the cause and the perversions are the condition.
Herein, self is insisted upon by way of two kinds of ideas : namely cognizance and cognizance-concomitant ideas for one who is misapprehending both 1 distortedly.
Another way: perception of not-self eradicates perception of self 2 conceived by means of cognizance-concomitant ideas.
Another way :
there is perception of impermanence by means of cognizance-concomitant ideas but no perception of not-self 3 thus :
 down to 4 .
Herein, such seeing 6 is perception of self.6
What is the cause, what the condition,
for that t I-making is the cause, my-making is the condition.
Herein, what is the Coordination?
By “ this world is born to anguish “ the unprofitable consciousness he alludes to is the condition for name-and-form; … down to … ageing-and-death. This is the coordination.
“So when he sees with right understanding how it is, his ….. 1 is the abandoning of the unprofitable.
Herein, there is cessation of ignorance ; with cessation of ignorance, … down to … cessation of ageing-and-death. This is the coordination.
 one who goes with the stream, one who goes against the stream, one who has steadied himself, and one who has crossed over, gone to the further shore, and stands on firm ground as one divine ) .
Herein, he who goes with the stream ( cultivates sensual desires
and does evil actions) . In so far as he cultivates sensual desires
this is the unprofitable root, greed. And it is since he is swept along by sensual desires, which are the streams of craving,1 that he is called one who “ goes with the stream “.
Any person who, because of his going with that stream, with that as condition, with that as cause, does unprofitable action by body and speech is called one who “ does evil action “.
He has three streams : embodiment-view, uncertainty, and misapprehension of virtue and duty.
In virtue of these three streams he reappears in the triple element of existence: in the sensual-desire element, in the form element, in the formless element.
In the opposite sense, - he who Does not 1 
does not misapprehend virtue and duty,
Since he instead cultivates these ideas of renunciation
accordingly 3 it is the Arahant who has” gone to the further shore” of that stream. One” gone to the further shore”, who “stands on firm ground “, has the extinction element with trace left.
With “ one who goes with the stream “ he states the non- abandoning of the fetters to be abandoned by seeing.
With ” one who goes against the stream “ he states the abandoning, in the fruit of Stream-Entry, the defilements coefficient with wrong view . With “ one who has steadied himself” he states the abandoning of the five hitherside fetters.
Herein, with “one who goes with the stream” he states one who is confused 1 about the path,
with “ one who goes against the stream “ and with “ one who has steadied himself” he states one who is wise 2 owing to the path,
With “ one who goes with the stream “ he states the way leading to the origin of embodiment,
with “one who goes against the stream “ and with “ one who has steadied himself “ he states the way leading to cessation of embodiment,
This is the Thread-meaning.
Herein, what is the Teaching?
In this Thread the four Noble Truths are taught,
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying an Investigation?
He who cultivates sensual desires would do evil, he who does not 1 cultivate sensual desires would not do evil, and it is he who has crossed beyond both these planes who has “ gone to the further shore “ : any such inquiry is the Investigation.
Construing? Any inquiry into whether this construes in the Threads or does not construe is the Construing.
Footings? With one who “goes with the stream” there is the footing for the seven 1 fetters.
For the doing 2 of what is unprofitable the footing is the roots of the unprofitable.
With one who “ goes against the stream “ there is the footing for seeing how things are.
With one who has “ steadied himself” there is the footing for invincibility.3
“Gone to the further shore” : there is the footing for the plane of Him Who Has Done.4
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying Characteristics?
He who “ goes with the stream “ owing to craving
also goes owing to all defilements.
He who has “ steadied hlmself “ is also steadied bodily and also steadied verbally and mentally.
This is the Mode of Conveying Characteristics.
Herein, what is the Fourfold Array?
What is the Blessed One’s Purport here in the Thread?
It is that those who will not delight in the way leading to going with the stream will make efforts for that going against the stream … down to … in the plane of Him Who Has Done.1
Conversion? The four Truths are taught in the Thread here.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying an Analysis?
That “ he who cultivates sensual desires and he who does evil actions
is one who goes with the stream” is not unilaterally always so; for also a Stream-Enteeer may cultivate sensual desires
but although the Initiate thus also may do such evil actions as demonstrated in the Thread 1 yet he is not one “ going with the stream “. So This is declarable only after analysis.
“ And he does not cultivate sensual desires and he does no evil action and he is one who goes against the stream “ is not unilaterally always so. All those outside the Dispensation 2who are lust-free 3 with regard to sensual desires do not cultivate sensual desires and they do no evil yet they go with the stream, they do not 5 go against the stream. This is the analysis.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Reversal?
It is the opposition demonstrated.
Synonyms? In the case of sensual desires they are sensual desires as things and sensual desires as defilement , and they are forms, sounds, odours, flavours, and touches,1 and they are chattels consisting of children, wives, bondsmen, and workmen.1
Those “ going with the stream “, are described by a description in terms of defilement’s taking place.
Initiate persons are described by a description in terms of penetration.2
Ways of Entry? The one who “ goes with the stream “ is Suffering.
His ideas are Suffering’s Origin.
Any form is the form category; so too the rest of the five categories; and dependent arising. These defilements, included in the determinations category, are described in the idea base, the idea element, and the faculties.1
Clearing Up? The instigation whereby this Thread is taught is cleared up.
Terms of Expression? By “ one going against the stream” all Stream-Enterers are demonstrated by a unity. But there are those who “ go against the stream “ of the underlying tendency to lust who are Initiates too ; the foremost 2 is the person who has “steadied himself”, and they under him
as the Lust-Free Non-Returner , are described by a unity.
He who has “gone to the further shore “ is all Arahants, all Hermit Enlightened Ones, and all Fully Enlightened Ones, described by. a unity.
Requisites? For him who “goes with the stream” bad friends 1 are the condition, obsession by sensual desire is the cause.
One who” goes against the stream “ : for him .c there are two causes and two conditions for the arising of … down to … right view “ . For him who has “steadied himself” 2 the obtained path is the cause and the instigation is the condition, bodily and a portion of the cognizance-concomitant .
Coordination? This Thread being an analysis, there is no plane of coordination.
“He 2 attains complete extinction “ : he alludes to the fruit of the path of Arahantship and the extinction element without trace left. 986. By the giving he alluded to the abandoning of the gross defilements,
by the virtue to that of the medium, by the understanding he alluded to that of the subtle defilements, and by “ With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, He attains complete extinction “ he alludes to the plane of Him Who Has Done .
By “Merit will grow for one who gives, No risk is stored for one restrained,
One who is skilled abandons evil “ the path is stated.
By “ With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, He attains complete extinction “ he states the highest fruit. 1
By the three clauses “Merit will grow for one who gives, No risk is stored for one restrained, One who is skilled abandons evil “ the profitable root belonging to the worlds is stated.
By “ With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, He attains complete extinction “ the profitable root dissociated from worlds is stated.
By “Merit will grow for one who gives, No risk is stored for one restrained “ he alludes to the plane of the ordinary man.
By “ One who is skilled abandons evil “ he alludes to the Initiates’ plane.
By “ With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, He attains complete extinction” the Adept’s plane is stated.
By” Merit will grow for one who gives, No risk is stored for one restrained” the way leading to heaven 1 is stated,
by” One who is skilled abandons evil “ the Initiates’ deliverance,
and by “ With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, He attains complete extinction” the Adept’s deliverance.
By “Merit will grow for one who gives, No risk is stored for one restrained “ he states talk on giving, talk on virtue, and talk on heavens ,1 namely the teaching of True Ideas belonging to the worlds.
By “ One who is skilled abandons evil “ contemplation of disappointment is stated.
By “With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, He attains complete extinction “ the teaching of the True Idea that is peculiar to Enlightened Ones 2 is stated.
“ Merit will grow for one who gives “ : by his giving freedom from fear to breathing things the abstention from killing breathing things gives freedom from fear to creatures ;
in the same way all the training precepts can be cited :
“No risk is stored for one restrained” : he restrains cognizance by establishing it in virtue, and when he is restraining, his cognizance comes to fulfillment. “
With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, He attains complete extinction” is the two deliverances, namely heart- deliverance due to fading of lust and understanding-deliverance due to fading of ignorance.
This is the Thread-Demonstration.
Herein, what is the Teaching?
What is taught in this Thread?
Two good destinations, namely gods and human beings, and also the five strands of sensual desire :
in the verse, namely “Merit will grow for one who gives” and “No risk is stored for one restrained”. By “ One who is skilled abandons evil” the path is stated.
By “ With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, He attains complete extinction” the two extinction elements are taught, that with trace left and that without trace left.
This is the teaching.
Investigation? “Merit will grow for one who gives” : by this first term the ground for making merit consisting in giving is stated ;
hence the ripening  of straightway-resulting profitable ideas.
By the second term 235, line 28, *//* 2 235, line 29 -let find, thus the Dispensation gives outlet. This is the purport.
Herein, what is the Reversal?
and all the fifty terms can be cited .
he describes all that by a description in terms of synonyms.1
“ What it expectantly relishes brings fear “ : 3 the perversions 4 are described by a description in terms of presentation.5
Herein, what is the Clearing Up?
with the abandoning of the embodiment-view he sees how there is disappointment in sensual desires.
and since, with that as condition he “stands as one divine”, as it were, 2 an Arahant,
and with “ one gone to the further shore “ it is those hearers (229 who are Adepts and also Fully Enlightened Ones 3 that are stated.
and with “one gone to the further shore” it is the Adept-Arahant ideas that are stated.
and the surmounting of the worlds of the triple element.
He who makes efforts “ against the stream “
of craving also makes efforts against the stream of defilements.
and may do evil actions connected therewith ;
Descriptions?*//* 1 */By “one going with the stream “. All ordinary men are described by a unity./* 1
Non-Returners are described by a description in terms of invincibility . These are the descriptions.
and said: 4. “Master Kaccana, the brahmins say thus: ‘Brahmins are the highest caste, those of any other caste are inferior; brahmins are the fairest caste, those of any other caste are dark; only brahmins are purified, not non-brahmins; brahmins alone are the sons of Brahma, the offspring of Brahma, born of his mouth, born of Brahma, created by Brahma, heirs of Brahma.’
or how does it appear to you in this case?”
there is no difference between them at all that I see.”
or how does it appear to you in this case?”
this is the demonstration with two 1 terms
237, line 5 Herein,1 what is the type of Thread dealing with morality and dealing with penetration ?
The verse : .2
“For one who gives “ : the ground for making merit consisting in giving is stated.
“No risk is stored for one restrained” : the ground for making merit consisting in virtue is stated.
“ One who is skilled abandons evil “ : he states the abandoning of greed and delusion and ill will.
“With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, He attains complete extinction “ : he states the outguiding of will and lust for greed, for delusion, and for ill will.
The verse 1 “ Merit will grow for one who gives “ is the profitable root non-greed.
“No risk is stored for one restrained” is the profitable root non-hate.*/
237, line 16 namely “No risk is stored for one restrained”, the state 1 of no risk, no foe, and no ill will affiiction is stated.
By the third term,1 namely “One who is skilled abandons evil”, cessation of unknowing with the arising of knowledge is stated.
By the fourth term, with the exhaustion o( lust and hate 2 there is the heart-deliverance due to fading of lust, and with the exhaustion of delusion there is the understanding-deliverance due to fading of ignorance. This is the Investigation.
he abandons avarice,
and merit grows.
There is this construing.
Herein, what are the Footings? “ Merit will grow for one who gives” is the footing for the Expression of Generosity ,
“No risk is stored for one restrained” is the footing for the Expression of Understanding, “ One who is skilled abandons evil “ is the footing for the Expression of Truth,1
This is the Footings.
Herein, what are the Characteristics?
“Merit will grow for him who gives, No risk is stored for one restrained”:
The Fourfold Array?
What is the Blessed One’s Purport here?
It is that those who aspire to great properties will give gifts for the abandoning of danger,1 that those with the will for non-risk will abandon the five risks, that those who have the will for the profitable keep the eight-factored path in being for the abandoning of the eight wrongness,
and that those who desire to attain extinction will abandon lust, hate, and delusion. This is the Blessed One’s purport.
Conversion? Avarice in one who does not give, and risk for one 1inrestrained, and non-abandoning of evil, are Origin through demonstration by opposites.1
With non-greed and non-hate and non-delusion as profitable, these are the three profitable roots.
Their condition is the eight rightnesses. This is the Path.
Their exhaustion 2 of lust, hate, and delusion is Cessation.
Construing? One who is steadied in giving fulfils in both ways :
and “ With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, He attains complete extinction “ is the footing for the Expression of Peace.
also for one who gives no risk is stored up.1 “ One who is skilled abandons evil, with exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion he attains complete extinction” : also with the exhaustion of form, also with the exhaustion of feeling, … With exhaustion, fading, cessation, of form by means of which form someone describing a Perfect One 2 would describe a wrong view , and so with the rest of the five categories.
Analysis 1 “Merit will grow for him who gives “ is not unilaterally always so. For him who gives out of fear of punishment by kings, for him who gives to the virtuous using what is not allowable, no merit grows, and he gives such a gift without profit. And with gifts of rods for punishing and gifts of weapons it is demerit, not merit, that grows.
“ No risk is stored for one restrained “ is not unilaterally always so. What is the reason? When someone sees his state here and now thus , etc. , he does not, by such restraint as that, unmake risk.
On the contrary, it is one who undertakes thus “ One who kills breathing things has evil ripening here and now and in some future existence” and so with all the ten kinds of unprofitable action that he refrains with that as cause; 1
It is by this kind of restraint that non-risk is stored up.
Reversal? “ Merit will grow for him who gives “ : merit will not grow for one who does not give-
the kind of merit, that is, that consists in giving.1 “ No risk is stored for one restrained “ : for one unrestrained risk is made.2
“One who is skilled abandons evil” : one who is unskilled does not abandon it.
“ With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, he 3 239, line 8
“No risk is stored for one restrained” is described by a description in terms ofdestruction with the support of non-hate. “ One who is skilled abandons evil “ is described by a description in terms of destruction with the support of non-delusion.
Ways of Entry? In the case of the five faculties beginning with faith, “Merit will grow for him who gives, No risk is stored for one restrained” is the virtue category 1 by means of restraint
made a way of entry. In the case of the six faculties beginning with the eye, restraint is the concentration category. That “One who is skilled abandons evil” is the understanding category.”,With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, he attains complete extinction” : this is the deliverance category.
In the case of the elements, the idea element ; in the case of the bases, the mind base.
Clearing Up? The instigation with which this Thread is taught is cleared up in the Thread itself.
Terms of Expression? Giving is described in terms of a unity.
But “ For him who gives “ is not described by a description in terms of a unity,
it is described by a description in terms of the blamelessness of the liking .2
“ With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, he attains complete extinction “ is described in terms of fighting courage.
Requisites? For giving, gladness is the condition and non-greed the cause.
For one restrained, reasoned attention is the cause and giving up the condition.
“One who is skilled abandons evil “ : seeing how things are is the condition and obtainment of knowledge the cause.
Coordination? The verse “Merit will grow for him who gives “ : for him also virtue grows
and also restraint grows.
“No risk is stored for one restrained” :
also no other defilements are stored up, .
“ With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, he attains complete extinction” : with the exhaustion of lust and hate there is also the exhaustion of the underlying tendency to lust and also of those to hate and to delusion. 1011. “He attains complete extinction” is the extinction element with trace left and the extinction element without trace left.
This is the Coordination.
“ With exhaustion of lust, hate, delusion, he attains complete extinction “ : another’s utterance, and reasoned attention in oneself, and the path, are the cause and the condition.
The eight kinds of giving beginning with generosity, giving up, giving of the True Idea, giving of material things, … 1 can be cited in detail : this is a diversity.
Descriptions? “Merit grows for him who gives” is described by a description in terms of destruction with the support of non-greed.
and also for him who concentrates his cognizance ; also merit grows through performance of services.
Synonyms? “Merit grows for him who gives” : merit also grows for him who shares,
240, line 20 attains complete extinction “ : without the complete exhaustion he has no extinction.3
231, line 13  this Thread can be quoted in detail.
When he “devotes himself” and “ strives” and “makes efforts” 3 he here and now … when ill… the time of death… when a god… he reaches Hermit Enlightenment ) .
“ Entered the ear “ : this is done by hearing the true object of faith ;
and his cognizance is not yet thirsty for the insight into ideas that consists in the higher understanding 1 or for complete breaking-out.2 1014. And this Thread is taught of the five kinds of persons: there are the Followers by Faith with blunt faculties and with keen faculties and the followers by Ideas with blunt faculties and with keen facuities ;
but 1 since a person of deluded temperament cannot devote himself, strive, or make efforts, the deliverance, according as it comes to be, 2 according to the concentration it has , shows its fruit at that moment, at that instant, in that period;
and even if the devotee falls away or another corrupts 3 him , that deliverance  is still not without its pleasant ripening for him
either here and now or on reappearance or in some future period.
Herein, if the kind of person who is a Follower by Ideas with keen faculties has such ideas entered by the ear, then when he devotes himself he reaches distinction here and now;
The Follower by Faith with keen faculties reaches it on the occasion of the time of death,
but the Follower by Ideas with blunt faculties reaches it when he is ill.
and he with blunt faculties reaches it when he is a god ;
but when he does not reach it as a god, then with that same lust for the True Idea, with that relish for the True Idea, he eventually reaches 1 Hermit Enlightenment.
 He who devotes himself, strives, makes efforts, in regard to the ideas that have entered the ear perceives successive 1 distinction, and perceiving, he reaches it here and now.
 If he gives attention thereto when ill, he reaches it when he devotes himself thereto.
 If he has the sense of urgency at the time of his death, he reaches it when he devotes himself thereto.
 But if he has no sense of urgency in any of these instances,2 then -; 3
he recognizes thus: .
Then as a god he reaches it.
Or else through abiding in negligence due to cleaving to the five strands of heavenly sensual desires, he eventually by means of that profitable root reaches Hermit Enlightenment.
What, owing to another’s utterance, is “consolidated by word of mouth “ 1 is understanding consisting in what is heard.
Those ideas, when “looked over by the mind”, are understanding consisting in cogitation.
In that they are “ well penetrated by right view “ is understanding consisting in keeping in being.
When ideas that have entered the ear are “consolidated by word of mouth”, then - when someone attains extinction here and now that person is an Arahant ;
 He who reaches Hermit Enlightenment through that profitable root is the type of person whose actual being has for its accessories his previous devotion.
“Ideas that have entered the ear” is the first Base for Deliverance , “ consolidated by word of mouth “ is the second and third Base for Deliverance, “ looked over by the mind “ is the fourth Base for Deliverance, and “ well penetrated by right view” is the fifth Base for Deliverance.
“ Ideas that have entered the ear, consolidated by word of mouth” : · having heard through his ear successive ideas,1 he fulfils the virtue category. “ Looked over by the mind “ : he fulfils the concentration category. “Well penetrated by right view”: he fulfils the understanding category.
but he who reaches it on reappearance as a god and attains extinction there is a Non-Returner.
“Ideas that have entered the ear” : 1 , which can be quoted in detail ;
this is the first Exploit of Faith . “Looked over by the mind” :  1 can be quoted in detail ; .
this is the second Exploit of Faith. “Well penetrated by right view “ :  ;
this is the third Exploit of Faith.
By “ ideas that have entered the ear “ the Master shows an Initiate.
By “ looked over by the mind “ the Master shows an Arahant.
By “Well penetrated by right view” the Master shows a Perfect One, accomplished and fully enlightened.
By “ Ideas that have entered the ear “ : he shows the escape in the case of sensual desires.
By “ looked over by the mind “ he shows the escape in the case of the form element.
By “well penetrated by right view” he shows the escape in the case of the triple element.
This is the Thread-meaning.
Herein, what is the Mode of Conveying a Teaching?
In this Thread the three Searches are taught: the path of quiet in sensual-desire search is through “ ideas that have entered the ear” ; the path of quiet in the existence search is 1 through the “verbally consolidated” ;
the path of quiet in the divine-life search is through the” well penetrated by right view”.
Investigation? According as he is giving attention to, is investigating, what is heard,1 he obtains understanding consisting in what is heard.
According as he gives attention to 2 the ideas as heard, then he obtains understanding consisting in cogitation.
According as he gives attention to ideas here and now, then he obtains understanding consisting in keeping in being.
This is the Investigation.
It is through what is heard that he obtains understanding consisting in what is heard,
it is through cogitation that he obtains understanding consisting in cogitation, it is through right view that he obtains understanding consisting in keeping in being.
There is this Construing.
Footings? “Ideas that have entered the ear” is the footing for hearing the True Idea.1
“Consolidated by word of mouth “ is the footing for devotion.
“ Looked over by the mind “ is the footing for insight into ideas according to the True Idea.
“ Well penetrated by right view” is the footing for the Path .2 1028. Characteristics 1 … “ Looked over by the mind “ 1 is both looked over by understanding and looked over by right view  … 1
The Fourfold Array? What is the Blessed One’s Purport in this Thread?
As to possessors of these three 1 kinds of understanding, they an out- 234, line 11
With no hearing1 and with no attention 1 and with no penetration, the way leading to the origin of embodiment is stated.
With hearing and with attention and with penetration,2 the way leading to cessation of embodiment is stated.
This is the Conversion.
Analysis? Since this is unilaterally declarable,
there is no plane of analysis here.
Reversal? By their opposites the five rewards are five dependencies,1 which one reaches here and now or on reappearing or in some subsequent period.
Synonyms? “ Ideas that have entered the ear “ : what is heard 1 is also seen by the understanding faculty, and also intimated. What is “well penetrated by understanding “ is also clarified.
Descriptions? The teaching, namely “ideas that have entered the ear”, is described by a description in terms of science.1
Attention is described by a description in terms of gladness. Distinctions) here and now are described by a description in terms of reward.
Ways of Entry? The three kinds of understanding: “Consolidated by word of mouth” is understanding consisting in what is heard, cc looked over by the mind “ is understanding consisting in cogitation, and “well penetrated by right view” is understanding consisting in keeping in being.
These are the Noble Truths. The arising of science is the cessation of ignorance, which is Dependent Arising. In the case of the Faculties, the three faculties dissociated from worlds ; in the case of the Bases, this is included in the idea base ; in the case of the Elements, it is included in the idea element.
Clearing Up? The Thread’s instigation is completed at the beginning .1
Terms of Expression? The” five rewards” are described by a diversity. The ideas 1 that have “ entered the ear” are the Noble Ones’ Usage described by a diversity. The hearing of the ideas is described by a unity.
Requisite? Paying respect to true men is the condition , for hearing the True Idea, faith being the cause.
“Looked over by the mind “ : experience of the meaning 1 is the condition and experience of the idea the cause. “Well penetrated by right view “ : hearing faith’s true object and attention are the condition, and understanding consisting in what is heard and in cogitation are the cause.
Coordination? The Thread having been analysed , there is no need 1 to produce another way,
since the plane of coordination is there already. 237, line 4.
241, line 30 In the Elder Maha-Kacciiyana’s Pitaka-Disclosure
the chapter on the Modes of Conveying in Combined Treatment is completed.
or how does it appear to you in this case?”
or how does it appear to you in this case?”
there is no difference between them at all that I see.”
or haw does it appear to you in this case?”
or how does it appear to you in this case?”
or how does it appear to you in this case?”
there is no difference between them at all that I see.”
 and :
herein, .
Herein those creatures who are fettered by craving have much cleaving and weak insight,
Herein, creatures of craving temperament have insisted upon perception of creatures and do not see rise and subsidence;
they see self in the five categories. Some see self as possessed of form or form in self or self in form ;
that is how they see each of the five categories
by means of the other categories . But when creatures with pronounced views thereof are exercizing insight, they see the categories directly as self :
they see form as self thus
So the first instances 3 of each of the five categories 4 belong with the annihilation view thus ,
and with the three last terms in the case of each 5 single category the instance belongs to eternalism thus .
When those of craving temperament go forth into homelessness outside this Dispensation they abide devoted to the pursuit of sensual pleasures.
And those of view temperament with that outcome i.e. likewise gone forth abide devoted to the pursuit of self-torment.
It is owing to that same pleasure in views that outsiders’ range is only that much.
Herein, when creatures of view temperament find a way of entry into the Noble Ones’ True Idea and Outguiding Discipline, they become Followers by Ideas ;
Herein, when creatures of view temperament hold the view that there is wrong in sensual desires,1 so long as the underlying tendencies with regard to sensual desires are not eradicated 2 they abide devoted to pursuit of self-torment.
There is no meaning in sensual desires”, and they, who already did not seek sensual desires, thus easily relinquish sensual desires
Hence “pleasant way” is said.
But creatures of craving temperament cleave to sensual desires. To them the Master, teaches
or some bhikkhu, as follows “There is no meaning in sensual desires “, and they, since those are dear to them, relinquish with pain.
Hence ‘’ painful way ‘’ is said.
So all these creatures combine together under the two Ways, under the Painful and the Pleasant.
Herein, creatures of view temperament are of two kinds : with blunt faculties and with keen faculties.
Herein, creatures of view temperament with keen faculties renounce with pleasure and actualize swiftly, hence “pleasant way with swift acquaintanceship ‘’ is said.
And herein, since creatures of view temperament with blunt faculties actualize more sluggishly as compared with the first-mentioned kind with keen faculties, they renounce with pleasure and actualize sluggishly,
Herein, creatures of craving temperament are of two kinds : with keen faculties and with blunt faculties.
Herein, creatures of craving temperament with keen faculties renounce with pain and actualize swiftly,
hence “painful way with swift acquaintanceship” is said.
These are the four Ways , with no fifth and no sixth.
Whoever they 1 are that have attained extinction or will attain extinction, it is by these four Ways, not by any other. 1051. This Way, having been demonstrated 1 in defilement by a tetrad thus,
can be demonstrated in the Noble Ideas by a tetrad-path. This is called the Play-of-Lions Guide-Line.
Herein, there are: 1. Four Nutriments ,
Four Perversions , 3. Assumings , 4. Bonds , 5. Ties , 6. Taints , 7. Floods , 8. Barbs , 9. Steadying-Points for Consciousness , 10. Goings on Bad Ways .
In this way the collation of the Thread
is made under the four Nutriments.
Herein, 1. physical nutriment and contact as nutriment are abandonable by one of craving temperament,
-2. The first nutriment is the first perversion, the second nutriment the second perversion, the third nutriment the third perversion, the fourth nutriment the fourth perversion.
These are the four perversions with no fifth and no sixth,
-3. Herein, one steadied in the first perversion assumes sensual desires ; this is sensual-desire assuming.
One steadied in the second perversion assumes future being ; this is virtue-and-duty assuming.
One steadied in the third perversion assumes a view 2 ; this is view assuming.
One steadied in the fourth perversion assumes the categories as self; this is self-theory assuming.
-5. Herein,1 one steadied in sensual-desire assuming ties with covetousness 2 ; this is the body-tie of covetousness.
One steadied in virtue-and-duty assuming ties ill will; this is the body-tie of ill will.
One steadied in view assuming ties misapprehension; this is the body-tie of misapprehension.
One steadied in self-theory assuming ties when diversifying ; this is the body-tie of insistence that this is truth.
-6. While he is tying 1 the defilements that assail him
Herein, the taint of sensual desire is due to the body-tie of covetousness, the taint of being is due to the body-tie of ill will, the taint of views is due to the body-tie of misapprehension, and the taint of ignorance is due to the body-tie of insistence that this is truth.
-7. These 1 four taints, when they come to abundance, are floods, that is why they are called floods.
Herein the taint of sensual desire is the flood of sensual desire, the taint of being is the flood of being, the taint of ignorance is the flood of ignorance, and the taint of views is the flood of views.
-8. These four floods, when they have entered the inclination 1 and are accompanied by underlying tendency,
Herein, the flood of sensual desire is the barb of lust, the flood of being is the barb of hate, the flood of ignorance is the barb of delusion, 2 and the flood of views is the barb of views.3
These are the four steadying-points for consciousness.
Herein, when infected 1 by the barb of lust, consciousness passing on is steadied on form ;
when infected by the barb of hate …passing on … on feeling ; when infected by the barb of delusion … passing on … on perception ; when infected by the barb of views, consciousness passing on is steadied on determinations.
-10. By means of the four steadying-points for consciousness they go the fourfold bad way: through will, through hate, through fear, and through delusion.
It is owing to lust that one goes the bad way through will, owing to hate that one goes the bad way through hate, owing to delusion that one goes the bad way through delusion, and owing to view that one goes the bad way through fear.
So this action and these defilements are the cause of the roundabout.
Herein these are the four directions.
 Physical nutriment, the perversion that there is beauty in the ugly, sensual-desire assuming, the bond 1 of sensual desires, the body-tie of covetousness, the taint of sensual desires, the flood of sensual desires, the barb of lust, for1n as steadying-point for consciousness passing on, the going a bad way through will :
 Contact as nutriment, the perversion that there is pleasure in the painful, virtue-and-duty assuming, the bond of being, the body-tie of ill will, the taint of being, the flood of being, the barb of hate, feeling as steadying-point for consciousness passing on, the going a bad way through hate : this is the second Direction.
this is the third Direction.
So the plotting of the first Direction by the first term of each of these ten Threads
is called the Plotting of Directions.
Surveying on the unprofitable side by means of the four Perversions after associating the defilement is the plane of the Plotting of Directions on the unprofitable side. 1068. As to the first terms of these 1 ten Threads , what is the meaning of these ideas?
The meaning is one, only the phrasing is different.2
This is the first collation.
All defilements in the four ter1os in each tetrad can be inserted under this 1 abbreviation.
Next the profitable side. 1. four Ways , 2. four Meditations , 3. four Foundations of Mindfulness , 4. four Abidings-heavenly, divine,1 noble, imperturbable , 5. four Right Endeavours , 6. four Wonderful and Marvellous Ideas , 7. four Expressions 2 , 8. four kinds of Concentration-concentration due to will concentration due to energy, concentration due to cognizance, concentration due to inquiry ,
four Ideas Dealing with Pleasure no other than enlightenment factors, no other than ardour, no other than faculty restraint, no other than relinquishment of all , 10. four Measureless States .
-10. Herein, the painful way with sluggish acquaintanceship kept in being and made much of fulfills the first meditation. The first meditation fulfilled fulfils the first foundation of mindfulness. The first foundation of mindfulness fulfilled fulfils the first abiding. The first abiding fulfilled fulfils the first right endeavour. The first right endeavour fulfilled fulfils the first wonderful and marvellous idea. The first wonderful and marvellous idea fulfilled fulfills the first expression. The first expression fulfilled fulfils concentration due to will. Concentration due to will fulfilled fulfils faculty restraint. Faculty restraint fulfilled fulfills lovingkindness.
So with the other three terms in each tetrad down to … Relinquishment fulfilled fulfils the fourth measureless State.
 Herein, the first way and first meditation and first foundation of mindfulness and first abiding and first right endeavour and first wonderful and marvellous idea, and the expression of truth, and concentration due to will, and faculty restraint, and the measureless state of lovingkindness:
 The painful way with swift acquaintanceship and the second meditation and second foundation of mindfulness and second abiding and second right endeavour and second wonderful and marvellous idea, and the expression of generosity, and concentration due to cognizance, and ardour,1 and the measureless state of compassion : these are the second Direction.
 The pleasant way with sluggish acquaintanceship and the third meditation and third foundation of mindfulness and third abiding and third right endeavour and third wonderful and marvellous idea, and the expression of understanding, and concentration due to energy, and enlightenment factors, and the measureless state of gladness :
 The pleasant way with quick acquaintanceship and the fourth meditation and fourth foundation of mindfulness and fourth abiding and fourth right endeavour and fourth wonderful and marvellous idea, and the expression of peace, and concentration due to inquiry, and relinquishment of all, and the measureless state of onlooking-equanimity :
It is this plotting of these four directions
Herein, the pairing off 1 is this:
Four Nutriments 2 and four Ways, four Perversions and four Foundations of Mindfulness, four Assumings and four meditations, four Bonds and Abidings, Ties and Right Endeavours, Taints and Wonderful-and-Marvellous Ideas, Floods and Expressions, Barbs and Concentrations, Steadying-points for Consciousness and Ideas Dealing with Pleasure, four Goings on Bad Ways and four Measureless States. This is the construing of the profitable and unprofitable by opposites.. This is called the Plotting-of-Directions 3 Guide-Line.
Its end is the four Fruits of the Monk’s State . And the idea demonstrated 4 as the first Direction in the profitable demonstration 4 has for its end the fruit of Stream-Entry, the second the fruit of Once-Return, the third 4 the fruit of Non-Return, and the fourth the fruit of Arahantship.
Herein, what is the Trefoil Guide-Line?
Those who find outlet by the painful way with sluggish acquaintance and with swift acquaintance are two types of persons ; and those who find outlet by the pleasant way with sluggish acquaintance and with swift acquaintance are two types of persons.
Of these four types of persons, the type of person who finds outlet 1 by the pleasant way with sluggish acquaintance and the type of person who finds outlet by the painful way with swift acquaintance
Herein, he who finds outlet by the pleasant way with swift acquaintance is one who gains knowledge by what is condensed .
The next type of person shared in common with the third is one who gains knowledge by what is expanded.
The type of person who finds outlet by the painful way with sluggish acquaintance is one who is guidable.
So these, having been four, are three. 1079. Herein, insight preceded by quiet is for one who gains knowledge by what is condensed. Quiet preceded by insight is for one who is guidable. Quiet and insight coupled together are for one who gains knowledge by what is expanded.
The blunt type of teaching is for one who gains knowledge by what is condensed. The keen type of teaching is for one who is guidable. The keen-to-blunt type of teaching is for one who gains knowledge by what is expanded.
The training in the higher understanding is for one who gains knowledge by what is condensed. The training in the higher cognizance is for one who is guidable. The training in the higher virtue is for one who gains knowledge by what is expanded.
That is how these types of persons have an outlet by the four ways.
Herein, the corruption is this. 1. three Unprofitable Roots , 2. three kinds of Object , i 3. three kinds of Contact , 4. three kinds of Feeling , 5. three kinds of Mental Approach , 6. three Corruptions , 7. three kinds of Thinking , 8. three Fevers , 9. three Characteristics of the Determined , 10. three Painfulnesses .
Three unprofitable roots: the unprofitable root greed, the unprofitable root hate, the unprofitable root delusion.
Three kinds of contact : contact to be felt as pleasant, contact to be felt as painful, contact to be felt as neither-painful-nor-pleasant.
Three kinds of feeling : pleasant feeling, painful feeling, neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.
Three kinds of mental approach: approach with joy, approach with grief, approach with onlooking-equanimity.
Three corruptions : lust, hate, delusion.
Three kinds of thinking: sensual-desire thinking, ill-will thinking, cruelty thinking.
Three fevers: the lust-born, the hate-born, the delusion-born.
Three characteristics of the determined : arising, steadiness, subsidence.
Three kinds of painfulness : painfulness as pain, painfulness in change, painfulness in determinations.
Herein, what does the unprofitable root greed mould itself from?
The threefold object is the agreeable, the disagreeable, and that provocative of onlooking-equanimity.
The unprofitable root greed moulds itself therefrom by means of the agreeable object.
So with an agreeable object there is contact to be felt as pleasant. Depending on contact to be felt as pleasant, pleasant feeling arises. Depending on pleasant feeling, the approach with joy arises. Dependent on the approach with joy, lust arises. Depending on lust, sensual-desire thinking arises. Dependent on sensual-desire thinking, lust-born fever arises. Depending on lust-born fever, the determined characteristic arising arises.1 Depending on the determined characteristic arising, painfulness in change arises.
What does the unprofitable root hate mould itself from?
The unprofitable root hate moulds itself therefrom by means of the disagreeable object.
So with a disagreeable object there is contact to be felt as painful. Depending on contact to be felt as painful, painful feeling arises. Depending on painful feeling, the approach with grief arises. Depending on the approach with grief, hate arises. Depending on hate, ill-will thinking arises. Depending on ill-will thinking, hate-born fever arises. Depending on hate-born fever, the determined characteristic alteration of the steadied 1 arises. Depending on the determined characteristic alteration of the steadied, painfulness as pain arises.
What does the unprofitable root delusion mould itself from?
So with an object provocative of onlooking-equanimity there is contact to be felt as neither-painful-nor-pleasant. Depending on contact to be felt as neither-painful-nor-pleasant, neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling arises. Depending on neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, the approach with onlooking-equanimity arises. Depending on the approach with onlooking-equanimity, delusion arises. Depending on delusion, cruelty thinking arises. Depending on cruelty thinking delusion-born fever arises. Depending on delusion-born fever, the determined characteristic subsidence arises.2 Depending on the determined characteristic subsidence, painfulness in determinations arises. This is the demonstration of the three kinds of corruptions. This is called the Trefoil Guide-Line on the unprofitable 8 side.
So three unprofitable roots with no fourth, with no fifth, three objects, three kinds of contact, three kinds of feeling, … down to … painfulness in determinations . Whatever is on the unprofitable side all combines in the three unprofitable roots .
Herein, what is the profitable side?
Three Profitable Roots , 2. three kinds of Understanding: understanding consisting in what is heard, understanding consisting in cogitation, understanding consisting in keeping in being ,
three kinds of Concentration : with thinking and exploring, … etc. , 4. three Trainings : training in higher virtue, … etc. ,
three Signs : sign of quiet, sign of exertion, sign of onlooking- equanimity ,
three kinds of Thinking : renunciation thinking, … etc. ,
three Faculties: the I-shall-come-to-know-finally-the-as-yet-not-finally-known faculty, … in detail ,
three Approaches : approach with renunciation, approach with non-ill-will, approach with non-cruelty 1 ,
three Categories: the virtue category, the concentration category, the understanding category .
Herein, the profitable root non-greed fulfils understanding consisting in what is heard. Understanding consisting in what is heard fulfilled fulfils concentration with thinking and exploring. Concentration with thinking and exploring fulfilled fiilfils training in higher cognizance. Training in higher cognizance fulfilled ftilfils the sign of quiet. The sign of quiet fiilfilled ftilfils renunciation thinking. Renunciation thinking fiilfilled iiilfils the I-shall-come-to-know-finally-the-as-yet-not-finally-known faculty. The I-shall-come-to-know-finally-the-as-yet-not-finally-known faculty fulfilled fulfils the approach with renunciation. The approach with renunciation fulfilled abandons the search for sensual desires. The abandoning of the search for sensual desires fulfils the concentration category.
The profitable root non-hate fiilfils understanding consisting in cogitation. Understanding consisting in cogitation fulfilled fulfils concentration without thinking and with only exploring.
Concentration without thinking and with only exploring fulfilled fulfils training in higher virtue. Training in higher virtue fulfilled fulfils the sign of onlooking-equanimity. The sign of onlooking-equanimity fulfilled fulfils non-ill-will thinking. Non-ill- will thinking fulfilled fulfills the final-knowledge faculty. The final-Knowledge faculty fulfilled fulfills the approach with non-ill-will. The approach with non-ill-will fulfilled abandons the search for being. The abandoning of the search for being fulfills the virtue category.
The profitable root non-delusion fulfills understanding consisting in keeping in being. Understanding consisting in keeping in being fulfilled fulfills concentration without thinking and exploring. Concentration without thinking and exploring fulfilled fulfils training in higher understanding. Training in higher understanding fulfilled fulfils the sign of exertion. The sign of exertion fulfilled fulfills the final-knower faculty. The final-knower faculty fulfilled fulfills the approach with non-cruelty. The approach with noncruelty fulfilled fulfills the search for a divine life. The search for a divine life fulfilled fulfills the understanding category.
So these are the three ideas on the profitable side, and all profitable ideas are demonstrated by the three triad-demonstrations. Their end is the three Gateways to Liberation .
Herein, with the first the Dispositionless, with the second the Void, with the third the Signless.
This is called the second 1 Guide-Line, the Trefoil.
Herein, there are three types of person, one who gains knowledge from what is condensed, one who gains knowledge from what is expanded, and one who is guidable .
Of these three types of person, those types of person who find outlet 1 by the pleasant way with swift acquaintance and the pleasant way with sluggish acquaintance are two types of person,
and there are two types of person who find outlet 1 by the painful way with swift acquaintance and by the painful way with sluggish acquaintance. These, who are four in virtue of that distinction according to the four ways, are two, namely as one of view temperament and one of craving temperament .
Of these two types of persons this is the corruption. 1. Ignorance and Craving , 2. Consciencelessness and Shamelessness , 3. Unmindfulness and Unawareness , 4. Hindrances and Fetters , 5. Cleaving 1 and Insistence , 6. I-making and My-making , 7. Faithlessness and Unamenability to Correction 2 , 8. Idleness and Unreasoned Attention , 9. Uncertainty and Covetousness , 10. Not Hearing the True Idea, and Non-Attainment .
Herein, ignorance and consciencelessness and t1nmindfulness and hindrances and cleaving and I-making and faithlessness and idleness and uncertainty and not hearing the True Idea : this is one Direction.
Craving and shamelessness and unawareness and fetters and insistence and my-making and unamenability to correction and unreasoned attention and covetousness and non-attainment : these are the second Direction.
Of the ten dyads the ten first terms
So the unprofitable ideas’ state of being a source 1 of suffering is Origin.
Whatever 2 idea name-and-form resides in is Suffering. So this Origin and this Suffering are the two Truths of Suifering and Origin, which is the first demonstration of the Conversion of Relishing.
Herein, what is the profitable side?
Quiet and Insight , 2. Science and Good Conduct , 3. Mindfulness and Awareness , 4. Conscience and Shame , 5. Abandoning of I-making and Abandoning of My-making , 6. Right Effort and Reasoned Attention , 7. Right Mindfulness and Right Concentration , 8. Understanding and Dispassion , 9. Attainment and Hearing the True Idea , 10. Joy and Practice in accordance with the True Idea .
Herein, quiet and science and mindfulness and conscience and abandoning of I-making and right effort and right mindfulness and understanding and attainment and joy : these ideas are one Direction.
Insight and good conduct and awareness and shame and abandoning of my-making and reasoned attention and right concentration and dispassion and hearing the True Idea and practice in accordance with the True Idea : these are the second Direction.
So on the profitable side and the unprofitable side the Conversion of Relishing Guide-Line has four Directions.
Now of these, the ten first unprofitable of the unprofitable side that come to abandonment by means of the profitable come to be abandoned by means of the ten first 1 terms on the profitable side.
With their abandoning the heart-deliverance due to fading of lust is the end. And the ten second unprofitable terms of the unprofitable side that come to abandoning, come to be abandoned by means of the ten second 2 terms on the profitable side.
With their abandoning the understanding-deliverance due to fading of ignorance is the end.
Of these three Guide-Lines, the first Guide-Line is called the Play of Lions.
It has eight terms, four of which are profitable and four unprofitable; these eight terms are eight of the Root-Terms. The second Guide-Line, as a meaning Guide-Line too,1 is the Trefoil.
That guides by means of six ideas, since it guides by means of three profitable roots and three unprofitable roots. So these six terms and the first-mentioned Root-Terms are fourteen of the eighteen Root-Terms .
Herein, the last Guide-Line is the Conversion of Relishing. That guides by means of four ideas:
by ignorance and craving, and by quiet and insight. These four ideas complete the eighteen Root-Terms demonstrated under the three Guide-Lines.
Herein, all the unprofitable 1 converges under the nine unprofitable 1 terms.
And of these nine Root-Terms four are in the Play-of-Lions Guide-Line, three in the Trefoil, and two in the Conversion of Relishing. That is how they are on the unprofitable 1 side.
Herein, as to the nine profitable Root-Terms, all the profitable is construable thereunder.
Herein, in the Play-of-Lions Guide-Line there are four ter1ns, in the Trefoil three, and in the Conversion of Relishing two. These are the nine profitable Root-Terms.,.
Herein, there are four terms in the Conversion-of-Relishing Guide-Line and the eighteen Root-Terms converge there.
How? Quiet and Non-Greed and Non-Hate, and Perception of Ugliness and Perception of Pain : these five terms on the profitable side belong with Quiet.
And Insight and Non-Delusion and Perception of Impermanence and Perception of Not-Self: these four terms belong with Insight.
These are the nine profitable construed under two of the terms. Herein, of the nine unprofitable Root-Terms on the unprofitable side, Craving and Greed and Hate and Perception of Beauty and Perception of Pleasure : these five terms belong with Craving.
And Ignorance and Delusion and Perception of Permanence and Perception of Self : these four terms belong with Ignorance.
These are the nine unprofitable terms fully abbreviated.
So these three Guide-Lines are included in the one Guide-Line.
That is how the eighteen Root-Terms can be demonstrated in the Conversion-of- Relishing Guide-Line.
How are the eighteen Root-Terms construable under the Trefoil Guide-Line?1
Of the nine profitable terms, Insight and Non-Delusion and Perception of Impermanence and Perception of Not-Self: these four terms are Non-Delusion; and Quiet and Non-Greed and Perception of Ugliness and Perception of Pain: 2 these four terms are Non-Greed and Non-Hate.3 That is how these nine terms can be construed under the three profitable roots.
Herein, of the nine unprofitable terms, Craving and Greed and Perception of Beauty and Perception of Pleasure : these four te1·ms are Greed as unprofitable Root ; and Ignorance and Delusion and Perception of Permanence and Perception of Self : these are Hate. And so these nine terms are construed under the three unprofitable roots.
That is how the eighteen Root-Terms can be demonstrated by the Trefoil Guide-Line by construing them under the profitable and unprofitable 4 roots.
How are the eighteen Root-Terms construable under the Play-of-Lions Guide-Line?
Craving and Perception of Beauty: these are the first Perversion.
Greed and Perception of Pleasure : these are the second Perversion.
Ignorance and Perception of Permanence : these are the third Perversion.
Delusion and Perception of Self : this is the fourth Perversion.
So these nine 1 unprofitable terms are construed under the four terms.
Non-Greed and Perception of Pain : these are the second Foundation of Mindfulness.
Insight and Perception of Impermanence : these are the third Foundation of Mindfulness.
Non-Delusion and Perception of Not-Self: these are the fourth Foundation of Mindfulness.
These eighteen Root-Terms have been included under the Play-of-Lions Guide-Line.
The plane and the resort 1 of these three Guide-Lines is included in each 1 Guide-Line.
When the profitable ideas or unprofitable ideas of one Guide-Line are known, the opposite 2 can be sought out accordingly. Having sought out the opposites, that Guide-Line can be demonstrated. When that Guide-Line is demonstrated, 3
then according as one Guide-Line is demonstrated so can all the three Guide-Lines, each including the others, be demonstrated,
since the eighteen Root-Terms are all included under each single Guide-Line: when that idea is cognized all ideas are cognized.
Of these three Guide-Lines, the Play-of-Lions Guide-Line has the four Fruits of the Monk’s State for its end :
The Trefoil Guide-Line has the three Gateways to Liberation for its end :
The Conversion of Relishing Guide-Line has the Heart- Deliverance due to Fading of Lust and the Understanding-Deliverance due to Fading of Ignorance for its end.
The first Direction has the Heart-Deliverance due to Fading of Lust and the second Direction 1 has the Understanding-Deliverance due to Fading of Ignorance.
These are three Guide-Lines. The Plotting of these three Guide-Lines’ eighteen Root-Terms is called the Plotting-of-Directions Guide-Line.
By plotting 1 one knows that this idea belongs with this idea: such right bringing together 
These are the five Guide-Lines.
Here is a mnemonic verse :
Mindfulness Foundations, And Quiet, and Insight, and the Roots Of Profit :
All Profit by nine terms construed, And all Unprofit too by nine :
Guiding the profit by the roots Of profit, unprofit by its roots, 3
which by the Faculties 4 guide, and also By perversions the Defilements.
The Guide-Line that plots out ideas Of profit here, unprofit there,
After thus plotting with the Plotting Of Directions, what then selects 6
The Moulding of the Guide-Lines,
the meaning contained in the two profitable ideas 1 in the Conversion of Relishing may be taken as analysing the plane of existence that is being analysed 2 in the triads. And then all that meaning is demonstrated by three phrasing terms, namely the three profitable roots.
of meaning too 3 is stated by the four terms. There is no plane to demonstrate by the twenty-eight parts 4 since it is already demonstrated by the four terms as the four profitable perceptions, which cover it.
So the measure is the non-confounding of what is demonstrated.
Just as all kinds of concentration can be sought and found in the three kinds of concentration-in that with thinking and exploring, that without thinking and with only exploring, and that without thinking and without exploring-since this is their measure, there being no fourth kind of concentration,
while those creatures with prominent views have much insight and weak cleaving.
“What is form is self;
what I am is form” ;
and he who 1 sees form’s destruction 2 is an annihilationist.
but when creatures of craving temperament find a way of entry into the Noble Ones’ True Idea and Outguiding Discipline, they become Followers by Faith.
To them the Master, or some hearer of his, teaches as follows”
without cleaving to them through mental pain.
hence “pleasant way with sluggish acquaintanceship” is said.
And herein, since creatures of craving temperament with blunt faculties actualize more sluggishly compared with the first-mentioned kind with keen faculties, they renounce with pain and actualize sluggishly,
hence “painful way with sluggish acquaintanceship” is said.
while mind-choice as nutriment and consciousness as nutriment are abandonable by one of view temperament.
and the measure is the four nutriments.
are called remorse,
and the remorse is underlying tendencies.
are called barbs, and they strike the heart and remain there.
-9. Consciousness gripped by the four barbs is steadied on the four ideas : on form, on feeling, on perception, or on determinations.
this is the first Direction.
 Mind-choice as nutriment, the perversion that there is self in the not-self, view assuming, the bond of views, the body-tie of misapprehension, the taint of views, the flood of views, the barb of views, perception as steadying-point for consciousness passing on, the going a bad way through fear :
 Consciousness as nutriment, the perversion that there is permanence in the impermanent, self-theory assuming, the bond of ignorance, the body-tie of insistence that this is truth, 1 the taint of ignorance, the flood of ignorance, the barb of delusion, determinations as steadying-point for consciousness passing on, the going a bad way through delusion, this is the fourth Direction.
Likewise the second, likewise the third, likewise the fourth.
these are the first Direction.
these are the third Direction.
these are the fourth Direction.
that is called the Guide-Line of Plotting of Directions.
are two types of persons.
The unprofitable root delusion moulds itself therefrom by means of the object provocative of onlooking-equanimity.1
three Searches : search for sensual desires, search for being, search for a divine life ,
impart a single meaning and they are the first Direction on the black side.1 The ten second terms of all the dyads are the second Direction.
Herein, of the nine profitable Root-Terms, Quiet and Perception of Ugliness: these are the first Foundation of Mindfulness.
the first Direction has the first Fruit, the second Direction the second Fruit, the third Direction the third Fruit, and the fourth Direction the fourth Fruit.
the first Direction has the Dispositionless, the second Direction the Void, and the third Direction the Signless.
on the profitable side and on the unprofitable side is the Hook Guide-Line.
Craving, Ignorance, And Greed, Hate, and Delusion too,
And with as well Perversions four, Do constitute Defilement’s plane. - The nine terms.
all this profit here Does constitute the Faculties’ plane. - The nine terms.
With nine Root-Terms for each of these Both sides thus total eighteen ter1os .1
The Guide-Line Craving and Ignorance guiding By Quiet and Insight,
and construing Appropriately in the Truths,2 Is the Conversion of Relishing.
As they are, really, not unreally, That Guide-Line they call the Trefoil.
Does Faith’s True Objects 4 The wise in Guide-Lines 4 have called that Lions’ Play
As stated in the prose expounded 5 They call the Plotting of Directions.
All profit ideas and unprofit And guides them right is called the Hook.
the Elder Maha-Kaccayana the Thread-analyser’s in the Pitaka-Disclosure,
showing is completed.
As to the unprofitable and profitable tetrads demonstrated in the Play-of-Lions Guide-Line, the profitable and unprofitable triads demonstrated in the Trefoil Guide-Line, and the profitable and unprofitable dyads demonstrated in the Conversion of Relishing Guide-Line:
That range
The Elder Maha-Kaccayana Dweller in the Rose-Apple Wood’s Pitaka-Disclosure
is finished.
and likewise the three kinds of understanding-that consisting in what is heard, that consisting in cogitation, and that consisting in keeping in being-since they together are demonstrated 1 in all kinds of understanding, understanding having no fourth kind that does not consist in what is heard or cogitation or keeping in being; so too what is called the measure is the non-confounding of these ideas.2
The Blessed One said this:
“Yes, venerable sir,” those bhikkhus replied.
Listen to that and attend closely, I will speak.”
command what punishment for him you wish,’
how would you treat him?”
command what punishment for him you wish,’
how would you treat him?”
or how does it appear to you in this case?”
there is no difference between them at all that I see!”
or how does it appear to you in this case?”
there is no difference between them at all that I see.”
I go to Master Kaccana for refuge and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus.
But since that Blessed One has attained to final Nibbana, we go to that Blessed One for refuge and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus.
It seems that large numbers of people in India used to gather together here and there at city gates and in debating halls and pay gold money to have the various outside-sectarians’ tales, such as the Rape of Sita and the rest, told, each tale to be finished at the end of four months.
In the course of this a talk about good omens started in this way: ‘ What is a good omen? Is what is seen a good omen? Is what is heard a good omen? Is what is sensed a good omen? Who is there that knows what a good omen is?’
‘So’ Then a man who held the seen to be the good omen said “ I know the good omen. The seen is the good omen in the world. For the visible form reputed as the best omen is seen.
For example: here someone, having risen early, sees a talking bird or a bilva sapling or a pregnant woman or children decked out in finery or full offering dishes or a fresh red mullet or a thoroughbred or a chariot with thoroughbreds or a bull or a cow or a brown ox, or else he sees some other such visible form reputed to be the best omen. This is what is called the good omen as the seen “.
Some accepted his statementand some did not.
Those who did not disputed with him.
Then a man who held the heard to be the good omen said “ Sirs, the eye sees both what is clean and what is unclean, likewise what is fair and what is ugly, agreeable and disagreeable.
If the seen were the good omen, it would all be the good omen.
here someone, having risen early, hears the name “Vaddha” or “ Vaddhamäna” or “Punna” or “Phussa” or” Sumana “ or “ Siri “ or “ Sirivaddha “ pronounced, or elsethe words “ today is a good star conjunction “ or “a good period “or “ a good day “ or “ a good omen “, or else he hears some such sound reputed to be the best omen. This is what is called the good omen as the heard “.
Some accepted his statement, too, and some did not.
Those who did not disputed with him.
Then a man who held the sensed to be the good omen said “ Sirs, the ear hears what is good and what is bad, agreeable and disagreeable.
If the heard were the good omen, it would all be the good omen.
For example: here someone, having risen early, smells such a flower scent as lotus scent or chews a fine tooth-stick or he touches earth or touches green crops or fresh cowdung or a tortoise or a basket of sesamum or a flower or a fruit or does plastering with fine clay or clothes himself in fine cloth or wears a fine turban,
Some accepted his statement, too, and some did not.
Herein, he who held the seen to be the good omen could not get the man who held the heard to be the good omen to perceive as he did, . nor could anyone of them get the other two to perceive as he did
With that, those who accepted the statement of him who held the seen to be the good omen went away saying “ Only the seen is the good omen “
while those who accepted the statement of him who held the heard to be the good omen and that of him who held the sensed to be the good omen went away saying respectively “ Only the heard is the good omen “, “ Only the sensed is the good omen “’.
So this talk of good omens became the fashion throughout all India.
And throughout all India men in factions speculated about good omens: ‘ What is a good omen?’
Guardian deities of human beings heard the talk and likewise took to speculating about good omens.
Then there were earth deities who were friends of these. When they heard about it from them, these earth deities also took to speculating about good omens. Then there were space deities who were friends of these, . . . and deities of the Realm of the Four Kings, . . . and so on in this way up as far as . . . Then there were Akanittha Deities who were friends of the Sudassi Deities in the world of High Divinity. When they heard about it from them these Akanittha Deities took to speculating in factions about good omens.
In this way speculation about good omens spread throughout ten thousand world-systems,
and after it had spread, notwithstanding that it kept on being defined, ‘ The good omen is this!’, the good omen is this!’, twelve years went by and still there was no agreed definition.
Except for noble disciples of the Blessed One all men and gods and High Divinities became divided into three factions according to the seen, the heard and the sensed,
no single one of whom had come to a conclusion ‘ Only this is the good omen ‘ that tallied with what actually is the fact, and so it was that the ‘ Good-omen Tumult’ arose in the world.
Now there are five kinds of tumult: an aeon tumult, a Wheel-turner tumult, an Enlightened-one tumult, a good-omen tumult, and a stillness tumult.
Herein, sensual-sphere deities, with their heads bared and theirhair dishevelled, with piteous faces, mopping their tears with their hands, clothed in dyed cloth and wearing their dress in great disorder, travel up and down the haunts of men, making the announcement: At the end of a hundred thousand years there will be the emergence of an aeon. This world will be destroyed. Even the ocean will dry up. This Great Earth, and Sineru, King of Mountains, will be consumed and annihilated. The destruction ofthe earth will extend as far as the World of High Divinity. Maintain lovingkindness in being, good sirs, maintain compassion, gladness, maintain onlooking-equanimity in being, good sirs; care for your mothers, care for your fathers, honour the elders of your clans; be wakeful, do not be negligent!
This is called an aeon tumult.
Sensual-sphere deities, too, travel up and down the haunts of men, making the announcement: At the end of a hundred years a Wheel-turning King will arise in the world.
This is called a Wheel-turner tumult,
Pure-abode deities put on divine ornaments, make divine turbans on their heads, and, full of happiness and joy, they travel up and down the haunts of men, making the announcement: ‘ At the end of a thousand years an Enlightened One will arise in the world.
This is called an Enlightened-one tumult.
Pure-abode deities, too, knowing gods’ and men’s minds, travel up and down the haunts of men, making the announcement:’ At the end of twelve years the Fully Enlightened One will explain the Good Omens.
This is called a Good-Omen Tumult.
Pure-abode deities, too, travel up and down the haunts of men, making the announcement: ‘ At the end of seven years a certain bhikkhu will meet with the Blessed One and question him about the practice of Stillness
This is called the stillness tumult.
Among these five kinds of tumult, it was the good-omen tumult that arose in the world among gods and men, who had become divided into three factions over the seen good omen and the rest.
Then, after repeated investigation amongst gods and men without finding what the good omen was, at last at the end of twelve years the deities belonging to the Body of the Thirty-three met and foregathered, and they took counsel together thus: ‘ Good sirs, just as the owner of a house for the inmates of the house, as the owner of a village for the villagers, as the king for all men, so too this Sakka Ruler of Gods is for us our head and chief, that is to say, by dint of merit, by lordship and understanding he is master ofthe two worlds of gods of the Four Kings and of the Thirty-three. So surely we ought to ask Sakka Ruler of Gods about this matter.
‘Accordingly they went to Sakka’s presence, and after paying homage to Sakka Ruler of Gods, who, with his figure resplendent with raiment and regalia befitting the occasion, and surrounded by abevy of two and a half myriads of nymphs, was seated on the Red Marble Throne at the root of the Päricchattaka Tree, they stood atone side, and they told him: ‘ Good sir, please to know that a question about good omens has now arisen. Some say that the seen is the good omen, some say that it is the heard, and some say that it is the sensed. We and others too have come to no conclusion. It would be good if you would pronounce a verdict.
Now though the Gods’ King has native understanding, still he asked ‘ Where did this talk of good omens first originate?’
They replied ‘ Sire, we heard it from the gods of the Four Kings’ Realm ‘.
Then those of the Four Kings’ Realm said From the space deities’, and the spacedeities said ‘ From the earth deities’, and the earth deities said’ From human beings’ guardian deities’, and the human beings’ guardian deities said ‘ It originated in the human world’.
Then the Ruler of Gods asked’ Where is the Fully Enlightened One living?
‘They replied In the human world, sire ‘.
Has anyone asked that Blessed One? No one, sire.
How then, good sirs, would you forget the fire and kindle a glow-worm to light you that you overlook that Blessed One, teacher of good omens without remainder,and conceive that I should be asked? Come, good sirs, let us ask that Blessed One; then we shall surely obtain a splendid answer. ‘Then he commanded a god’s son: ‘ Do you ask that Blessed One.
‘So that god’s son decorated himself with ornaments to suit the occasion, and then, flaring like a lightning flash and surrounded by a group of gods, he went to the great monastery of Jeta’s Wood, and after paying homage to the Blessed One, he stood at one side. Then, putting the question about the good omen, he uttered the verse: ‘ Gods and men there are full many . . . ’
Therefore the seen is not the good omen. On the contrary the heard is the good omen.
For the sound reputed as the best omen is heard.
For example:
Therefore the heard is not the good omen. On the contrary the sensed is the good omen.
For the odour, flavour and tangible reputed as the best omen is sensed.
or else he smells some such odour, tastes some such flavour, touches some such tangible, reputed to be the best omen. This is called the good omen as the sensed “.
THUS HAVE I HEARD.806 On one occasion, the Blessed One was living at Mithila in the Makhadeva Mango Grove.807
It occurred to the venerable Ananda: “What is the reason, what is the cause, for the Blessed One’s smile?
Tathagatas do not smile for no reason.”
So he arranged his upper robe on one shoulder, and extending his hands in reverential salutation towards the Blessed One, he asked him: “Venerable sir, what is the reason, what is the cause, for the Blessed One’s smile?
Tathagatas do not smile for no reason.”
“Once, Ananda, in this same Mithila there was a king named Makhadeva. He was a righteous king who ruled by the Dhamma, a great king who was established in the Dhamma.808 He conducted himself by the Dhamma among brahmins and householders, among town-dwellers and countryfolk, and he observed the Uposatha days on the fourteenth, fifteenth, and eighth of the fortnight.809
- ‘Yes, sire,’ he replied.
And after many years, many hundred years, many thousand years, the barber saw grey hairs growing on King Makhadeva’s head.810
- “Then, good barber, pull out those grey hairs carefully with tweezers and put them in my palm.’
- ‘Yes, sire, he replied, and he pulled out those grey hairs carefully with tweezers and put them in the king’s palm.
“Then King Makhadeva gave the best township to his barber, and calling the prince, his eldest son, he said: ‘Dear prince, the divine messengers have appeared;811 grey hairs are seen growing on my head. I have enjoyed human sensual pleasures; now it is time to seek divine sensual pleasures.
Come, dear prince, take over the kingship.
I shall shave off my hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and go forth from the home life into homelessness.
And now, dear prince, when you too see grey hairs growing on your head, then after giving the best township to your barber, and after carefully instructing the prince, your eldest son, in kingship, shave off your hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and go forth from the home life into homelessness.
Continue this good practice instituted by me and do not be the last man.
Dear prince, when there are two men living, he under whom there occurs a breach of this good practice - he is the last man among them.
Therefore, dear prince, I say to you: Continue this good practice instituted by me and do not be the last man.’
“Then, after giving the best township to his barber and after carefully instructing the prince, his eldest son, in kingship, in the Makhadeva Mango Grove he shaved off his hair and beard, put on the yellow robe, and went forth from the home life into homelessness.
“He abided pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, likewise the second, likewise the third, likewise the fourth; so above, below, around, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he abided pervading the all-encompassing world with a mind imbued with loving-kindness, abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.
“He abided pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with compassion…with a mind imbued with appreciative joy…with a mind imbued with equanimity, likewise the second, likewise’ the third, likewise the fourth; so above, below, around, and everywhere, and to all as to himself, he abided pervading the all-encompassing world with a mind imbued with equanimity, abundant, exalted, immeasurable, without hostility and without ill will.
“For eighty-four thousand years King Makhadeva played childish games; for eighty-four thousand years he acted as viceregent; for eighty-four thousand years he governed the kingdom; for eighty-four thousand years he led the holy life in this Makhadeva Mango Grove after shaving off his hair and beard, putting on the yellow robe, and going forth from the home life into homelessness.
By developing the four divine abodes, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he passed on to the Brahma-world.
“Now at the end of many years, many hundred years, many thousand years, King Makhadeva’s son addressed his barber thus:……
“The descendants of King Makhadeva’s son to the number of eighty-four thousand kings in succession, after shaving off their hair and beard and putting on the yellow robe, went forth from the home life into homelessness in this Makhadeva Mango Grove.
with compassion…with appreciative joy…with equanimity…without ill will.
“For eighty-four thousand years they played childish games; for eighty-four thousand years they acted as vice- regents; for eighty-four thousand years they governed the kingdom; for eighty-four thousand years they led the holy life in this Makhadeva Mango Grove after shaving off their hair and beard, putting on the yellow robe, and going forth from the home life into homelessness.
By developing the four divine abodes, on the dissolution of the body, after death, they passed on to the Brahma-world.
“Nimi was the last of those kings. He was a righteous king who ruled by the Dhamma, a great king who was established in the Dhamma. He conducted himself by the Dhamma among brahmins and householders, among town-dwellers and country- folk, and he observed the Uposatha days on the fourteenth, fifteenth, and eighth of the fortnight.
“Once, Ananda, when the gods of the Thirty-three had met together and were seated in the Sudhamma Assembly, this discussion arose among them: ‘It is a gain, sirs, for the people of Videha, it is a great gain for the people of Videha that their King Nimi is a righteous king who rules by the Dhamma, a great king who is established in the Dhamma. He conducts himself by the Dhamma among brahmins and householders, among town- dwellers and countryfolk, and he observes the Uposatha days on the fourteenth, fifteenth, and eighth of the fortnight.’
Then Sakka, ruler of gods, addressed the gods of the Thirty- three: ‘Good sirs, do you want to see King Nimi?”
- ‘Good sir, we want to see King Nimi.’
“Now on that occasion, it being the Uposatha day of the fifteenth, King Nimi had washed his head and ascended to the upper palace chamber, where he was seated for the Uposatha observance.
Then, just as quickly as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm, Sakka, ruler of gods, vanished among the gods of the Thirty-three and appeared in the presence of King Nimi.
He said: ‘It is a gain for you, great king, it is a great gain for you, great king.
When the gods of the Thirty-three had met together and were seated in the Sudhamma Assembly, this discussion arose among them: “It is a gain, sirs, for the people of Videha…eighth of the fortnight.”
Great king, the gods want to see you.
I shall send a chariot harnessed to a thousand thoroughbreds for you, great king. Great king, mount the divine chariot without misgiving.’
“King Nimi consented in silence.
Then, just as quickly as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm, Sakka, ruler of gods, vanished in the presence of King Nimi and appeared among the gods of the Thirty-three.
“Then Sakka, ruler of gods, addressed the charioteer Matali thus: ‘Come, good Matali, prepare a chariot harnessed to a thousand thoroughbreds, and go to King Nimi and say: “Great king, this chariot harnessed to a thousand thoroughbreds has been sent for you by Sakka, ruler of gods. Great king, mount the divine chariot without misgiving.’“
‘“May your words be held sacred” the charioteer Matali replied. And having prepared a chariot harnessed to a thousand thoroughbreds, he went to King Nimi and said: ‘Great king, this chariot harnessed to a thousand thoroughbreds has been sent for you by Sakka, ruler of gods. Great king, mount the divine chariot without misgiving.
But, great king, by which route shall I drive you: by that on which doers of evil experience the results of evil actions, or by that on which doers of good experience the results of good actions?”
- ‘Drive me by both routes, Matali.’812
“Matali brought King Nimi to the Sudhamma Assembly.
Sakka, ruler of gods, saw King Nimi coming in the distance
Welcome, great king!
The gods of the Thirty-three, great king, seated in the Sudhamma Assembly, have expressed themselves thus: “It is a gain, sirs, for the people of Videha…eighth of the fortnight.”
Great king, the gods of the Thirty-three want to see you.
Great king, enjoy divine might among the gods.’
“‘Enough, good sir. Let the charioteer drive me back to Mithila.
There I will conduct myself by the Dhamma among brahmins and householders, among town-dwellers and country- folk; there I will observe the Uposatha days on the fourteenth, fifteenth, and eighth of the fortnight.’
“Then Sakka, ruler of gods, told the charioteer Matali: ‘Come, good Matali, prepare the chariot harnessed to a thousand thoroughbreds and drive King Nimi back to Mithila.’
‘“May your word be held sacred,’ the charioteer Matali replied. And having prepared the chariot harnessed to a thousand thoroughbreds, he drove King Nimi back to Mithila.
And there, indeed, King Nimi conducted himself by the Dhamma among brahmins and householders, among town-dwellers and countryfolk; and there he observed the Uposatha days on the fourteenth, fifteenth, and eighth of the fortnight.
“Then at the end of many years, many hundred years, many thousand years, King Nimi addressed his barber thus: ……
“Now King Nimi had a son named Kalarajanaka.
He did not go forth from the home life into homelessness.
He broke that good practice.
He was the last man among them.
“Now, Ananda, it may be that you think thus: ‘Certainly, someone else was King Makhadeva on that occasion.’
But it should not be regarded thus.
I was King Makhadeva on that occasion. I instituted that good practice and later generations continued that good practice instituted by me.
But that kind of good practice does not lead to disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana, but only to reappearance in the Brahma-world.
But there is this kind of good practice that has been instituted by me now, which leads to complete disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
And what is that good practice?
It is this Noble Eightfold Path; that is, right view, right intention, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration.
This is the good practice instituted by me now, which leads to complete disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to peace, to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
“Ananda, I say to you: continue this good practice instituted by me and do not be the last man.
Ananda, when there are two men living, he under whom there occurs a breach of this good practice - he is the last man among them.
Therefore, Ananda, I say to you: continue this good practice instituted by me and do not be the last man.”813
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Ananda was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
Then in a certain place the Blessed One smiled.
There are full many is a demonstrative of an indefinite number; hence what is meant is: several hundreds, several thousands.
They sport , thus they are gods ; the meaning is:they play with the five strands of sensual desires, or they glitter with their own splendour.
Moreover, as to the word deva, it is threefold as convention, rebirth, and purification,
according as it is said’
“ God “ : there are three kinds of gods, namely, gods by convention, gods by rebirth, and gods by purification.
Kings, queens and princes are called “ gods by convention “,
the gods of the Four Kings’ Realm or the gods higher than that are called “Gods by rebirth “,
and the Arahants are called” gods by purification “ .
Among these it is the gods by rebirth that are intended here.
Men : they are the offspring of Manu , thus they are men ;
though the Ancients say ‘ They are men because of prominence of mind .
They are of four kinds as belonging to the four great continents of Jambudipa in the South, Aparagoyäna in the West, Uttarakuru in the North, and Pubbavideha in the East, Here those of Jambudipa are intended.
Creatures fall in with weal by means of these , thus they are good omens ; the meaning is that they reach success and increment.
Speculating on: acintayum=cintesum . Which, they hope, will bring them : which they want, aspire to, long for.
Safety is a safe state ; what is meant is: ‘ Hoping to assure the existence , here and now and in lives to come, of all such ideas as are creditable , admirable, and good.
’ Tell then : teach, clarify, announce, reveal, expound, explain.
The good omen : the reason for success, reason for prosperity, reason for all excellence.
Supreme :distinguished, lofty, which brings welfare and pleasure to all the world.
Out of desire to hear about the Good-omen Question, deities belonging to ten thousand world-systems had met together in this world-system and had each created for himself a selfhood so subtle that ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, sixty, seventy, even eighty, could stand together on an area no bigger than the pointof a single hair’s tip, and so they stood round the Blessed One, who was sitting on the Enlightened One’s throne prepared for him, outshining in his splendour and lustre all the gods, the Märas and the High Divinities; so since this god’s son saw this, and since he knew with his mind even the thoughts in the minds of all the human beings in the whole of Jambudipa’s land who had been unable to come on that occasion, then, in order to draw out from all, be it gods or men, the dart of uncertainty, he uttered these words:
Gods and men there are full many Speculating on good omens,
Which, they hope, will bring them safety —wanting each his own safety—: Tell, then, the supreme good omen,
being questioned by me with the consent of these gods, and for the sake of aiding men, tell us out of pity, Blessed One, what omen is supreme for all of us by its bringing pure welfare and pleasure.
Herein, not consorting is not frequenting, not reverencing.
With the foolish : they are strong, they breathe , thus they are fools ; the intention is that they live with mere in-breath and out-breath instead of with the life of understanding .
With that sort of foolish men.
Rather with the wise : they pick their way , thus they are wise ; the intention is that they go with the gait of knowledge of benefits here and now and in the life to come.
With that sort of wise men.
Consorting: frequenting, reverencing, them; companionship, intimacy,with them. Honouring : worshipping, respecting, revering, paying homage.
The honourable : those worthy of honour.
This is a supreme good omen : he said’ This is a supreme good omen ‘ referring collectively to all that he had just mentioned, namely, the non-consorting with fools, the consorting with the wise, and the honouring of the honourable;
what is meant is: ‘ Since you have asked “ What is the supreme good omen? “, take it that, in the first place, this is a supreme good omen.’
This is the word-commentary to this stanza.
The commentary on the meaning should be understood as follows. The Blessed One spoke this stanza after hearing these words of the god’s son’s thus.
Herein, there are four kinds of talk: talk asked for, talk unasked for, talk with sequence of meaning, and talk without sequence of meaning.
Herein, in such passages as ‘O Gotama of abundant understanding, How act disciples to be good? I ask ‘ and such passages as Good sir, how did you come to cross the flood? ‘ what is spoken by him thus questioned is ‘ talk asked for ‘ .
In such passages as ‘ That which others count as pleasure Noble Ones will count as pain’ what is spoken by one without first being questioned and inspired by one’s own inclination is ‘ talk unasked for’ .
Because of the words “Bhikkhus, I teach the True Idea with sources ‘ all Enlightened Ones’ talk is ‘ talk with sequence of meaning’ .
In this Dispensation there is no ‘ talk without sequence of meaning’ .
So out of these four kinds of talk this is ‘ talk asked for ‘ becauseit was spoken by the Blessed One when asked by this god’s son.
And in the case of talk asked for, just as, when a clever man who isskilled in what is the path and skilled in what is not the path, is asked the path, then, after first telling what should be avoided, heafterwards tells what should be taken, saying ‘There is a road-fork in that place; there leave the left and take the right’ , so too-, with respect to what should and what should not be consortedwith, what should be consorted with can be told after telling what should not be consorted with.
And the Blessed One is like the man skilled in the path,
according as it is said
’ “ The man skilledin the path”: this, Tissa, is a designation for a Perfect One, accomplished and fully enlightened ‘ ;
for he is ‘ Skilled in this world, skilled in the other world, skilled in what is the sphere of mortality, skilled in what is not the sphere of mortality, skilled in what is Mära’s sphere, skilled in what is not Mära’s sphere’ .
That is why, telling first what should not be consorted with, he said Not consorting with the foolish, Rather with wise men consorting ‘,
since, to start with, fools should not be consorted with, should not be reverenced, like the path to be abandoned, and next the wise should be consorted with, should be reverenced, like the road to be taken.
If it is asked ‘ But why were the non-consorting with foolsand the consorting with the wise mentioned first by the Blessed One when speaking about the good omen?
‘—It may be stated as follows: It was through consorting with fools that gods and men took up the view of good omens that assumed the good omen to be the seen, etc. , and that is no good omen. That is why the Blessed One spoke first of non-consorting with fools and consorting with the wise, thus condemning association with those who are not good friends, which is injurious to good in both this world and the next, and commending association with good friends, which ensures good in both worlds.
Herein, the foolish are any creatures who follow out the unprofitable courses of action beginning with killing breathing things; and they can be recognized in three aspects,
according as it is said in the Suttas: Bhikkhus, there are three characteristics of the fool ‘.
Furthermore, the six dissident teachers beginning with Pürana Kassapa , then Devadatta andhis followers, namely, Kokälika, Katamoraka-Tissa, Khandä-deviyäputta and Samuddadatta , and also Cincamänavikä , etc., and in bygone times Dighavida’s brother, and other such creatures as these should be understood as fools.
They are like a smouldering ember: with their misapprehension they ruin both themselves and those who give effect to their words.
And so it is that Dighavida’s brother has been lying prone where he fell in the Great Hell, ripening out his evil actions for four Buddha-intervals with a selfhood 60 leagues inextent. And so it is that five hundred clans who confessed his view were reborn as his retinue to ripen out their evil actions in the Great Hell.
And this is said:
Bhikkhus, just as a fire that starts in a rush shed or a grass shed burns down even an upper chamber plastered within and without, closed off, secured by bars, with windows shuttered, so too, whatever fears arise, all arise owing to fools, not owing to wise men.
Whatever perils arise,… Whatever calamities arise, all arise owing to fools, not owing to wise men.
While the fool brings fear, the wise man does not.
While the fool brings peril, the wise man does not. While the fool brings calamity,the wise man does not .
Moreover a fool resembles stale fish, and one who consorts with him resembles a leaf-bag in which stale fish has been wrapped and so becomes fit only for wise men’s rejection and disgust.
And this is said:
’ Now when a man ties up with blades Of kusa grass some fetid fish,
The blades of grass get fetid too: Such is consorting with a fool’ .
And when the boon was being granted by Sakka Ruler of Gods, Akittipandita said:
Let me not see or hear a fool,’ Let me not live where lives a fool,
Let me not choose to have to do’ In verbal traffic with a fool.
—What has a fool then done by you,’ Kassapa, teil what is the cause’
Why you have preference so great’ That never fool may cross your sight?’
—He leads half-wittedly to loss, And counsels irresponsibly,’
Prefers misjudgment, and, if told What is correct, shows restiveness.
’ Nothing he knows of discipline; ‘Tis good to have no sight of him ‘ .
When the Blessed One had said that non-consorting with fools is a good omen, thus condemning consorting with fools in every aspect, he now said that consorting with the wise is a good omen aswell, commending consorting with the wise.
Herein, the wise are any creatures who follow out the ten profitable courses of action beginning with abstention from killing breathing things; and they can be recognized in three aspects,
Furthermore, the Enlightened Ones and Hermit Enlightened Ones, the eighty Great Disciples, and the other disciples of Perfect Ones such as Sunetta,Mahä Govinda, Vidhura, Sarabhanga, Mahosadha, Sutasoma,King Nimi, Prince Ayoghara, and Akittipanclita, should be understood as wise men.
They are as capable of eliminating all fear, risk and calamity for those who give effect to their words as are protection in a rebellion, a lamp in darkness, food and drink and so on ina state of being overcome by pain of hunger and thirst and so on.
For innumerable indeed and not to be measured are the gods and men who, after coming to the Perfect One, have attained exhaustion of taints or become established in the world of High Divinity , or become established in the world of sensual-sphere gods or been reborn in the world of the happy destinations as human beings.
Eighty thousand clans were reborn in heaven after gaining confidence in the Elder Sariputta and serving him with the four requisite-conditions for the bhikkhu’s life; and likewise all the other great disciples, Mahä Moggalläna, Mahä Kassapa, and so on. Some of the teacher Sunetta’s disciples reappeared in the world of High Divinity,some in the sensual-sphere world in the company of the Paranim-mitavasavatti Gods ,… some in the company of the householder clans of the great halls.
And this is said:
Bhikkhus, it is not owing to a wise man that there is fear, it is not owing to a wise man that thereis peril, it is not owing to a wise man that there is calamity ‘.
Moreover, a wise man resembles such scented goods as tagara flowers, and one who consorts with him resembles a leaf in which tagara flowers have been wrapped, and he becomes fitf or wise men’s cultivation and approval.
And this is said:
Now when in foliage a man’ Ties up some tagara incense,
The leaves will of the scent partake:’ Such is consorting with the wise ‘ .
And when the boon was being granted by Sakka Ruler of Gods, Akittipanoüta said:
—Oh let me see and hear wise men,’ Oh let me live where live wise men,
Oh let me choose to have to do’ In verbal traffic with the wise.
’ —What have the wise then done for you, Kassapa, teil what is the cause’
Why you have preference so great’ That wise men always cross your sight?
’ —They lead wise-wittedly to gain, Counsel not irresponsibly,’
Prefer good judgment, and, if told’ What is correct, show docileness.
’ And discipline they understand:’ ‘Tis good to have to do with them ‘ .
When the Blessed One had said that consorting with wise men is a good omen, thus commending consorting with wise men in every aspect, he now said that honouring the honourable is a good omen, commending the act of honouring to those who have, through non-consorting with fools and consorting with wise men, approachedthe honourable.
Herein, the Enlightened Ones, the Blessed Ones, are honourable because they are devoid of all vices and possessed of all virtues.
Next after them the Hermit Enlightened Ones and the Noble Disciples; for the honouring of them, even if itis little, conduces for long to welfare and pleasure.The examples here are Sumana the garland-maker, Mallikä, and so on.
Herein,we shall relate one example. One day, it seems, when it was morning, the Blessed One dressed,and taking his bowl and outer robe, went into Räjagaha for alms.
Sumana the garland-maker was on his way to the king of Magadha with some flowers. He saw the Blessed One, who inspired confidence, invited confidence, as, gleaming with a Buddha’s splendour, he was coming to the city gate. When he saw him, he thought’ The king might pay me a hundred or a thousand for these flowers, but that would only be pleasure of this world. On the other hand,honour done to the Blessed One is immeasurable, its fruit is incalculable and for long brings welfare and pleasure. So I shall honour the Blessed One with these flowers. And with confident heart hetook a handful of flowers and threw them in the Blessed One’s direction. The flowers travelled through the air and remained suspended over the Blessed One in the form of a flower canopy.
Seeing this mighty wonder, he became still more confident in his heart, and again he threw a handful. They travelled as before and remained suspended in the form of a flower curtain.
In that way he threw eight handfuls. They travelled as before and remained suspended in the form of a flower palanquin,
the Blessed One being inside the palanquin. A huge body of people gathered.
Seeing the garland-maker, the Blessed One manifested a smile.
The Elder Änanda thought Buddhas do not manifest a smile without cause or condition’, and he asked the reason.
The Blessed One said Änanda, through the might of this honouring, this garland-maker will, after traversing the round for a hundred thousand aeons among gods and men, at last become a Hermit Enlightened Onecalled Sumanissara ‘,
and at the end of his utterance he pronounced this stanza for the purpose of inculcating the True Idea:’
Good is the act that, when performed, Entails no burning of remorse;’
To reap whose ripening a man’ Is overjoyed and glad at heart ’.
And at the end of the stanza eighty-four thousand breathing things attained the True Idea.
That is how it should be understood that the honouring of them, even if it is little, conduces for long to welfare and pleasure.
And that was an honouring with only material things, so what need besaid of honouring with practice?
Consequently, when clansmen do honour to the Blessed One by the Going for Refuge, the acceptance of the Training Precepts, and the giving effect to the Uposatha Factors, and by their own special qualities beginning with the Virtue of the Fourfold Purity, who can estimate the fruits of their honouring?
For they are said to honour a Perfect One with thehighest honour’
according as it is said ‘
Änanda, the bhikkhu or bhikkhuni or layman follower or laywoman follower who abides inthe way of practice in accordance with the True Idea and has entered upon the proper way, behaving in accordance with the True Idea, he it is that worships, respects, and reveres a Perfect One and honours him with the highest honour’ .
And the bringing of welfare and pleasure by honouring Hermit Enlightened Ones and Enlightened Ones’ disciples should be understood in the same way.
Moreover, in the case of laymen it should be understood that elder brothers and sisters are to be honoured by a junior, mother and father by a son, and husband, mother-in-law and father-in-law by the daughters-in-law of a clan.
For in their case the honouring is a good omen, too, because it is their profitable ideas that are called ‘ honouring’ and because these are a cause of increase in life-span and the rest;
for this is said
’ Those who love mothers, love fathers, love monks, love divines, and are deferential to seniors of clans, proceed in giving effect to this profitable idea. Because of their giving effect to profitable ideas they find increase inlife-span and in good appearance ‘ .
Defining, We show, lastly, how it is so’ it was stated in the Schedule  what still needs to be said can be stated as follows. There are, in fact, three good omens mentioned in this stanza, namely, non-consorting with fools, consorting with the wise, and honouring the honourable.
Herein, non-consorting with fools should be understood as a good omen because it is a cause for welfare in both worlds by its safeguarding people from the fears that have for their condition consorting with fools. Then consorting with the wise and honouring the honourable should be understood as good omens because they area cause for extinction and for the happy destinations in the way stated in the explanation of the greatness of their fruit.
But in what follows we shall in each instance define the good omen and explain how it isa good omen without referring to the Schedule.
The commentary on the meaning of this stanza Not consorting with the foolish ‘ is ended.
according as it is said in the Suttas ‘ Bhikkhus, there are these three characteristics of the wise man’ .
Now although the Blessed One had been begged for little with the single request ‘ Tell, then, the supreme good omen’, still, like the rare man who is a generous giver, notwithstanding that he had already stated three good omens in a single stanza, he began again to speak of many good omens with the stanzas beginning’ Living in befitting places’, doing so owing to deities desire to hear more than that, owing to the existence of yet further good omens, and owing to his own desire to enjoin upon the various creatures the good omens best suited to them wherever they might be.
Herein, in the third stanza, to start with, befitting means favourable.
Places : village, town, city, country;and, in fact, any locality inhabited by creatures.
Living : living there.
In the past : before, in previous births.
Having . . . made merit : having stored up profitable action.
Self is what cognizance is called, or else it is the whole selfhood. Right direction in . . . guidance : right directing of that self; prompting, placing, is what is meant.
The rest is as already stated.
This is the word-commentary here.
The commentary on the meaning should be understood as follows. What is called living in befitting places is living where the four kinds of assembly are found, where the grounds for making merit beginning with giving exist , and where the Master’s Dispensation with its nine factors is in evidence; Living there is called a good omen because it is a condition for creatures’ making merit.
An example here is the story of the fisherman who entered the Island of Ceylon , and so on .
Another method: the place which is the site of the Blessed One’s enlightenment is called a befitting place’ and likewise the place where the Wheel of the True Idea was set rolling, and the place at the root of the Ganda Mango Tree where the Twin Marvel was shown in the midst of an assembly twelve leagues across, disrupting the theories of all outside sectarians, the place of the Descent from the Gods, or any other place inhabited by the Enlightened One such as Sävatthi, Räjagaha, and so on. Living there is called a good omen because it is a condition for creatures’ obtaining the six Unsurpassables .
Another method: ‘ In the eastern direction: the town called Kajangala; on the far side of that, Mahäsälä; beyond that, the outland countries; to the near side is in the middle.
In the southeastern direction: the river called SalalavatI; beyond that, the outland countries; to the near side is in the middle.
In the southern direction: the town called Setakannika; beyond that, the out-land countries; to the near side of that is in the middle.
In the western direction: a Divine-caste village called Thüna; beyond that the outland countries; to the near side is in the middle.
In the northern direction: a rock called Usiraddhaja; beyond that, the out-land countries; to the near side is in the middle ‘ .
This Middle Place is three hundred leagues wide and two hundred and fifty broad and nine hundred in circumference.
Here the Wheel-turning Monarchs who exercise sovereignty and dominance over the four great continents and the two thousand small islands arise. And here, after fulfilling the Perfections during one incalculable age and a hundred thousand aeons the Great Disciples, Säriputta, Moggalläna, and the others, arise. And here, after fulfilling the Perfections for two incalculable ages and a hundred thousand aeons, the Hermit Enlightened Ones arise. And here, after fulfilling the Perfections for four, eight, or sixteen incalculable ages and a hundred thousand aeons, the Fully Enlightened Ones arise.
Herein, by following the advice of a Wheel-turning Monarch and establishing themselves in the five virtues creatures become destined for heaven.
Likewise by following the advice of Hermit Enlightened Ones. But by following the advice of a Fully Enlightened One or that of his disciple they become destined for heaven and destined for extinction .
That is why living there is called a good omen since it is a condition for these lands of excellence.
The fact of having in past births stored up profitable action contingent upon honouring Enlightened Ones, Hermit Enlightened Ones and those with taints exhausted is called having in the past made merit . That is a good omen too.
Why?
Because, after seeing an Enlightened One or a Hermit Enlightened One face-to-face, or after hearing even a four-line stanza in the presence of an Enlightened One or his disciple, Arahantship can be reached in the end.
And when a human being has had previous practice so that the root of what is profitable is prominent in him , then by means of that same root of what is profitable he arouses insight and so reaches the exhaustion of taints, like King Mahä Kappina and his chief queen .
That is why it is said that having in the past made merit is a good omen.
Right direction in self-guidance is stated thus: ‘ Here someone that was unvirtuous establishes himself in virtue, that was faithless establishes himself in the excellence of faith, that was avaricious establishes himself in the excellence of generosity.
This is called “ right direction in self-guidance” ‘ . That also is a good omen.
Why?
Because it is a cause for attaining the numerous benefits, both here and now and inthe life to come that are due to the abandoning of risk.
So in this stanza there are also three good omens stated with living in befitting places, having in the past made merit, and right direction in self-guidance;
The commentary on the meaning of this stanza, namely, Living in befitting places ‘ is ended.
This is called a befitting place.
and how they are good omens has already been made clear in each instance.
Now as to Ample learning ‘: here ample learning means the state of having heard much .
A craft is any hand-skill.
A . .. disciplining : disciplining of body, speech and mind.
Well-trained : properly trained.
Well spoken : properly spoken.
Any : an indefinite demonstrative.
Speech : utterance, pronouncement.
The rest is as already stated.
This is the word-commentary here.
The commentary on the meaning should be understood as follows. The phrase ample learning is commented on as remembering the Master’s Dispensation’ in the way beginning ‘Remembers what he has heard and consolidates what he has heard ’ and ‘Here someone has heard much — Threads of Argument , Songs , Expositions , . .. ‘ . That is called a good omen since it is a cause for abandoning what is unprofitable and achieving what is profitable, and since it is a cause for gradually realizing the ultimate meaning .
And this is said by the Blessed One
’ Bhikkhus, a well-taught noble disciple abandons what is unprofitable and maintains in being what is profitable, he abandons what is blamable and maintains in being what is blameless, he keeps himself pure’ ,
and it is said further
He investigates the meaning of ideas remembered. When he investigates the meaning of ideas remembered, he gets a liking for meditation upon ideas. With the liking for meditating upon ideas, zeal springs up. One in whom zeal has sprung up is actively engaged. Through being actively engaged, he makes judgments. When he has made a judgment, he makes an endeavour-to-control. When he makes an endeavour-to-control, he realizes with the body the ultimate truth, and he sees it by penetration of it with understanding’ .
Furthermore any ‘ample learning’ concerned with the house life should be understood as a good omen, if blameless, since that, too, leads to welfare and pleasure in both worlds.
As far as concerns the word craft , there is craft in house life and craft in homelessness.
Herein, craft in house life consists in such work as that of a jeweller or goldsmith, which is far from what is morally unprofitable since it is devoid of injury of other breathing things, and it is a good omen since it conduces to well-being in this world.
Craft in homelessness consists in work on the monk’s requisites such as the laying-out and sewing of robes, etc., which is given in detail here and there in the way beginning Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu is clever in any great or little task for his companions in the Divine Life’ , of which it is said ‘ This is a helpful idea ‘ . That too should be understood as a good omen since it brings welfare and pleasure in both worlds alike to oneself and to others.
As far as concerns disciplining ,
there is firstly disciplining in the house life, which is the abstaining from the ten courses of unprofitable action. When that is well trained in by not offending through defilement and by defining the special qualities of virtuous conduct, it is a good omen since it brings welfare and pleasure in both worlds.
Then there is disciplining in the homeless state, which is non-offence under the seven categories of offences; it is well trained in in the way already stated. Or else disciplining in the homeless state is the Virtue of the Fourfold Purity . When that is well trained in by such a training that one established in it reaches Arahantship, it should be understood as a good omen since itis a cause for attaining both mundane and supramundane pleasure.
Any speech that is well spoken should be understood as speech devoid of the defects of lying, harsh speech,malicious speech, and gossip,
according as it is said ‘ Bhikkhus, when speech possesses four factors it is well spoken ‘ .
Or else speech simply without gossip is ‘ well spoken’,
according as it is said:’
Now those At Peace say: First, well-spokenness;’
Second, speak but the True Idea, naught else;’
And third, speak only kindly, not unkindly;
And fourth, speak only truth and nothing false ‘ .
This should be understood as a good omen since it brings welfare and pleasure in both worlds.
Now this well-spokenness is normally included in disciplining’; nevertheless since it isseparately mentioned in this stanza ‘ disciplining ‘ should be taken to exclude it here.
However, why all this trouble? What is to be understood here as ‘ well-spokenness’ is the words used in teaching the True Idea to others;
for that, like ‘ living in befitting places’, is called a good omen since it is a condition for creatures to attain welfare and pleasure in both worlds and also extinction as well.
And this is said too:’
The speech where with a Buddha tells How safely to attain extinction’
And make an end of suffering:’ Of all kinds this is surely first’ .
So in this stanza there are four good omens stated with ample learning, a craft, well-trained disciplining, and well-spoken speech.
The commentary on the stanza ‘ Ample learning’ is ended.
How they are good omens has already been made clear in each instance.
Aid is the act of aiding .
Spheres of work are simply work .
The rest is as already stated. This is the word-commentary.
The commentary on the meaning should be understood as follows. A mother is a parent and so is a father .
Aid is the furnishing of assistance by provision of the four requisite-conditions for life together with washing of feet, rubbing,anointing and bathing.
Herein, the mother and father are very helpful to children, desiring their welfare and sympathizing with them, so that when they see their little children who have been playing outside come in with their bodies covered with dirt, they show their affection by cleaning off the dirt, stroking their heads and kissing them all over. And children can never repay a mother and father for that even were they to carry them about on their heads for a hundred years .
And then since they, as educators and providers and instructors about this world, stand, as it were, in the place of the High Divinity and are reckoned as equal to the Former Teachers, aid provided for them brings commendation here in this life and heavenly pleasure after death.
And this is said by the Blessed One:
’ Parents may indeed be called’ Divinities and Former Teachers;
They merit children’s sacrifice’ For sympathizing with their offspring.
For that a wise man venerates’ And worships them; he makes provision
With what they need for food and drink,’ With clothing and with bed as well,’
With care in bathing and anointing, With washing of their feet besides.
’ For such behaviour towards His mother and his father thus’
The wise commend him here, and when’ He dies he goes to heavenly bliss ‘ .
Another method: aid is of five kinds, namely, sustenance, performance of tasks, maintenance of the clan’s traditions, etc., and that should be understood as a good omen since it is a cause for the five kinds of welfare here and now beginning with protection from evil.
And this is said by the Blessed One:
’ Householder’s son, mother and father, as the eastern direction, can be aided in five instances by a son: “ I, who was given sustenance by them, shall sustain them, I shall perform their tasks for them, I shall maintain the traditions of their clan, I shall keep up their inheritance, and in addition I shall make continual offerings for them when they have passed on and completed their time “.
When mother and father,as the eastern direction, are aided by a son in these five instances they are sympathetic with their son in five instances: they protect him from evil, they encourage him to do good, they have him trained in a craft, they have him joined to a suitable wife, and when it is the occasion they hand over their inheritance to him’ .
Furthermore, he who aids his mother and father by arousing in them confidence in the three Objects of faith—in the Enlightened One, the True Idea and the Community— by getting them to give effect to virtue, or by the Going Forth, is the foremost of those who aid their parents.
For wife and children : here both sons and daughters born of oneself come to be counted as ‘ children ‘ ;
’ wife ‘ is any one of the twenty kinds of female spouse.
Support is the giving of help by cherishing, etc.;
and that should be understood as a good omen since it is a cause for the welfare and pleasure here and now consisting in well-ordered work and so on.
And this is said by the Blessed One ‘ Wife and children can be understood as the western direction ‘ and the ‘wife and children’ cited here are included by the words ‘ female spouse ‘ in the following passage: ‘ Householder’s son, a female spouse, as the western direction, can be aided in return by a husband in five instances: by cherishing, by non-despising, by non-betrayal, by relinquishing authority, and by giving presents of ornaments.
When a female spouse, as the western direction, is aided in return by a husband in these five instances, she is sympathetic with her husband in five instances: she is well-ordered in her work, her retainers are properly supported, she does not betray her husband, she preserves what has been earned, and she is clever and industrious in all tasks ‘ .
Still another method: Support is the act of supporting with gifts, kind words, and helpful behaviour, that are lawful;
for example, giving pocket-money on Uposatha days, allowing the seeing of festivals on festival days, ensuring good omens on omen days, and advice and instruction about aims here and now and in life to come.
That should be understood as a good omen since it is a cause for welfare here and now in the way already stated, since it is a cause for welfare in life to come owing to its being in accordance with the True Idea, and since it is a cause for veneration by deities,
according as Sakka Ruler of Gods, has said:
’ The merit-making householders,’ The virtuous lay-followers,’
Who lawfully support their wives:’ I venerate them, Mätali’ .
The spheres of work that are said to bring no conflict are such spheres of work as agriculture , cattle-keeping, commerce, etc., which, owing to their promoting punctuality, seemly action, industriousness, excellence of energy in rising early, and freedom from malpractices, are devoid of any such unprofitableness as dilatoriness, unseemly action, inaction, tardy action, and the like.
These are called a good omen, since, when thus exercised either through one’s own shrewdness or through that of one’s wife and children or one’s bonds men and servants, they are a cause for the obtaining of increased riches here and now.
And this is said by the Blessed One
’ One seemly in his acts, responsible,’ Who rises early, will augment his fortune ‘ , and
’ Whose habit is to sleep by day,’ And who is seen to rise by night,
And constantly gets drunk with wine,’ Is all unfit to keep a house.
’ “ Too cold! Too hot! Too late! “ they say;
And opportunities pass by’ The tyros who thus shirk the task.
But he that heeds no more than straws’ Both cold and heat,
doing men’s work, ‘Need never fail in happiness ‘ , and again
’ So when a man saves up his wealth,’ Emulating the honey-bee,
His riches will accumulate, Just as an ant-hill is built up ‘ , and so on.
So in this stanza there are just the four good omens stated with aid for a mother, aid for a father, support for wife and children, and spheres of work that bring no conflict. But there are five by taking wife and child separately, and there are only three if mother and father are taken together.
How they are good omens has already been made clear in each instance.
The commentary in the meaning of this stanza ‘ Aid for mother and for father’ is ended.
That is why it is called a good omen.
Now that aid of his to his mother and father, which is aid in return for aid given to him by his mother and father, is a good omen since it is the footing for many benefits both here and now and in the life to come.
Now as to ‘ Giving’: by means of this one gives , thus it is a giving ; what is meant is that what is with one self is transferred to another.
The conduct of the True Idea or conduct not deviating from the True Idea is True-Idea conduct .
These are known to us , thus they are kin .
Unexceptionable is that which is not to be taken exception to ; unblamed, uncensured, is what is meant.
The rest is as already stated. This is the word-commentary.
The commentary on the meaning should be understood as follows. Giving is a term for the choice, preceded by contentment, consisting in giving up in someone else’s favour one or other of the ten objects of giving beginning with food , or else it is the non-greed associated with that choice;
for it is through non-greed that this object is transferred to another. Hence it was said above By means of this one gives, thus it is a giving.
That is called a good omen since it is a cause for achieving the special fruits, both here and now and in life to come, consisting in dearness to many, etc.;
and here such Suttas as this can be recalled: A giver, Siha, a master of giving, is dear to many, beloved of many ‘ .
Another method. Giving is of two kinds, namely, giving of material things and giving of the True Idea . Herein, giving of material things is of the kind already stated;
but giving of the True Idea is the teaching, out of desire for others’ welfare, of the True Idea proclaimed by the Enlightened One, and that brings about the kind of pleasure that is due to the exhaustion of suffering both in this world and the other world. Of these two kinds of giving, this is the best,
according as it is said:’
The gift of the True Idea conquers all gifts,’
The taste of the True Idea conquers all tastes,’
The joy of the True Idea conquers all joys,
The termination of craving conquers all pain ‘ .
Herein, it has only been stated how the giving of material things is a good omen.
But the giving of the True Idea is called a good omen because it is the footing for such special qualities as the experiencing of the meaning ;
for this is said by the Blessed One
’ Bhikkhus, in proportion as a bhikkhu teaches in detail the True Idea to others as he has heard and mastered it, he accordingly comes to experience the meanings and experience the ideas in that True Idea ‘ , and so on.
True-Idea conduct is conduct consisting in the ten profitable courses of action,
according as it is said ‘ Householders, there are three kinds of bodily conduct in accordance with the True Idea, fair conduct’ , and so on.
That True-Idea conduct should be understood as a good omen since it is a cause for rebirth in the heavenly world;
for this is said by the Blessed One ‘ Householders, it is by reason of conduct in accordance with the True Idea, by reason of fair conduct, that creatures here on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a happy destination, in the heavenly world ‘ .
Kin are those who are connected as far as the seventh generation back on the mother’s or the father’s side.
Support provided for them according to one’s means with sustenance, clothing, corn, etc., when they come to one stricken by loss of property or loss through sickness, is called a good omen since it is a cause for achieving the distinctions here and now consisting in commendation, etc., and for those in the life to come consisting in going to heaven, and so on.
Unexceptionable actions are those such as giving effect to the Uposatha factors, doing social services, planting gardens and groves, making bridges, etc.;
for these are called a good omen since they are a cause for achieving many kinds of welfare and pleasure.
Here such Suttas as that which follows can be recalled: It is possible, Visäkhä, that here some woman or man, after observing the Observance Day with eight factors, reappears on the dissolution of the body, after death, in the company of the gods of the Four Kings ‘ .
So in this stanza there are four good omens stated with giving, True-Ideal conduct, support for kin, and unexceptionable actions.
The commentary on the meaning of this stanza ‘ Giving’ is ended.
How they are good omens has already been made clear in each instance.
Now as to ‘Shrinking, abstinence ‘: shrinking is the act of shrinking . Abstinence is the act of abstaining ; or else, creatures abstain by means of it, thus it is abstinence.
From evil : from what is unprofitable.
Besotting is in the sense of causing intoxication . Besotting drink : mayjapänarh=majjassa pänam ; from that besotting drink.
Refraining : the act of refraining . Diligence : act of being not negligent .
In True Ideals : in what is profitable.
The rest is as already stated. This is the word commentary.
The commentary on the meaning should be understood as follows. Shrinking is only the mental non-delight in one who sees danger in evil.
Abstinence is his act of abstaining by body and speech in those two doors of action. That abstinence is three fold, namely, abstinence as custom, abstinence as undertaking , and abstinence as severance. Herein, any clansman’s abstinence in virtue of his own birth or clan or race from a thing customarily abstained from thinking ‘ It does not befit me that I should kill a breathing thing, take what is not given etc., is called ‘ abstinence as custom.
When it occurs by undertaking training rules, it is’ abstinence as undertaking’ subsequent to the occurrence of which a clansman does not indulge in killing breathing things, and the rest.
That associated with the Noble Path is ‘ abstinence as severance ‘, subsequent to the occurrence of which in a Noble Disciple the five fears and risks have been made to subside for him.
Evil is given in detail thus ‘ Householders son, killing breathing things is a defilement in action and so are taking what is not given, misconduct in sensual desires, and false speech ‘ , :
Killing breathing things and taking What has not been given, lying,’
Going with another’s wife: These no wise man will commend ‘ .
and is summed up in the following stanza thus . defilement in action called the ‘ fourfold unprofitable’. From that kind of evil.
And such Suttas should be recalled here as this: ‘Householder’s son, when a Noble Disciple abstains from killing breathing things . . . ‘ .
From besotting drink refraining : this designates abstention from any opportunity for negligence due to wine, liquor and besotting drink, which has already been described .
This refraining from besotting drink is called a good omen because one who drinks besotting drinks does not know either a meaning or an idea; he ill-treats his mother and his father and Enlightened Ones and Hermit Enlightened Ones and Perfect Ones’ disciples; here and now he encounters censure, in his next rebirth, an unhappy destination, and in the life after that, madness;
but when a man refrains from besotting drink, he achieves both immunity from those defects and excellence in those special qualities that are their opposites.
So that, it should be understood, is why it is called a good omen.
Diligence in profitable ideals : ‘There is carelessness, inattentiveness, heedlessness, hanging back, unzealousness, uninterestedness, non-repetition, non-maintenance-in-being, non-development, non-resolution, non-application, negligence, concerning the maintenance of profitable ideas in being:
This diligence is called a good omen since it is a cause for achieving the various kinds of what is profitable and since it is a cause for reaching the Deathless.
And the Master’s message to be recalled here is that in such passages as follows ‘ When a bhikkhu abides diligent, ardent and self-controlled, his . . . ‘ and ‘ The way of deathlessness is diligence ‘.
So in this stanza there are three good omens stated with abstinence from evil, refraining from besotting drink, and diligence in True Ideals.
The commentary on the meaning of the stanza ‘ Shrinking,abstinence ‘ is ended.
And all this shrinking and abstinence is called a good omen since it is a cause for the achievement of various kinds of distinction consisting in abandoning fear and risk here and now and in the life to come, and so on.
any such negligence, neglecting, neglected-ness, is called negligence’ .
it should be understood as the habit of never being without mindfulness of profitable ideas, which, as to meaning, is the converse of the negligence stated as follows .
How they are good omens has already been made clear in each instance.
Now as to ‘ Then respect’: respect is respectfulness .
Humble manner is lowly mien .
Content is contentment .
The state of knowing what has been done is grateful bearing.
When it is timely : when it is the moment, when it is the occasion.
Hearing truth: dhammasavanarh=dhammassa savanam .
The rest is as already stated. This is the word-commentary.
The commentary on the meaning should be understood as follows. Respect is the payment of respect , paying res-pect , respectfulness , accorded to Enlightened Ones, Hermit Enlightened Ones, Perfect Ones’ disciples, teachers, preceptors, mothers, fathers, elder brothers and sisters, etc., who are the worthy means for the payment of respect.
And that respect is called a good omen since it is a cause for going to a happy destination, etc.,
according as it is said
’ He pays respect to him to whom respect should be paid, he reveres him that should be revered, he honours him that should be honoured.
By his adopting such actions and putting them into effect, he reappears, on the dissolution of the body, after death, in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
If, on the dissolution of the body, . . . instead of reappearing . .. in the heavenly world, he comes to the human state, then he is of a high-born clan wherever he is born ‘ ,
and according as it is said ‘Bhikkhus, there are these seven ideas that prevent decline,
what seven?
Respectfulness to the teacher,. . . ‘ , and so on.
Humble manner is lowliness of the mind, humility in manner. The person possessing it has put away conceit, put away arrogance, and he resembles a foot-wiping cloth, resembles a bull with amputated horns, resembles a snake with extracted fangs, and is gentle, genial and easy to talk with. Such is humble manner.
This is called a good omen since it is a cause of obtaining the special qualities of fame, and so on.
And it is said that’ One humble and unobdurate Is such as will acquire good fame .
Content is contentment with the four requisite conditions whatever they are like. “ That is of twelve kinds.
There are three kinds in the case of the robe, namely, contentment with what one gets, contentment with one’s own strength, and contentment with what is befitting;
and similarly in the cases of alms food,resting-place, and medicine.
Here is a commentary on the divisions of it. Here a bhikkhu obtains a robe, and whether it is a fine one or not
he makes do with only that, wishing for no other, and he does not use any other even if he gets one: this is his ‘ contentment with what one gets ‘ in the case of the robe.
On the other hand, he may be so afflicted by sickness that if he wears a heavy robe it weighs him down and tires him, and then he is quite content to exchange it for a light one with a bhikkhu who is in communion that is, not suspended by an act of the Community, and to use that one: this is his ‘ contentment with one’s own strength ‘ in the case of the robe.
Another bhikkhu maybe one who gets superior requisite-conditions, and if he gets a very costly robe such as a lawn robe, then thinking ‘ This befits elders who have been long gone forth, or the very learned’ he gives it to them and for himself collects rags from the top of a rubbish heap or anywhere else, makes a patched cloak of them and wears that quite contentedly: this is his contentment with what is befitting ‘ in the case of the robe.
Here again a bhikkhu obtains alms food, and whether it is coarse or superior, he uses only that, and, wishing for no other, he does not use any other even if he gets it: this is his’ contentment with what one gets ‘ in the case of the alms food.
On the other hand, he may be so afflicted by sickness that if he eats coarse alms food he brings on a serious illness or disability; and then he is content to give it to a bhikkhu who is in communion and to accept ghee, honey, milk, etc., at his hands and so be able to do his work upon the monks’ True Ideal: This is his ‘contentment with one’s own strength’ in the case of the alms food.
Another bhikkhu may get superior alms food, and thinking ‘This almsfood befits elders who have been long gone forth and other companions in the Divine Life who make do without superior alms food’; and so he gives it to them, and after wandering for almsfood for himself, he eats mixed alms food quite contentedly: this is his ‘contentment with what is befitting’ in the case of the alms food.
Here again a bhikkhu acquires a resting-place
On the other hand, he may be so afflicted by sickness that if he lives in a humble resting-place he is much troubled by biliousness and so on,
Another bhikkhu may not accept a fine resting-place even if it is offered to him, andthinking ‘A fine resting-place offers grounds for negligence; or lethargy and drowsiness descend on anyone who sits there, and then thoughts of lust beset a man when he wakes up again after having been overcome by sleep’,
Here again a bhikkhu obtains common gall-nuts or yellow gall-nuts as medicine, and he makes do with that;
On the other hand, he may get molasses when he is in need of oil, and then he is quite content to give that to a bhikkhu who is in communion, and after making up a medicine with the oilreceived at his hands he is then able to do his work upon the monks ‘True Ideal: this is his’ contentment with one’s own strength ‘ in the case of the requisite of medicine.
Another bhikkhu, when cow’s urine fermented with gall-nuts has been put in one vessel and ‘ four-sweets ‘ in another, may be asked ‘ Venerable sir, take which you like ‘, and then if either of the two cures his ailment, thinking that urine with gall-nuts was commended by Buddhas and so on and that this has been said ‘ The Going Forth into Home-lessness is dependent for medicine on fermented urine; try and make use of that for the rest of your life’ , he refuses the medicine consisting of the ‘ four-sweets ‘ and makes up a medicine with the urine and gall-nuts, and with that he is supremely content:
Now all this contentment thus divided up is what is called’ content’
It should be understood as a good omen since it is a cause for achieving the abandoning of such evil ideas as excessive-ness of wishes, greatness of wishes, and evilness of wishes , since it is a cause for rebirth in the happy destinations, since it is an accessory of the Noble Path, and since it is a cause of the ‘four-direction ‘ state,
and this is said
’ With no resistance in the four directions,’
He is content with any one at all’ ,and so on.
Grateful bearing is the state of knowing , by recollection again and again, about assistance, whether little or much, and done by whomsoever it may be.
Furthermore, ‘grateful bearing’ can also be understood as recollection of acts of merit, which also greatly assist breathing things since they protect them from hell’s sufferings and so on. Consequently ‘ grateful bearing can be understood as the recollection of their assistance.
That is called a good omen since it is a cause for acquiring the many sorts of distinctions beginning with commendability by True Men.
And it is said: ‘ Bhikkhus, two kinds of person are hard to find in the world.
What two?
One who first does a favour, and one who is grateful, who is recognizant’ .
Hearing Truth when it is timely : this is the hearing of the True Idea on an occasion when cognizance is accompanied by agitation or is overcome by thoughts of sensual desire, ill will, or cruelty, doing so on such an occasion in order to remove these thoughts.
Then some others have said that ‘Hearing Truth when it is timely ‘ is hearing the True Idea every five days,
according as it is said ‘But every five days we sit out the whole night together in talk on the True Idea ‘ .
Furthermore, ‘ Hearing Truth when it is timely ‘ can also be understood as hearing the True Idea at a time at which one approaches good friends in order to be able to hear such of the True Idea as will remove one’s own doubts,
according as it is said ‘ From time to time he approaches them, and he asks and he questions’ , and so on.
That hearing of Truth when it is timely should be understood as a good omen since it is a cause for acquiring the many distinctions beginning with the abandoning of hindrances, the four benefits, and the exhaustion of taints,
this being said
’ Bhikkhus, on an occasion on which a Noble Disciple hears the True Idea, giving ear by heeding, attending and whole-heartedly reacting, then on that occasion there is in him no one of the five hindrances ‘ ,
and this ‘ Bhikkhus, when ideas that have come to the ear … are well penetrated, four benefits can be expected’ ,
and this’ Bhikkhus, there are these four ideas, which, when they are completely maintained in being, made to have completely parallel occurrence, eventually bring about the exhaustion of taints.
What four?
Hearing Truth when it is timely, . . . ‘ , and so on.
So in this stanza there are five good omens with respect, humble manner, content, gratitude, and hearing Truth when it is timely.
The commentary on the meaning of this stanza ‘ Then respect’ is ended.
and is contented with only that one, and if he acquires another, better, one, he does not use it: this is his ‘ contentment with what one gets ‘ in the case of the resting-place.
and then he is quite content to give it to a bhikkhu who is in communion, and to live in an airy, cool resting-place that the other has acquired and so be able to do his work upon the monks’ True Ideal: this is his ‘contentment with one’s own strength ‘ in the case of the resting-place.
he rejects it and lives anywhere, such as in the open, at a tree-root, in a leaf-hut, quite contentedly: this is his ‘ contentment with what is befitting ‘ in the case of the resting-place.
he makes do with only that without wishing for the ghee, honey, molasses, etc., obtained by others and not using it even if he gets it: this is his’ contentment with what one gets ‘ in the case of the requisite of medicine.
this is his ‘ contentment with what is befitting’ in the case of the requisite of medicine.
How they are good omens has already been made clear in each instance.
Now as to ‘Patience’: patience is the act of being patient .
Meekness when corrected : because of his taking correction aright a speaking-to is easy in his case, thus he is easily-spoken-to ; the action of one who is easily-spoken-to is easily-spoken-about ; the state of what is easily-spoken-about is easily-speakable-about-ness .
They are monks because of the stilling of defilements .
Seeing : regarding.
Discussion of the Truth: dhammasäkacchä=dhammassa säkacchä .
The rest is as already stated.
This is the word-commentary.
according as it is said:
In olden time there was a monk, Of patience he was paragon;
’ He kept his patience even when’ The king of Käsi murdered him ‘.
Or else he gives it attention as admirable that it is no worse affliction, like the venerable Punna,
according as it is said
’ Venerable sir, if the people of Sonäparanta abuse and threaten me, then I shall think “ These people of Sonäparanta are admirable, truly admirable, in that they did not give me a blow with a fist “ ‘ , and so on.
One who possesses this is commended also by the Seers,
according as Sarabhanga the Seer said:’
Who has his anger slain, he sorrows nevermore;
The Seers do recommend abandoning contempt.
Be patient with the words of all that harshly speak;
The Men at Peace have said: Such patience is supreme ‘.
And he is commended by deities, too,
according as it is said:
‘It is when one endowed with strength’ Will show forebearance to the weak’
That patience shows supreme, they say:’ If weak, a man is always patient’ .
And he is commended by the Enlightened Ones, too,
according as Sakka Ruler of Gods said:
Who free from anger will yet bear ‘ Abuse and even torture too
With patience in force, in strong array,’ Him truly do I call divine’ .
Now this patience should be understood as a good omen since itis a cause for acquiring the special qualities mentioned here and others as well.
Meekness when corrected is the state that causes the speaking of the word ‘ good ‘, by someone who is being lawfully spoken to for the purpose of his being corrected, whereby he does so without indulging in prevarication or silence or thinking up virtues and vices, and places foremost the greatest obedience, respect, and lowliness of mind.
That is called a good omen since it is a cause for the obtaining of advice and instruction in the Divine Life, and since it is a cause for abandoning vices and acquiring virtues.
Seeing monks is the seeing, byapproaching, aiding, recollecting and hearing, of those gone forth whose defilements are stilled, who have maintained in being body, virtue, cognizance, and understanding, and who possess the supreme control and quiet. And all that is called ‘ seeing ‘ by the Teaching in the elementary form. That should be understood as a good omen.
Why?
Because of its great helpfulness.
And this has been said ‘ Bhikkhus, seeing of those bhikkhus is very helpful, I say’ , and so on.
Consequently, as soon as a clansman desirous of welfare sees virtuous bhikkhus at his door he should serve them according to his means with what is available for giving, if anything is available for giving;
if there is none, he should pay homage with the fivefold prostration;
if that is not possible, he should venerate them with hands raised palms together; if that is not possible, he should look on them with confident heart and loving eyes.
Then, owing to such merit rooted in seeing, he will for many a thousand births have in his eye no disease, ill-humour, swelling or stye, and his eyes will sparkle brightly with the five colours like moving crystal panes in a divine mansion built of jewels, and for as much as a hundred thousand aeons he enjoys every sort of excellence among gods and men.
And it is no wonder that a human being born with understanding should find that his acts of merit consisting in the rightly effected seeing of monks ripen so excellently since even in the case of animals born with only bare faith it is told how excellently their acts of merit ripen:
The round-eyed owl, who long did dwell Here in the vedisaka tree—
happy owl was he indeed’ To see a Buddha rare to rise betimes!
His heart had confidence in me’ And the Community elect.
’ Now for a hundred thousand aeons’ No state of deprivation he shall know.
’ Him, when he falls from heavenly worlds,’ His profitable deeds will guide;
And far and wide he will be called’ The Joyous One whose knowledge has no bounds ‘
And then discussion of the Truth when it is timely : in the dusk or in the early dawn, say, two bhikkhus, Sutta-experts, discuss with each other about Suttas, or two Vinaya-experts about the Vinaya, or two Abhidhamma-experts about the Abhidhamma, or two Jätaka-preachers about the Jätaka, or two Commentary-expounders about the Commentary; or else they converse from time to time for the purpose of dispelling a state of cognizance that is slack or agitated or beset by uncertainty: this is discussion of the truth when it is timely’
It is a good omen since it is a cause for such special qualities as particular distinction in the scriptures, and so on.
So in this stanza there are four good omens stated with patience, meekness when corrected, seeing monks, and discussion of the True Idea when it is timely.
The commentary on the meaning of this stanza ‘ Patience ‘ is ended.
The commentary on the meaning should be understood as follows. Patience is patience as endurance. If a bhikkhu possesses it, then when people abuse him with the ten instances of abuse or threaten him with torture, etc., he is as though he neither heard nor saw them and remains as impassive as did Khantivadi ,
How they are good omens has already been made clear in each instance.
Now as to ‘ Ardour ‘: it burns up evil ideas, thus it is ardour .
The Divine Life is either the life that is divine or it is the life of the High Divinities ; what is meant is; the best life .
Seeing truths that are called Noble: ariyasaccäna dassanam=ariyasaccänam dassanam ; some say ariyasaccäni dassanam , but that is inelegant.
It has left the wood , thus it is extinction ; the act of realizing is realization . Realization of extinction: nibbdnasac-chikiriyä=nibbänassa sacchikiriyä .
The rest is as already stated. This is the word-commentary.
The commentary on the meaning should be understood asf ollows. Ardour is either faculty-restraint , since that burns up covetousness and grief, etc., or else it is energy, since that burns up idleness; a person possessing it is called ardent .
It is a good omen since it is a cause for the abandoning of covetousness, etc., and for the obtaining of jhana, and so on.
The Divine Life is a designation for abstinence from sexual intercourse, for the monk’s True Ideal , for the Dispensation, and for the path.
For in such passages as ‘ Abandoning what is not the Divine Life, he becomes one who leads the Divine Life ‘ it is abstinence from sexual intercourse that is called Divine Life .
In such passages as ‘Friend, is a Divine Life lived under the Blessed One’ 
In such passages as ‘ Evil One, I will not finally attain extinction until this Divine Life of mine shall have become prosperous, flourishing and wide-spread among the many ‘ it is the Dispensation .
In such passages as ‘ Bhikkhu, this Noble Eightfold Path is a Divine Life,
that is to say, right view,. .. ‘ it is the path .
All this is appropriate here except for the last-mentioned kind since that is included in’ seeing truths that are called Noble’, which follows next.
It should be understood as a good omen since it is a cause for reaching the successively higher distinctions obtained, by the successive four paths and four fruitions of Stream-Entry and the rest.
Seeing truths that are called Noble is the seeing peculiar to the Path, in virtue of which they attain to the four Truths mentioned in the Boy’s Questions . It is a good omen since it is a cause for surmounting the suffering of the round of rebirths.
Realization of extinction : here it is the fruition of Arahantship that is intended by ‘extinction ‘;
for that is called ‘ extinction ‘ because of the surmounting of craving termed’ fastening’ as the fastening to the five kinds of destination.
So while either the reaching of that as the path or the reviewing of it as the path’s fruition can actually be called ‘ realization’ ,
nevertheless since the former kind of realizationas the path has already been established by the immediately preceding phrase ‘seeing truths that are called Noble’ that kind is consequently not intended here in this phrase.
So this kind of realization of extinction namely, reviewing as the fruition of the path should be understood as a good omen since it is a cause for a pleasant abiding here and now, and so on.
So in this stanza there are four good omens stated with ardour, the Divine Life, seeing the Noble Truths, and realization of extinction.
The commentary on the meaning of this stanza ‘ Ardour’ is ended.
it is the monk’s True Ideal .
How they are good omens has already been made clear in each instance.
Now as to ‘Though by worldly ideas tempted’: Tempted is contacted stirred, reached.
Worldly ideas are ideas in the world ; such ideas as are never reversed as long as the world continues its occurrence, is what is meant.
Cognizance is mind , mentality .
His : of a new bhikkhu, a middle, or an elder bhikkhu.
Ne’er. .. shall waver : neither moves nor vacillates.
Sorrowless : unsorrowing , with the dart of sorrow extracted.
Stainless : with stains gone , with stains erased .
In safety : fearless, unmenaced.
The rest is as already stated. This is the word-commentary.
The commentary on the meaning should be understood as follows. Though by worldly ideas tempted, Ne’er his cognizance shall waver : when someone is tempted , beset, by the eight worldly ideas, namely, gain and non-gain fame and ill-fame, censure and praise, pleasure and pain , and his cognizance does not waver, is unmoved, never vacillates, then that cognizance of his should be understood as a good omen since it brings about the non-wavering supramundane state.
And whose cognizance is it that does not waver when he is tempted by them?
The Arahants, in whom taints are exhausted, no one else’s at all.
And this is said:
Just as a solid mass of rock’ Remains unshaken by the wind,
So too, no forms, sounds, smells or tastes,’ No tangibles of any sort,’
Nor yet ideas, disliked or liked,’ Avail to move those such as this.
’ Such cognizance stands quite aloof’ In contemplating subsidence ‘ .
It is only the cognizance in one whose taints are exhausted that is called sorrowless .
That is sorrowless because of the absence of what is stated in the way beginning ‘Sorrow, sorrowing, sorrowfulness, inner sorrow, inner- sorriness, consuming of the heart’ .
Some say that it is extinction , but that has no sequence of meaning with the line that precedes it.
And just as the cognizance of one whose taints are exhausted is ‘sorrowless ‘, so too it is stainless and in safety ,
since it is ‘ stainless ‘ with the absence of any stain of lust, hate and delusion, and it is ‘ in safety ‘ because it is safe from the four bonds . Consequently it should be understood as a good omen since, although threefold as demonstrated by the three words beginning with ‘ sorrowless ‘ when thus taken at the moment of its occurrence in whichever mode it happens to occur, it is a cause for bringing about undisconcertability and the highest state in the world, etc., and is a cause for bringing about fitness for gifts , and so on .
So in this stanza there are four good omens stated with unwavering cognizance, sorrowless cognizance, unstained cognizance, and secure cognizance, with respect to the eight worldly ideas.
The commentary on the meaning of this stanza ‘ Though by worldly ideas tempted, Ne’er his cognizance ‘ is ended.
How they are good omens has already been made clear in each instance.
After thus stating thirty-eight good omens with the ten stanzas beginning with ‘ Not consorting with the foolish ‘ , he now uttered this final stanza ‘Since by working such like omens ‘,extolling the good omens already mentioned by himself.
Here is a commentary on its meaning. Suchlike : such as these , namely, ‘ the non-consorting with fools, etc., of the kinds already stated by me.
Since by working :
katväna is the same as karitvä or katvä , and is no different in meaning.
Men are everywhere unvanquished : what is meant is that not being vanquished by even one among the four enemies classed as the Märas of categories, defilements, and determinative acts, and Mara the god’s son, and having on the contrary themselves vanquished those four Märas.
The letter m here in the compound sabbattha-m-aparäjitä should be taken as inserted merely for purposes of liaison.
And go everywhere in safety : whether in this world or in the other world, whether standing, walking, etc., everywhere they go in safety owing to their remaining unvanquished by the four Märas after they have worked suchlike good omens as these; what is meant is that they go in safety, go unmenaced, unharassed, secure, and fearless, because of the absence of those taints, vexations and fevers that would have arisen from their consorting with fools, and the rest.
And the nasal component should be understood as inserted for metrical reasons.
That is their supreme good omen :with this line of the stanza the Blessed One concluded his teaching.
How?
‘God’s son, take it thus: Whoever work suchlike omens’ , then since they go everywhere in safety it is that —namely, the thirty-eight-fold good omen of non-consorting with fools, etc.—which is therefore their —namely, of those who have worked suchlike omens— supreme , best, superlative, good omen .
Now when this teaching was thus concluded by the Blessed One, a hundred thousand myriads of deities reached Arahantship, and the number of those who reached the fruitions of Stream-entry, Once-return, and Non-return was incalculable.
Then on the following day, the Blessed One addressed the venerable Ananda thus ‘ Änanda, last night a certain deity approached me and asked me a question about good omens. I told him thirty-eight good omens. Learn this discourse on good omens, have the Bhikkhus recite it.
The Elder learnt it and had the bhikkhus recite it.
That has come down by the succession of teachers, being such as we have it today. So it can be understood that this was how this Divine Life became prosperous, flourishing, and widespread among the many, disseminated and properly explained by gods and men .
Now here is how to construe it all from the beginning, the purpose of doing which is to gain exercise and facility of knowledge in these same good omens. So then these creatures, who desire the pleasures of this world and of the other world and supramundane pleasure as well—when, after abandoning consorting with foolish people and coming to depend on the wise, they honour those who should be honoured—when they are encouraged, by living in a befitting place and by merit previously made, to perform what is profitable—when, by right direction in self-guidance, they each acquire a selfhood adorned with ample learning, a craft, and discipline—when they speak what is well spoken since it befits the discipline—when, as long as they have not renounced the lay state, they liquidate their old indebtedness to other peopleby aid for mother and father, contracting new indebtedness to themselves by support for wife and children, and they gain success in riches and corn through spheres of work that bring no conflict, and then, by taking the heartwood of riches through giving and the heart wood of life through True-Ideal conduct, they work the welfare of their own people by support of kin and the welfare of other people by unexceptionable actions, till, by avoiding through abstinence from evil the hurting of others and by refraining from besotting drink the hurting of themselves, they increase the profitable side by diligence in True Ideals—and when, having abandoned the lay life owing to increase in what is profitable, they are gone forth in to homelessness, and after cultivating excellence in the Duties by respect and humble manner towards the Enlightened One, disciples of the Enlightened One, preceptors, teachers, and so on, and contentedly abandoning cupidity for requisites, they establish themselves on the plane of True Men by means of gratitude, and then after abandoning slackness of cognizance through hearing the True Idea and transcending all anxieties through patience, they find helpers for themselves through meekness under correction and so come, owing to seeing monks, to see how to proceed with the practice, till, after removing, by discussion of the truth, doubt about ideas that should be doubted about, they eventually achieve Purification of Virtue by means of ardour in faculty-restraint, Purification of Cognizance by means of the kind of Divine Life that consists in the Monk’s True Ideal, and the four Purifications that follow upon those— then, by means of this practice the Purification of Knowledge and Seeing that is referred to by the words ‘ seeing truths that are called Noble’, they realize at last the fruition of Arahantship called ‘ extinction’, after which their cognizance no more wavers owing to the eight worldly ideas than does Mount Sineru owing to wind and rain; they are sorrowless, unstained and secure;
and those who are secure are everywhere unvanquished and go everywhere in safety.
That is why the Blessed One said:
Since by working suchlike omens’ Men are everywhere unvanquished
And go everywhere in safety, That is their supreme good omen.
“Now at the end of many years, many hundred years, many thousand years, King Makhadeva addressed his barber thus: ‘Good barber, when you see any grey hairs growing on my head, then tell me.’
When he saw them, he said to the king: ‘The divine messengers have appeared, sire; grey hairs are to be seen growing on your majesty’s head.’
And there he had expounded meditation subjects suitable for the eighty-four thousand shades of temperament in the following way, that is to say: for those of lustful temperament he showed Loathesomeness as a meditation subject of the eleven kinds as with consciousness and without consciousness for those of hating temperament, the fourfold meditation subject beginning with Lovingkindness; for those of deluded temperament, the meditation subject consisting in Mindfulness of Death, etc.; for those of speculative-thinking temperament, Mindfulness of Breathing, the Earth Universal, etc.; for those of faithful temperament, the meditation subjects consisting of the Recollections of the Enlightened One, etc.; and for those of intelligent temperament, the Definition of the Four Elements.
So when a party of five hundred bhikkhus had learnt each a meditation subject in the Blessed One’s presence and were seeking a suitable resting place with a village as alms resort, eventually in the outland country they came in sight of a mountain forming part of the Himalaya range. While its surface glittered like blue quartz crystal, it was embellished with a cool dense shady green forest grove and a stretch of ground strewn with sand resembling a pearlnet or a silver sheet, and it was furnished with a clean spring of grateful cool water.
Now when the bhikkhus had spent one night there and the dawn was drawing near, they attended to the needs of the physical frame and then went for alms into a town not far distant.
The town was connected with a thousand clans and constructed as a community-residence, and the people there had faith and confidence. Since it is hard in the outlands to get a sight of those gone forth into homelessness, they were happy and joyful when they saw the bhikkhus, and they fed them and begged them to stay on there for the three months of obligatory residence during the Rains, and they had five hundred work-rooms built and furnished with all such necessaries as beds, chairs, pots for drinking and washing water, and so on.
On the following day the bhikkhus went into another town for alms,
and there too the people served them in like manner and begged them to stay on for the Rains.
The bhikkhus consented subject to there being no obstacle. They re-entered the wood, where they arranged to keep up energy night and day by having a wood-block struck for the watches, and abiding much in reasoned attention, they went to the roots of trees and sat down.
The tree deities were discouraged by the virtuous bhikkhus’ courage, and they came down from their own mansions and wandered back and forth with their children.
Just as when a block of houses is commandeered from villagers by kings or royal ministers and the human inhabitants of the houses who have had to evacuate them and go to live elsewhere watch from a distance, wondering ‘ When are they going away? ‘, so too the deities came down from their own mansions and wandered back and forth, watching from a distance and wondering ‘When are the venerable ones going away?’
Next they thought thus ‘ Bhikkhus who enter upon the first period of residence for the Rains will certainly stay on for three months; but we cannot live with our children away from home for so long. Let us show the bhikkhus some object that will scare them away’.
So in the night when it was the bhikkhus’ time to give effect to the monks’ True Ideal, they created terrifying forms of spirits, and standing in front of each of them, they made a dreadful noise.
When the bhikkhus saw the forms and heard the noise, their hearts quailed, they grew pale and jaundiced
and they could no longer unify their cognizance. When they were harassed again and again by this fear, with their cognizance ununified they forgot their mindfulness. As soon as they had forgotten their mindfulness, the deities harassed them with bad smells as objects. Their brains seemed to smother in the stench, with feelings of oppression in their heads. However, they did not mention their hauntings to each other.
Then one day when all had assembled at the time for waiting on the Senior Elder of the Community, he asked them ‘Friends, when you went into this wood, the colour of your skin was quite pure and bright for some days and your faculties were clear; but now you are lean and pale and jaundiced. What does not suit you here? ‘.
Then a bhikkhu said ‘ Venerable sir, at night I saw and heard such-and-such a dreadful object and I smelt such-and-such a smell, and so my mind was not concentrated, and all told in the same way what had been happening.
The Senior Elder said ‘Friends, two kinds of Entry upon Residence for the Rains have been described by the Blessed One , and this resting place does not suit us. So let us go to the Blessed One and ask about another resting place that will suit us’.
The others agreed, and so they all put their resting places in order, and then they took their bowls and outer robes and without even telling anyone — for they had no attachments among the clans — they set out to wander by stages to Sävatthi.
They went to the Blessed One.
When he saw them, he said ‘Bhikkhus, a training rule has been made known by me saying that no one is to go wandering during the Rains . Why are you wandering? ‘.
They told the Blessed One all that had happened.
The Blessed One adverted to the whole of Jambudipa, but he saw not even so much as a place for a four-legged chair that might suit them as a resting place.
Then he told them ‘Bhikkhus, there is no other resting place that will suit you. It is only by living there that you might reach the exhaustion of taints. So go and occupy that same resting place. But if you want to be free from fear of deities, then learn this safeguard;
for this will be both a safeguard and a meditation subject for you’ and he uttered this Sutta.
According to some others, however, he said ‘ So go and occupy that same resting place’ after saying which, the Blessed One added ‘ A forest-dwelling bhikkhu should know the protection procedure,
that is to say, by doing every evening and morning two spells of Lovingkindness, two of Safeguards, two of Loathesomeness, and two of Mindfulness of Death, and also by adverting to the Eight Principal Grounds for a Sense of Urgency —and the Eight Principal Grounds for a Sense of Urgency are either birth, ageing, sickness, death, and the suffering in the four states of deprivation, or else they are the four consisting of birth, ageing, sickness, and death, and then the suffering in the states of deprivation as the fifth, the suffering rooted in the round during the past, the suffering rooted in the round during the future, and the suffering rooted in the search for nutriment’.
And they say that when the Blessed One had told those bhikkhus the protection procedure, he then uttered this Sutta for the sake of Lovingkindness, for the sake of a Safeguard, and for the sake of the jhana obtainable through loving-kindness that is to be used as the basis for insight into the Three Characteristics of impermanence, suffering, and not-self.
And now, since it was also said ‘And then a comment I shall tell’ there begins the commentary on the meaning of this discourse whose source has just been clarified in this way.
By one with skill in good: atthakusalena=atthe kusalena ; by one clever in good, is what is meant.
What : either this is a nominative indefinite pronoun agreeing with karaniyam,
and this is an accusative definite pronoun agreeing with santam padam, or else the words yan tarn are both nominative agreeing with karaniyam, and only the words
santam padam are accusative— and herein, this last is a designation for extinction, since that is ‘ peace ‘ by characteristic and it is a ‘ state’ by its reachability .
To have attained : having come up to .
He can , thus he is able ; what is meant is that he is capable, has power.
Right : yoked to rectitude .
He is thoroughly right thus he is upright .
Speaking to him is easy in his case, thus he is meek .
He would be: assa=bhaveyya .
Gentle : yoked to mildness .
Not proud: anatimänl=na atimänl .
Now here is a commentary on the meaning of the two clauses:’ What should be done by one with skill in good, The State of Peace to have attained is this.’
Herein, there is what should be done and there is what should not be done.
Herein, briefly what should be done is the three Trainings and what should not be done comprises failure in virtue, failure in views, failure in conduct, failure in livelihood, and so on.
Likewise there is one with skill in good and there is one without skill in good.
Herein, one without skill in good is one gone forth in the Dispensation who does not devote himself rightly, whose virtue is torn , who makes a living by depending on the twenty-one kinds of improper search —
namely, be depending as a bhikkhu on giving bamboos, giving leaves, giving flowers, giving fruits, giving tooth-sticks, giving mouth-washing water, giving bathing facilities, giving bath powder, giving clay, flattery, bean-soupery, fondling, carrying communications on foot, practising medicine, acting as a messenger, going on errands, getting almsfood given in exchange for alms food, science of lands, science of fields, science of astrology, science of limbs —,
who goes to the sixfold wrong resort—
namely, ‘ A harlot as resort, or a widow, oldmaid, eunuch, bhikkhuni, or a tavern;
who dwells associated with kings, kings’ ministers, other sectarians, other sectarians’ disciples, by association not in conformity with the True Idea, who cultivates, frequents, and honours such clans as are faithless, without confidence, addicted to abuse and calumny and undesirous of good and desirous of harm, discomfort, and what is not safety from bondage, where bhikkhus and bhikkhunis and laymen followers and laywomen followers are concerned ‘ .
But one gone forth in this Dispensation, who devotes himself rightly, and abandoning improper search and desiring to establish himself in the Virtue of Fourfold Purity , fulfils the Restraint by Pätimokkha Rule under the heading of faith, Faculty-Restraint under the heading of mindfulness, Purification of Livelihood under the heading of energy, and right Use of the Requisite-Conditions for the bhikkhu’s life under the heading of understanding.
And when he purifies Restraint by Pätimokkha Rule by means of purification in the seven categories of offences , purifies Faculty-Restraint by means of non-arousing of covetousness and ill will when objects have impinged in the six doors of the five faculties beginning with the eye, and that of the mind, purifies livelihood by means of avoidance of improper search and by use of what is commended by the wise and praised by the Enlightened Ones and their disciples, purifies the use of the four requisite-conditions by means of the reviewing already mentioned, and purifies Full Awareness by means of the reviewing, in the case of alternation of the postures, the purposefulness, suitability, resort, and non-delusion .
And when he knows that virtue is cleaned with knowledge just as dirty cloth is cleaned with bean-water or a looking-glass with ashes or gold with a furnace, and he cleans his virtue by washing it in the water of knowledge, and that is when he guards his own Virtue Category most diligently,
just as ahen bird guards her eggs, as a yak guards his tail, as a woman with an only child guards her dearly beloved only child, or as a one-eyed man guards his only eye , and he reviews it evening and morning till he sees no slightest blame there.
And when he becomes established in the virtue that provides non-remorse, when he exerts himself in the way of suppression of defilement and in the pursuit of that does the preliminary work on a Universal , and when, by doing the preliminary work on a Universal, he generates the attainment of jhana.
But the acme of skill in good is when, having emerged from an attainment, he comprehends determinations till he eventually reaches Arahantship.
Herein those ‘with skill in good ‘, praised either in so far as they are established in the virtue that provides non-remorse, or in so far as they exert themselves in the ‘ way of suppression of defilement’, or in so far as they attain the paths and fruitions, are ‘those with skill in good ‘ in this sense.
And those bhikkhus were of such kinds.
Hence the Blessed One said What should be done by one with skill in good with reference to those bhikkhus, but giving the teaching in terms of a single person.
Next, when they were wondering ‘ What should be done? ‘ , he told them The State of Peace to have attained is this .
Now the intention can be taken as follows. It is what should be done by one who desires, after contriving to have attained it by penetration, to abide in this extinction-State-of-Peace , which is praised by the Enlightened Ones and their like.
And here ‘ what’ implies only the practice that at the beginning of this line in the stanza it was said ‘ should be done ‘ ;but then the clause ‘ to have attained the State of Peace is this’ 
must be understood as one whose meaning requires completing, which is why ‘ by one who desires . . . to abide in ‘ was said above .
Or alternatively, the intention can be understood as follows. When through hearsay, etc., to this effect, namely, ‘ To have attained the State of Peace ‘, he knows with mundane understanding the extinction-State to be one of peace , and when he wants to arrive at it, then the ‘what ‘that it is proper as the practice should be done by him is this which should be done by one with skill in good .
Or alternatively, it had been said that there is something that ‘ should be done by one with skill in good’ , and the bhikkhus were wondering ‘ What? ‘, and then the Blessed One told them ‘ The State of Peace to have attained is this ‘ ,
the intention of which can be understood also as follows. After contriving to have attained with mundane understanding the State of Peace , what should be done is this — . what must be done is what should be done  only that is worth doing , is what is meant
But what is that?
What else should be done but the doing that is the means to that State? And, of course, this means is already expressed by the initial clause with its indication of the Three Trainings in the sense of their being worth doing;
for we already said as much in the comment on the meaning, namely,’ There is what should be done and there is what should not be done.
Herein, briefly what should be done is the Three Trainings ’.
Now while some of the bhikkhus understood it, some did not, since the teaching was extremely brief.
Consequently, in order to make those who had not yet understood understand, he uttered the second half-stanza, namely,’ He would be able, right, upright, And meek and gentle and not proud giving in detail what must especially be done by a forest-dwelling bhikkhu.
What is meant?
A forest-dwelling bhikkhu, who desires to abide in the State of Peace, after having contrived to attain it, or who,after contriving to attain it with only mundane understanding, is practising the way finally to arrive at it, would be able with the possession of the second and fourth factors of endeavour to practise for the penetration of the Truths without regard for body and life. Likewise, he would be able, that is, clever, unidle, capable, in the preliminary work for a Universal , in undertaking the duties, etc., and in repairing his own bowl, robes, etc., and in these and other such major and minor things to be done for companions in the Divine Life.
Being able, he would also be right with possession of the third factor of endeavour.
Being right, instead of being content with being right once he would be more thoroughly right , that is, upright  by repeatedly promoting non-laxity aslong as he lives.
Or alternatively, he is right by means of non-fraudulence and upright by means of non-deceitfulness.
Or he is right with abandonment of crookedness of body and speech and upright with abandonment of crookedness of mind.
Or he is right by non-publication of any special qualities of jhana and path that are non-existent in himself and upright by non-endurance of gain arisen on account of such non-existent special qualities.
Thus he would be right and upright with the purity of ends and means consisting in meditation upon objectsof pure concentration and upon the three General characteristics of impermanence, etc., which are ensured respectively by the first pair of Trainings, namely, the Higher Virtue and Higher Cognizance, and by the third, namely, the Higher Understanding.
And he would be not only right and upright but also meek as well;
for a person who, when told ‘This ought not to be done ‘ says ‘ What has been seen by you? What has been heard by you? Who are you that you speak to me; are you a Preceptor, Teacher, friend, companion?’ or obstructs with silence or accepts the admonition but does not act on it, is far from arriving at any distinction;
but one who, when advised, says ‘Good, venerable sir, well said. What is blameworthy is hard to see in oneself. If you should see me again thus, tell me out of compassion. May I long have advice from you ‘ and practises according as instructed, is not far from arriving at distinction.
That is why he would be meek by accepting others’ advice and acting on it.
And he would be gentle just as he would be meek.
But while firm in not practising malleableness with laymen when pressed by them to go with messages, go on errands, etc., he would yet be as malleable in the performance of the duties in the whole Divine Life as well-refined gold is for employment in this and that .
Good is the Way; or alternatively, anything at all that is beneficial to oneself , since it should be honoured , is ‘ good ‘ —and ‘ since it should be honoured ‘ means since it should be approached.
- that one is without skill in good.
- is one with skill in good.
- he is also one with skill in good.
- he is also one with skill in good.
- he is also one with skill in good.
Or alternatively, the word gentle means that he would be without grimaces , open-countenanced, easy to talk with and as welcoming as a good ford with an easy approach.
And he would be not only gentle but also not proud as well; he would not be proud towards others on account of such grounds for pride as birth, race, etc., but would abide like the Elder Säriputta even-minded to all alike whether outcaste or prince .
The Blessed One thus told in part what should be done especially by a forest-dwelling bhikkhu who desires, after contriving to have attained the State of Peace, to abide in it, or who is practising the way to arrive at that State. Being then desirous of saying more than that, he uttered the further stanza.
Herein, he is content with the twelvefold contentment of the kind already stated under ‘And content and grateful bearing ‘ , thus he is contented .
Or alternatively, he finds contentment , thus he is one content ; he is one content with his own , he is one content with what there is , and he is one content equally with all , thus he is content .
Herein, what is called ‘his own’ is that indicated in the ceremony of Full Admission thus ‘ Depending onthe lumps of alms food ‘ , and it is whatever among the four requisite-conditions for the bhikkhu’s life has been accepted by himself. He is called ‘ one content with his own ‘ when, without showing any alteration of expression either at the time of receiving or at the time of using, he makes do with it whether it is good or bad, whether it is carefully or carelessly given. What is called ‘ what there is’ is what is factual and has been obtained by himself.
He is called ‘one content with what there is ‘ when he is content with that alone without aspiring to more than that and thus abandons excessiveness of wishes.
What is called ‘equallywith all’ is the abandoning of approval and resistance with respect to the desired and the undesired. He is called ‘ one content equallywith all ‘ when he is content with that kind of equality regarding all objects.
He is supported with ease , thus he is easy to support ; he is easily sustained, is what is meant.
For a bhikkhu is hard to support if, when given his bowl full of special rice, meat and boiled rice, he shows a face of gloomy sullenness or is suspicious, saying in the giver’s presence ‘ What is this you have given? ‘, and gives it away to novices or laymen.
When people see that, they keep far away, thinking ‘ A bhikkhu who is hard to support can never be sustained’
But he is easy to support when with cheerfulness and confident face he makes do with what he gets, no matter whether it is poor or superior, little or much.
When people see that, they are quite trustful, and they claim thus ‘ Our venerable is easy to support, he is content even with a little. We ourselves will sustain him’, and they do sustain him.
It is one such as that who is intended here as ‘easy to support’.
His busiedness is little , thus he is unbusy . He is not occupied with the many kinds of busiedness such as love of working, love of talking, love of company, and so on. Or alternatively, in the whole monastery he is devoid of any busieness concerned with building-work, property of the Community, instruction of novices and monastery-attendants, etc., and insteadhe is engaged only in the busiedness consisting in the monks’ True Ideal after doing his own hair-cutting, nail-cutting and preparing of his own bowl and robes.
His way of life is light , thus he is frugal ;
he is not like some bhikkhus with their many chattels, who, when it is time to go away, do so after they have loaded many people with head packs, waist packs, etc., of bowls, robes, rugs, oils, sugar, etc.; but, when it is time to go away, having little requisite-equipment, he carries only the monk’s eight requisites, namely, the bowl, three robes, razor, needle, waistband, and water-strainer, and taking only these, he goes away as does a bird with its own wings . It is one such as this that is intended here by ‘ frugal’
He has faculties that are serene , thushe is serene in faculties ; his faculties are unagitated by lust for desirable objects or ill will towards undesirable objects, is what is meant.
Prudent : knowledgeable, intelligent, possessed of understanding; the intention is that he is possessed of understanding about guarding virtue, understanding about managing robes and the rest,and understanding as the act-of-understanding the seven kinds of suitability, namely, those regarding the abode, alms-resort, speech,person, food, climate, and posture .
He is not impudent , thus he is modest ; the meaning is that he is devoid of bodily impudence in its eight instances, verbal impudence in its four instances, and mental impudence in its many instances .
What is called ‘ bodily impudence in its eight instances’ is acting unbecomingly by means of the body in the presence of the Community, in the presence of a Chapter, in the presence of a person, in the refectory, in the hot-bath house, at the bathing place, on the path for gathering alms, and in the entry into houses,
that is to say: ‘Here someone in the midst of the Community sits lolling with hands clasped round knees or with feet crossed , and so on. Likewise in the midst of a chapter;
Again, in the refectory he does not give a seat to seniors, he prevents new bhikkhus—those with less than five years’ seniority— from getting a seat .
Likewise in the hot-bathhouse ; and he has fires lighted, etc., without asking seniors about it .
And at the bathing place,without bothering about what is said, namely, ‘ Without making the standard “ junior and senior “, bathing should be done in the order of arrival’ , he arrives after others and enters the water and jostles seniors and new bhikkhus without waiting his turn.
And in the entry into houses he enters before the seniors and plays bodily games with children, and so on.
that is to say: ‘Here someone in the midst of the Community preaches the True Idea unasked ‘ . And likewise in the presence of a chapter and of a senior person as stated already. And when asked a question by people there, he answers them without asking a senior if he may do so. And among houses he speaks thus ‘ You, so-and-so, what is there? Is there any rice-gruel or anything to eat or chew? What will you give me? What shall we eat today? Whatshall we drink? .
What is called mental impudence in its many instances is unbecoming thinking, namely, thoughts of sensual desire, of ill will, and of cruelty, etc., in such and such instances, doing so only with the mind and with no transgression by body or speech.
Not fawning upon families : whatever families he approaches, he does not fawn upon them either out of craving for the requisite-conditions or owing to association with laymen that is not in conformity with the True Idea; what is meant is that he is not one, who sorrows with them and relishes with them, who is pleased when they are and suffers when they do, and who is forward in engaging himself in any business or work that has arisen.
And in this stanza, the words ‘ he would be ‘ , which were stated in the previous stanza thus ‘ he would be . . . meek ‘ , must be construed also with all the terms in this way: ‘ he would be contented, he would be easy to support, . . . ‘
and ‘ in the midst of a chapter’ includes a meeting of the four assemblies of bhikkhus, bhikkhunis, laymen followers and lay-women followers. Likewise in the presence of senior persons.
And on the path for gathering alms he goes in front of seniors, bumping their arms with his arms, in order to get the best seat, the best water, the best alms food.
What is called ‘ verbal impudence in its four instances’ is unbecoming speech utterance in the presence of a Community, a chapter, and a person, and among houses,
When the Blessed One had thus announced what more would be done especially by a forest-dwelling bhikkhu who desired, after contriving to have attained the State of Peace, to abide in it, orwho was practising the way to arrive at that State, he now uttered the following stanza being desirous of announcing also what should not be done.
Its meaning is as follows. There are some slight things in bodily, verbal or mental misconduct that are called ‘ bad’, and when he is thus doing what should be done he would do no slight thing in that, and in not doing it, it is not onlythe gross that he would not do but also anything at all ; what is meant is that he would not do even as much as a little, evenas much as an atom.
And next he showed the danger to be seen here in this life for him in the doing of such things by saying that other wise men might deplore 
and here others who are unwise are not the standard
since they do either what is not deplorable or what is deplorable or what is little deplorable or greatly deplorable,
but it is only the wise who are the standard
since they, after inquiry and investigation, speak in dispraise of what deserves dispraise and in praise of what deserves praise,
Now the Blessed One stated with these two and a half stanzas the approach to the meditation subject thus. And that approach is divided into what should be done and what should not be done especially by a forest-dwelling bhikkhu who desires, after contriving to have attained the State of Peace, to abide in it, or who is practising the way to arrive at that State—and under the heading of’ forest-dweller ‘ are included all those who want to come to abide in that State through taking a meditation subject. And so, having done that, he now began to give an exposition of lovingkind-ness, which begins with the words: Sukhino vä khemino hontu. The purpose of this was to serve those bhikkhus as a safeguard to dispel their fear of deities and as a meditation subject for inducing jhana as the basis for insight.
Herein, joyful is possessing pleasure.
And safe : having safety; what is meant is, fearless, unplagued.
Every: without remainder.
Creature’s : breathing things.
Heart rejoice : with pleased cognizance;
and here it can be understood that they are ‘ joyful’ with bodily pleasure, that their ‘hearts rejoice ‘ with mental pleasure, and that they are ‘safe ‘ with both or else with the disappearance of all fears and plagues.
But why is it stated like this?
In order to show the different modes of maintenance of lovingkindness in being;
for lovingkindness can be maintained in being thus:’ Let all creatures be joyful’ or ‘Let them be safe ‘ or ‘ Let their hearts rejoice ‘ .
which is why ‘ other wise men ‘ is said.
When the Blessed One had thus shown in brief the maintenance of lovingkindness in being from access up to absorption as the limit, he now uttered the following pair of stanzas: Ye Jceci. He did so in order to show that in detail as well.
Or alternatively, cognizance that is used to ordinary variety in its object does not become steadied on unity at first-, but it does become steadied gradually by following out a classification of the object, and that is why he uttered this pair of stanzas beginning ‘ Whatever’ the purpose of which is the steadying of it on its object classified under the dyads and triads beginning with ‘ frail or firm , doing so by following these out.
Or alternatively, when an object is fully evident to someone, his cognizance easily stays on it, and so he uttered this pair of stanzas beginning with ‘ Whatever’, which illustrate the classification of the object by means of the dyads and triads beginning with ‘frail and firm’ since he was desirous of steadying those bhikkhus’ cognizance on an object made fully evident to them.
And, in fact, he points out four dyads, namely, the frail/firm dyad, the seen/unseen dyad, the far/near dyad, and the that-are/that-yet-seek-to-be dyad, and then with the six terms beginning with ‘ long ‘he also points out three triads, namely, the long/middle-sized/short triad, the big/middle-sized/small triad, and the thick/middle-sized/small triad, since the meaning of the term ‘ middle-sized’ is implicit in all three triads and the meaning of the term ‘ small’ in two of them.
Herein, whatever is a term without remainder.
Breathing things are themselves beings , thus they are breathing beings ;
or alternatively, they breathe thus they are breathing things , by which term he includes creatures belonging to the five-constituent kind of being , which are bound up with in-breath and out-breath;
and then they are , thus they are beings , by which he includes one-constituent and four-constituent creatures.
There are: atthi=santi ; they are factual.
Having thus pointed out comprehensively with the words whatever breathing beings there are all the creatures about to beincluded under the dyads and triads mentioned above, he now pointed them all out again by including them in the first dyad, namely, no matter whether frail or firm with none excepted .
Herein, they thirst , thus they are frail ; this is a designation for those with craving and for those with fear.
They stand , thus they are firm ; this is a designation for Arahants, who have abandoned craving and fear.
There is no one of them that is an exception, thus they are with none excepted ; all, is what is meant.
And what is said at the end of the second pair of stanzas should all be construed with the dyads and triads thus: ‘ Whatever breathing beings there are, no matter whether frail or firm, let every creature’s heart rejoice’
and likewise down as far as the dyad ‘that are or that yet seek to be, let every creature’s heart rejoice’
Now as to the six terms beginning with ‘ long’ that represent the three triads beginning with long/middle-sized/short: the long are those with a long selfhood such as Nägas , fishes, lizards, etc.;
for in the great ocean there are Nägas with a selfhood measuring many hundred fathoms, and there are fishes, lizards, etc., with a selfhood measuring many leagues.
Big : with a big selfhood such as turtles, etc., in the water, such as elephants, Nägas, etc., on land, and such as Dänava Demons, etc., among non-human beings.
And it is said ‘Rähuis the foremost of those who possess a selfhood ‘ ;
for the selfhood of that Eclipse Demon is four thousand eight hundred leagues in height, his arms measure twelve hundred leagues, the space between his eyebrows is fifty leagues, and so are the spaces between his fingers and toes, and the palms of his hands are two hundred leagues.
The middle-sized are the selfhoods of horses, oxen, buffaloes, pigs, and so on.
The short are creatures that in this or that kind of birth fall short of the normal measurement according to the big and middle-sized, such as dwarfs, and so on.
Small : these are creatures that are not the resort of the fleshly eye but are the objective field of the heavenly eye, and they are generated in water, etc., with a subtle selfhood; or they are lice, and so on.
Besides, any creatures in any kind of birth that are of lesser measure than the big or middle-sized or than the thick or middle-sized can be understood as small.
The thick are creatures with a rounded selfhood, such as fishes, tortoises, oysters, clams, and so on.
Having thus pointed out creatures without exception with these three triads, he now pointed them out again by including them in the three remaining dyads beginning with ‘or those seen or unseen’
Herein, those seen are any that have already been seen by their coming to the eye’s horizon.
The unseen are thosethat remain beyond the sea, beyond a mountain, beyond this world-system, and so on.
With the dyad ‘or whether dwelling far or near’ he points out creatures dwelling far or not far from one’sown selfhood. These can be understood as the footless and as bipeds;
for creatures dwelling inside one’s own body are near, while those dwelling outside it are far .
Likewise those dwelling in the house-precincts are near, while those dwelling outside the precincts are far.
Again, those dwelling in one’s own abode, village, country, continent, world-system, are near, while those dwelling beyond the abode, . . . the world-system are respectively far.
That are : that have been born, generated;
they are reckoned thus ‘They are , they will not be again’, which is a designation for those with taints exhausted, namely, Arahants.
That yet seek to be:sambhavesino—sambhavamesanti ;
this is a designation for Initiates and ordinary men, who still seek being in the future because they have not abandoned the fetter of being .
Or alternatively, in the case of the four kinds of womb generation, , creatures that are egg-born or uterus-born are called those that yet seek to be as long as they have not broken the egg-membrane or the caul-membrane respectively; but when they have broken the egg-membrane or the caul-membrane and have come out, they are called those that are.
However, moisture-born creatures and those of spontaneous appearance are called those that yet seek to be in the first moment of their cognizance, and they are called those that are from the moment of the second cognizance;
or else they are those that yet seek to be as long as they do not reach any posture other than that in which they were born, while after that they are called those that are.
When the Blessed One, with these two and a half stanzas beginning with’ Joyful’ had thus shown to those bhikkhus in various aspects the maintenance of lovingkindness in being towards creatures by way of an aspiration for their coming to welfare and pleasure, he now said: Na faro pararh nikubbetha He did so showing that too by way of an aspiration for their non-coming to harm and suffering.
That is the Ancients’ reading; but now they also read param hi instead of param ni- which is not creditable.
Herein, one is an individual 
and another one is another individual .
Let not . . . undo : let him not betray.
Nor slight : nor let him by surmounting show conceit .
Anywhere : anywhere, in the open, in a village, in a field, in the midst of relatives, or in the midst of a guild, and so on.
Him : that one .
At all : any one at all whether Warrior-Noble or Priestly Divine or householder or one gone forth, whether well off or ill off, and so on.
With provocation or resistive thought : with provocation by alteration in body or speech, and with resistive thought by alteration in mind; and
vyärosanä patighasannä contracted instr. or abl. is said though normally one should say vyärosanäya patighasannäya normal fem. sing, instr. or abl., just as sammad annä vimuccati is said though normally one should say sammad annäya vimuccati , and just as anupubbasikkhä anupub-bakiriyä anupubbapatipadä is said though normally one should say anupubbasikkhäya anupubbakiriyäyaanupubbapatipadäya.
Let them not wish each other ill: nännamannassa dukkhamiccheyya—annamanriassa dukkham na iccheyya .
What is meant?
Lovingkindness should be maintained in being not only by attention given thus ‘ Joyful and safe’, etc., but it should also be maintained in being as follows:’ Oh that no person at all might undo any other person at all with such undoing as betrayal, etc., or might slight any other person at all in any place on the grounds for conceit consisting in birth, property, etc. , and that each might not wish another ill with provocation or resistive thought.
When he had thus pointed out the maintenance of lovingkindness in being by way, as to meaning, of aspiration for this non-coming to harm and suffering, he now said Mätä yathä illustrating that same statement with a simile.
Its meaning is this. As a mother might guard her son , the child of her breast born in herself, and that being also her only child , might guard it with her life by laying down her own life in order to ward off the coming of suffering, thus would he maintain , would he generate again and again, would he augment, his loving-kindness-thought to every living being, and he would maintain it in being unboundedly by means of the object of cognizance consisting of boundless creatures or by means of remainderless extension in a single being.
Herein, he fattens and tends , thus he is a friend ; the meaning is that by his inclination to welfare he acts as a lubricant and protects from harm’s coming.
The state of a friend is love .
For all : unreservedly for. The world : the world of creatures.
Thought :a state of being that is in the mind ;
for that is said because it is associated with cognizance.
He would maintain : would increase.
It has no measure , thus it is done unboundedly ; it is stated thus as an object consisting of measureless numbers of creatures.
Above : upwards; he refers to formless being by this.
Below : downwards; he refers to sensual-desire being by this.
All around : in the middle; he refers to formed being by this.
Unchecked : devoid of checks; with barriers broken down, is what is meant .
It is an enemy that is called a ‘ barrier’; the meaning is that it should be directed even to him.
No malice with : devoid of malice; what is meant is, devoid of the manifestation, even now and then, of any choice governed by malice.
Or foe : without enemies;
for a person who abides in lovingkindness is dear to human beings and dear to non-human beings, and he has no enemies at all; hence that thought is called ‘ with no foe ‘ because of its enemylessness.
And these terms, namely, ‘ enemy ‘ and ‘foe’ are metaphorical expressions.
This is the word-by-word commentary.
Now here is a commentary on the meaning intended. He would maintain , would augment, would bring to growth, increase and fullness, unboundedly for all the world his thought of love , which has already been mentioned in this way ‘ Thus. . . would he maintain unboundedly his thought for every living being ‘ .
How?
Above and below and all around by extending without remainder above up to the Acme of Existence ; that is, the base consisting of neither perception nor non-perception, below down to Avici, the lowest hell, and all around in all the remaining directions.
Or else by pervading without remainder the formless states above, the sensual-desire-element below, and the form-element all around .
And while maintaining this thought in this way, he would maintain it in being by ensuring the absence of any check, malice, or foe, so that it may be unchecked, no malice with or foe .
Or else when it has reached excellence in maintenance-in-being and is unchecked since it finds opportunities everywhere, has no malice since his own annoyance with others has been removed, and has no foe since others’ annoyance with himself has been removed.
he would maintain, augment, for all the world, in the three divisions of above, below and all around, his thought of love unboundedly
Having thus shown the maintenance of lovingkindness in being, he now said ‘Tittham caram nisinno vä’. He did so showing the posture-rule for one who abides devoted to maintaining that in being.
Its meaning is this. When he is thus maintaining that ‘thought of love ‘ in being, instead of adopting any such posture-rule as that given in such passages as ‘ he sits down, having folded his legs crosswise, set his body erect’ , he instead makes the posture-rule here the dispelling, as one pleases, of any discomfort in any particular posture that constantly supervenes with over-long retention of it, so that whether he is standing or walking or seated too or lying down the while he is undrowsing , then he would pursue this lovingkindness-jhana mindfulness .
Or alternatively, having thus shown augmentation of maintenance of lovingkindness in being in the previous stanza, he now said ‘Standing, walking’ in order to show mastery;
for one who has reached mastery is desirous of pursuing such lovingkindness-jhana mindfulness by posture the while he is either standing or walking. Or alternatively, the standing, etc., are no obstacle to him; but rather, whether he is standing or whether he is walking, for the while that he is desirous of pursuing such lovingkindness-jhana mindfulness thus, for so long does he, being undrowsing , pursue it — he has no sluggishness—;
hence he said ‘ Standing or walking, seated too, Or lying down the while undrowsing,
He would pursue this mindfulness’.
The intention is as follows. He would so maintain in being what was stated thus ‘ His thought of love for all the world He would maintain ‘ that were he desirous of pursuing this lovingkindness-jhana mindfulness  by posture, he would pursue this mindfulness the while he was engaged in standing, etc.; or else for the while that, without bothering whether he was standing, etc., he might be desirous of pursuing this lovingkindness-jhana mindfulness , for so long he would pursue this mindfulness.
Having given an exhortation to that abiding in lovingkindness thus ‘ He would such mindfulness pursue ‘, pointing out in so doing mastery in the maintenance of lovingkindness in being, he now said ‘Brahmam etam vihäram idha-m-ähu extolling that abiding.
The meaning is this. There is this abiding in lovingkindness that is set forth in the way beginning with the words ‘ Joyful and safe ‘ and down as far as the words ‘He would pursue this mindfulness’.
Now it is this — since among the heavenly abidings, divine abidings, noble abidings, and abidings in the postures, it is immaculate and is beneficial both to oneself and to others — that is, they say here in the Noble Ones’ True Idea and Discipline, a Divine Abiding . It is a foremost abiding, they say, and consequently he would such mindfulness pursue constantly, continuously and uninterruptedly, whether standing or walking, seated too, or lying down the while undrowsing.
When the Blessed One had finished his teaching thus, he told the bhikkhus ‘Go, bhikkhus, and live in that same forest grove. On the eighth days in each month that are for the hearing of the True Idea, have the gong struck and recite this discourse, and then have a sermon on the True Idea, and be careful to give a blessing . Cultivate this same meditation subject, maintain it in being and develop it. Then instead of showing you dreadful objects, those non-human beings will most surely wish you well and seek your good’.
They agreed, and after they had got up from their seats and had paid homage to the Blessed One, keeping him on their right, they departed to go back to where they had come from; and they did as they had been told.
Now thinking ‘ The venerable ones wish us well and seek our good ‘, the deities were full of happiness and joy, and they themselves swept out the resting places, prepared warm water, performed back-treatment and foot-treatment for them, and arranged for their protection.
There the bhikkhus maintained lovingkindness in being, and making that the basis, they established insight into the three general characteristics of Impermanence, suffering, and not-self, till all of them reached Arahantship, the highest fruit, in that same Rains, and they were able to hold the Paväranä Ceremony in purity.
Its meaning is this. After emerging from the abiding in loving-kindness jhana, which was specified thus ‘ This is Divine Abiding here, they say ‘, he discerns the non-material-form ideas there in that jhana consisting in thinking and exploring and the rest, which he defines as ‘ name ‘. Then, following on the defining, etc., of these jhana factors as ‘ name ‘, he discerns the ideas of material- form there, which he defines as ‘ form ‘. By means of this delimitation of name-and-form he traffics not with views , avoiding that by discerning in the way stated thus ‘A heap of mere determinations; No creature can be found herein ‘ , till he eventually becomes virtuous with the kind of virtue that is supramundane since he is now perfected in the right view belonging to the Path of Stream Entry, which is called seeing , and which is associated with that supramundane virtue. After that, whatever greed there is in him still remaining unabandoned in the guise of sensual desire as subjective defilement for sensual desires as objects , of that he becomes purged — vineyya =vinayitva ; that is, he becomes cured — by attenuation of certain defilements and by abandoning of certain others without remainder by means of his attaining the Paths of the Once Returner and the Non Returner, he will surely come no more to any womb ; absolutely never again coming to any womb,
he is reborn only in the Pure Abodes, where he reaches Arahantship and attains extinction.
in the Illustrator of Ultimate Meaning, the Commentary on the Minor Books,
The explanation of the Lovingkindness Discourse is ended.
Herein, there follows first a word-commentarv on the first stanza: ‘What should be done by one with skill in good’. Should be done: karaniyam=kätabbam ;it is worth doing .
That is how the classification of the source, which illustrates why’, should be understood in detail.
And at this point, namely, ‘which illustrates as well By whom ’twas spoken, when, where, why’
I shall set out to clarify Its Source,’ what was laid down in the Schedule has been given in detail in all aspects.
That was the origin of the Good-omen Question.
Now here is the comment on the words and on the meaning in the verses.
When the Blessed One heard the words of the god’s son, he uttered the stanza ‘ Not consorting with the foolish . . . ’
Now, since ‘the omen as we go
But since it was said ‘ Whereafter when the time falls due, We comment on the meaning too the comment on the meaning must begin.
Now while there are some others who say that ‘ only the first five stanzas were spoken by the Blessed One, the rest being spoken by the venerable Ananda at the time of his performing the Protection Ceremony that may be so in fact, or it may not.
But does that investigation concern us? The commentary that we shall make on this Jewel Sutta will actually fit both cases.
…By developing the four divine abodes, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he passed on to the Brahma-world.
Now the Treasure-store Discourse, which begins thus ‘A man lays by a treasure store’, is placed here next after the Without-the-Walls Discourse.
So first I shall the reason state Wherefore they placed this discourse here,
Herein, the reason for its being placed here should be understood as follows.
Although it is not in the order in which it t that this Treasure-store Discourse was delivered by the Blessed One, that is to say, next after the Without-the-walls Discourse, it is nevertheless placed here because it is supplementary to the Without-the-walls Discourse, which was uttered as the giving of a blessing.
Or else it can be understood that it was placed here for the purpose of showing by its means of the the Without-the-walls Discourse the failure of those devoid of merit.
This is the reason for placing it here.
And make the Need-Arisen clear, Before the Comment I relate.
The Need-Arisen for its utterance was this. 1 At Savatthi, it seems, there was a certain land-owner rich in much money and property.
He lived the household life in faith and confidence uncognizant of the stain of avarice.
One day he gave an almsgiving to the Community of Bhikkhus headed by the Enlightened One.
It so happened that on that occasion the king was in need of money, so he sent a man, telling him ‘Go and fetch the land-owner named so-and-so’.
The man went to the land-owner and told him ‘Householder, the king summons you’.
The landowner was actually serving the Community of Bhikkhus headed by the Englightened one, his mind being graced by the special qualities of faith and so on. He replied ‘Go now, good man; I shall come later. Just now I am engaged in laying up a treasure store’.
Then, when the Blessed One had eaten and had shown that he had had enough, he uttered these stanzas, namely ‘ A man lays by a treasure store ’, as a blessing in order to show to the land-owner how that same excellence in merit is in the ultimate sense a treasure store.
This was the need arisen.
‘first the reason stated Wherefore they placed this discourse here,
And made the Need-Arisen clear, the comment I shall now relate’ 
So having
As regards the first stanza, namely, ‘A man a treasure store lays by ‘ herein, it is stored away , thus it is a treasure store ; the meaning is that it is put by, protected, guarded.
That is of four kinds, namely, a fixture, the ambulant, a pseudo-limb, and a follower.
Herein, the ‘ fixture ’ is any bullion or gold stored away underground or in attics, or any field or land, or anything else of the sort that is devoid of any alteration of posture: this is a treasure store as a fixture.
The ‘ ambulant ’ consists of bonds - women and bondsmen, elephants, cattle, horses and mares, goats and sheep, fowls and pigs, or anything else of the sort that is associated with alteration of the postures: this is a treasure store as the ambulant.
The ‘ pseudo-limb ’ is any sphere of work, sphere of craft, branch of science, ample learning , or anything else of the sort acquired by training and bound up with one’s own selfhood as if it were a limb: this is a treasure store as a pseudo-limb.
The ‘ follower ’ is merit consisting in giving, consisting in virtue, consisting in maintenance of concentration and insight in being, consisting in hearing the True Idea, and consisting in teaching the True Idea, or any other merit of the sort that gives desirable fruit here and there as if it had followed one: this is a treasure store as a follower.
But in this instance it is the treasure store as a fixture that is intended.
Lays by : puts away, sets apart, guards.
A man : a human male.
Of course, a man and a woman and a eunuch can lay by a treasure store, but here, though the teaching is given under the heading of a man, nevertheless as to meaning the others should be regarded as taken in combination as well here.
Deep in a water-level pit : what is ‘ deep ’ is in the sense of its having to be plunged down to; it is a ‘ water- level pit ’ owing to its proximity to water .
There is such as is deep but not water-level, like a hundred-fathom hole in a jungle tract, and there is such as is water-level but not deep, like a one-span or two-span hole scooped out in a low-lying marsh, and there is such as is both deep and water-levellike a hole deepened in a jungle tract until it is estimated that water is about to come.
It is with reference to the last that ‘ deep in a water-level pit ’ is said.
If need arise for aid : it is inseparable from aid , thus it is for aid ; what is meant is that it brings aid, brings welfare.
Need : kiccam—katabbam ; what is meant is, anything at all that ought to be done .
Arisen is the same as risen ; what is meant is that it has appeared as a state of something that has to be done 
It will be there to aid me then : this demonstrates the purpose of the treasure store;
If that need for aid arises.
for he lays it by for that benefit thus ‘ If need for my doing anything at all that will bring me aid has arisen, this treasure store will be able to supply that need of mine’;
for it should be understood that the benefit for him is simply the supplying of the need when the need has arisen.
Having thus, in showing the purpose of the treasure store, shown the intention of acquisition of benefit, he now said in order to show the intention of defence against harm:
Its meaning should be understood by construing the two phrases ‘ it will be there ’ and ‘ for discharge ’ as appropriate, which are stated thus ‘ It will be there to aid me then ’ and ‘For my discharge … of debts Here is the construction.
Not only does a man lay by a treasure store thinking ‘ It will be there to aid me then ’, but he also lays by a treasure store thinking ‘ It will be there for my discharge from kings were I denounced by enemies and adversaries in some such way as “ He is a brigand ” or “ He is an adulteror ” or “ He is a tax-evader ”; 2 or it will be there for my discharge from a brigand if I am held to ransom by brigands either by their stealing money through house-breaking or by their threatening my life thus “ Give so much money and gold ”.
And then there will be those to whom I owe debts and they will press me to pay off the debts, and it will be there for the discharge of my debt when I am pressed by those creditors.
And there are occasions when there is a famine, when harvests fail and food is hard to get, and it is not easy for one who is not rich to survive, and so it will be there for me in such a famine ;
Having thus shown with these two stanzas of two lines each that the purpose of laying by a treasure store is twofold as the intention to acquire benefit and the intention to defend against harm, he now said in order to round off the statement of that same twofold purpose:
Its meaning is this. shown as acquisition of benefit and defence against harm respectively with the words ‘ It will be there to aid me then ’ and ‘ From kings were I denounced’
with the purpose of supplying those needs With suchlike aims , what is called a store , namely, money and bullion, etc., in the world of location 3 will be laid by , put away, set apart.
For my discharge, from kings were I ‘ Denounced, or from a brigand else
‘ If held to ransom, or of debts, ‘ In famine or in accidents ”
and there are accidents due to fire or water or an unwelcome heir, and it will be there for me in such accidents when they arise ’.
’ With suchlike aims what in the world ‘ Is called a store will be laid by ’
Now since that treasure store thus laid by provides only for those who possess merit and not for anyone else the acquisition of benefits and defence against harm intended, he pointed out this meaning by saying
’ the meaning of which is as follows. 14. Though that treasure store, be it ne’er so well laid by —be it never so thoroughly dug in and put away, is what is meant,
deep in a water-level pit , till it is reckoned to be deep in a water-level pit; what is meant is, be it never so thoroughly done as that—
And the word tam should be regarded as a mere particle for filling out the line, as in such passages as ‘ Yatha tam appamattassa atapino ’ ;
or else tam is said with change of gender from masculine to neuter where so referring back to sabbo should have been said,
how thoroughly?
‘ Though be it ne’er so well laid by ‘ Deep in a water-level pit,
‘ Not all of it will yet suffice ‘ To serve him all the time;…
and when taken thus its meaning is easily discovered.
still not all of it will yet suffice To serve him all the time ; even all of it will not serve for all of the time that man by whom it was laid by; it will not suffice for, be capable of answering, his aforementioned need, is what is meant;
but rather only some serves only sometimes, or else it does not serve at all.
Having thus said ‘ Not all of it will yet suffice To serve him all the time ’, showing reasons why it will not serve him, he now said:
Its meaning is this. The store gets shifted , may disappear, may go away, from its place in which it was sell laid by; even though it has no choice of its own, still with the exhaustion of its owner’s merit it goes to another place.
Or he perhaps forgets the marks , he no longer knows what place he laid the treasure store by in. Or then, prompted by the exhustion of his merit, Naga serpents hale it , that treasure store, off, remove it to another place;
or else spirits fritter it away , take what they like and go off with it;
So that treasure store fails to serve him for these reasons beginning with its getting shifted from its place.
Having thus told reasons for its failure to serve, namely, those beginning with its getting shifted from its place, which are those recognized in the world, he now said showing the one and only reason which is the root of all those aforesaid reasons, namely, exhaustion of merit:
‘ And when his merit is consumed, ‘ The whole will vanish utterly
Its meaning is this. And when  on the occasion on which, there is the consumption of the kind of merit that produces gain in property, then the kind of merit that leads to loss of property finds it opportunity and takes over; and then the whole of the treasure store consisting of such riches as money, bullion, etc., that was laid by by the layer-by will vanish utterly .
‘ The store gets shifted from its place, ‘ Or he perhaps forgets the marks,
‘ Or Naga Serpents hale it off, ‘ Or spirits fritter it away, ‘
Or else the heirs he cannot bear ‘ Abstract it while he does not see ’
or else the heirs that he cannot bear dig the treasure store out of the ground and abstract it while he does not see .
and said to him: ‘Come, great king!
Having thus stated the kind of treasure store recognized in the world, which, although laid by with such and such intention, yet fails to serve as intended and is in various ways inseparable from the idea of vanishing away, the Blessed One now said showing that excellence of merit as a treasure store in the ultimate sense, in order to show which he began this Treasure-Store Discourse when giving the landowner his blessing.
Herein, with gifts should be taken in the way already stated under ‘ Giving, True-Ideal conduct ’ ;
virtuousness is bodily and verbal non-transgression,
Refraining is the act-of-refraining ; what is meant is the hindering of cognizance’s ranging about among a variety of objects. This is a designation for concentration.
One possessing this kind of refraining is called ‘ one who has supreme refraining ’ in the passage ‘ Who can refrain by hand and foot, And speech, who has supreme refraining ’ .
Some others have said that refraining is the act-of-refraining, and that what is meant is restraint, it being then a designation for faculty-restraint .
Constraint is the act- of-constraining ; what is meant is the quieting of defilement.
This is a designation for understanding, since understanding is in some instances called ‘ understanding ’ , as in such passages as ‘sussūsā labhate pañña’ ,
and in some instances it is the ‘ True Idea’ as in such passages as ,
and in some instances it is ‘constraint’ as in such passages as .
After defining ‘ gifts’ and the rest in this way, the meaning of this stanza can be understood in brief as follows. When a woman or a man shall have , with the four things, namely, with gifts , with virtue , with refraining and with constraint , a treasure store consisting of merit that by being done thoroughly is well laid by either in the single continuity of cognizance of these things beginning with gifts 5 or in the instances beginning with ‘ shrines ’ in the next stanza, just as a treasure store consisting of such riches as bullion, gold, pearls or gems is stored away by putting together in one place those things such as the gold and the rest.
Shall have with gifts or virtuousness ‘ Or with refraining or constraint ,
‘ But when a woman or a man ‘ ‘ A store of merit well laid by ’
or else what is intended here by ‘ virtuousness ’ is all five-factored and eight-factored virtue 4 in the case of laymen and virtue as Patimokkha-Rule restraint in the case of bhikkhus.
Having thus shown treasure-store-ness in the ultimate sense by means of excellence of merit with the stanza beginning ‘ But when a woman or a man’ the Blessed One now said showing the ground wherein that treasure store is well laid by.
Herein, it should be built up 6 thus it is a shrine , what is meant is that it should be honoured. Or it is a shrine because it has been built up .
That is of three kinds as a shrine by use, a shrine by dedication, and a relic shrine.
Herein, the Tree of Enlightenment is a shrine by use, an image of the Enlightened One is a shrine by dedication, and a monument with a relic-chamber containing a relic is a relic shrine.
The Community is any one among those kinds defined as the Community headed by the Enlightened One, and the rest.
A person is anyone whether layman or gone forth from the house life.
He has no room on any day on which he arrives, thus he is a guest ;
The rest is as already stated.
After defining ‘ shrines ’ and the rest in this way, the meaning of this stanza can be understood in brief as follows. That treasure store, which was called ‘ well laid by ’, is well laid by on these grounds.
Why?
Because it is capable of giving long-lasting desirable fruit,
and so those who give even a little at a shrine will for long gain desirable fruit,
according as it is said
‘ I gave only a single flower ‘ But then for eighty myriad aeons
‘ I knew no woeful destination ’ ,
’ Now if a man should see full pleasure ‘ In giving up relative pleasure ’ 
And so too should be understood the classification of the fruit of giving on the other grounds beginning with the Community in the way in which it is stated in the Dakkhinavisuddhi Sutta , the Velama Sutta , and so on .
And just as the occurrence of Giving at shrines, etc., and the richness of its fruit have been shown, so in each case as applicable there can be understood the occurrence of Virtue as Keeping and Avoiding , contingent upon whatever it may be, and the richness of its fruit, the occurrence of Refraining as Recollection of the Enlightened One and the richness of its fruit, and the occurrence of Restraint as Insight, Attention, and Reviewing, with that as the basis and the richness of its fruit.
’ In shrines or the Community ‘ Or in a person or in guests
‘ Or in a mother, in a father, ‘ Even in an elder brother’,
this is a designation for one who should be given hospitality the moment he arrives.
Having thus shown the ground, divided into shrines, etc., for a treasure store consisting of merit to be laid by in when it is being laid by with giving, etc., the Blessed One now said He did so showing what distinguishes that treasure store well laid by on these grounds from the treasure store laid by deep in a water- level pit.
Herein, with the words this treasure store is well laid by he demonstrates the kind of treasure store that is well laid by with gifts, etc., stated in the preceding lines.
Unlosable : it cannot be won from one and taken by others, thus it is unlosable. Ajjeyyo is also a reading; the meaning of that is: it ought to be got , is worth getting , ought to be got together , 7 by one who seeks welfare and happiness.
With this reading the construction should be made as follows ‘ This treasure store ought to be got ’, and then after pointing out the connexion by asking ‘Why?’ , the construction should be completed thus ‘ Because it is well laid by and is a follower ’.
Otherwise what was stated would be that it was what had been already well laid by that ought to be got; but what has been well laid by is not still to be got ,
It follows , thus it is a follower ; the meaning is that when a man goes to the other world it does not abandon him in the provision of its fruit, wherever that may be.
Among what by abandoning Must be gone to he goes with this : 8 when the time of death has appeared, then with this treasure store among all the properties that must begone to , having abandoned them, he goes to the other world: that, it would seem, is the meaning;
Why?
Because properties are not what must be gone to ,
Consequently, if that were the meaning, it would be tantamount to saying ‘ By abandoning properties that are the distinctions of happy destination that must be gone to .
Therefore the meaning here should be understood as follows. From among properties that, by abandoning a mortal in the way stated as ‘ The store gets shifted from its place ’ , etc., are going , he goes with this ;
for this does not abandon him owing to its being a follower.
Here it may be objected that the passive gerundive, namely, gamaniyesu has the meaning of the alternative passive gerundive, namely, gantabbesu and not the meaning of the active present participle gacchantesu .
—That need not be taken rigidly;
for in the passage ‘ Ariya niyyanika ’ the meaning is ‘are leading out ’ and not ‘ must be outled ’ , and here too the meaning is ‘ among those that are going ’ , not ‘ among those that must be gone to ’ .
Or alternatively, at the time of death one who wants to give something to someone is not able even to handle properties, and so first those properties must be abandoned by him bodily, and afterwards they must be gone from by him with cognizance that is free from longing; they must be surpassed, is what is meant.
Therefore the meaning in this case can be regarded as follows: ‘ Among properties which, he first having abandoned them bodily, afterwards must be gone from with cognizance ’.
In the case of the first meaning, the use of the locative is in the sense of withdrawal 9 thus: ‘ Among properties that must be gone by abandoning him he, having thus withdrawn therefrom the portion of merit as a treasure store, takes this and goes
for this treasure store’s substantive-essence of being-taken-and-gone-with-ness is characterized by the properties’ substantive-essence of must-be-gone-from- ness .
‘This treasure store is well laid by, ‘ A follower unlosable:
‘ Among what by abandoning ‘ Must be gone to he goes with this.
since it has already been got before the laying by.
but that will not do.
since such and such properties have to be abandoned ; rather such and such distinctions of destination on rebirth are ‘ what must be gone to ’ .
In the case of the second meaning the locative is in the sense of characterizing a substantive by another substantive ;
Having thus shown what distinguishes this merit-treasure from the treasure store laid by deep in a water-level pit, the Blessed One further said . He did so urging gods and men to busy themselves with that merit- treasure by detailing 10 the special qualities of the merit-treasure shown by him, as a trader in rare goods does when he urges buyers to busy themselves with his wares by detailing the special qualities of his own goods.
Herein, as to no others have a share in it: asddharana-m-anhesam —asddharano annesam ; the letter m is for liaison purposes as it is in such passages as ‘adukkha-m-asukhaya vedandya sampayutta ’ .
And robbers cannot steal this treasure : acordharano=na corehi dharano ; it is not to be taken by robbers, is what is meant.
It must be stored , thus it is a treasure-store .
Having thus detailed 10 the special qualities of merit with two half-lines, he next urged them to activity in it with two more, namely, ‘ So let the steadfast merit make ’ and ‘ The store that is their follower’
Here is the meaning of them. A store that no others own a share of and that robbers cannot steal is what is called ‘merit ’ ;
and not only is that store one which no others own a share of and robbers cannot steal, but also it is ‘ the store that is a follower ’, of which it was said in the preceding stanza 4 This treasure store is well laid by, a never- failing follower
‘ No others have a share in it, ‘ And robbers cannot steal this store; ‘
So let the steadfast merit make, ‘ The store that is their follower ’.
and that follower too consists of merit, therefore the steadfast one, the person perfected in discovery , perfected in steadfastness, let him make— kayiratha—kareyya —merit .
Having thus urged gods and men to activity in the merit-store by detailing its special qualities, the Blessed One now said He did so showing in brief what fruit it gives to those who have become active and are pursuing the making of merit.
‘ This is a store can satisfy ‘ Every desire of gods and men
But this giving all that is desired happens only to one who has bound the merit up with an aspiration; none happens without any aspiration,
Why is that?
Because he observes conduct in accordance with the True Idea, fair conduct ’ 
Why is that?
Because he observes conduct in accordance with the True Idea, fair conduct ’ 
and similarly he said
‘ Here, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu possesses faith, possesses virtue,… learning,… generosity,… understanding. It occurs to him “ Oh that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of the Warrior-Nobles of the great halls
He exerts that cognizance, decides that cognizance, maintains that cognizance in being;
those determinations and those abidings of his, thus maintained in being and developed, lead to his reappearance there ’ , and so on.
according as it is said
‘ If a householder who observes conduct in accordance with the True Idea, fair conduct, should wish “ Oh that on the dissolution of the body, after death, I might reappear in the company of the Warrior-Nobles of the great halls ”, it is possible that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he might reappear in the company of the Warrior- Nobles of the great halls.
and likewise ‘ “ Oh that by realization myself with direct-knowledge I might here and now enter upon and abide in the heart-deliverance and understanding-deliverance that are taintless with exhaustion of taints ”, it is possible…
That is why he now said He did so showing the aspiration that causes that merit’s giving what is desired, which aspiration is a procedure of wishing in such-and-such wise with its requisite equipment of exertion of that cognizance, deciding it, and maintaining it in being.
No matter what they aspire to have, ‘ All that they get by merit’s grace
He now uttered the following five stanzas beginning with Beauty of looks, beauty of voice, He did so showing by specific limitation in each case how that ‘all’ is obtainable by means of that merit.
Herein, in the first stanza of these five to begin with, beauty of looks : is good-coloured complexion, golden sheen of the skin; for that is got by means of this merit store,
‘ Bhikkhus, since a Perfect One, in a former birth,… formerly existing as a human being, was unangry and little given to despair, and since when much was said he never answered back, was never irritated, never felt ill will, never resented, and never manifested annoyance, irritation, hate and surliness, and since he was a giver of fine soft rugs and cloaks made of fine linen, fine cotton,…fine wool;
with that action performed, stored up, … on his being come again to the same human state, he acquires these two characteristics of a Great Man:
Beauty of voice is a divine kind of voice, utterance like that of a karavika bird.11 That too is obtainable by this means,
according as it is said
‘ Bhikkhus, since a Perfect One in a former birth,…abandoning harsh speech, became one who abstained from harsh speech, became a speaker of such words as are innocent, pleasing to the ear and lovable, as go to the heart, are civil, desired of many and dear to many;
with that action performed, stored up, … on his being come again to this same human state, he acquires these two characteristics of a Great Man:
He has a large tongue, and he has a divine voice like the call of a karavika bird’ .
Beauty of figure is well- shapedness in the places proper for being evenly filled out and rounded ; what is meant is, construction 12 with evenly filled out roundedness of limbs.
And that too is obtained by this means,
‘ Bhikkhus, since a Perfect One in a former birth,…formerly existing as a human being, sought the good, the welfare, the comfort, the safety from bondage, of the many, thinking “ How shall these have increase in faith, in virtue, in learning, in generosity, in understanding, in riches and corn, in fields and lands, in bipeds and quadrupeds, in wives and children, in bondsmen, servants and men, in relatives, in friends, in kinsmen?” With that action performed, stored up… on his being come again to this same human state, he acquires these three characteristics of a Great Man: He has the upper torso of a lion, the furrow between his shoulders is filled in, and his neck 13 is evenly rounded’ , and so on.
And Sutta passages can be cited from here and there that establish obtainment of the fulfilment of aspirations by means of this merit-store in cases of others as well as of the Perfect One in this way;
but this is in brief for fear of too much detail. 39. We shall now comment on the remaining words.
Beauty of : here the whole physical frame can be understood as the ‘ form ’, as it is in such passages as ‘ When a space is equipped with bones and sinews and flesh and skin, there comes to be the term “a form”’ ; its elegance, beauty of form, not- over-tallness, not-over-shortness, not-over-leanness, not-over-stout- ness, not-over-darkness, not-over-fairness, is what is meant.
Lordliness is the lordly state; ownership in virtue of the state of a Warrior-Noble of the great halls, etc., is what is meant.
Retinue is excellence of one’s own dependents and retainers in and in the case of those gone forth from the house life it is excellence in the fourfold assembly. ādhipaccañca parivāro = ādhipaccaparivāro .
And here it can also be understood that excellence in physical frame is expressed by ‘ beauty of looks etc., excellence of property by ‘ lordliness and excellence of dependents and retainers by ‘ retinue ’.
All that is got by merit’s grace : what he points out is that when it was stated above thus ‘ No matter what they aspire to have, all that is got by merit’s grace ’ , herein, this firstly is a set of six things stated with specific limitation as ‘ beauty of looks etc., all of which can be understood to be got by means of that merit.
according as it is said
He is the colour of gold, and his skin has a golden sheen ’ .
according as it is said
Having thus shown with this stanza the excellence of godly and human kingship that is to be got by merit’s might, he now uttered the stanza ‘And every human excellence, ‘ showing the excellence of extinction preceded by the excellence in combined form that was stated variously in the preceding stanzas.
Here is a commentary on the words in it. Human : it is the offspring of human beings , thus it is human , and manusi is the same as manusika.
Excellence is the act of excelling , 15
Any is an inclusion without remainder in this instance. They delight by means of that when it is arisen in themselves or when it is become an aid externally, thus it is delight ; this is a designation either for pleasure or for what is an external basis for pleasure.
Even is an indefinite term in this instance. The word and has the meaning of a conjunction conjoining this with the foregoing excellence.
Extinction itself is extinction’s excellence .
Now here is a commentary on the meaning. All the human excellence and the delight in godly worlds mentioned by the phrases beginning with ‘ beauty of looks ’ and also this extinction’s excellence that can be reached by means of the states beginning with that beyond that of One Mature in Faith 16 —that as well—, are the third set of things stated by specific limitation, and all that is got by merit’s grace.
Or alternatively, there is what is not mentioned under ‘ beauty of looks ’, etc., namely, the human excellence classed as particular distinction in understanding, etc., which is demonstrated in the way beennning ‘ They are well endowed with mindfulness. … there is the living of the Divine Life here’ , and also the further delight in jhana, etc.,17 in the godly world and then extinction’s excellence of the kind already stated as well, and this is the third ‘ all’ stated by specific limitation that is ‘ got by merit’s grace ’.
That is how the commentary on the meaning should be understood here.
A godly world: devaloko —devanam loko ;
in that godly world.
Having thus shown with this stanza how the excellence of extinction, which can be reached by means of the state of One Mature in Faith i.e., a Stream Enterer, etc., 16 is to be got by merit’s might, he now uttered the following stanza: A man has excellence in friends; He did so showing what is to be acquired through the state of One Both-Ways-Liberated, 16 as the three True Knowledges and the means thereto.
Here is a commentary on the words in it. By its means one excells , or one arrives at evidences of special qualities, thus it is excellence ; 15 the friend himself is the excellence, thus there is excellence in friends ‘: that excellence in friends.
A man has : depending on.18
Reason right together with what is the means.19
Denoting : he does the maintaining 20 of devotion.
One cognizes by its means, thus it is true-knowledge . 21 One is delivered by its means, or it itself is delivered , thus it is deliverance ; he ivins true knowledge and deliverance : vijjavimuttivasibhavo — vijja-vimuttisu vasi-bhavo .
Now here is a commentary on the meaning. There is this mastery , through non-sluggishness in such- and-such-wise, 22 and this mastery—won after he has found excellence in friends by depending on the Master or on some venerable companion in the Divine Life and, by taking his advice and instruction, has devoted reason right by practising the way as instructed—, this mastery, which is both mastery in the three True Knowledges consisting in Recollection of Past Life, the Heavenly Eye that sees the passing and reappearance of creatures according to their actions, and the Knowledge of Exhaustion of Taints, ‘ Herein, what is deliverance?
It is the resoluteness of cognizance and it is extinction ’ , and mastery in deliverance classed as the eight attainments 23 and extinction stated thus is the fourth ‘ all ’ stated by specific limitation as ‘ got by merit’s grace’.
Having thus shown with this stanza the excellence of extinction that is to be got by the might of merit that sides with , mastery in the true knowledge and deliverance just mentioned, which is also to be reached by one Both-Ways-Liberated who possesses the Triple True Knowledge, he now uttered the following stanza: ‘ Discriminations, liberations,’ It was because those Both-Ways-Liberated who have reached mastery in true knowledge and deliverance and possess the triple true knowledge all get that evidencing of special qualities that consists in the discriminations, etc., by means of that excellence of merit, and because that excellence of merit is also treatable in such-and- such-wise as the footing for that evidencing, that he therefore uttered this stanza, with which this statement of ‘ all ’ by limitation is completed.24
And this understanding with its four divisions dealing with ideas, meanings, language, and perspicuity 25 , which are called discriminations , and these eight liberations , which are set out in the way beginning ‘ Possessed of form, he sees forms ’ , and the perfection of disciples , which establishes the disciples’ excellence reachable by the Blessed One’s disciples, and both kinds , namely, the Hermit Enlightenment , which establishes self-becomeness , and the plane of enlightenment , which establishes supremacy over all creatures, are the fifth 4 all ’ stated by specific limitation that is 4 got by merit’s grace.
Having thus shown with three stanzas what it is that was stated in general in the lines 4 No matter what they aspire to have, All that is got by merit’s grace ’ , he now concluded the teaching with the following stanza: ‘So great are the rewards it gives,’ And he did so commending all this exercise signalized as the treasure store that ‘can satisfy every desire ’ .
Here is a word-commentary on it. So refers back to the previous meaning.
It has a great reward , thus it gives great rewards ; what is meant is that it conduces to great good ; mahiddhika is also a reading.
It is an indicative; what it indicates is the excellence of the merit stated in the stanzas from ‘ But when a woman or a man Shall have with gifts or virtuousness ’ down to ‘ So let the steadfast merit make ’ .
Namely is only a particle in the sense of confronting; it confronts in this way ‘ which is this ’ in order to demonstrate what was indicated by ‘it’ .
Merit’s excellence: punnasampada= punnanam sampada .
For that is a term for a reason.
Steadfast : those endowed with steadfastness .
Commend : praise.
Wise : those perfect in understanding.
A store of merit made : the state of having made merit.
Now here is a comment on the meaning. Having thus commended the reward to be arrived ar by the might of merit’s excellence, which begins with ‘beauty of looks’ and ends with ‘Both kinds of enlightenment’, the Blessed One now pointed out that same meaning summarily, lauding in the same sense the greatness of the rewards of merit’s excellence of the kinds stated. And in so doing, what he meant was ‘ It , namely , the merit’s excellence pointed out by me in the way beginning But when a woman or a man Shall have with gifts or virtuousness ”, by its bringing such great rewards gives so great rewards , and for that those like me, who are the steadfast creatures, preaching of the True Idea, indefatigability, and special quality of being true to what is, commend a store of merit made in its several constituent aspects, doing so not owing to partiality, and with such phrases as “No others have a share in it, And robbers cannot steal this store ” and “ Bhikkhus, do not fear the kinds of merit: that is a designation for pleasure, namely 4 kinds of merit ”” .
At the end of the teaching the lay follower, along with many other people became established in the fruition of Stream Entry. When he went into the presence of King Pasenadi of Kosala, he told him what had happened. The king was exceedingly contented, and saying ‘ Good, householder, good that you lay by a treasure store that cannot be carried off by those like me’ he congratulated 26 and greatly complimented him.
in the Illustrator of Ultimate Meaning, the Commentary on the Minor Books
The explanation of the Treasure-Store Discourse is ended.
There has been action, there has been action-result:
There has been action, there is action-result:
There has been action, there will be action-result:
There is action, there is action-result:
There is action, there will be action-result:
There will be action, there will be action-result:
There has been profitable action, there has been profitable action- result:
There has been unprofitable action, there has been unprofitable action- result:
There has been …
There has been reprehensible action … 5. There has been unreprehensible action … 6. There has been dark action … 7. There has been bright action … 8. There has been action productive of pleasure … 9. There has been action productive of pain… 10. There has been action resulting in pleasure … 11. There has been action resulting in pain … There will be action resulting in pain, there will be action-result result- ing in pain: there will be action resulting in pain, there will be no action- result resulting in pain.
Treatise on Action
there has been action, there has been no action-result.
there has been action, there is no action-result.
there has been action, there will be no action-result.
there is action, there is no action- result.
there is action, there will be no action-result.
there will be action, there will be no action-result.
there has been profitable action, there has been no profitable action-result.
There has been…
there has been unprofitable action, there has been no unprofitable action-result.
… By developing the four divine abodes, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he passed on to the Brahma-world.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was wandering among the Kosalans together with a large Sangha of bhikkhus.
Then in a certain place beside the main road the Blessed One smiled.
It Occurred to the venerable Ananda: “What is the reason, what is the cause, for the Blessed One’s smile?
Tathagatas do not smile for no reason.”
So he arranged his upper robe on one shoulder, and extending his hands in reverential salutation towards the Blessed One, asked him: “Venerable sir, what is the reason, what is the cause, for the Blessed One’s smile?
Tathagatas do not smile for no reason.”
“Once, Ananda, in this place there was a prosperous and busy market town called Vebhalinga, with many inhabitants and crowded with people.
Now the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, lived near the market town Vebhalinga.
It was here, in fact, that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, had his monastery;
Then the venerable Ananda folded his patchwork cloak in four, and spreading it out, said to the Blessed One: “Then, venerable sir, let the Blessed One be seated.
Thus this place will have been used by two Accomplished Ones, Fully Enlightened Ones.”
The Blessed One sat down on the seat
Now the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, lived near the market town Vebhalinga.
It was here, in fact, that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, had his monastery;
“In Vebhalinga the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, had as a supporter, as his chief supporter, a potter named Ghatikara.
Ghatikara the potter had as a friend, as his close friend, a brahmin student named Jotipala.790
I hold that it is good to see that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened.’
The brahmin student Jotipala replied: ‘Enough, my dear Ghatikara,
“A second and third time the potter Ghatikara said: ‘My dear Jotipala, let us go and see the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened.
I hold that it is good to see that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened.’
And a second and a third time the brahmin student Jotipala replied: ‘Enough, my dear Ghatikara,
- ‘Then, my dear Jotipala, let us take a loofah and bath powder and go to the river to bathe.’
- ‘Very well,’ Jotipala replied.
“So the potter Ghatikara and the brahmin student Jotipala took a loofah and bath powder and went to the river to bathe.
Then Ghatikara said to Jotipala: ‘My dear Jotipala, there is the monastery of the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, quite nearby.
Let us go and see the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened.
I hold that it is good to see that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened.’
Jotipala replied: ‘Enough, my dear Ghatikara,
“A second and a third time Ghatikara said: ‘My dear Jotipala, there is the monastery of the Blessed One Kassapa…’
“Then the potter Ghatikara seized the brahmin student Jotipala by the belt and said: ‘My dear Jotipala, there is the monastery of the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, quite nearby.
Let us go and see the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened.
I hold that it is good to see that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened.’
Then the brahmin student Jotipala undid his belt and said: ‘Enough, my dear Ghatikara,
“Then, when the brahmin student Jotipala had washed his head, the potter Ghatikara seized him by the hair and said:792 ‘My dear Jotipala, there is the monastery of the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, quite nearby.
Let us go and see the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened.
I hold that it is good to see that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened.’
“Then the brahmin student Jotipala thought: ‘It is wonderful, it is marvellous
that this potter Ghatikara, who is of a different birth, should presume to seize me by the hair when we have washed our heads! Surely this can be no simple matter.’ And he said to the potter Ghatikara: ‘You go as far as this, my dear Ghatikara?”
- ‘I go as far as this, my dear Jotipala;
- ‘Then, my dear Ghatikara, let go of me. Let us visit him.’
“So Ghatikara the potter and Jotipala the brahmin student went to the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened. Ghatikara, after paying homage to him, sat down at one side,
Ghatikara then said to the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened: ‘Venerable sir, this is the brahmin student Jotipala, my friend, my close friend.
Let the Blessed One teach him the Dhamma.’
“Then the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, instructed, urged, roused, and encouraged Ghatikara the potter and Jotipala the brahmin student with an exposition of the Dhamma.
At the conclusion of the exposition, having delighted and rejoiced in the Blessed One Kassapa’s words, they rose from their seats, and after paying homage to the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, keeping him on their right, they departed.
“Then Jotipala asked Ghatikara: ‘Now that you have heard this Dhamma, my dear Ghatikara, why don’t you go forth from the home life into homelessness?”
- ‘My diear Jotipala, don’t you know that I support my blind and aged parents?”
- ‘Then, my dear Ghatikara, I shall go forth from the home life into homelessness.’
“So Ghatikara the potter and Jotipala the brahmin student went to the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened. After paying homage to him,
Let the Blessed One give him the going forth.’
And the brahmin student Jotipala received the going forth from the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, and he received the full admission.793
Wandering by stages, he eventually arrived at Benares,
“Now King Kiki of Kasi heard: ‘It seems that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, has reached Benares and is living in the Deer Park at Isipatana.’
So he had a number of state carriages made ready, and mounting a state carriage, drove out from Bepares with the full pomp of royalty in order to see the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened.
He went thus as far as the road was passable for carriages, and then he got down from his carriage and went forward on foot to the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened. After paying homage to him, he sat down at one side
“At the conclusion of the exposition, King Kiki of Kasi said: ‘Venerable sir, let the Blessed One together with the Sangha of bhikkhus consent to accept tomorrow’s meal from me.’
And the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, accepted in silence.
Then, knowing that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, had accepted, he rose from his seat and after paying homage to him, keeping him on his right, he departed.
“Then, when the night had ended, King Kiki of Kasi had good food of various kinds prepared in his own dwelling - red rice stored in the sheaf with the dark grains picked out, along with many sauces and curries - and he had the time announced to the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, thus: ‘It is time, venerable sir, the meal is ready.’
“Then, it being morning, the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, he went with the Sangha of bhikkhus to the dwelling of King Kiki of Kasi and sat down on the seat made ready.
Then, with his own hands, King Kiki of Kasi served and satisfied the Sangha of bhikkhus headed by the Buddha with the various kinds of good food.
When the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, had eaten and had withdrawn his hand from the bowl, King Kiki of Kasi took a low seat, sat down at one side
- ‘Enough, king,
A second and a third time King Kiki of Kasi said: ‘Venerable sir, let the Blessed One accept from me a residence for the Rains in Benares; that will be helpful for the Sangha.’
- ‘Enough, king,
“The king thought: ‘The Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, does not accept from me a residence for the Rains in Benares,’ and he was very disappointed and sad.
“Then he said: ‘Venerable sir, have you a better supporter than I am?”
- ‘I have, great king. There is a market town called Vebhalinga
where a potter named Ghatlkara lives. He is my supporter, my chief supporter.
Now you, great king, thought: “The Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, does not accept from me a residence for the Rains in Benares,” and you were very disappointed and sad;
The potter Ghatikara has gone for refuge to the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha.
He abstains from killing living beings, from taking what is not given, from misconduct in sensual pleasures, from false speech, and from wine, liquor, and intoxicants, which are the basis of negligence.
He has perfect confidence in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha, and he possesses the virtues loved by noble ones.
He is free from doubt about suffering, about the origin of suffering, about the cessation of suffering, and about the way leading to the cessation of suffering.
He eats only in one part of the day, he observes celibacy, he is virtuous, of good character.
He has laid aside gems and gold, he has given up gold and silver.
He does not dig the ground for clay using a pick with his own hand;
He supports his blind and aged parents.
Having destroyed the five lower fetters, he is one who will reappear spontaneously in the Pure Abodes and there attain final Nibbana without ever returning from that world.
“‘On one occasion when I was living at Vebhalinga,
- “Venerable sir, your supporter has gone out; but take rice from the cauldron and sauce from the saucepan and eat.”
‘“I did so and went away.
Then the potter Ghatikara went to his parents and asked: “Who has taken rice from the cauldron and sauce from the saucepan, eaten and gone away?”
- “My dear, the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, did.”
‘“Then the potter Ghatikara thought: “It is a gain for me, it is a great gain for me that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, relies on me thus!”
And rapture and happiness never left him for a half-month or his parents for a week.
‘“On another occasion when I was living at Vebhalinga,
- “Venerable sir, your supporter has gone out; but take some porridge from the vessel and sauce from the saucepan and eat.”
“‘I did so and went away.
Then the potter Ghatikara went to his parents and asked: “Who has taken porridge from the vessel and sauce from the saucepan, eaten and gone away?”
- “My dear, the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, did.”
‘“Then the potter Ghatikara thought: “It is a gain for me, it is a great gain for me that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, relies on me thus!”
And rapture and happiness never left him for a half-month or his parents for a week.
‘“On another occasion when I was living at Vebhalinga
Then I addressed the bhikkhus thus: “Go, bhikkhus, and find out if there is any grass at the potter Ghatikara’s house.”
- “Venerable sir, there is no grass at the potter Ghatikara’s house; there is the grass thatch on his roof.”
- “Go, bhikkhus, and remove the grass from the potter Ghatlkara’s house.”
‘“They did so.
Then the potter Ghatikara’s parents asked the bhikkhus: “Who is removing the grass from the house?
- “Sister, the hut of the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, is leaking.”
- “Take it, venerable sirs, take it and bless you!”
“Then the potter Ghatikara went to his parents and asked: “Who has removed the grass from the roof?”
- “The bhikkhus did, my dear; the hut of the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, is leaking.”
‘“Then the potter Ghatikara thought: “It is a gain for me, it is a great gain for me that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, relies on me thus!”
And the rapture and happiness never left him for a half-month or his parents for a week.
Then that house remained three whole months with the sky for a roof, and yet no rain came in.
Such is the potter Ghatikara.’
“‘It is a gain for the potter Ghatikara, it is a great gain for him that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, relies on him thus.’
“Then King Kiki of Kasi dispatched to the potter Ghatikara five hundred cartloads of red rice stored in the sheaf, and also sauce materials to go with it.
Then the king’s men went to the potter Ghatikara and told him: ‘Venerable sir, there are five hundred cartloads of red rice stored in the sheaf, and also sauce materials to go with it, dispatched to you by King Kikl of Kasi;
- “The king is very busy and has much to do.
I have enough.
Let this be for the king himself.’795
“Now, Ananda, you may think thus: ‘Certainly, someone else was the brahmin student Jotipala on that occasion.’
But it should not be regarded thus.
I was the brahmin student Jotipala oh that occasion.”
That is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Ananda was satisfied and delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
They abided pervading one quarter with a mind imbued with loving-kindness…
it was here, in fact, that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, resided and advised the Sangha of bhikkhus.”
that had been made ready and addressed the venerable Ananda thus:
“Once, Ananda, in this place there was a prosperous and busy market town called Vebhalinga, with many inhabitants and crowded with people.
it was here, in fact, that the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, resided and advised the Sangha of bhikkhus.
“One day the potter Ghatikara addressed the brahmin student Jotipala thus: ‘My dear Jotipala, let us go and see the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened.
what is the use of seeing that bald-pated recluse?”
what is the use of seeing that bald- pated recluse?”
what is the use of seeing that bald-pated recluse?”
“Bhikkhus, there are these five things that lead to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
What five?
“Here, the bhikkhus do not learn the Dhamma: discourses, mixed prose and verse, expositions, verses, inspired utterances, quotations, birth stories, amazing accounts, and questions-and-answers.
This is the first thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
“Again, the bhikkhus do not teach the Dhamma to others in detail as they have heard it and learned it.
This is the second thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
“Again , the bhikkhus do not make others repeat the Dhamma in detail as they have heard it and learned it.
This is the third thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
“Again , the bhikkhus do not recite the Dhamma in detail as they have heard it and learned it.
This is the fourth thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
“Again, the bhikkhus do not ponder, examine, and men­tally inspect the Dhamma as they have heard it and learned it.
This is the fifth thing that leads to the decline and disappearance of the good Dhamma.
“These are the five things that lead to the decline and disap­pearance of the good Dhamma.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five other things that lead to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
What five?
“Here, the bhikkhus learn the Dhamma: discourses… and questions-and-answers.
This is the first thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
“Again , the bhikkhus teach the Dhamma to others in detail as they have heard it and learned it.
This is the second thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
“Again , the bhikkhus make others repeat the Dhamma in detail as they have heard it and learned it.
This is the third thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non ­ disappearance of the good Dhamma.
“Again , the bhikkhus recite the Dhamma in detail as they have heard it and learned it.
This is the fourth thing that leads to the continuation, non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
“Again , the bhikkhus ponder, examine, and mentally inspect the Dhamma as they have heard it and learned it.
This is the fifth thing that leads to the continuation , non-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.
“These are the five things that lead to the continuation, non­-decline, and non-disappearance of the good Dhamma.”
“Monks, there are these four obscurations of the sun and moon, obscured by which the sun and moon don’t glow, don’t shine, don’t dazzle.
Which four?
“Clouds are an obscuration of the sun and moon, obscured by which the sun and moon don’t glow, don’t shine, don’t dazzle.
“Fog is an obscuration.…
“Smoke and dust is an obscuration.…
“Rāhu, the king of the asuras believed to be the cause of an eclipse is an obscuration of the sun and moon, obscured by which the sun and moon don’t glow, don’t shine, don’t dazzle.
“These are the four obscurations of the sun and moon, obscured by which the sun and moon don’t glow, don’t shine, don’t dazzle.
“In the same way, there are four obscurations of contemplatives & brahmans, obscured by which some contemplatives & brahmans don’t glow, don’t shine, don’t dazzle.
Which four?
“There are some contemplatives & brahmans who drink alcohol and fermented liquor, who don’t refrain from drinking alcohol and fermented liquor.
This is the first obscuration of contemplatives & brahmans, obscured by which some contemplatives & brahmans don’t glow, don’t shine, don’t dazzle.
“There are some contemplatives & brahmans who engage in sexual intercourse, who don’t refrain from sexual intercourse.
This is the second obscuration of contemplatives & brahmans, obscured by which some contemplatives & brahmans don’t glow, don’t shine, don’t dazzle.
“There are some contemplatives & brahmans who consent to gold & silver, who don’t refrain from accepting gold & silver.
This is the third obscuration of contemplatives & brahmans, obscured by which some contemplatives & brahmans don’t glow, don’t shine, don’t dazzle.
“There are some contemplatives & brahmans who maintain life through wrong livelihood, who don’t refrain from wrong livelihood.
This is the fourth obscuration of contemplatives & brahmans, obscured by which some contemplatives & brahmans don’t glow, don’t shine, don’t dazzle.
“These are the four obscurations, obscured by which some contemplatives & brahmans don’t glow, don’t shine, don’t dazzle.”
Obscured by passion & aversion —some brahmans & contemplatives—
people entrenched in ignorance, delighting in endearing forms,
drink alcohol & fermented liquor, engage in sexual intercourse,
unwise, consent to gold & silver,
live by means of wrong livelihood —some brahmans & contemplatives.
These are said to be obscurations by the Awakened One, kinsman of the Sun.
Because of these obscurations some brahmans & contemplatives
don’t glow, don’t shine, are impure, dusty, dead.1
Covered with darkness, slaves to craving, led on,
they swell the terrible charnel ground, they grab at further becoming.
And a second and a third time the brahmin student Jotipala replied: ‘Enough, my dear Ghatikara,
what is the use of seeing that bald- pated recluse?”791
what is the use of seeing that bald-pated recluse?”
for so much do I hold that it is good to see that Blessed One, accomplished and fully enlightened!”
while Jotipala exchanged greetings with him,
and when this courteous and amiable talk was finished, he too sat down at one side.
“Then not long after Jotipala the brahmin student had received the full admission, a half-month after he had received the full admission, the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, having stayed at Vebhalinga as long as he chose, set out to wander towards Benares.
and there he went to live in the Deer Park at Isipatana.
and the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened, instructed, urged, roused, and encouraged King KikI of Kasi with an exposition of the Dhamma.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Vārāṇasī in the Deer Park at Isipatana.
If form were the self, this form would not lend itself to disease. It would be possible with regard to form, ‘Let my form be thus. Let my form not be thus.’
“Form, monks, is not self.
There he addressed the group of five monks:
But precisely because form is not self, this form lends itself to dis-ease. And it is not possible with regard to form, ‘Let my form be thus. Let my form not be thus.’
“Feeling is not self.…
“Perception is not self.…
“Fabrications are not self.…
If consciousness were the self, this consciousness would not lend itself to dis-ease. It would be possible with regard to consciousness, ‘Let my consciousness be thus. Let my consciousness not be thus.’
“Consciousness is not self.
But precisely because consciousness is not self, consciousness lends itself to dis-ease. And it is not possible with regard to consciousness, ‘Let my consciousness be thus. Let my consciousness not be thus.’
“What do you think, monks? Is form constant or inconstant?”
“Inconstant, lord.”
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?”
“Stressful, lord.”
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: ‘This is mine. This is my self. This is what I am’?”
“No, lord.”
“… Is feeling constant or inconstant?”
“… Is perception constant or inconstant?”
“… Are fabrications constant or inconstant?”
Is consciousness constant or inconstant?”
“Inconstant, lord.”
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?”
“Stressful, lord.”
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: ‘This is mine. This is my self. This is what I am’?”
“No, lord.”
“Thus, monks, any form whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: Every1 form is to be seen with right discernment as it has come to be: ‘This is not mine. This is not my self. This is not what I am.’
“Any feeling whatsoever.…
“Any perception whatsoever.…
“Any fabrications whatsoever.…
“Any consciousness whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: Every1 consciousness is to be seen with right discernment as it has come to be: ‘This is not mine. This is not my self. This is not what I am.’
“Seeing thus, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with form, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with perception, disenchanted with fabrications, disenchanted with consciousness. Disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate.
Through dispassion, he is released.
With release, there is the knowledge, ‘Released.’
He discerns that ‘Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done. There is nothing further for this world.’”
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the group of five monks delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
And while this explanation was being given, the minds of the group of five monks, through lack of clinging/sustenance, were released from effluents.
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrel Sanctuary.
Now on that occasion the Blessed One was sick, afflicted, gravely ill.
Then the Venerable Mahacunda approached the Blessed One, paid homage to him, and sat down to one side.
The Blessed One then said to the Venerable Mahacunda: “Recite the factors of enlightenment, Cunda.”
“These seven factors of enlightenment, venerable sir, have been rightly expounded by the Blessed One; when developed and cultivated, they lead to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
What seven?
The enlightenment factor of mindfulness has been rightly expounded by the Blessed One; when developed and cultivated, it leads to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana
The enlightenment factor of equanimity has been rightly expounded by the Blessed One; when developed and cultivated, it leads to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.
These seven factors of enlightenment, venerable sir, have been rightly expounded by the Blessed One; when developed and cultivated, they lead to direct knowledge, to enlightenment, to Nibbana.”
“Surely, Cunda, they are factors of enlightenment! Surely, Cunda, they are factors of enlightenment!”
This is what the Venerable Mahacunda said.
The Teacher approved.
And the Blessed One recovered from that illness.
In such a way the Blessed One was cured of his illness.
Thus have I heard: On one occasion the Blessed One was living near Rajagaha in the bamboo grove in the squirrels’ feeding ground.
At that time, he was afflicted with a disease, was suffering therefrom, and was gravely ill.
Then the Venerable Maha Cunda ‘arising from his solitude at eventide’ approached the Blessed One, saluted him, and sat down beside him.
To the Venerable Maha Cunda thus seated, the Blessed One said: “O Cunda, let the factors of enlightenment occur to your mind.”
“These seven factors of enlightenment, bhante , are well expounded and are cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One. They conduce to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
What are the seven?
i. “Mindfulness, the factor of enlightenment, bhante, is well expounded by the Blessed One, and is cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One. It conduces to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
ii. “Investigation of the Dhamma, the factor of enlightenment, bhante, is well expounded by the Blessed One and is cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One. It conduces to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
iii. “Persevering effort, the factor of enlightenment, bhante, is well expounded by the Blessed One and is cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One. It conduces to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
iv. “Rapture, the factor of enlightenment, bhante, is well expounded by the Blessed One and is cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One. It conduces to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
v. “Calm, the factor of enlightenment, bhante, is well expounded by the Blessed One and is cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One. It conduces to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
vi. “Concentration, the factor of enlightenment, bhante, is well expounded by the Blessed One and is cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One. It conduces to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
vii. “Equanimity, the factor of enlightenment, bhante, is well expounded by the Blessed One, and is cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One. It conduces to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
These seven factors of enlightenment, bhante, are well expounded and cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One. They conduce to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.”
“Most assuredly Cunda, they are factors of enlightenment. Most assuredly, Cunda, they are factors of enlightenment.”
Thus said the Venerable Maha Cunda,
and the Master approved of it.
Then the Blessed One recovered from his affliction,
and thus disappeared his affliction.
and said: ‘Venerable sir, let the Blessed One accept from me a residence for the Rains in Benares; that will be helpful for the Sangha.’
my residence for the Rains has already been provided for.’
my residence for the Rains has already been provided for.’
but the potter Ghatikara is not and will not be so.
what is left over from embankments or thrown up by rats, he brings home in a carrier; when he has made a pot he says: “Let anyone who likes set down some selected rice or selected beans or selected lentils, and let him take away whatever he likes.”794
it being morning, I dressed, and taking my bowl and outer robe, I went to the potter Ghatlkara’s parents and asked them: “Where has the potter gone, please?”
it being morning, I dressed, and taking my bowl and outer robe, I went to the potter Ghatlkara’s parents and asked them: “Where has the potter gone, please?”
my hut leaked.
please accept them.’
they sat down at one side and Ghatikara the potter said to the Blessed One Kassapa, accomplished and fully enlightened: ‘Venerable sir, this is the brahmin student Jotipala, my friend, my close friend.
THUS HAVE I HEARD. On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatti in Jeta’s Grove, Anathapindika’s Park.
Then the wanderer Vekhanassa went to the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him.787
“But, Kaccana, why do you say: ‘This is the perfect splendour, this is the perfect splendour!’?
What is that perfect splendour?”
“Master Gotama, that splendour is the perfect splendour which is unsurpassed by any other splendour higher or more sublime.”
“But, Kaccana, what is that splendour that is unsurpassed by any other splendour higher or more sublime?”
“Master Gotama, that splendour is the perfect splendour that is unsurpassed by any other splendour higher or more sublime.”
“Kaccana, you might continue for a long time in this way…
“Kaccana, there are these five cords of sensual pleasure.788
Forms cognizable by the eye that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust. Sounds cognizable by the ear…Odours cognizable by the nose…Flavours cognizable by the tongue… Tangibles cognizable by the body that are wished for, desired, agreeable, and likeable, connected with sensual desire and provocative of lust. These are the five cords of sensual pleasure.
“Now, Kaccana, the pleasure and joy that arise dependent on these five cords of sensual pleasure are called sensual pleasure.
Thus sensual pleasure arises through sensual pleasures, but beyond sensual pleasure there is a pleasure higher than the sensual, and that is declared to be the highest among them.”789
When this was said, the wanderer Vekhanassa said: “It is wonderful, Master Gotama, it is marvellous,
But those bhikkhus who are arahants with taints destroyed, who have lived the holy life, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, reached the true goal, destroyed the fetters of being, and are completely liberated through final knowledge - it is they who would know what sensuality is, what sensual pleasure is, and what the pleasure higher than the sensual is.”
When this was said, the wanderer Vekhanassa was angry and displeased, and he reviled, disparaged, and censured the Blessed One, saying: “The recluse Gotama will be worsted.” He then said to the Blessed One: “So then there are some recluses and brahmins here who, without knowing the past and without seeing the future, yet claim: ‘Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had ta be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being.’
What they say turns out to be ridiculous; it turns out to be mere words, empty and hollow.”
“If any recluses and brahmins, without knowing the past and without seeing the future, yet claim: ‘Birth is destroyed, the holy life has been lived, what had to be done has been done, there is no more coming to any state of being,’ they can be confuted in accordance with the Dhamma.
Rather, let the past be, Kaccana, and let the future be.
Let a wise man come, one who is honest and sincere, a man of rectitude.
I instruct him, I teach him the Dhamma in such a way that by practising as instructed he will soon know and see for himself: “Thus, indeed, there rightly comes to be liberation from the bond, that is, from the bond of ignorance.’
Suppose, Kaccana, there were a young tender infant lying prone, bound by stout bonds at the four limbs with the fifth at the neck; and later on, as a result of his growth and the maturing of his faculties, those bonds loosened, then he would know ‘I am free’ and there would be no more bondage.
So too, let a wise man come…’Thus, indeed, there rightly comes to be liberation from the bond, that is, from the bond of ignorance.’“
When this was said, the wanderer Vekhanassa said to the Blessed One: “Magnificent, Master Gotama! Magnificent, Master Gotama! Master Gotama has made the Dhamma clear……for those with eyesight to see forms. I go to Master Gotama for refuge and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus. From today let the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge for life.”
When this courteous and amiable talk was finished,
he stood at one side and in the Blessed One’s presence he uttered this exclamation: “This is the perfect splendour, this is the perfect splendour!”
…yet you do not indicate what that splendour is.
What five?
how well that has been expressed by Master Gotama: “Thus sensual pleasure arises through sensual pleasures, but beyond sensual pleasure there is a pleasure higher than the sensual, and that is declared to be the highest among them.’“ “Kaccana, for you who are of another view, who accept another teaching, who approve of another teaching, who pursue a different training, who follow a different teacher, it is hard to know what sensuality is, or what sensual pleasure is, or what the pleasure higher than the sensual is.
and it was not long before their minds were freed from the corruptions without remainder.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling among the Sakyans at Kapilavatthu in the Great Forest, together with a large Saṅgha of approximately five hundred monks, all of them arahants. And most of the devatās from ten world-systems had gathered in order to see the Blessed One & the Saṅgha of monks.
Let us also approach the Blessed One and, on arrival, let us each speak a verse in his presence.”
Then the thought occurred to four devatās of the ranks from the Pure Abodes: “The Blessed One is dwelling among the Sakyans at Kapilavatthu in the Great Forest, together with a large Saṅgha of about five hundred monks, all of them arahants. And most of the devatās from ten world-systems have gathered in order to see the Blessed One & the Saṅgha of monks.
Then, just as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm, those devatās disappeared from among the Devas of the Pure Abodes and reappeared before the Blessed One.
Having paid homage to him, they stood to one side.
As they were standing there, one devatā recited this verse in the Blessed One’s presence:
“A great meeting in the woods: The deva hosts have assembled.
We have come to this Dhamma meeting to see the unvanquished Saṅgha.”
Then another devatā recited this verse in the Blessed One’s presence:
“There the monks are concentrated, have straightened their own minds.
Like a charioteer holding the reins, the wise ones guard their faculties.”
Then another devatā recited this verse in the Blessed One’s presence:
“Having cut through barrenness, cut the cross-bar, having uprooted Indra’s pillar, unstirred,
they wander about pure, unstained, young nāgas1 well tamed by the One with Eyes.”
Then another devatā recited this verse in the Blessed One’s presence:
“Those who have gone to the Buddha for refuge will not go to the plane of woe.
On discarding the human body, they will fill the hosts of the devas.”
Then the Blessed One addressed the monks: “Monks, most of the devatās from ten world-systems have gathered in order to see the Tathāgata & the Saṅgha of monks.
Those who, in the past, were Worthy Ones, Rightly Self- awakened, at most had their devatā-gathering like mine at the present.
Those who, in the future, will be Worthy Ones, Rightly Self-awakened, will at most have their devatā-gathering like mine at the present.
“I will tell you the names of the deva hosts. I will describe to you the names of the deva hosts. I will teach you the names of the deva hosts.
Listen & pay close attention. I will speak.”
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded to the Blessed One.
The Blessed One said:
I will recite a verse of tribute.
Those who live where spirits dwell, who live in mountain caves, resolute, concentrated,
many, like hidden lions, who have overcome horripilation,
white-hearted, pure, serene, & undisturbed:
Knowing that more than 500 of them had come to the forest of Kapilavatthu,
the Teacher then said to them, disciples delighting in his instruction,
“The deva hosts have approached. Detect them, monks! ”
Listening to the Awakened One’s instruction, they made an ardent effort.
Knowledge appeared to them, vision of non-human beings.
Some saw 100, some 1,000, some 70,000,
some had vision of 100,000 non-human beings.
Some gained vision of innumerable devas filling every direction.
Realizing all this, the One-with-Vision felt moved to speak.
The Teacher then said to them, disciples delighting in his instruction,
“The deva hosts have approached. Detect them, monks,
as I describe their glories, one by one.
7,000 yakkhas inhabiting the land of Kāpilavatthu,
powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
6,000 yakkhas from the Himālayas, of varied hue,
powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
From Mount Sāta 3,000 yakkhas of varied hue,
powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
These 16,000 yakkhas of varied hue
powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
yakkhas from Vessāmitta, of varied hue,
powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
Kumbhīra from Rājagaha, who dwells on Mount Vepulla,
attended to by more than 100,000 yakkhas—
Kumbhīra from Rājagaha: He, too, has come to the forest meeting.
And Dhataraṭṭha, who rules as king of the Eastern Direction,
as lord of the gandhabbas: A glorious, great king is he,
and many are his sons named Indra, of great strength.
Powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, they have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
And Virūḷha, who rules as king of the Southern Direction,
as lord of the kumbaṇḍas: A glorious, great king is he,
and many are his sons named Indra, of great strength.
Powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, they have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
And Virūpakkha, who rules as king of the Western Direction,
as lord of the nāgas: A glorious, great king is he,
and many are his sons named Indra, of great strength.
Powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, they have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
And Kuvera, who rules as king of the Northern Direction,
as lord of the yakkhas: A glorious, great king is he,
and many are his sons named Indra, of great strength.
Powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, they have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
Dhataraṭṭha from the Eastern Direction, Virūḷhaka from the South,
Virūpakkha from the West, Kuvera from the Northern Direction:
These four Great Kings encompassing the four directions,
resplendent, stand in the Kāpilavatthu forest.
Their deceitful vassals have also come —deceptive, treacherous—
Māyā, Kuṭeṇḍu, Veṭeṇḍu, Viṭu with Viṭuṭa,
Candana, the Chief of Sensuality, Kinnughaṇḍu, Nighaṇḍu,
Panāda, the Mimic, Mātali, the deva’s charioteer,
Cittasena the gandhabba, King Naḷa, the Bull of the People,
Pañcasikha has come with Timbaru and his daughter, Suriyavacchasā SunDazzle.2
These & other kings, gandhabbas with their kings,
rejoicing, have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
Then there have also come nāgas from Lake Nābhasa, Vesālī & Tacchaka.
Kambalas, Assataras, Pāyāgas, & their kin.
And from the River Yāmuna comes the prestigious nāga, Dhataraṭṭha.
The great nāga Erāvaṇṇa: He, too, has come to the forest meeting.
They who swoop down swiftly on nāga kings, divine, twice-born, winged, their eyesight pure:
 came from the sky to the midst of the forest. Citra & Supaṇṇa are their names.
But the Buddha made the nāga kings safe, made them secure from Supaṇṇa.
Addressing one another with affectionate words, the nāgas & Supaṇṇas made the Buddha their refuge.
Defeated by Indra of the thunderbolt hand, Asuras dwelling in the ocean,
Vāsava’s brothers—powerful, prestigious—
Greatly terrifying Kālakañjas, the Dānaveghasa asuras,
Vepacitti & Sucitti, Pahārāda, with Namucī,
and Bali’s hundred sons, all named Veroca,
arrayed with powerful armies have approached their honored Rāhu
and said: “Now is the occasion, sir, of the monk’s forest meeting.”
Devas of water, earth, fire, & wind have come here.
Varuṇas, Vāruṇas, Soma together with Yasa, the prestigious devas of the hosts
of goodwill & compassion have come.
These ten ten-fold hosts, all of varied hue,
powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
Veṇḍu Viṣṇu & Sahalī, Asama & the Yama twins,
the devas dependent on the moon surrounding the moon have come.
The devas dependent on the sun surrounding the sun have come.
Devas surrounding the zodiac stars and the sprites of the clouds have come.
Sakka, chief of the Vasus, the ancient donor, has come.
These ten ten-fold hosts, all of varied hue,
powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
Then come the Sahabhu devas, blazing like crests of fire-flame.
The Ariṭṭakas, Rojas, cornflower blue.
Varuṇas & Sahadhammas, Accutas & Anejakas,
Sūleyyas & Ruciras, and Vāsavanesis have come.
These ten ten-fold hosts, all of varied hue,
powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
Samānas, Great Samānas, Mānusas, Super Mānusas,
the devas corrupted by play have come, as well as devas corrupted by mind.3
Then come green-gold devas and those wearing red.
Pāragas, Great Pāragas, prestigious devas have come.
These ten ten-fold hosts, all of varied hue,
powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
White devas, ruddy-green devas, dawn-devas have come with the Veghanas
headed by devas totally in white. The Vicakkhaṇas have come.
Sadāmatta, Hāragajas, & the prestigious multi-coloreds,
Pajunna, the thunderer, who brings rain to the lands:
These ten ten-fold hosts, all of varied hue,
powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
The Khemiyas, Tusitas, & Yāmas, the prestigious Kaṭṭhakas,
Lambitakas & Lāma chiefs, the Jotināmas & Āsavas,
the Nimmānaratis have come, as have the Paranimmitas.
These ten ten-fold hosts, all of varied hue,
powerful, effulgent, glamorous, prestigious,
rejoicing, have approached the monks’ forest meeting.
These 60 deva groups, all of varied hue,
have come arranged in order, together with others in like manner 
“We’ll see the one who has transcended birth, who has no bounds, who has crossed over the flood, effluent-free,
the Mighty One, crossing over the flood, like the moon emerging from the dark fortnight.”
Subrahmā and Paramatta Brahmā, together with sons of the Powerful One,
Sanaṅkumāra and Tissa: They too have come to the forest meeting.
Great Brahmā, who stands over 1,000 Brahmā worlds,
who arose there spontaneously, effulgent: Prestigious is he, with a terrifying body.4
And ten Brahmā sovereigns, each the lord of his own realm—
and in their midst has come Hārita Brahmā surrounded by his retinue.”
When all these devas with Indras & Brahmās had come,
Māra’s army came as well. Now look at the Dark One’s foolishness!
He said: “Come seize them! Bind them! Tie them down with passion!
Surround them on every side! Don’t let anyone at all escape!”
Thus the great warlord urged on his dark army,
slapping the ground with his hand, making a horrendous din,
as when a storm cloud bursts with thunder, lightning, & torrents of rain.
But then he withdrew—enraged, with none under his sway.
Realizing all this, the One-with-Vision felt moved to speak.
The Teacher then said to them, disciples delighting in his instruction,
“Māra’s army has approached. Detect them, monks!”
Listening to the Awakened One’s instruction, they made an ardent effort.
The army retreated from those without passion, without raising even a hair on their bodies.
Having all won the battle—prestigious, past fear—
they rejoice with all beings: disciples outstanding among the human race.
“Bhikkhus, when a bhikkhu who possesses five factors resorts to and uses a lodging that possesses five factors, in no long time, with the destruction of the taints, he might realize for him self with direct knowledge in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, dwell in it.
“And how , bhikkhus, does a bhikkhu possess five factors?
“Here, a bhikkhu is endowed with faith. He has faith in the enlightenment of the Tathagata thus: ‘The Blessed One is an arahant, perfectly enlightened, accomplished in true knowledge and conduct, fortunate, knower of the world, unsurpassed trainer of persons to be tamed, teacher of devas and humans, the Enlightened One, the Blessed One’. “He is seldom ill or afflicted, possessing an even digestion that is neither too cool nor too hot but moderate and suitable for striving. “He is honest and open, one who reveals him self as he really is to the Teacher and his wise fellow monks. “He has a roused energy for abandoning unwholesome qualities and acquiring wholesome qualities; he is strong , firm in exertion , not casting off the duty of cultivating wholesome qualities. “He is wise; he possesses the wisdom that discerns arising and passing away , which is noble and penetrative and leads to the complete destruction of suffering.
“It is in this way that a bhikkhu possesses five factors.
“And how does a lodging possess five factors?
“ Here , the lodging is neither too far from a place for alms nor too close, and it possesses a means for going and returning. “During the day it is not disturbed by people and at night it is quiet and still. “There is little contact With flies, mosquitoes, wind , the burning sun , and serpents. “One dwelling in that lodging can easily obtain robes, almsfood, lodging, and medicines and provisions for the sick. “In that lodging elder bhikkhus are dwelling who are learned, heirs to the heritage, experts on the Dhamma, experts on the discipline, experts on the outlines. He approaches them from time to time and inquires:‘How is this, Bhante? What is the meaning of this? Those venerable ones then disclose to him what has not been disclosed, clear up what is obscure, and dispel his perplexity about numerous perplexing points.
“It is in this way that a lodging possesses five factors.
“When a bhikkhu who possesses these five factors resorts to and uses a lodging that possesses these five factors, in no long time, with the destruction of the taints, he might realize for himself with direct knowledge, in this very life, the taintless liberation of mind, liberation by wisdom, and having entered upon it, dwell in it.”
Thus have I heard. Once the Lord was staying in Rajagaha at the Vultures’ Peak.
And at that time the wanderer Nigrodha759’ was staying at the Udumbarika lodging760 for wanderers, with a large company of some three thousand wanderers.
And one morning early, the householder San­dhana came to Rajagaha in order to see the Lord.
Then he thought: ‘It is not the proper time to see the Blessed Lord,
Perhaps I should go to the Udum­barika lodging for wanderers and call on Nigrodha.’
And he did so.
And just then Nigrodha was sitting in the midst of a large crowd of wanderers who were all shouting and scream­ing and making a great clamour, and indulging in various kinds of unedifying conversation761
Then Nigrodha saw Sandhana approaching from a dis­tance,
The householder Sandhana, a follower of the ascetic Gotama, is approaching.
He is one of the number of white-robed householder followers of the ascetic Gotama in Rajagaha.
And these good folk are fond of quiet, they are taught to be quiet and speak in praise of quiet.
If he sees that this company is quiet, he will most likely want to come and visit us.’
At this the wanderers fell silent.
Then Sandhana approached Nigrodha and exchanged courtesies with him,
Then he said: ‘Reverend sirs, the way the wanderers of another faith conduct themselves when they come together is one thing: they make a great clamour and indulge in all manner of unedifying conversation…
Then Nigrodha replied: ‘Well now, householder, do you know whom the ascetic Gotama talks to? Whom does he converse with? From whom does he get his lucidity of wis­dom?
The ascetic Gotama’s wisdom is destroyed by the soli­tary life, he is unused to assemblies, he is no good at conver­sation,
Just as bison762 circling around keep to the fringes,
so it is with the ascetic Gotama. In fact, householder, if the ascetic Gotama were to come to this as­sembly, we would baffle him with a single question,
Now the Lord, with his divine-ear-faculty, purified and surpassing human range, heard this exchange between San­dhana and Nigrodha.
And, descending from the Vultures’ Peak, he came to the Peacocks’ Feeding Ground beside the Sumagadha Tank, and walked up and down there in the open air.
Then Nigrodha caught sight of him,
and he called his company to order, saying: ‘Gentlemen, he quiet, be less noisy! The ascetic Gotama is walking up and down beside the Sumagadha Tank.
He is fond of quiet, he speaks in praise of quiet.
If he sees that this company is quiet, he will most likely want to come and visit us.
If he does so, we will put this question to him: “Lord, what is this doctrine in which the Blessed Lord trains his disciples, and which those disciples whom he has so trained as to benefit from it recognise as their principal support, and the perfection of the holy life?”
At this, the wanderers were silent.
Then the Lord approached Nigrodha,
At last the Blessed Lord has gone out of his way to come here.
Be seated, Lord, a seat is prepared.’
The Lord sat down on the prepared seat,
and Nigrodha took a low stool and sat down to one side.
Then the Lord said to him: ‘Nigrodha, what was the subject of your conversation just now? What talk have I interrupted?”
Nigrod­ha replied: ‘Lord, we saw the Blessed Lord walking up and down at the Peacocks’ Feeding Ground by the Sumagadha Tank, and we thought: “If the ascetic Gotama were to come here we could ask him this question: Lord, what is this doctrine in which the Blessed Lord trains his disciples, and which those disciples whom he has so trained as to benefit from it recognise as their principal support, and the perfection of the holy life?”
‘Nigrodha, it is hard for you, holding different views, being of different inclinations and subject to different influences, following a different teacher, to understand the doctrine which I teach my disciples…
Come on then, Nigrodha, ask me about your own teaching, about your extreme austerity. How are the conditions of austerity and self-mortification fulfilled, and how are they not fulfilled? ‘
At this the wanderers made a great commotion and noise, exclaiming: ‘It is wonderful, it is marvellous how great are the powers of the ascetic Gotama in holding back with his own theories and in inviting others to discuss theirs! ‘
Silencing them, Nigrodha said: ‘Lord, we teach the higher austerities, we regard them as essential, we adhere to them.
Such being the case, what constitutes their fulfilment or non-fulfilment? ‘
‘Suppose, Nigrodha, a self-mortifier goes naked, uses no polite restraints, licks his hands, does not come or stand still when requested. He does not accept food out of the pot or pan….
He wears coarse hemp or mixed material, shrouds from corpses, rags from the dust-heap…He is a plucker-out of hair and beard, devoted to this practice; he is a covered-thorn man, making his bed on them, sleeping alone in a garment of wet mud, living in the open air, accep­ting whatever seat is offered, one who drinks no water and is addicted to the practice, or he dwells intent on the practice of going to bathe three times before evening.
What do you think, Nigrodha, is the higher austerity thereby fulfilled, or not?”
‘Indeed, Lord, it is fulfilled.’
‘But, Nigrodha, I maintain that this higher austerity can be faulted in various ways.’
‘In what way, Lord, do you maintain that it can be fault­ed?”
‘Take the case, Nigrodha, of a self-mortifier who practises a certain austerity.
As a result, he is pleased and satisfied at having attained his end.
And this is a fault in that self-morti­fier.
Or else in so doing he elevates himself and disparages others.
And this is a fault in that self-mortifier.
Or else he has become intoxicated with conceit, infatuated and therefore care­less.
And this is a fault in that self-mortifier.
‘Again, a self-mortifier practises a certain austerity, and this brings him gains, honours and fame. As a result, he is pleased and satisfied at having attained his end…
And this is a fault in that self-mortifier.
Again, a self-mortifier practises a certain austerity, and he divides his food into two heaps, saying: “This suits me, that doesn’t suit me!”
And what does not suit him he eagerly rejects,
Again, a self-mortifier practises a certain austerity for the sake of gains, honours and fame, thinking: “Kings and their ministers will honour me, Khattiyas and Brahmins and householders, and religious tea­chers.” And this is a fault in that self-mortifier.
‘Again, a self-mortifier disparages some ascetic or Brah­min, saying: “See how he lives in abundance, eating all sorts of things!
Whether propagated from roots, from stems, from joings, from cuttings or fifthly from seeds,763 he chews them all up with that thunderbolt of a jaw of his, and they call him an ascetic! “ And this is a fault in that self-mortifier.
Or he sees another ascetic or Brahmin being made much of by families, being honoured and respected and worshipped,
whereas I who am a real ascetic and self-mortifier get no such treatment!” Thus he is envious and jealous because of those householders. And this is a fault in that self-mortifier.
Again, a self-mortifier sits in a prominent position. And this is a fault in that self-mortifier.
Or he goes round ostentatiously764 among the families, as if to say: “See, this is my way of renunciation! “ And this is a fault in that self-mortifier.
Or he behaves in an underhand way.
On being asked: “Do you approve of this?” although he does not approve he says: “I do”,
In this way he becomes a conscious liar. And this is a fault in that self-mortifier.
‘Again, a self-mortifier, when the Tathagata or a disciple of the Tathagata presents the Dhamma in a way that should command his assent, withholds that assent. And this is a fault in that self-mortifier.
Or he is angry and bad-tempered.
And this is a fault in that self-mortifier.
Or he is mean and spiteful, envious and jealous, crafty and deceitful, obstinate and proud, with evil desires and under their sway, with wrong views and given to extremist opinions; he is tainted with worldliness, holding on firmly, unwilling to give up.
And this is a fault in that self-mortifier.
What do you think, Nigrodha? Are these things faults in the higher austerity, or not?”
‘Certainly they are, Lord.
It could happen that a single self-mortifier was possessed of all these faults, not to speak of just one or the other.’
—14. ‘Now, Nigrodha, take the case of a certain self-mor­tifier who practises a certain austerity. As a result, he is not pleased and satisfied at having attained his end.
This being so,
Again, he does not elevate himself and disparage others… .
Thus he does not become a conscious liar. In this respect he is purified.
‘Again, a self-mortifier, when the Tathagata or a disciple of the Tathagata presents the Dhamma in a way that should command his assent, gives his assent. In this respect he is purified.
And he is not angry or bad-tempered.
In this respect he is purified.
And he is not mean and spiteful, envious and jealous, crafty and deceitful, obstinate and proud, he is without evil desires and not under their sway, without wrong views and not given to extremist opinions, he is not tainted with worldliness, does not hold on firmly and is not unwilling to give up.
In this respect he is purified.
What do you think, Nigrodha? Is the higher austerity purified by these things, or not?”
‘Certainly it is, Lord, it attains its peak there, penetrating to the pith.’
‘No, Nigrodha, it does not attain its peak there, penetrating to the pith. It has only reached the outer bark.’ 765
‘Nigrodha, you may think: “The ascetic Gotama says this in order to get disciples.”
But you should not regard it like that.
Let him who is your teacher remain your teacher.777
But you should not regard it like that.
Let your rules remain as they are.
Or you may think: “He wants us to abandon our way of life.”
But you should not regard it like that.
Let your way of life remain as it was.
Or you may think: “He wants to establish us in the doing of things that according to our teaching are wrong, and are so considered among us.”
But you should not regard it like that.
Let those things you con­sider wrong continue to be so considered.
Or you may think: “He wants to draw us away from things that according to our teaching are good, and are so considered among us.”
But you should not regard it like that.
Let whatever you consider right continue to be so considered.
Nigrodha, I do not speak for any of these reasons…
‘There are, Nigrodha, unwholesome things that have not been abandoned, tainted, conducive to rebirth,778 fearful, pro­ductive of painful results in the future, associated with birth, decay and death. It is for the abandonment of these things that I teach Dhamma.
If you practise accordingly, these tainted things will be abandoned, and the things that make for puri­fication will develop and grow, and you will all attain to and dwell, in this very life, by your own insight and realisation, in the fullness of perfected wisdom.’
At these words the wanderers sat silent and upset, their shoulders drooped, they hung their heads and sat there down­cast and bewildered, so possessed were their minds by Mara.779
so that not a single one of them thinks: “Let us now follow the holy life proclaimed by the ascetic Gotama, that we may learn it — for what do seven days matter?”’
Then the Lord, having uttered his lion’s roar in the Udumbarika park, rose up in the air and alighted on the Vultures’ Peak.
And the householder Sandhana also returned to Rajaga­ha.780
At this, Nigrodha said to the Lord: ‘Transgression over­came me, Lord! Foolish, blind and evil as I was, that I spoke thus of the Lord.
May the Lord accept my confession of this fault, that I may restrain myself in future!”
‘Indeed, Nigro­dha, transgression overcame you when, through folly, blind­ness and evil you spoke thus of me.
But since you recognise the nature of your transgression and make amends as is right, we accept your confession.
For, Nigrodha, it is a mark of progress in the discipline of the Noble Ones, if anyone recognises the nature of his transgression and makes amends as is right, restraining himself for the future.
‘But, Nigrodha, I tell you this:
If he practises what he is taught, then within seven years he will attain in this life to that unequalled holy life and goal, for the sake of which young men of good family go forth from the household life into homelessness, by his own knowledge and realisation, and he will abide therein.
Let alone seven years —
Let alone half a month —
And when the householder Sandhana realised: ‘These wanderers of other views are actually listening and attending to the Lord’s words, and inclining their minds to the higher wisdom,
… His wisdom is destroyed by the solitary life, he is no good at conversation, he is right out of touch…”
And at these words Nigrodha was silent and upset, his shoulders drooped, he hung his head and sat there downcast and bewildered.
Seeing the state he was in, the Lord said: ‘Is it true, Nigrodha, that you said that?”
‘Lord, it is true that I said that, foolishly, mistakenly, and wickedly.’
‘What do you think, Nigrodha?
Have you ever heard it said by wanderers who were aged, venerable, the teachers of teachers, that those who in the past were Arahants, fully-enlightened Buddhas used to talk, when they came together, by shouting and screaming and making a great clamour, and indulging in unedifying conversation…
Or did they not say rather that those Blessed Ones sought lodging in the forest, in the depths of the jungle, free from noise, with little sound, far from the madding crowd, undisturbed by men, well-fitted for seclusion, just as I do now?”
‘Lord, I have heard
Nigrodha, you are an intelligent man of mature years. Did it never occur to you to think: “The Blessed Lord is enlighten­ed and teaches a doctrine of enlightenment, he is self-restrain­ed and teaches a doctrine of self-restraint, he is calm and teaches a doctrine of calm. He has gone beyond and teaches a doctrine of going beyond, he has gained Nibbana and teaches a doctrine for the gaining of Nibbana”?”
‘Well then, Lord, how does austerity reach its peak, penetrating to the pith?
It would be good if the Blessed Lord were to cause my austerity to attain its peak, to penetrate to the pith.’
‘Well, Nigrodha, take the case of a self-mortifier who ob­serves the fourfold restraint…,
And then, with the purified divine eye, he sees beings passing away and arising: base and noble, well favour­ed and ill-favoured, to happy and unhappy destinations as kamma directs them.
What do you think, Nigrodha? Is the higher austerity purified by these things, or not?”
‘Certainly it is, Lord. It attains its peak there, penetrating to the pith.’ 774
‘So indeed it is, Nigrodha, that austerity is so purified as to reach its peak and penetrate to the pith.
And so, Nigrodha, when you ask: “What, Lord, is this doctrine in which the Blessed Lord trains his disciples, and which those disciples whom he has so trained as to benefit from it recognise as their principal support, and the perfection of the holy life?”
I say that it is by something more far-reaching and excellent that I train them, through which they…recognise as their principal support, and the perfection of the holy life.’
At this the wanderers made a great commotion and noise, exclaiming: ‘We and our teacher are ruined! We know of nothing higher or more far-reaching than our teaching! ‘
‘Well then, Lord, how does austerity attain its peak, penetrating to the pith?
It would be good if the Blessed Lord were to cause my austerity to attain its peak, to penetrate to the pith.’
‘Nigrodha, take the case of a self-mortifier who observes the fourfold restraint…,
He recalls various past lives… There my name was so- and-so,…my caste was so-and-so . I experienced such-and-such pleasant and painful conditions … Having passed from there, I arose there…
What do you think, Nigrodha? Is the higher austerity purified by these things, or not?”
‘Certainly it is, Lord. It attains its peak there, penetrating to the pith.’
‘No, Nigrodha, it only reaches the fibres surrounding the pith.’ 773
‘Well then, Lord, how does austerity attain its peak, penetrating to the pith?
It would be good if the Blessed Lord were to cause my austerity to attain its peak, to penetrate to the pith.’
‘Nigrodha, take the case of a self-mortifier who observes the fourfold restraint.
And what is this?
Here, a self-mortifier does not harm a living being, does not cause a living being to be harmed, does not approve of such harming;
In this way, a self-mortifier observes the fourfold restraint.
And through this restraint, through making this his austerity,
‘Then he finds a solitary lodging, at the root of a forest tree, in a mountain cave or gorge, a charnel-ground, a jungle-thicket, or in the open air on a heap of straw.
Then, having eaten after his return from the alms-round, he sits down cross-legged, holding his body erect, having established mindfulness before him.767
Abandoning ill-will and hatred, he dwells with a mind freed from them, and by compassionate love for the welfare of all living beings, his mind is purified of them.
Abandoning sloth-and-torpor,… by the perception of light,768 mindful and clearly aware, his mind is purified of sloth-and-torpor.
Aban­doning worry-and-flurry,… and with an inwardly calmed heart his mind769 is purified of worry-and-flurry.
Abandoning doubt, he dwells with doubt left behind, without uncertainty as to what things are wholesome, his mind purified of doubt.
‘Having abandoned these five hindrances, and in order to weaken by insight the defilements770 of mind, he dwells, letting his mind, filled with loving-kindness, pervade one quarter,
And so he continues to pervade the whole wide world, above, below, across and everywhere with a mind filled with loving-kindness, extensive, developed,771 measureless, free from hatred and ill-will.
And he dwells, letting his mind, filled with com­passion, … with sympathetic joy,… with equanimity, per­vade one quarter,
What do you think, Nigrodha?
Is the higher austerity purified by these things, or not?”
‘Certainly it is, Lord. It attains its peak there, penetrating to the pith.’
‘No, Nigrodha, it does not attain its peak there. It has only pene­trated to the inner bark.’ 772
I mark the span of life, O bird, how quickly it is sped,
And, standing fast in virtues ten, the next world never dread.
Almsgiving, justice, penitence, meek spirit, temper mild,
Peace, mercy, patience, charity, with morals undefiled—
Queen Sīlavatī, being a wise woman, thought, “What will be the issue of all this?” At the end of one or two days she said to the king, “We are anxious to see our daughter-in-law.”
He readily assented and sent for his daughter.
Pabhāvatī, magnificently dressed and surrounded by a band of her attendants, came and saluted her mother-in-law.
On seeing her the queen at once thought, “This maiden is very lovely and my son is ill-favoured.
Should she see him, she will not stay a single day but will run away. I must devise some scheme.”
Addressing the Madda king she said, “My daughter-in-law is quite worthy of my son: howbeit we have an hereditary observance in our family. If she will abide by this custom, we will take her to be his bride.”
“What is this observance of yours?”
“In our family a wife is not allowed to see her husband by daylight until she has conceived.
If she will act up to this, we will take her.”
The king asked his daughter, “My dear, will you be able to act thus?”
“Yes, dear father,” she replied.
Then king Okkāka bestowed much gear on the Madda king and departed with her.
And the Madda king despatched his daughter with a vast retinue.
Once upon a time when Brahmadatta was ruling in Benares, a forester, named Sura, who dwelt in the kingdom of Kāsi, went to the Himalayas, to seek for articles of merchandise.
There was a certain tree there that sprang up to the height of a man with his arms extended over his head, and then divided into three parts.
In the midst of its three forks was a hole as big as a wine jar,
and when it rained this hole was filled with water. Round about it grew two myrobalan 3 plants and a pepper shrub; and the ripe fruits from these, when they were cut down, fell into the hole.
Not far from this tree was some self-sown paddy. The parrots would pluck the heads of rice and eat them, perched on this tree.
And while they were eating, the paddy and the husked rice fell there.
So the water, fermenting through the sun’s heat, assumed a blood-red colour.
In the hot season flocks of birds, being thirsty, drank of it, and becoming intoxicated fell down at the foot of the tree, and after sleeping awhile flew away, chirping merrily.
And the same thing happened in the case of wild dogs, monkeys and other creatures.
The forester, on seeing this, said, “If this were poison they would die, but after a short sleep they go away as they list; it is no poison.” And he himself drank of it, and becoming intoxicated he felt a desire to eat flesh,
and then making a fire he killed the partridges and cocks that fell down at the foot of the tree, and roasted their flesh on the live coals, and gesticulating with one hand, and eating flesh with the other, he remained one or two days in the same spot.
“Large-eyed and peerless one,” etc.—This was a story the Master, while sojourning at Jetavana, told of a female novice.
A girl of good family at Sāvatthi, they say, recognizing the misery of the lay life, embraced asceticism, and one day went with other Sisters to hear the Law from the Bodhisatta, as he sat preaching from a magnificent throne, and observing his person to be endued with extreme beauty of form arising from the power of illimitable merit, she thought, “I wonder whether in a former existence those I once ministered to were this man’s wives.”
Then at that very moment the recollection of former existences came back to her. “In the time of Chaddanta, the elephant, I was previously existing as this man’s wife.”
And at the remembrance great joy and gladness sprang up in her heart.
In her joyous excitement she laughed aloud as she thought, “Few wives are well disposed to their husbands; most of them are ill disposed. I wonder if I were well or ill disposed to this man.”
And calling back her remembrance, she perceived that she had harboured a slight grudge in her heart against Chaddanta, the mighty lord of elephants, who measured one hundred and twenty cubits, and had sent Sonuttara, a hunter, who with a poisoned arrow wounded and killed him.
Then her sorrow awoke and her heart grew hot within her, and being unable to control her feelings, bursting into sobs she wept aloud.
On Seeing this the Master broke into a smile, and on being asked by the assembly of the Brethren, “What, Sir, was the cause of your smiling?” he said, “Brethren, this young Sister wept, on recalling a sin she once committed against me.” And so saying he told a story of the past.
he is in retreat;
it is not the proper time to see the meditating monks,
they are in retreat.
about kings, robbers, ministers, armies, dangers, war, food, drink, clothes, beds, garlands, perfumes, relatives, carriages, villages, towns and cities, countries, women, heroes, street- and well-gossip, talk of the departed, desultory chat, speculation about land and sea, talk of being and non-being.
and he called his followers to order, saying: ‘Be quiet, gentlemen, don’t make a noise, gentlemen!
and then sat down to one side.
The Blessed Lord’s way is diffe­rent: he seeks a lodging in the forest, in the depths of the jungle, free from noise, with little sound, far from the mad­ding crowd, undisturbed by men, well fitted for seclusion.’
he is right out of touch.
we would knock him over like an empty pot.’
and Nigrodha said: ‘Come, Blessed Lord, welcome, Blessed Lord!
Or else he elevates himself and disparages others…
Or else he becomes intoxicated with conceit, infatuated and therefore careless.
while what suits him he eats up greedily, recklessly and passionately, not see­ing the peril, with no thought for the consequences. And this is a fault in that self-mortifier.
and he thinks: “They make much of that rich-liver, they honour him, respect him and worship him,
or although he does approve he says: “I do not.”
in this respect he is purified.
he does not take what is not given, or cause it to be taken, or approve of such taking;
he does not tell a lie, or cause a lie to be told, or approve of such lying;
he does not crave for sense-pleasures,766 cause others to do so, or approve of such craving.
he takes an upward course and does not fall back into lower things.
Abandoning hankering for the world, he dwells with a mind freed from such hankering, and his mind is purified of it.
then a second,
then a third,
then a fourth.
… extensive, developed, measureless, free from hatred and ill-will.
free from hatred and ill-will.
Thus he remembers various past lives, their conditions and details.
free from hatred and ill-will…
Thus he remembers various past lives, their conditions and details.
he said to Nigrodha: ‘Reverend Nigrodha, you said to me: “Come now, householder, do you know whom the ascetic Gotama talks to?
So now that the Blessed Lord has come here, why don’t you baffle him with a single question and knock him over like an empty pot?”
the way you and your teachers do?
it said that those who were Arahants, fully-enlightened Buddhas did not indulge in loud talk…
but sought lodging in the forest,…just as the Blessed Lord does now.’
Let an intelligent man come to me who is sincere, honest and straightforward, and I will instruct him, I will teach him Dhamma.
in six years,
five, four, three, two years,
seven months,
six months, five, four, three, two months, one month, half a month.
in seven days he can gain that goal.776
Or you may think: “He wants us to abandon our rules.”
Then the Lord said: ‘Every one of these foolish men is pos­sessed by the evil one,
Thus have I heard. Once the Lord was styaing at Nalanda in Pavarika’s mango-grove.
And the Venerable Sariputta came to see the Lord, saluted him, sat down to one side,
‘You have spoken boldly with a bull’s voice, Sariputta, you have roared the lion’s roar of certainty.
How is this? Have all the Arahant Buddhas of the past appeared to you, and were the minds of all those Lords open to you, so as to say: “These Lords were of such virtue, such was their teaching, such their wisdom, such their way, such their liberation”?”
‘No, Lord.’
‘And have you perceived all the Arahant Buddhas who will appear in the future?”
‘No, Lord.’
‘Well then, Sariputta, you know me as the Arahant Buddha, and do you know: “The Lord is of such virtue, such his teaching, such his wisdom, such his way, such his liberation”?”
‘No, Lord.’
‘So, Sariputta, you do not have knowledge of the minds of the Buddhas of the past, the future or the present.
Then, Sariputta,have you not spoken boldly with a bull’s voice and roared the lion’s roar of certainty with your declaration? ‘
‘Lord, the minds of the Arahant Buddhas of the past, future and present are not open to me.
But I know the drift of the Dhamma.
Lord, it is as if there were a royal frontier city, with mighty bastions and a mighty encircling wall in which was a single gate, at which was a gatekeeper,
And he, constantly patrolling and following along a path, might not see the joins and clefts in the bastion, even such as a cat might creep through.
But whatever larger crea­tures entered or left the city, must all go through this very gate.
And it seems to me, Lord, that the drift of the Dhamma is the same.
All those Arahant Buddhas of the past attained to supreme enlightenment by abandoning the five hindrances, defilements of mind which weaken understanding, having firmly established the four foundations of mindfulness in their minds, and realised the seven factors of enlightenment as they really are.
All the Arahant Buddhas of the future will do likewise,
‘So I came once to the Blessed Lord to listen to Dham­ma.
And the Blessed Lord taught me Dhamma most excellent­ly and perfectly, contrasting the dark with the light.
And as he did so, I gained insight into that Dhamma, and from among the various things I established one in particular, which was serene confidence857 in the Teacher, that the Blessed Lord is a fully-enlightened Buddha, that the Dhamma is well taught by the Blessed Lord, and that the order of monks is well-trained.
‘Also, lord, the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to the wholesome factors is unsurpassed,
This is the un­surpassed teaching in regard to the wholesome factors.
This the Blessed Lord fully comprehends, and beyond it lies nothing further to be comprehended; and in such understanding there is no other ascetic or Brahmin who is greater or more enlight­ened than the Blessed Lord, as regards the wholesome factors.
‘Also unsurpassed is the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to the elucidation of the sense-spheres:
This is the unsurpassed teaching in regard to the sense-spheres…
‘Also unsurpassed is the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to the modes of rebirth
That is the first way.
Or, one enters the womb knowing, stays there unknow­ing, and leaves it unknowing.
That is the second way.
Or, one enters the womb knowing, stays there knowing, and leaves it unknowing.
That is the third way.
Or, one enters the womb knowing, stays there knowing, and leaves it knowing.
That is the fourth way.
This is the unsurpassed teaching in regard to the modes of rebirth….
‘Also unsurpassed is the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to the telling of thoughts861
Thus, one tells by a visible sign, saying: “This is what you think, this is in your mind, your thought is like this.”
And however much one declares, it is so and not otherwise.
That is the first way.
Or, one tells not by a visible sign,
Or one tells not by a sound uttered,
Or one tells, not by any of these means, when one has attained a state of mental concentration without thinking and ponder­ing,863
And however much one de­clares, it is so and not otherwise.
That is the fourth way.
This is the unsurpassed teaching in regard to the telling of thoughts in four ways…
‘Also unsurpassed is the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to the attainment of vision,864
Here, some ascetic or Brahmin, by means of ardour, en­deavour, application, vigilance and due attention, reaches such a level of concentration that he considers just this body — upwards from the soles of the feet and downwards from the crown of the head, enclosed by the skin and full of manifold impurities: “In this body there are head-hairs, body-hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, sinews, bones, bone-marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, pleura, spleen, lungs, mesentery, bowels, stomach, excrement, bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, tallow, saliva, snot, synovic fluid, urine.” 
Again, having done this and gone further, he contemplates the bones covered with skin, flesh and blood.
This is the second attainment.
Again, having done this and gone further,
Again, having done this and gone still further,
This is the unsurpassed teach­ing in regard to the attainments of vision…
‘Also unsurpassed is the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to the designation of individuals.867
‘Also unsurpassed is the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to the exertions.875
This is the unsurpassed teaching in regard to the exer­tions …
‘Also unsurpassed in the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to the modes of progress,876
In the case of painful progress with slow comprehension, progress is considered poor on account of both painfulness and slowness.
In the case of painful progress with quick com­prehension, progress is considered poor on account of pain­fulness.
In the case of pleasant progress with slow compre­hension, progress is considered poor on account of slowness.
In the case of pleasant progress with quick comprehension, progress is considered excellent on account of both pleasant­ness and quick comprehension.
This is the unsurpassed tea­ching in regard to the modes of progress…
‘Also unsurpassed is the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to proper conduct in speech:
This is the unsurpassed teaching in regard to proper conduct in speech…
‘Also unsurpassed is the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to a person’s proper ethical conduct.
One should be truthful and faithful, not using deception, patter, hinting or belittling,879 not always on the make for further gains, but with sense-doors guarded, abstemious, a peace­maker, given to watchfulness, active, strenuous in effort, a meditator,880 mindful, of fitting conversation, steady-going,881 resolute882 and sensible,883 not hankering after sense-pleasures but mindful and prudent.
This is the unsurpassed teaching in regard to a person’s proper ethical conduct…
‘Also unsurpassed is the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to modes of receptivity to instruction,
This is the unsurpassed teaching in regard to the modes of receptivity to instruction…
‘Also unsurpassed is the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to the knowledge of the liberation of others.
The Blessed Lord knows, by his own skilled observa­tion: “That one will, by the complete destruction of three fet­ters, become a Stream-Winner…;
‘Also unsurpassed is the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to the doctrine of Eternalism.886
In this way he remembers the details of his various past lives,
The self and the world are eternal, barren, steady as a mountain-peak, rooted like a pillar.
Beings run on, transmigrate, pass away and rearise, yet these persist eternally.”
Again, some ascetic or Brahmin recalls various existences…
Again, some ascetic or Brahmin recalls various exis­tence…
This is the unsurpassed teaching in regard to the doctrine of Eternalism…
‘Also unsurpassed is the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to past lives.
Here, some ascetic or Brah­min… recalls various past existences —
In this way he remembers the details of his various past lives.
There are devas whose life-span is not to be reckoned by counting or computation,888
This is the unsurpassed teaching in regard to remembrance of past lives…
‘Also unsurpassed is the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to knowledge of the death and rebirth of beings.
Here, some ascetic or Brahmin… attains to such con­centration of mind that he sees with the divine eye, purified and surpassing that of humans, beings passing away and arising: base and noble, well-favoured and ill-favoured, to happy and unhappy destinations as kamma directs them, and he knows: “These beings, on account of misconduct of body, speech or thought or disparaging the Noble Ones, have wrong view and will suffer the kammic fate of wrong view.
At the breaking-up of the body after death they are reborn in a lower world, a bad destination, a state of suffering, hell.
But these beings, on account of good conduct of body, speech or thought, of praising the Noble Ones, have right view and will reap the kammic reward of right view.
At the breaking-up of the body after death they are reborn in a good destination, a heavenly world.”
Thus with the divine eye, purified and sur­passing that of humans, he sees beings passing away and re-arising.
This is the unsurpassed teaching in regard to know­ledge of the death and birth of beings…
‘Also unsurpassed is the Blessed Lord’s way of teaching Dhamma in regard to the supernormal powers.
These are of two kinds. There is the kind that is bound up with the cor­ruptions and with attachment,890 which is called “un-Ariyan”,
What is the “un-Ariyan” supernormal power?
Here some ascetic or Brahmin enjoys various supernormal powers:
That is the “un-Ariyan” supernormal power.
And what is the “Ariyan” supernormal power?
Here a monk, if he wishes: “Let me abide with the disgusting891 not feeling disgust”, can so abide,
That is the “Ariyan” supernormal power, that is free of the corruptions and not bound up with attachment.
This is the unsurpassed teaching in regard to the supernormal powers.
This the Blessed Lord fully comprehends, and beyond it lies nothing further to be comprehended; and in such under­standing there is no other ascetic or Brahmin who is greater or more enlightened than the Blessed Lord, as regards the super­normal powers.
‘Whatever, Lord, it is possible for a clansman endowed with confidence to achieve by putting forth effort and by per­sistence, by human effort, human exertion and human endur­ance,892 that the Blessed Lord has achieved.
For the Blessed Lord gives himself up neither to the pleasures of the senses, which are base, vulgar, for worldlings and not for the Noble, and unprofitable, nor to self-torment, which is painful, igno­ble and unprofitable.893
‘Lord, if I were asked: “Well now, friend Sariputta, have there ever been in the past any ascetics and Brahmins more exalted in enlightenment than the Blessed Lord? “ I should say: “No.”
If asked: “Will there be any such in the future? “ I should say: “No.”
If asked: “Is there any such at pre­sent? “ I should say: “No.”
Again, if I were asked: “Have there been any such in the past equal in enlightenment to the Blessed Lord? “ I should say: “Yes.”
If asked: “Will there be any such in the future? “ I should ,say: “Yes.”
But if I were asked: “Are there any such at present equal in enlightenment to the Blessed Lord? “ I should say: “No.”
And if I were then asked: “Venerable Sariputta, why do you accord this highest recognition to one and not the other? “ I should say: “I have heard and received it from the Blessed Lord’s own lips: ‘There have been in the past,
I have also heard and received it from the Blessed Lord’s own lips that it is not possible, it cannot be that in one and the same world-system two Arahant supreme Buddhas should arise simultaneous­ly.896 No such situation can exist.”
‘Lord, if I were to reply thus to such questions, would I be speaking in conformity with the Blessed Lord’s word, and not misrepresenting him by departing from the truth? Would I be explaining Dhamma correctly, so that no fellow-follower of the Dhamma could contest it or find occasion for censure? ‘
‘Certainly, Sariputta, if you answered like this you would not misrepresent me, you would be explaining Dhamma cor­rectly and not laying yourself open to censure.’
At this, the Venerable Udayi said to the Lord: ‘It is wonderful, Lord, it is marvellous how content the Blessed Lord is, how satisfied and restrained,897
If the wanderers professing other doctrines were able to discern in themselves even one of such qualities, they would proclaim it with a banner!
It is wonderful…
‘Well then, Udayi, just observe:
If such wanderers were able to discern in themselves even one of such qualities, they would proclaim it with a banner.
But the Tathagata is content,…
Then the Lord said to Sariputta: ‘And therefore you, Sariputta, should frequently speak about this matter to monks and nuns, to male and female lay-followers.
And any foolish people who have doubts or queries about the Tathagata will, by listening to such talk, have their doubts and queries resolved.’
This was how the Venerable Sariputta proclaimed his con­fidence in the Lord.
And so one name for this exposition is ‘The Serene Faith’.
and said:856 ‘It is clear to me, Lord, that there never has been, never will be and is not now another ascetic or Brahmin who is better or more enlightened than the Lord.’
wise, skilled and clever, who kept out strangers and let in those he knew.
and you, Lord, who are now the Arahant, fully-en­lightened Buddha, have done the same.
Since this commentary will be clearer if we first examine the grounds on which the Exalted One delivers a sutta, we will deal with this matter first.
, There are four grounds for the delivery of a sutta: personal inclination , the inclination of others , the proposal of a question , and the occurrence of a special incident .
Among these, those suttas which the Exalted One declares entirely through his own inclination, without being requested by others, have personal inclination as the ground for their delivery.
Some examples of this class are the Akankheyya Sutta , the Vattha Sutta , the Mahasatipatthana Sutta , the Mahasalayatanavibhanga Sutta , the Ariyavamsa Sutta , and many suttas on the right endeavours, the bases of spiritual success, the faculties, powers, factors of enlightenment, and factors of the path.
Those suttas which he declares by reason of the inclinations of others, after discerning their inclination, acquiescence, state of mind, aspiration, and capacity for understanding, have the inclinations of others as the ground for their delivery. An instance is the case of Rahula, when the Exalted One, perceiving that the factors maturing towards emancipation had reached maturity in Rahula, thought:” Let me now lead Rahula to the destruction of the cankers.”
Some suttas of this class are the Ciilarahula Sutta , the Maharahula Sutta , the Dhammacakkappavattana Sutta , and the Dhatuvibhanga Sutta .
When the four assemblies, the four classes, nagas, supannas, gandhabbas, asuras, yakkhas,1 the gods of the sense sphere heavens, and Mahabrahmas approach the Exalted One and ask questions about the factors of enlightenment,
those suttas have the proposal of a question as the ground for their delivery. To this class belong numerous suttas of the Samyuttanikaya, and the Sakkapanha , Culavedalla , Mahavedalla , Samannaphala , and other suttas.
And those suttas declared because a special incident has occurred,
Examples are the Dhammadayada , Culasihanada , the Candupama, Puttamamsupama, Darakkhandhupama, Aggikkhandhupama, Phenapindupama, and Paricchattakupama Suttas.
Of these four, this sutta has the occurrence of a special incident as the ground for its delivery,
And what was that incident?
The arising of conceit on account of learning.
For, it is told, five hundred brahmins who were masters of the three Vedas heard the Exalted One teaching the Dhamma, and recognizing the danger in sense pleasures and the benefit in renunciation, went forth into homelessness in his presence. In no long time they mastered the entire word of the Buddha, and on account of their learning gave rise to conceit. “Whatever the Exalted One says,” they thought,” that we quickly understand. The Exalted One does not say anything which does not come within scope of the three genders, the four kinds of terms, and the seven declensions. Thus there is nothing in what he says that presents a knotty problem to us.”
As a result they neglected to show proper reverence for the Exalted One, rarely going to attend upon him or to listen to him teach the Dhamma.
The Exalted One understood the course their minds were taking, and aware that it would not be possible for them to realize the path or the fruit so long as the pillar of conceit was not uprooted from their minds, he made their conceit the occasion for the delivery of a sutta. Skillful in teaching, he undertook this teaching on “ the exposition of the root of all dhammas” for the purpose of shattering their conceit.
“Of all” means without exception .
For the word “all” expresses the lack of an exception,
The word “dhamma” is found used in the following senses: the scriptures , the Truths , concentration , wisdom , nature , things endowed with a specific nature , emptiness , merit , a disciplinary offense , the knowable , etc.
“He saw the Dhamma, understood the Dhamma” -in the sense of the Truths.
“Those Exalted Ones were of such dhammas” —concentration.
“Truth, dhamma, fortitude, generosity” 
“Of a nature to be born, of a nature to grow old, of a nature to die” -nature.
“Wholesome dhammas” - things endowed with a specific nature.
“On that occasion there are dhammas” -emptiness.
“Dhamma well- practised issues in bliss” -merit.
“Two dhammas are unfixed” -a disciplinary offense.
And in the passage: “All dhammas in all their modes enter the threshold of the Exalted One’s portal of knowledge,” it is the knowable.
Here the word occurs in the sense of things endowed with a specific nature.
This is the word-meaning: “They hear their own characteristics, thus they are dhammas” .
The word “root” 
The word pariyaya occurs in the texts in the sense of teaching ,
Here it has the meaning of teaching and cause.
Thus the phrase “the exposition of the root of all dhammas” signifies the cause designated the particular root-cause of all dhammas, or the teaching of the cause of all dhammas .
But this sutta has to be carefully interpreted. It is not all specific- natured dhammas of the four planes that is indicated by the words “all dhammas,”
but only all dhammas pertaining to the three planes included in personality .1 This here is the purport.
Herein, he is uninstructed, needs to be taught, because he possesses neither learning nor spiritual achievement .
For he who possesses neither the learning running counter to the activity of conceiving because he has neglected to study, question, and discriminate the aggregates, elements, sense bases, truths, law of conditionality, and foundations of mindfulness, etc., nor spiritual achievements because he has failed to achieve what should be achieved by practice, is said to be “ uninstructed “ on account of his deficiency in learning and spiritual achievement.
He is one who needs to be taught.
He is
The worldling is so-called because he generates a multitude of diverse defilements, etc.1
As it is said: “ They generate a multitude of defilements, hence they are worldlings. They have not destroyed the multiple forms of personality-view, they look up to a multitude of teachers, they have not emerged from the multitude of destinations, they form multiple kamma-formations, they are swept away by a multitude of floods, afflicted by a multitude of afflictions, consumed by a multitude of fevers- hence they are worldlings. They are lustful and greedy for the five multiple strands of sense pleasure; therein they are bour.d, infatuated, addicted, attached, fastened, and confined-hence they are worldlings. They are obstructed, hindered, and enveloped by the five multiple hindrances; there they are enclosed, concealed, and incarcerated-hence they are worldlings” .
Again, one who is included among the incalculable multitude of people who live according to an inferior doctrine and are averse to the doctrine of the ariyans is called a worldling.
And a person distinct or remote from the ariyans endowed with such noble qualities as virtue, learning, etc. is called a worldling.
Between the two types of worldlings mentioned in the following verse it is the blind worldling who is called the “uninstructed worldling.’
The Enlightened One, the kinsman of the sun, Speaks of the worldling in a twofold way.
One is the worldling blinded by darkness, The other the worldling noble and good.
The ariyans are so-called because they are remote from the defilements, because they are not heading towards decline, because they are heading towards growth, and because they are worthy of being honoured by the world together with its gods. 1 Buddhas, paccekabuddhas, and disciples of the Buddhas are called “ariyans.” Or the Buddhas alone are called “ariyans” here,
while the phrase” the good men” applies to paccekabuddhas and disciples as well.
Men who shine through their possession of supramundane qualities are called “good men” .
Or both words apply to all three;
Now he who by nature has no regard for the ariyans, and does not welcome their sight, is one “ who is without regard for the ariyans.”
This type of man is of two kinds: he who does not see them with the eye and he who does not see them with knowledge. And here it is not seeing them with knowledge that is intended.
For even though they be seen with the fleshly eye or with the divine eye, they are still unseen,
Though Sona, Sigala, and others saw ariyans with their eyes,
Here is a story to illustrate this :A cankerless elder had a personal attendant who had become a monk in old age. One day, after the two had walked for alms, while following the elder carrying the latter’s bowl and outer robe, the attendant asked: “Venerable sir, the ariyans- what are they like?”
The elder replied: “ Here there is an old man, walking together with an ariyan, doing his duties towards him, carrying his bowl and robe, yet even he does not know what the ariyans are like. So difficult to know are the ariyans, friend.”
And though this was said, still the attendant didn’t get the point.
Thence it is not seeing with the eyes that is meant by the phrase “regard ,” but seeing with knowledge.
As it is said: “What is your purpose, Vakkali, in seeing this foul body? He who sees the Dhamma, Vakkali, he sees me” .
Therefore, even though one sees the ariyans with one’s eyes, so long as one does not see the characteristics of impermanence, seen by the ariyans, and does not achieve the Dhamma achieved by the ariyans, for so long the ariyan state and the dhammas constituting an ariyan remain unseen, and one is described as a person “ without regard for the ariyans.”
That is, without skill in the ariyan Dhamma classified into the foundations of mindfulness, etc.
Because he lacks in all of this, He’s said to be undisciplined.
This discipline is twofold: the discipline of restraint and the discipline of abandoning .
And each part of this twofold discipline is again divided into five.
The discipline of restraint is fivefold as restraint by virtue , by mindfulness , by knowledge , by patience , and by energy .
“He guards the faculty of the eye, he acquires restraint over the faculty uf the eye” ,-this is restraint by mindfulness.
Those streams which flow throughout the world, Ajita, said the Lord,
“He patiently endures cold and heat “ ,-this is restraint by patience.
“ He does not tolerate an arisen thought of sensual desire, he abandons it” ,- this is restraint by energy.
This entire fivefold restraint is called “ restraint “ and “discipline “ because it respectively restrains and disciplines any bodily, misconduct which should be restrained and disciplined.
Thus the discipline of restraint is classified as fivefold.
Thus personality-view is abandoned by the defining of mentality-materiality, the views of acausality and wrong causal relationships by the discernment of conditions, uncertainty in regard to this by the subsequent transcending of doubts, the assumption of “ I “ and “ mine “ by the insight-comprehension of groups, the perception of the path in what is not the path by the discrimination of the path from what is not the path, annihilationism by the perception of arising, eternalism by the perception of fall, the perception of fearlessness in the fearful by the perception of fear, the perception of satisfaction by the perception of unsatisfactoriness, the perception of delight by the contemplation of disenchantment, the non-desire for release by the knowledge desiring release, non-equanimity by the knowledge of equanimity, running contrary to the structure of dhammas and to nibbana by conformity-knowledge, and the assumption of the sign of formations by change-of-lineage. 1 This is called “ abandoning by factor-substitution.”
Abandoning by suppression is the abandonment of the hindrances, etc. by the obstructive power of concentration, either at the level of access or absorption . This is likened to preventing the growth of water-moss by striking the surface of the water with a pot.
Abandoning by eradication is the abandonment of the flock of defilements by completely severing the possibility of their occurrence. It is achieved through the development of the four supramundane paths, and occurs in the individual mental-continua of the four individuals attaining to these paths.
The subsiding of the defilements at the four moments of fruition is the abandoning by subsiding.
Nibbana, in which all that is conditioned is abandoned by the escape from all that is conditioned, is the abandoning by escape.
Since this entire fivefold abandoning is abandoning in the sense of giving up , and discipline in the sense of disciplining, it is called the discipline of abandoning.
Or else it is called the discipline of abandoning because whatever is abandoned is also disciplined.
Thus this discipline of abandoning is classified as fivefold.
Because his restraint is repeatedly disrupted and because he has not abandoned what should be abandoned, the uninstructed worldling lacks this discipline that is described briefly as twofold and in detail as tenfold. And lacking it, he is said to be “ undisciplined.”
The same method applies to the corresponding statements in terms of” the good men,”
As it is said: “ Those who are ariyans are also good men,
and those who are good men are also ariyans.
In order to show this topic by means of a teaching which has a dhamma as subject and an individual as term of expression.1
For the teaching of the Buddha is of four kinds: a teaching which has dhammas as subject and dhammas as terms of expression ; a teaching which has individuals as subject and dhammas as terrms of expression ; a teaching which has individuals as subject and individuals as terms of expression ; and a teaching which has dhammas as subject and individuals as terms of expression .
Therein, “There are, bhikkhus, these three feelings.
What are the three?
Pleasant feeling, painful feeling, and neither pleasant nor painful feeling
“This person consists of six elements, six bases of contact, eighteen mental rangings, and four determinations “ -this is a teaching which has individuals as subject and dhammas as terms of expression.
“ There are, bhikkhus, three kinds of individuals existing in the world.
What are the three?
The blind, the one-eyed, and the two-eyed
And “What, bhikkhus, is the fear of a bad destination?
Herein, bhikkhus, someone reflects: ‘’ The result of bodily misconduct in the life to come is evil
In the present case, since the worldling consists of the bases which have not been fully understood , and the conceiving which is the root of all the dhammas intended here is itself rooted in lack of full understanding , therefore he describes the worldling first; for when he is introduced, the meaning will be made clear through a teaching which has individuals as terms of expression.
hindrances,
clinging-aggregates,
the “best treasure of man,” and so on-
and the Exalted One speaks a sutta in reply,
- these have the occurrence of a special incident as the ground for their pronouncement.
since it was delivered by the Exalted One on account of the occurrence of a special incident.
and signifies the lack of an exception in whatever term it comes into connection with.
In the passage: “Herein, a bhikkhu masters the Dhamma- the suttas, songs,” etc. , it occurs in the sense of the scriptures.
-wisdom.
here means particular root- cause .
cause ,
and turn .
called a worldling for such reasons: As that he generates a multitude of things,
Because he is immersed in the herd, And because he is a man who is distinct.
that is, Buddhas, paccekabuddhas, and disciples are all both ariyans and good men.
for these eyes apprehend only the outer appearance of the ariyans, not their interior ariyan state.
they were not seers of the ariyans.
Here-
The discipline is first twofold, Each part again divides by five.
Therein, “He is endowed, perfectly endowed, with this restraint of the Patimokkha “ ,-this is restraint by virtue.
Mindfulness serves to curb them in,
This I call the restraint of the streams.
But wisdom only turns them off ,-
this indicates restraint by knowledge.
The discipline of abandoning is also fivefold as abandoning by factor-substitution , by suppression , by eradication , by subsiding , and by escape .
Among these, the abandoning by factor- substitution is the abandoning of a negative factor by the class of insight-knowledge opposed to it, in the same way that darkness is abandoned when a lamp is lit.
for there is no difference in meaning.
Whether ‘the ariyans’ is said or ‘the good men’, ‘the Dhamma of the ariyans’ or ‘the Dhamma of the good men’, ‘the discipline of the ariyans ‘ or ‘ the discipline of the good men ‘-these are one, identical, the same, equivalents, interchangeable terms.”
Why does the Exalted One, after announcing: “I will teach you, bhikkhus, the exposition of the root of all dhammas,” proceed to describe the worldling without even teaching the exposition of the root?
“ -this is a teaching which has dhammas as subject and dhammas as terms of expression.
“ -this is a teaching which has individuals as subject and individuals as terms of expression.
“ -this is a teaching which has dhammas as subject and individuals as terms of expression.
that is to say: the four foundations of mindfulness, the four right efforts, the four roads to power, the five spiritual faculties, the five mental powers, the seven factors of enlightenment, the Noble Eightfold Path.858
By these a monk, through the destruction of the corruptions, cay in this very life, by his own super-know­ledge, realise and attain the corruption-free liberation of heart and liberation by wisdom, and abide therein.
HE PERCEIVES EARTH AS EARTH. Having thus described the worldling, the Master goes on to show his manner of conceiving the bases such as earth, etc., which is the generative source of all the dhammas included in personality.
Therein, earth is fourfold: characteristic-earth , composite earth , objectified earth , and earth as conventional designations .
In the passage: “What, friends, is the internal earth element?
That which is internal, belonging to oneself, hard, solid “ -this is characteristic-earth.
In the passage: “ If he should dig the earth, or cause the earth to be dug” -this is composite earth.
The twenty parts of the body beginning with head-hairs, etc. and the external elements such as iron and copper are also included in composite earth.
For composite earth consists of earth together with its accompanying material dhammas, such as colour, etc. 2
somebody who obtains jhana with the earth-kasina as basis, and is reborn in the world of the gods, gains the name “ earth deity “ after his means of arriving at such a state.
All these meanings of the word “ earth “ are relevant to the present context.
For whatsoever instance among these four kinds of earth the worldling perceives as earth, he perceives “ it is earth “; he perceives as a segment of earth ; he perceives through a perversion of perception, seizing upon the conventional expression “it is earth “ .
Or, without releasing this segment of earth, he perceives it as a being or as belonging to a being.
Why does he perceive it in this way? This should not be asked,
for like a madman the worldling
Or else, the reason is that he has no regard for the ariyans, etc.;
HAVING PERCEIVED EARTH AS EARTH. Having perceived earth with a perverted perception, the worldling afterwards conceives it, i.e., construes or discriminates it, through the gross proliferating tendencies of craving, conceit, and views which are here called “conceivings” . This accords with the statement: “Concepts due to proliferation are grounded upon perception” . He apprehends it in diverse ways contrary .
Thence it is said: “ He conceives earth.”
To show the ways in which he conceives it by a gross method, the twenty parts of the body such as head-hairs, body-hairs, etc. may be mentioned as internal earth . The external earth may be understood through
the passage in the Vibhanga: “ What is the external earth element?
Whatever is external, and is hard, solid, hardness, the state of being hard, exterior, not kammically acquired, such as:
iron, copper, tin, lead, silver, pearl, gem, cat’s- eye, shell, stone, coral, silver coin, gold, ruby, variegated precious stone, grass, wood, gravel, potsherd, earth, rock, mountain” .
The earth-sign in the triad of internal objects may also be included. 1 This is the interpretation of the meaning.
HE CONCEIVES EARTH. Through the three conceivings he conceives “ I am earth,” “earth is mine,” ‘’ another is earth,” “earth belongs to another.” Or else: he conceives internal earth through the conceiving of craving, through the conceiving of conceit, and through the conceiving of views. Or, alternatively, he conceives internal earth by the conceiving of craving, through the conceiving of conceit, and through the conceiving of views.
How?
He arouses desire and lust for the head-hairs, etc.; he relishes them, delights in them, welcomes them, and remains cleaving to them.
And so too for the body-hairs, nails, teeth, skin, or any other stimulating object.
Thus he conceives internal earth by the conceiving of craving.
“Let my head- hairs, etc. be thus in the future!
Let my body-hairs be thus! “, etc- Or he yearns for them with delight .
Or resolving his mind on the acquisition of what he has not obtained, he thinks: “ By this virtue … or by this holy life may I have moist, soft, delicate blue-black hair,” etc.
Again, on account of the beauty or ugliness of his own head- hairs, etc. he arouses conceit: “ I am superior “ or “ I am equal “ or “I am inferior.”
Thus he conceives internal earth through the conceiving of conceit.
He adheres to the head-hairs, etc. as a soul , according to the method that has come down: “The soul and the body are the same “-thus he conceives internal earth through the conceiving of views.
Or else, in direct contrast to the method given in the suttas, : “ The internal earth element and the external earth element are only the earth element. This is not mine” , he adheres to the earth element in the head-hairs, etc. as “ This is mine, this am I, this is my self.”
In this way too he conceives internal earth through the conceiving of views.
Thus he conceives internal earth through the three conceivings.
As the internal, so the external.
How?
He arouses desire and lust for iron, copper, etc.;
Thinking “ iron is mine,” “copper is mine,” he takes possession of them , guards them, and keeps watch over them. Thus he conceives external earth through the conceiving of craving.
Again, on account of the beauty or ugliness of his own iron or copper possessions, etc. he arouses conceit: “ I am superior “ or “ I am equal “ or “ I am inferior.” Thus he conceives external earth through the conceiving of conceit.
Then, perceiving a soul in iron, he adheres to iron as a soul;
Or else “ Herein, someone considers the earth-kasina as the self; thinking’
The earth-kasina is I, I am the earth-kasina ‘,
In this way too he conceives external earth through the conceiving of views.
Thus he conceives external earth through the three conceivings.
In this way the statement” he conceives earth” is to be interpreted in terms of the three conceivings.
The remainder we will discuss only in brief.
HE CONCEIVES IN EARTH. Here “in earth” is the locative case.
Therefore he conceives “ I am in earth”; he conceives “ There is an obstruction , an impediment , for me in earth”; he conceives “Another is in earth”; he conceives “There is an obstruction, an impediment, for another in earth.” This is the meaning here.
Or, alternatively, this statement may be interpreted according to the following method: “ How does one consider the self to be in material form?
Here someone regards feeling, perception, the mental formations, and consciousness as the self, and thinks: ‘This self of mine in material form’. Thus he regards the self as in material form” . In this way, assuming feeling, etc. to be the self, he misconstrues some instance of earth, either internal or external, to be the locus for this self. Conceiving “ This self of mine is in earth,” he conceives in earth. This is the way he conceives through views.
The conceiving3 of craving and conceit should be understood as the affection he arouses for this self of his, and the conceit based upon it.
When, in this same way, he conceives the self of another to be in earth, this is the conceiving of views.
But the other types of conceiving are also recognized.
HE CONCEIVES FROM EARTH. Here “ from earth “ is the ablative case.
Therefore, “he conceives from earth” should be understood to mean that he conceives himself or another together with their accessories to originate or to emanate from earth, or he conceives the self to be other than the earth . This is his conceiving of views.
The conceivings of craving and conceit can be understood as the affection and conceit he arouses in regard to the base conceived with the conceiving of views.
Others take the phrase “ he conceives from earth “ to mean that after developing meditation upon a limited earth-kasina, he assumes the existence of an immeasurable self which is different from the kasina object, and conceives “ my self is external to earth”.
HE CONCEIVES ‘EARTH IS MINE’. Here he lays claim to the entire great earth by way of craving; thus in this case only one conceiving, the conceiving of craving, is relevant.
This interpretation applies to all instances of earth, internal and external, divided according to the aforesaid classification, e.g. “ head-hairs are mine, body-hairs are mine iron is mine, copper is mine.”
HE DELIGHTS IN EARTH. He delights in earth with its aforementioned classifications; he relishes it, clings to it.
If this meaning has already been shown by the statement “ he conceives earth,” why is it here said “ he delights in earth “?
This has not been explained by the ancients, 1
For the Exalted One has fully penetrated that element of Dhamma which, when fully penetrated, confers elegance in teaching through diverse and variegated methods.
Therefore, after first showing the origination of defilements by way of conceiving, he now shows the same thing by way of delighting, as an example of his elegance in teaching.
Or … For one who conceives earth, conceives in earth, conceives from earth, conceives “earth is mine,” is not able to abandon the craving or views founded upon earth; therefore he also delights in earth.
But he who delights in earth delights in suffering , and suffering is the danger…. he says this in order to point out the danger.
For the Exalted One has said: “ Bhik.khus, he who delights in the earth element delights in suffering. He who delights in suffering, I declare, is not released from suffering” .
WHAT IS THE REASON? BECAUSE IT HAS NOT BEEN FULLY UNDERSTOOD BY HIM, I DECLARE. Having thus shown the worldling’s conceiving and delight based upon earth, with these words the Master reveals the reason why the worldling conceives and delights in earth.
This is the meaning:-If it is asked “For what reason does the worldling conceive earth? Why does he conceive and delight in earth?”,
the answer is: “ because it has not been fully understood by him,” i.e. because he has not fully understood the base.
He who fully understands the earth understands it by the three types of full understanding: the full understanding of the known , the full understanding of scrutinization , and the full understanding of abandoning .
Therein, what is the full understanding of the known?
He fully understands the earth element thus: “ This is the internal earth element, this the external earth element. This is its characteristic, this its function, manifestation, and proximate cause.” This is full understanding of the known.
What is the full understanding by scrutinization?
Having known it in this way, he scrutinizes the earth element in forty-two modes as impermanent, suffering, a sickness, etc. 2 This is full understanding by scrutinization.
What is the fall understanding by abandoning?
Having scrutinized it in this way, he abandons desire and lust for the earth element through the supreme path . This is full understanding by abandoning
Or, alternatively, the defining of mentality-materiality is the full understanding of the known;
He who fully understands earth undetstands it by these three full understandings. But for the worldling there is no such full understanding. Therefore, due to his lack of full understanding, he conceives earth and delights in it.
“Someone perceives the earth-kasina” -here the objectified earth is the earth-kasina, also called the earth-sign .3
- “Earth as conventional designation”.
seizes upon anything he can in whatever way he can.
or, as the Exalted One will say later on, “because it has not been fully understood by him.”
Thus in this way he conceives internal earth through the conceiving of craving.
he relishes them, delights in them, welcomes them, and remains cleaving to them.
the same method in regard to copper, etc.
Thus he conceives external earth by the conceiving of views.
“he considers the earth-kasina and the self as non-dual “ - he interprets the earth-sign as a self according to the method given in the Patisambhidamagga .
but I offer my own opinion: as a display of elegance of teaching or in order to point out the danger .
the insight- comprehension of the groups as far as conformity- knowledge is the full understanding by scrutinization;
and the knowledge of the ariyan path is the full understanding by abandoning.
in four ways:
thus, one descends into the mother’s womb unknowing,860 stays there unknowing, and leaves it unknowing.
in four ways.
but through hearing a sound made by humans, non-humans,862 or devas …
That is the second way.
but by applying one’s mind and attending to something conveyed by Sound…
That is the third way.
by divining another’s thoughts in one’s mind, and one says: “As far as so-and-so’s mind-force is directed,
so his thoughts will turn to that thing.”
“Water as water” . Water, like earth is fourfold: characteristic, composite, objectified, and conventional designation.
Among these, “ What is the internal water-element?
That which is internal, belonging to oneself, water, liquidity, moisture, moistness, the internal coherence factor of matter, kammically acquired,” etc. . characteristic-water is explained thus .
“Taking up the water kasina, he apprehends the sign in water,” -this is composite water.
The rest is the same as in the case of earth.
But by way of interpretation, the internal water element is given with the twelve items beginning thus: “Bile, phlegm,” etc. . The external water element should be understood thus: “ What is the external water element?
That which is external, water, liquidity, moisture, moistness, the external coherence factor of matter, not kammically acquired,
such as: the sap of roots, the sap of tree, trunks, the sap of bark, the juice of leaves, fruit juice, milk, curd, ghee, butter, oil, honey, molasses, and waters in the earth or atmosphere” . The water-sign in the triad of internal objects is also included.
“ Fire as fire” . In the section on fire, the detailed account should be understood according to the aforementioned method.
But by way of interpretation, the internal fire element is stated in terms of a fourfold division thus: “ That by which one is warmed, by which one ages, by which one is heated, and by which whatever is eaten, drunk, chewed, and tasted gets fully digested,” .
“ What is the external fire element?
That which is external, fire, fiery, heat, hotness, warmth, warmness, external, not kammically acquired,
“Air as air” . The same method as above applies in this section on air, but by way of interpretation, the internal air element is stated thus: “Winds moving upwards, winds moving downwards, winds residing in the bowels, winds residing in die abdomen, winds moving along in all the limbs, sharp winds, cutting winds, rending winds, inhalation, exhalation “ 
“ What is the external air element?
That which is external, air, airy, the external oscillation of matter, not kammically acquired,
The rest by the aforesaid method.
This is the conveyance-mode of the characteristic , defined in the Nettippakarana. By this principle, when the four primary elements are mentioned derivative materiality is implied along with them, since it shares the characteristic of material form.
The primaries together with derivative materiality make up the aggregate of material form.
Therefore, the assertion that the uninstructed worldling conceives earth, water, fire, and air signifies that he regards material form as the self.
The assertion that he conceives in earth,… in air signifies that he regards the self to be in material form.
The assertion that he conceives from earth,… from, air, which implies the self to be other than material form, signifies that he regards the self to be possessed of material form or material form to be in the self.
These are the four conceivings of personality-view based upon materiality.
These reduce to only two views: one is the annihilationist view , three are the eternalist view . This distinction should be understood.
such as: a log fire, a splint fire, a grass fire, a cow-dung fire, a husk fire, a rubbish fire, lightning , the heat of a fire, the heat of the sun, the heat from an accumulation of logs, the heat from an accumulation of grass, grain, and wares” . The external fire element should be understood thus .
such as: the easterly winds, the westerly winds, northerly winds, southerly winds, cold winds, hot winds, gentle winds, strong winds, black winds, high-altitude winds, wing winds, supaI.JJ}.a winds, winds from a palm-leaf, winds from a fan” . The external air element should be understood thus .
When one idea is mentioned, all Ideas of like characteristic
Are mentioned too: this constitutes The Mode Conveying Characteristics.1
HE PERCEIVES BEINGS AS BEINGS . Since the worldling arouses conceivings towards the beings who are discerned by reference to formations 1 as well as towards formations themselves, after having explained the conceiving based on formations under the heading of material form, the Exalted One sets out to expound these living beings, beginning with the above words.
Therein, the word “being’” is found in the following senses: the five aggregates , non-humans , elements , existing , the cankerless saint , living beings , trees , etc.
“Whatever beings are here assembled “ -here it is non-humans.
“The four primary elements are the cause” -here it is the elements.
“If a fact, an offence requiring expiation “ -here, existing.
“ The being who swallows time” -here, the cankerless saint.
“All beings lay down the body in the world” -here, living beings.
“The destruction of plant life” - here, trees.
In the present case the meaning of living beings applies. But not without a distinction;
for here “beings” signifies only living beings below the heaven of the Four Great Kings .1
Therein, “ he perceives beings as beings “-the method has been stated.3
How?
“ He sees a householder or a householder’s son supplied and furnished with the five strands of sense pleasure” -having apprehended beings in this way, he takes hold of the notion that “ beings are beautiful “ or “ beings are happy “ and becomes attached. Having seen them, having heard, smelled, tasted, touched, cognized them, he becomes attached:
thus he conceives beings through the conceiving of craving.
Or resolving his mind on the acquisition of what he has not obtained, he thinks: “O that I may be reborn in the company of great wealthy Khattiyas,” etc. 1 Thus too he conceives beings through the conceiving of craving.
When, depending on his excellence or deficiency in relation to other beings, he ranks himself as superior to others,
As it is said: “ Herein, someone on account of birth …or an a certain ground previously ranked himself as equal to others;
at a later time he ranks himself as superior
and others as inferior. Such a kind of conceit is called arrogance “ .
When he conceives beings thus: “ Beings are permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change,” or “All living beings, all creatures, all beings, all souls are without power, without strength, without energy, evolving in the grip of fate, chance, or nature, experiencing pleasure and pain in the six classes” - this is the conceiving of views.
In this way he conceives beings through the three conceivings.
How does he conceive himself “in beings” ?
When he wishes for his own rebirth or attainment of happiness among such and such beings,
Or when he gives a gift, undertakes precepts, or observes the Uposatha, 2 wishing for rebirth among those beings ,
When, having apprehended beings in terms of an aggregation , he ranks some beings as superior, some as equal, some as inferior ,
So too he conceives some beings as permanent and stable,
“He conceives from beings” : he conceives from beings when he conceives himself or others together with their accessories to originate from some being; this is his conceiving of views.
When he arouses affection and conceit for the base conceived through the conceiving of views, these are his conceivings ofcraving and conceit.
“ He conceives ‘ beings are mine ‘ : here the conceiving of craving is alone relevant.
This occurs when he lays claim to beings thus: “ My sons, my daughters, my goats and sheep, my poultry and swine, my elephants, cattle, horses, and mares.”
“He delights in beings “: the method has been stated .
“Because they have not been fully understood by him “ : the beings are not fully understood because he has not fully understood the formations by reference to which beings are discerned.
The interpretation should be made by the method stated.
Having shown in brief the bases of conceiving by way of formations and living beings, with the words “gods as gods” the Exalted One sets out to show the same thing in detailed classification according to the division of planes.
Therein, they revel in the five strands of sense pleasure or in their own psychic powers, thus they are called gods ; they play or they shine is the meaning.
There are three kinds of “gods”: gods by, convention , gods by rebirth , and gods by purification .
Gods by convention are kings, queens, and princes.
Gods by rebirth are the gods of the heaven of the Four Great Kings and the higher heavenly worlds.
And gods by purifiation are arahants, cankerless saints.
Here gods by rebirth are meant. But not without a distinction,
for Mara and his retinue in the Paranimmitavasavatti heavenly world are excepted; only the remaining gods in the remaining six sense sphere heavenly worlds are intended.
The entire explanation of the meaning should be understood in the way set forth in the section on beings.
“ Pajapati “: here Pajapati is Mara.
Some say that this is a designation for the great kings, etc. who are overlords in the various groups of gods,
but the Great Commentary 1 rejects this as incorrect, for these are already included under the category of gods. Mara alone is intended here by the word “Pajapati,” for he is the overlord of this generation made up of living beings.
Where does he reside?
In the Paranimmita- vasavatti heavenly world.1
Some say that the king of the Vasavattis exercises rule there,
while Mara lives in one place wielding sovereignty over his own retinue like a rebel prince in a frontier corner of a kingdom.
Here is the interpretation: When he arouses desire after seeing or hearing that Pajapati is beautiful, of long-life and abundant happiness, then he conceives him through the conceiving of craving.
When he resolves his mind on the acquisition of what he has not obtained, thinking: “O, that I may be reborn in the company of Pajapati,” in this way too he conceives Pajapati through the conceiving of craving.
When, after attaining the state of Pajapati, he gives rise to the conceit: “ I am the ruler of creatures, the overlord, “ he conceives Pajapati through the conceiving of conceit.
Thinking “ Pajapati is permanent and stable,” or “Pajapati will he annihilated and destroyed,” or “ Pajapati is without power, without strength, without energy, evolving in the grip of fate, chance, or nature, experiencing pleasure and pain in the six classes,” he conceives Pajapati through the conceiving of views..
“ In Pajapati “: here the conceiving of views is alone applicable.
someone conceives: “Those dhammas which are found in Pajapati are permanent, stable, eternal, not subject to change.”
Or else he conceives: “There is no evil in Pajapati, nor are any evil deeds found in him.”
“ From Pajapati “: here the three conceivings are relevant.
How?
Here someone conceives himself or another together with their accessories to originate or emanate from Pajapati; this is his eonceiving of views.
When he arouses affection and conceit for the base conceived through the conceiving of views, these are his conceivings of craving and conceit.
“ Pajapati is mine “: here the conceiving of craving is alone relevant.
This occurs when he lays claim to Pajapati thus: “Pajapati is my master, he is my lord.”
The rest by the method stated.
“Brahma as Brahma.” : he is magnified with distinguished qualities, thus he is Brahma..
Mahabrahma is called “ Brahma “; so too is the Tathagata, brahmins, mother and father, and what is supreme.
In the passage: “ Brahma of one thousand, Brahma of two thousand “ , it is Mahabrahma.
“‘Brahma’, bhikkhus, this is a designation for the Tathagata “- here it is the Tathagata.
Dispeller ofdarkness, enlightened one, universal eye,
“ Mother and father are called ‘ Brahma, ‘ ‘teachers of old.” -
“He sets in motion the wheel of Brahma “ - here supreme.
Here it is the Brahma who is first to be born and whose life-span lasts for the aeon that is intended.
The ministers of Brahma and the assembly of Brahma should also be included.1
“ The gods of Streaming Radiance “: a radiance streams forth , streams out , from their bodies like light from the flame of a torch, penetrating further and further and descending; thus they are gods of Streaming Radiance .
By mentioning these, all beings occupying the plane of the second jhana-the gods of Limited Radiance , of Immeasurable Radiance , as well as of Streaming Radiance-should be included, for all these occupy a single level.
“The gods of Refulgent Glory” : they are covered with glory , bestrewn with glory; their bodies are a single mass radiant and beautiful like a resplendid, blazing piece of gold placed in a golden casket.
the gods of Limited Glory , of Immeasurable Glory as well as of Refulgent Glory-should be included, for all these occupy a single level.
“The gods of Abundant Fruit” :
these are Brahmas on the plane of the fourth jhana.
They vanquish, thus they are Vanquishers .
What do they vanquish?
The four immaterial aggregates.
This is a designation for the beings of the non-percipient realm.
The non-percipient gods occupy one section of the same plane as the gods of Abundant Fruit, where they remain in the same posture in which they are reborn throughout their lives, all with similar material form resulting from the similarity of their productive kamma consciousness.
Some say the Vanquishers are the thousand Brahmas who are overlords among the Brahmas,
In the interpretation, when he arouses desire and lust after hearing that the Vanquishers are beautiful and long-lived, then he conceives the Vanquishers through the conceiving of craving.
When he resolves his mind on the acquisition of what he has not obtained, thinking: “O, that I may be reborn in the company of the Vanquishers,” in this way too he conceives the Vanquishers through the conceiving of craving.
Ranking himself as inferior and the Vanquishers as superior, he conceives them through the conceiving of conceit.
Misapprehending the Vanquishers as permanent and stable, he conceives them through the conceiving of views.
The rest follows the method stated in the section on Pajāpati.
In the passage: “ Do you see, bhikkhus, that this has come into being “ , it is the five aggregates.
“ He conceives beings “: this and the following can be interpreted through the three conceivings.
or as inferior,
or as equal, he conceives beings through the conceiving of conceit.
he conceives in beings through the conceiving of craving.
in this way too he conceives in beings through the conceiving of craving.
he conceives in beings through the conceiving of conceit.
some as impermanent and unstable, or he conceives “I too am a certain somebody among beings”-
thus he conceives in beings through the conceiving of views.
The retinue of Mara should be understood as included along with Mara.
It arises when
Gone to the world’s end transcending all existence,
The cankerless, released from all suffering,
The bringer of truth honoured by Brahma 
-here it is a brahmin.
here mother and father.
The explanation of the meaning should be understood by the method stated in the section on Pajapati.
By mentioning these, all beings occupying the plane of the third jhana-
The interpretation of the meaning for these three sections is the same as the method in the section on beings.
but this is incorrect, since those are already included in the Brahma section.
Discussing the heavenly worlds in succession, the Exalted One shows the non-percipient realm and then skips over the pure abodes in order to discuss the base of infinite space . The reason he omits the pure abodes is because his is an explanation of the round of existence , and the pure abodes pertain to the ending of the round , since they are inhabited exclusively by gods who are non-returners and arahats.
Or the reason is that the life-span of these gods is only a few thousands of aeons, and they only exist during the time when a Buddha has appeared in the world.
But Buddhas sometimes do not appear for an incalculable number of aeons, and during this time the plane of the pure abodes is empty.
For the realm of the pure abodes belongs to the Buddhas like a campground to a king.
For this reason they are not included in the stations of consciousness or the nine abodes of beings. But these conceivings occur at all times;
therefore the Buddha only speaks of the planes which always exist.
The base of infinite space is the four aggregates based on this plane-the wholesome , resultants , and inoperatives .1
But here only the aggregates of those reborn on that plane are meant, for this is a discussion delimiting the planes of existence.
The same method in the case of the base of infinite consciousness, etc.
But here the conceiving of conceit should be interpreted according to the method of the section on Pajapati.
The interpretation of the meaning in these four sections follows the method given in the section on the Vanquishers.
Having thus shown the bases of conceiving in detail by classifying them into their distinct planes, etc., the Exalted One now shows all the dhammas of the three planes inluded in personality which function as the bases of conceiving, by classifying them into a fourfold scheme as the seen, heard, sensed, and cognized.
Therein, the “seen “ means what is seen by the fleshly eye and by the divine eye.
This is a designation for the visible form base .
“He conceives the seen “: he conceives the seen with the three conceivings.
How?
Seeing the visible form base in terms of the perception of beauty and the perception of pleasure , he arouses desire and lust for it, relishes it, and delights in it.
For this has been said by the Exalted One: “Beings become lustful, bhikkhus, over the form of a woman, entranced, infatuated, intoxicated, and fettered. Coming under the sway of the form of a woman, they sorrow for a long time” .
Thus he conceives the seen with the conceiving ov craying.
Or he thinks: “ May my body be thus in the future,” and brings delight to bear upon it; or he gives alms yearning for the attainment of physical beauty, and so on in detail.
In these ways too he conceives the seen with the conceiving of craving.
He arouses conceit on account of the excellence or deficiency of his own form in relation to another’s, thinking:
“ I am superior to him,” or “ I am equal,” or “ I am inferior.” Thus he conceives the seen with the conceiving of conceit.
He conceives the visible form base as permanent, stable, and eternal, or as a self or the property of a self, or as auspicious or inauspicious. Thus he conceives the seen with the conceiving of views.
In this way he conceives the seen with the three conceivings.
How does he conceive himself “ in the seen “?
He conceives in the seen when he regards the self to be in visible form .
Or “just as milk is in the mother’s breast
This is his conceiving of views.
The conceivings of craving and cenceit are the affection and conceit he arouses in regard to the base conceived by the conceiving of views.
Thus he conceives “in the seen.”
The remainder should be understood by the method stated in the section on earth.
Lust, etc. are in visible form.” - he conceives in the seen when he thinks .
“The heard” : what is heard by the fleshy ear or by the divine ear. This is a designation for the sound base .
“The sensed” : that which is apprehended by sensing, i.e. by approach and contact. What is meant is that it is cognized through the mutual adherence of the sense faculty and objects . This is a designation for the bases of odour, flavour, and touch .1
“The cognized” : cognized with the mind. This is a designation for the remaining seven sense bases, or for the mental object .
But here only that which is included in personality is applicable.
In detail these sections should be understood by the method used in the section on the seen.
Having thus shown all personality distributed into four classes, as. the seen, etc., the Exalted One, with the words “unity” and “diversity” , now shows the same as divided into two classes through a section on the attainer and on the non-attainer .
By the word” unity” he shows the attainer,
This is the word-meaning: unity=oneness ,
The four immaterial aggregates pertain to the case of the attainer, all five aggregates to the case of the non-attainer. The interpretation can be made by the method of the Dispensation , thus: “He regards material form as the self,” etc., or by the commentarial method given in the section on earth, having determined by investigation which is appropriate.
But some say that unity indicates the method of unity and diversity the method of diversity .
Others say the adherence to the views “ the self is immutable after death and percipient of unity/ percipient of diversity” is meant.
Neither of these is correct for they aren’t intended here.
Having thus shown all personality as twofold, now collecting it together he shows the same thing again as singlefold with the words cc all as all” .
This is the method of interpretation :-Relishing all , he conceives all through the conceiving of craving.
Conceiving all as created by himself, thus: “These beings have been created by me,” he conceives all with the conceiving of conceit.
“All is caused by past kamma,” “All is created by God,” “All is without cause, without condition,” “All exists,” “All does not exist,” etc.-in these ways he conceives all through the conceiving of views.
How does he conceive himself “ in all”?
Here someone holds such a view: “ My self is great” .
Imagining all the world to be the container for the self, he conceives: “This self of mine is in all” . This is his conceiving of views.
His conceivings of craving and conceit are the affection he arouses for this self and the conceit based upon it, respectively.
The rest should be understood by the method given in the section on earth.
Having shown all personality as singiefoid, with the words “ nibbana as nibbana “ he shows the same as again singlefold by a different method.
Here “ nibbana “ …. “When this self, furnished and supplied with the five strands of sense pleasure, revels in them,
Relishing this nibbana, he conceives it with the conceiving of craving.
Holding that which is in reality not nibbana to be nibbana and to be permanent, etc., he conceives nibbana through the conceiving of views.
Taking his self to be other than nibbana, conceiving “ This is nibbana, this the self. This self of mine is in nibbana “-he conceives himself “ in nibbana “. This is his conceiving of views.
The affection he arouses for this self and the conceit based on it are his conceivings of craving and of conceit, respectively.
This is the method he conceives himself apart “ from nibbana “:
The affection he arouses for this self and the conceit based upon it are his conceivings of craving and of conceit, respectively.
He conceives “ nibbana is mine “ thus: “O, how blissful is my nibbana!”
The rest by the method stated.
Here is the summing up verse:
Because he does not understand The person as it really is
The worldling only generates Conceivings in the person-group .
Though in truth foul and perishable, Painful, void of an inner lord ,
The fool takes it in the opposite way, Grasps hold of it through his conceivings.
He contemplates the person-group As beautiful and pleasurable,
Plunging in through conceivings of craving Like a moth into a candle flame.
Standing on ideas of permanence, Extolling himself for his excellence,
Like filth being poured into filth Conceivings of conceit arise.
Like a madman his image in a glass, The fool takes the self to be real,
And so too property of this self- These are his conceivings in terms of views.
This that we have called “ conceiving “ Is the very subtle bondage of Mara,
Flexible and difficult to break, By this the worldling is held in thrall.
Though struggling and striving with all his might, He does not escape the round of births,
But circles on like a leash-bound dog Tied to a firmly planted post.
This worldling attached to the person-group Is constantly slain with vehement force
By the pains of birth, disease, and age, By all the sufferings of the round.
Therefore I say to you, good sir, Discern the person with sharp insight
As bound to pain, an impure mass, Subject to break up, void of self.
The sage perceiving as it is This, the true nature of our being,
Abandons all conceiving’s modes And from all suffering finds release.
and by the word” diversity” the non-attainer.
diversity= manyness .
then it has attained to supreme nibbana here and now” …. should be understood as the five kinds of” supreme nibbana here and now “ which have come down in the passage beginning .
The conceit he arouses because of this nibbana when he thinks “I have attained nibbana”-this is the way he conceives nibbana, through the conceiving of conceit.
taking his self to be other than nibbana: conceiving “ This is nibbana, this the self. This self of mine comes from nibbii.na, it is other than nibbana “-he conceives himself apart “from nibbana.” This is his conceiving of views.
So far the Exalted One has shown the cognitive process of the worldling in regard to the bases such as earth, etc., which process becomes the root of all the dhammas included in personality. Now, with the words “ A bhikkhu who is a learner,” he undertakes to show the cognitive process of the learner 1 as it occurs in regard to these same bases.
In what sense is the learner called by this name?
He is a learner because he has obtained the dhammas that make him a learner.
For this is said: “ To what extent, Lord, is one a learner?”
“ Here, bhikkhu, a bhikkhu is endowed with a learner’s right view… a learner’s right concentration.
To this extent a bhikkhu is a learner” .
Moreover, “he learns , therefore he is a learner.”
For this is said: “ He learns, bhikkhu, thus he is called a learner.
And what does he learn?
He learns the higher virtue, the higher consciousness, and the higher wisdom. He learns, bhikkhu, thus he is called a learner” .
The noble-minded worldling who fulfils the practice in conformity , who is endowed with virtue, restrained over the doors of the senses, moderate in eating, who applies himself to wakefulness and is devoted to the development of the constituents of enlightenment in the first and last watches of the night, thinking: “ Today or tomorrow I will achieve one of the fruits of recluseship” -he too is called a learner because he learns.
But in this place only the learner who has attained to penetration is meant,1 not even the noble-minded worldling.
“Who has not attained his heart’s ideal” :
In the passage “The heart is a snare that wanders about in mid-air” , it means lust.
“Mind, mentality, mentation “-here, mind.
“A learner who has not attained his heart’s ideal “-here, arahatship.
In the present case arahatship is intended.
Thus the meaning is “ who has not attained arahatship.”
“Security from bondage “ : security from the four bonds.3
“Yearning” : there are two yearnings, the yearning of craving and the yearning of desire .
here is intended.
The phrase means that he desires to attain security from bondage, desires to achieve it; he slants, slopes, and inclines to it as his goal.
HE DIRECTLY KNOWS EARTH AS EARTH He directly knows earth in its nature as earth , unlike the worldling who perceives it with a completely perverted perception.
Further, he knows it with distinguished knowledge . What is meant is that, resolving upon the earth in accordance with its real nature, he knows it as impermanent, suffering, and non-self.
He cannot be described either as one who conceives or as one who does not conceive.
What is the purport?
Because he has not abandoned any of the conceivings, the worldling is described as one who conceives.
The arahat, who has abandoned them all, is described as one who does not conceive.
The learner has abandoned the conceiving of views, and has diminished the others. Therefore he cannot be described as one who conceives, like the worldling, nor can he be described as one who does not conceive, like the arahat.
IN ORDER THAT HE MAY FULLY UNDERSTAND IT The base of conceiving should be fully understood by the learner through the three full understandings, for he has entered the course of rightness 1 and is bound for enlightenment. Unlike the worldling he is not wholly lacking in full understanding, and unlike the arahat he has not completed full understanding.
the word manasa has the meanings of lust , mind , and arahatship.
yearning as desire to do the wholesome -
LET HIM NOT CONCEIVE EARTH 1
Having thus shown the cognitive process of the learner in regard to the bases such as earth, etc., with the words “A bhikkhu who is an arahat,” the Exalted One next undertakes to show the cognitive process of the cankerless saint .
Therein, arahat = one who is remote from the defilements , far from the defilements. The meaning is: one who has abandoned the defilements.
As the Master says: “And how, bhikkhus, is a bhikkhu an arahat?
He is remote from evil, unwholesome dhammas, from dhammas which are defiling, leading to renewed existence, disturbing, bringing painful results, conducing to birth, ageing and death.
Thus, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu is an arahat” . “A cankerless saint”: the four cankers are the canker of sensual desire, the canker of desire for existence, the canker of wrong views, and the canker of ignorance. For the arahat these four cankers are destroyed, abandoned, eradicated, silenced, consumed by the fire of knowledge so that they can no more arise again; therefore he is called a cankerless saint.
“ Lived the holy life” : he has lived in co-residence with his teacher, dwelt in the ariyan path, and abided in the ten ariyan abidings. He has lived the life, completed the course; thus he is one “who has lived the holy life.” “Done what had to be done” : in comparison to the noble-minded worldling, the seven learners are doing what has to be done by the four paths. For the cankerless saint all that should be done has been done and completed. There is nothing further for him to do to achieve the destruction ofsuffering; thus he has” done what had to be done.”
For this is said:
There is nothing to add to what he has done, Nor does anything remain that he must do.
“Laid down the burden” : there are three burdens- the burden of the aggregates, the burden of the defilements and the burden of kamma-formations . For the arahat these three burdens have been laid down, thrown down, deposited, cast down; therefore he is called one who has “laid down the burden.”
“Attained his own goal” :
For that is one’s own goal, one’s personal goal, in the sense that it is connected with oneself, that it can never be abandoned by oneself, and that it is one’s supreme goal.
“Eliminated the fetters of existence” : the ten fetters are the fetters of sensual lust, aversion, conceit, views, doubt, clinging to rules and rituals, lust for existence, jealousy, stinginess, and ignorance.
These are called “fetters” because they fetter , connect, beings to the states of existence, or because they fetter one existence to the next.
These fetters of existence are eliminated by the arahat, abandoned consumed by the fire of knowledge; therefore he is called one who has “eliminated the fetters of existence.”
“Emancipated through final knowledge” : what is meant by “ final knowledge”?
He has known, scrutinized, investigated, clarified, and illuminated with knowledge perfectly, as it really is, the aggregates ‘ meaning of aggregates, the bases ‘ meaning of bases, the elements’ meaning of elements, suffering’s meaning of oppressing, the origin’s meaning of source, cessation’s meaning of peace, the path’s meaning of seeing, or the division beginning thus: “All formations are impermanent,” etc.
Since his mind is emancipated from all defilements, the arahat is emancipated by the emancipation of mind.
And since he is resolved upon nibbii.na he is also emancipated in nibbana.
Therefore he is called “ emancipated by final knowledge.”
BECAUSE IT HAS BEEN FULLY UNDERSTOOD BY HIM The arahat has fully understood the bases of conceiving through the three kinds of full understanding.
Therefore he neither conceives the base nor does he conceive the conceiving. The remainder by the method stated.
At the end of the nibbana section, three additional sections are stated in terms of the destruction of lust, hate, and delusion.
Each should be applied to each of the sections dealing with the bases, beginning with earth,
BECAUSE HE IS DEVOID OF LUST THROUGH THE DESTRUCTION OF LUST Those outside who are devoid of lust for sensual pleasures are not “ devoid of lust through the destruction of lust.”1
The arahat alone is. Therefore it is said: “ Because he is devoid of lust through the destruction of lust.”
This method should also be applied to the cases of hate and delusion.
Just as, when it is said “ because it has been fully understood by him,” the meaning is that because it has been fully understood he conceives neither the base nor the conceiving, so here too because he is devoid of lust he conceives neither the base nor the conceiving.
And here the section on full understanding is stated for the purpose of showing the fulfilment of the development of the path ,
Or else, the arahat does not conceive for two reasons: because he has fully understood the base and because he has eradicated the unwholesome roots.
Therefore the section on full understanding shows his full understanding of the base, the others his eradication of the unwholesome roots.
In the three latter sections, the following distinction should be understood: Having seen the danger in lust, he dwelt in the contemplation of suffering, became emancipated through the deliverance of the wishless , and is devoid of lust through the destruction of lust.
Having seen the danger in hate, he dwelt in the contemplation of impermanence, became emancipated through the deliverance of the signless , and is devoid of hate through the destruction of hate.
And having seen the danger in delusion, he dwelt in the contemplation of non-self, became emancipated through the deliverance of emptiness , and is devoid of delusion through the destruction of delusion.
If such is the case, since no one becomes emancipated through three deliverances, shouldn’t two sections be omitted? No.
Why?
Because there is no specification.
For it was said “a bhikkhu who is an arahat” without specification.
It was not said that he is emencipated by the wishless deliverance or by either of the other two; therefore all that is appropriate for the arahat should be mentioned.
Or else, without distinction, whoever is an arahat, by fully understanding the suffering in change , becomes devoid of lust through the destruction of lust: by fully understanding the suffering in painful feeling , becomes devoid of hate through the destruction of hate;
Or by fully understanding a desirable object , he becomes devoid of lust through the destruction of lust;
and by fully understanding a neutral object , he becomes devoid of delusion through the destruction of delusion.
Or by eradicating the latent tendency to lust for a pleasant feeling, he becomes devoid of lust through the destruction of lust; and by eradicating the latent tendencies to aversion and delusion for painful and neutral feelings, respectively, he becomes devoid of hate and devoid of delusion.
Therefore, showing these distinctions, the Exalted One says “ devoid of lust, devoid of hate, devoid of delusion”
For such a bhikkhu perfectly released. Who dwells with ever tranquil mind,
by “own goal” arahatship is meant.
“ Emancipated “: there are two emancipations, emancipation of mind and nibbana.
Only one condensed statement is given since the meaning is the same in all cases.
just as the statement on full understanding should be applied to all terms.
the others for the purpose of showing the fulfilment of the realization of the fruit .
and by fully understanding the suffering in formations , becomes devoid of delusion through the destruction of delusion.
by fully understanding an undesirable object , he becomes devoid of hate through the destruction of hate;
Having thus shown the cognitive process of the cankerless saint in regard to the bases such as earth, etc., with the words “ The Tathagata, bhikkhus,” the Exalted One next undertakes to show his own cognitive process.
Therein, “ the Tathagata “: the Exalted One is called the Tathagata for eight reasons: because he has “thus come” ; hecause he has “thus gone” ; because he has arrived at the real characteristic ; because he has awakened to real dhammas in accordance with actuality ; because he is a seer of the real ; because he is a speaker of the real ; because he acts in accordance with his teaching ; and in the sense of surpassing .1
He is an “ arahat” for the following reasons: because he is remote from the defilements ; because his enemies and the spokes have been destroyed ; because he is worthy to receive the requisites, etc.; and because ot absence of secret evil-doing.
And he is a perfectly enlightened Buddha because he is perfectly and by himself enlightened to all dhammas.
This is a summary;
for a detailed treatment of these two words, consult the Visuddhimagga, the chapter on the Recollection of the Buddha.2
BECAUSE IT HAS BEEN FULLY UNDERSTOOD TO THE END BY THE TATHAGATA . Here, the base of conceiving has been fully understood by the Tathagata.
It has been “ fully understood to the end “: fully understood to the conclusion, fully understood to the limit, fully understood without any remainder is meant.
For although there is no distinction between Buddhas and disciples in regard to the abandoning of defilements by the four paths, there is a distinction in regard to their range of full understanding.
Disciples can attain nibbana after insight-comprehension of only one segment of the four elements.
But for the Buddhas there isn’t even the slightest thing in the formations which hasn’t been seen, weighed, scrutinized, and realized with knowledge.
“Delight” is prior craving ,
“Having understood”: he has known that the delight in the previous existence is the root of the present suffering.
“ Existence “ = kamma-existence.
“ Birth “ = the resultant aggregates.
Since those are born they are called “birth,”
“What has come to be” =a living being .
This is meant: he has known that ageing and death come upon the aggregates of the living being that has come to be through rebirth-existence.
To this extent, showing the cause for his elimination of the conccivings to be his penetration of dependent origination when he attained omniscience after comprehending the formations with insight while sitting in the invincible posture at the foot of the Bodhi tree, he shows dependent origination with its four sections , three links , three periods of time and twenty modes .1
How is all this shown?
Here, delight is one section.
Suffering is given as a second, existence is a third, and birth, ageing, and death are the fourth.
Thus the four sections should be understood.1
Thus, just as there are three links between the four fingers, there are also three links between the four groups.
Delight belongs to the past period of time, birth, ageing, and death to the future, and suffering and existence to the present. Thus the three periods of time should be understood.
In the past there were five modes, of which craving alone has come down under the name “delight.” But though they are not mentioned in the text, ignorance, formations, clinging, and existence are included along with craving, since they all share the characteristic of being conditions.
The phrase “ birth, ageing, and death “ indicates the aggregates which are subject to birth, ageing, and death, and thus future consciousness, mentality: materiality, the sixfold base, contact, and feeling are implied.
These twenty modes have the characteristics described as follows: “ In the previous kamma-existence, ignorance with its characteristic of delusion, formations of accumulating, craving of attachment, clinging of involvement, and existence of volition-these five dhammas in the previous kamma-existence are conditions for rebirth-linking in this existence.
Here, consciousness with its characteristic of rebirth-linking, mentality-materiality of des- cending, the bases of sensitivity, contact of touching, and feeling of being felt-these five dhammas in the rebirth-existence in this life are conditioned by previously done kamma.
With the maturation of the sense bases here, ignorance with its characteristic of delusion, formations of accumulating, craving of attachment, clinging of involvement, and existence of volition-these five dhammas in the present kamma-existence are conditions for future rebirth-linking.
In the future, consciousness with its characteristic of rebirth-linking, mentality-materiality of descen- ding, the bases of sensitivity, contact of touching, and feeling of being felt-these five dhammas in future rebirth-existence are conditioned by kamma done here.”1
Thus by the statement: “ He has understood that delight is the root of suffering, and that with existence there is birth, and that for what has come to be there is ageing and death,” this entire dependent origination with its four sections, three links, three periods of time, and twenty modes, is shown.
Next the Exalted One says: THEREFORE, BHIKKHUS, THROUGH THE COMPLETE DESTRUCTION, FADING AWAY, CESSATION, ABANDONING, AND RELINQUISHING OF ALL CRAVINGS, THE TATHAGATA HAS AWAKENED TO THE SUPREME PERFECT ENLIGHTENMENT, I DECLARE.
“Destruction” is the ultimate destruction by the supramundane path.
The following words are synonyms for destruction.
For those cravings that are destroyed have also faded away, ceased, been abandoned, and been relinquished.
Or else, “ destruction “ can be interpreted as the common function of the four paths,
Or else: through the “destruction” of those by which he might conceive earth, and so forth until, through the “ relinquishing “ of those through which he might delight in earth. These interpretations are all possible; there is nothing to exclude them.
“ Supreme” - which is unsurpassed, the best of all.
The word bodhi is used in the texts to signify a tree, the path, the knowledge of omniscience , and nibbana.
In the passages: “ first enlightened at the foot of the Bodhi tree “ and “ between Bodhi and Gaya” , it is the tree that is called bodhi.2
In the passage; “ the knowledge of the four paths is called bodhi,” , it is the path.1
In the passage; “He of the most excellent profound wisdom attained bodhi” , it is the knowledge of omniscience.
In the following it is nibbana: “ Having attained to bodhi, the deathless, the unconditioned “ .
Here the Exalted One’s knowledge of the path of arahatship is intended;
Is the path of arahatship attained by disciples the supreme enlightenment or not?
It is not.
Why?
Because it does not yield all the noble qualities .
For some disciples, the path of arahatship yields only the fruit of arahatship; for some the threefold knowledge; for some the six abhinnas; for some the four discriminations ; for some the knowledge of the pāramī of disciples.
For paccekabuddhas it yields only the knowtedge of a paccekabuddha’s enlightenment.
But for Buddhas it yields the endowment with all noble qualities, just as the coronation of a king confers sovereignty over all the nation.
Therefore any other degree of enlightenment is not the supreme enlightenment.
“Awakened to” : directly known, penetrated, attained, achieved.
“ I declare” : I explain, I teach, proclaim, establish, reveal, analyze, make manifest.
Therein, this is the interpretation: “ The Tathagata, bhikkhus, does not conceive earth … does not delight in earth.
What is the reason? Because he has understood that delight is the root of suffering, and that with existence there is birth, and that for what has come to be there is ageing and death.
And what is more: since he has understood dependent origination thus, the craving called ‘ delight ‘ has been abandoned in all its aspects by the Tathagata. Through the complete destruction of all cravings, the Tathagata has awakened to the supreme perfect enlightenment;
therefore he does not conceive earth … does not delight in earth, I declare.” This is meant: “by reason of his awakening he does not conceive and does not delight, I declare.”
Or else: “Since cravings have gone to complete destruction through his understanding of dependent origination by the method, ‘Delight is the root of suffering,’ therefore, bhikkhus, through the complete destruction of all cravings, the Tathagata has awakened to the supreme perfect enlightenment, I declare.
By reason of his awakening, he does not conceive earth … does not delight in earth.”
“ Thus spoke the Exalted One “: the Exalted One spoke this entire sutta, from the end of the introduction to the words “ awakened to the supreme perfect enlightenment, I declare,” showing his supremely deep knowledge of omniscience which does not yield a foothold to the wisdom of others. The text comprises two recitation sections and eight major expository sections-one on the worldling, one on the learner, four on the arahat, and two on the Tathagata. Each major section, in turn, contains twenty-four minor sections, from earth down to nibbana.
But though this sutta, endowed with variegated methods and elegance of teaching, was spoken by the Exalted One with a Brahma-like voice sweet as the song of the cuckoo, pleasing to the ear, consecrating the hearts of the wise with the ambrosia of the deathless,
Why not?
Because they didn’t understand it.
Since they didn’t understand the meaning of the sutta, they didn’t rejoice in it.
For though endowed with variegated methods and elegance of teaching, at the time this sutta was for them like delicious food placed before a man with his mouth bound by a thick, broad cloth.
But didn’t the Exalted One fulfil the paramis for four immeasurables plus a 100,000 aeons and attain omniscience all for the purpose of teaching the Dhamma to others in a way they could understand?
If so, why didn’t they understand it in the way he taught it?
The reason has been given in the section explainining the grounds for the delivery of this sutta: “ he undertook this teaching for the purpose of shattering their conceit.” Therefore this need not be repeated here. Having heard this sutta taught for the purpose of shattering their conceit, they thought: “The theorist, he says, perceives earth. The learner, the arahat, and the Tathagata directly know it.
What is this? How is this? Previously we could quickly understand whatever the Exalted One said. But now we cannot make head or tail out of this ‘exposition of the root’. O, the Buddhas are immeasurable and unfathomable! “ Thus they became humble, like snakes with drawn fangs, and went respectfully to attend upon the Buddha and listen to the Dhamma.
A short time afterwards a number of bhikkhus, sitting together in the Dhamma hall, started the following conversation:- “O, the spiritual power of the Buddhas! Those brahmin-monks were so puffed up with conceit, but the Master’s teaching on the exposition of the root made them humble.” This was the talk going on among these bhikkhus.
Then the Exalted One came out from his Fragrant Cottage, went to the Dhamma hall displaying a wonder appropriate for the occasion, sat down in the special seat reserved for him, and said to the bhikkhus: “ What kind of conversation were you having just now, bhikkhus?”
They reported the matter to the Master.
The Master said: “It is not only now, bhikkhus, but in the past as well that I humbled these men while they were going about with their heads swollen with conceit.”
Then the Exalted One related the following story of the past, a parallel to the present incident:-
“ Once upon a time, bhikkhus, a certain famous brahmin was living in Benares, a master of the three Vedas, knowing the text and context of the Itihasas, the fifth of the brahminical authorities, with their invocations, liturgy and word-analysis, and he was fully versed in Natural Science and that of the marks of the Great Man. He taught mantras to five hundred brahmin youths.
Those youths, being clever, learned much quickly, bore it well in mind, and did not forget what they learned.
The brahmin too did not have the closed fist of some teachers, but taught them every branch of knowledge as though pouring water into a jar, telling them: “ This branch of knowledge leads to so much welfare in this life and in the next.”
In time those brahmin youths aroused the conceit: “Whatever our teacher knows, that we know. We too can now be teachers’. From then on those youths became disrespectful towards their teacher and neglectful of their duties.
The teacher, aware of the situation, thought: ‘ I will cut down their conceit ‘.
One day, when they came to attend on him, after they had done homage and took their seats, he said: ‘ Dears, I will give you a riddle. Solve it if you can ‘.
’ Give it, teacher, give it ‘, they eagerly replied, so intoxicated were they with the pride of their learning.
The teacher said :1
Answer this riddle, dears.
But though they pondered it over and over, they couldn’t figure it out, but could only remain silent.
The teacher dismissed them: ‘ Enough for today. Go, by tomorrow you should be able to answer it.’“
But even though ten and twenty of them tried to solve it together, still they couldn’t make head or tail out of the riddle.
The next day they went to the teacher and reported: ‘ We can’t understand the meaning of this riddle’.
The teacher, in order to cut down their conceit, recited this stanza:
Hearing this, those youths became silent, shame-faced, shoulders slumped, downcast, scratching the ground with their fingers.
Then the teacher, seeing that they were ashamed, said: “ Learn, dears, the solution to this riddle”.
Then he explained: “ Time “ is the earlier part of the day and the later part of the day.
“Beings” are living beings.
Time does not eat the skin and flesh of beings, but swallows and devours them by depriving them of life, beauty, and strength by crushing their youth, and by destroying their health.
“Together with itself”: thus devouring them, it does not omit anything but devours all.
Not only does it devour all beings, but it also devours itself.
For the earlier part of the day does not remain when the later part arrives,
“The being who swallows up this time “-this is the arahat, the cankerless saint.
For he is called one who “swallows up time” because he has “eaten up” time by barring out the possibility of future rebirth.
“ He consumes the consumer of beings “: it is craving which consumes beings in the planes of misery. This the arahat has burnt up with the fire of knowledge and reduced to ashes. Thence he is said to ‘ consume the consumer of beings’.
“ When this explanation was given those youths perceived the meaning of the riddle as clearly as the smooth and rough parts of a road illuminated at night by the light of a thousand lamps. They all vowed: ‘ As long as life lasts we will live under our teacher. Great, indeed, are these teachers! We were so puffed up with conceit on account of learning that we did not even know the meaning of a four line stanza ‘. Humbled, from then on they performed their proper duties towards their teacher as they did in the past, and in the next life were born in heaven.
At that time, bhikkhus, I was the teacher and these bhikkhus were the brahmin youths.
Thus in the past as well I humbled these men when they were going about with their heads swollen with conceit.”
Hearing this story of the past, thinking “ in the past as well we were knocked down because of conceit,” those bhikkhus became even more humble and applied themselves even more to their individual meditation-subjects.
On a later occasion the Exalted One, walking on tour through the country, reached Vesali, where he dwelt at the Gotamaka shrine. Knowing that the understanding of those five hundred bhikkhus had become mature, he taught them the Gotamaka Sutta :
“Through direct knowledge , bhikkhus, I teach Dhamma, not without direct knowledge. I teach a firmly ground Dhamma with firm grounds , not groundlessly. I teach Dhamma that is convincing , not unconvincing.
And since I teach Dhamma through direct knowledge, etc.,
It is sufficient for you to be pleased, bhikkhus, sufficient for you to be exultant, sufficient for you to be joyful:
‘The Exalted One is a perfectly enlightened Buddha, the Dhamma is well-expounded, the Sangha is practising the good path.’
Thus spoke the Exalted One. And while this exposition was being spoken the ten thousandfold world system shook.
Having heard this sutta, those five hundred bhikkhus attained arahatship together with the four discriminations right in their very seats. Thus on this occasion the present teaching reached the fulfilment of its purpose.
“suffering” is the five aggregates ,
“ root “ is the beginning .
This is the meaning: he has known that with kamma-existence rebirth-existence occurs.
Between craving and suffering there is one link, between suffering and existence a second, and between existence and birth a third.
Here, “all cravings “ is the same as delight.
“fading away” as the first path, “ cessation” as the second, “ abandoning “ as the third, and “ relin- quishing “ as the fourth .1
Or else: through the “destruction” of those cravings by which he might perceive earth as earth;
through the “ fading away “ of those by which he might conceive earth;
through the “cessation” of those by which he might conceive in earth;
through the “abandoning” of those by which he might conceive from earth;
and through the “ relinquishing “ of those by which he might conceive “ earth is mine.”
“perfect enlightenment” the perfect enlightenment and self-enlightment .
others say the knowledge of omniscience as well.
“those bhikkhus did not delight in the word of the Exalted One.”
’ Time swallows all beings that live Together with itself as well,
But the being that swallows up this time- He consumes the consumer of beings.’
’ Many downy heads were held high with conceit,
But some clever man has bound them by their necks ‘.
and the later part of the day does not remain when the next day arrives.
my exhortation and my instruction should be put into practice.
in four ways.
That is the first attainment of vision.
he comes to know the unbroken stream of human consciousness as established both in this world and in the next.865
That is the third attainment.
he comes to know the unbroken stream of human consciousness that is not established either in this world or in the next.866
That is the fourth attainment of vision.
There are these seven types:
the Both-Ways-Liberated,868 the Wis­dom-Liberated,869 the Body-Witness,870 the Vision-Attainer,871 the Faith-Liberated,872 the Dhamma-Devotee,873 the Faith-Devotee.874
This is the unsurpassed teaching in regard to the de­signation of individuals…
There are these seven factors of enlightenment: mindfulness, investigation of states, energy, delight, tranquillity, concentration and equani­mity.
which are four: painful progress with slow comprehension, painful pro­gress with quick comprehension, pleasant progress with slow comprehension, pleasant progress with quick comprehension.
how one should avoid not only any speech involving lying, but also speech that is divisive877 or sneeringly triumphant,878 but should use wise words, words to be treasured, words in season.
of which there are four: The Blessed Lord knows by his own skilled observation:884 “That one will, by following instruc­tions, by the complete destruction of three fetters, become a Stream-Winner, no more subject to rebirth in lower worlds, firmly established, destined for full enlightenment”;
then with the reduction of greed, hatred and delusion, become a Once-Retumer…;
by the complete destruction of the five lower fetters, be spon­taneously reborn…;
by the destruction of the corruptions, gain in this very life the deliverance of mind, the deliverance through wisdom which is uncorrupted…”
There are three such theories:
Here, some ascetic or Brahmin, by means of ardour, endeavour,…recalls various past existences …
up to several hundred thousand births… .
and he says: “I know the past, whether the universe was expanding or contracting,887
but I do not know the future, whether it will expand or contract.
.
.
The word “all” is found to be applied to four cases: the all-inclusive all , the all of restricted reference , the all of the sense bases , and the all of personality .
Thus, in the passage: “All dhammas in all their modes enter the threshold of the Exalted One’s portal of knowledge” , the all-inclusive all is intended.
In the passage: “You have all spoken well, Sariputta” , it is the all of restricted reference.
In the passage: “I will teach you the all, bhikkhus. The eye and visible forms … the mind and mental objects” , it is the all of the sense bases.
And in the passage: “He perceives all as all” , it is the all of personality.
Among these four, the all-inclusive all has unrestricted application, the other three restricted application. In the present case, the all of personality is meant. 1
“They bear their own characteristics “: although there are no dhammas devoid of their own characteristics, this is still said for the purpose of showing that these are mere dhammas endowed with their specific natures devoid of such attributions as that of a “being,” etc. Whereas such entities as self, beauty, pleasurableness, and permanence, etc., or nature , substance , soul , body, etc., which are mere misconstructions due to craving and views, or such entities as “sky-flowers,” etc. which are mere expressions of conventional discourse , cannot be discovered as ultimately real actualities , these dhammas can. These dhammas are discovered as ultimately real actualities.
And though there is no real distinction , still, in order to facilitate understanding, the exposition makes a distinction as a mere metaphorical device . 1
Also: they are borne, or they are discerned, known, according to their specific nature, thus they are dhammas .
The meaning is: the unique condition for each of the dhamma.s included in personality.
And what is that?
Craving, conceit, and views, or ignorance, etc. 1
For just as the conceivings of craving, , which arise in reference to the bases of conceiving such as earth, etc., are the root-cause for their occurrence, so also is ignorance, etc.
Thus it is said below , in conformity with this: “The uninstructed worldling,” etc., “Because it is not fully understood by him,” and “ Delight is the root of suffering “; and in addition, “ Because he is devoid of lust, hate, and delusion.” Hence their functioning as root-causes is proved.
The purport is all the dhammas beginning with earth which function as the bases for conceiving .
“The worldling consists of the bases which have not been fully understood “: the aggregates which have not been fully understood through the three kinds of full understanding. 1
For the aggregates are the bases of full understanding.
The base of conceiving is apprehended merely through hearsay, etc.
But some raise the objection: “No conceiving takes place when the characteristic is seen, and the perception which seizes upon as a solid mass and becomes the root for the assumption of views, does not recognize the characteristic. Therefore characteristic-earth should not be included.”1 This is incorrect, for the penetration of the characteristic is not intended here;
thence the commentator says: “seizing upon the conventional expression.”
And not all perception seizes upon the mass, nor does all become the root for the assumption of views. Therefore, conceiving also occurs in regard to the characteristic-earth which appears through the body-door and elsewhere.
Thence it was said that the base is “apprehended merely through hearsay, etc.”
“Seizing upon the conventional expression “:
Objection: If the conventional expression is applied, what is the fault? Don’t ariyans also make use of the conventional expression, as when they say: “This, venerable sir, is the great earth,” etc.?
Reply: It is not the mere employment of the expression that is intended here, but the wrong adherence which is working through the conventional expression. Thence he says: “he perceives through a perversion of perception.”
This is the meaning:-He perceives it as beautiful , etc. 1 through a perverted perception springing from unwise reflection .
By this, weak conceiving through craving, conceit, and views is shown.
If so, , why is perception mentioned?
Because it is evident.
Just as, when a fire is smouldering and smoke is seen, although the fire still exists, we say “ there is smoke “ rather than “ there is fire,” because the smoke is more evident;
in an analogous way, although conceiving is already exercising its function , this function is not distinct. The function of perception alone is distinct, for perception is more evident. But this perception accords with the conceiving and works in conjunction with the latter; therefore he says: “he perceives through a perversion of perception.”
And when it is said that he perceives it thinking “ it is earth,” it means that, without releasing a segment of earth from among these four kinds, he perceives what is in its true nature devoid of self, etc. as endowed with a self, etc. , like one perceiving a lump on the head as a piece of gold.
Papañcasaṅkhā =portions of papanca .
Because of these, beings are detained in samsara, i.e., delayed, thus these are “proliferating tendencies. “ “Conceiving” : because of these, people conceive, i.e., misconstrue , things as “This is mine,” etc. Craving, conceit, and views are referred to here by two synonymous terms, “conceivings “and” proliferating tendencies.”
“He apprehends it … contrary ” : like the conceiving of views, the conceivings of craving and conceit also apprehend things contrary to reality-craving assuming the repulsive to be beautiful, conceit the inferior to be superior, etc.
The “earth-sign” is the counterpart sign of the earth-kasiṇa.
The commentary shows the three conceivings in relation to one’s own continuum and the continua of others in a condensed interpretation.1
“ I am earth “: by this he shows the conceiving of views and the conceiving of conceit with an internal object, for this phrase implies adherence to a view of self or I-making .
“Earth is mine “-this signifies the conceiving of craving and the conceiving of conceit; the latter is a possible interpretation because through conceit one considers oneself superior on account of some segment of earth which has come into one’s possession.
Conceiving may be analyzed in relation to the other two phrases in the same way.
One who obtains jhana through the earth-kasiṇa may adhere to the object perceived in his meditation-vision as a self; or he may take that object as a sign of his superiority. Thus he conceives “ I am earth” . Apprehending this kasiṇa object as “my self,” he conceives “ earth is mine.”
On the other hand, if he adheres to this object doctrinally as another person or as a god, he conceives “ another is earth “; and if he adheres to it as the self of another, he conceives” earth belongs to another.”
Since “in earth” is a locative expression, the statement means that he construes the basis for conceiving as a receptacle for his self, for the self of another, and for the accessories of both.
Query: Isn’t it true that composite earth is a receptable-support for the succession of dhammas, both those connected and unconnected with the faculties? And the others-characteristic-earth, the earth-kasina sign, and the earth deities-object-supports for the mental factors which take them as their objects? So there is nothing wrong here .
Reply: No, because he misconstrues the basis of conceiving as a support.
For through the conceivings of views and conceit he takes earth as the support for “ I,” i.e. for a self, the reference of these conceivings. Thus he conceives “ I am in earth.” And through the conceiving of craving, he takes earth as the support for the self’s accessories, the reference of this conceiving. Thus he conceives “ There is an obstruction, an impediment, for me in earth.”
When he says “in material form,” he includes the part by mentioning the whole .1
Since the whole can never be found without its parts, by mentioning the whole the part is also included.
“ The other types of conceiving are also recognized “: when one regards another as superior, etc. on account of his success, power, etc., taking his self to exist with earth as dependence- support -this is the conceiving of conceit. And when one resolves one’s mind upon these objects -this is the conceiving of craving.
“ To originate or to emanate from earth”: origination from earth can be interpreted by way of the doctrine of the primordial egg : “ Then there existed an egg made of gold. Brahma himself originated in that.” 1 Or it can be understood by way of the doctrine of atomism , which holds that the molecule originates from the coupling of atoms. Emanation from earth can be interpreted by way of theism with its doctrine of the creative play of God , which maintains that all this world emerged from God.
“He conceives the self to be other than the earth”: he takes the self to be water, etc. In the first alternative the ablative has the characteristic of agency ; in the second it has the characteristic of contrast .
Just as, when affection and conceit are aroused for a base conceived by views, the conceiving3 of craving and conceit arise, so we can understand that when one ranks oneself as superior, etc., on account of a base conceived by craving, or misconstrues that base as the property of a self and the self as its permanent master, then the conceivings of conceit and views arise.
“ That element of Dhamma” the supreme enlightenment.
This is called an element because it bears , bears up , all knowable dhammas according to their specific nature; or because it bears up the entire succession of dhammas of the beings to be trained, preventing them from falling into the suffering of the planes of misery and the suffering of samsara; and because it occurs in an unperverted mode.
The supreme enlightenment is the path- knowledge , founded upon his knowledge of omniscience, and his knowledge of omniscience founded upon his path-knowledge.
“ Conceiving “ is the misconstruing of the object which occurs by way of desiring, self-promotion, and misapprehension .1
“Delighting,” on the other hand, is that through which cleaving occurs. This is the difference between conceiving and delighting .
Therein, the “ full understanding of the known “ is the wisdom of full understanding by which one fully understands, delimits , the plane of insight .
For this understands the dhammas of the three planes, delimiting them as internal and external and defining their characteristics, functions, etc.; thereby it makes it known, understood, evident, that “ this is the plane of insight.”
Here it should be understood in terms of the earth element.
The “ full understanding of scrutinization” understands the five clinging-aggregates in their true nature as impermanent, , by delimiting them through insight-comprehension and scrutinizing their modes of impermanence, etc. together with their accompaniments.
The “supreme path” is the path of arahatship,
Either is the full understanding of abandoning, which in the abstract sense is the wisdom which abandons by eradicating them .
Thus characteristic-earth is included by mentioning “ hard, solid,” etc.
Since the worldling, when he perceives any of these four kinds of earth, perceives it only as a portion of earth, and not as a portion of water, etc., it is said: “he perceives as a segment of earth.”
in this way the commentator shows that the perception of characteristic-earth also occurs through the medium of the conventional expression.
Just as applied thought and the other jhana factors, despite their distinct specific natures, are nevertheless all jhana factors in so far as they share the common nature of closely contemplating the object, in the same way, craving, conceit, and views-despite their distinct specific natures as yearning , self-inflation , and misapprehension , respectively-are all forms of conceiving in so far as they occur in the common mode of misconstruing the object .
The misconstruing is the adherence to the object as “I “ and “mine.”
or it is the supramundane path .
for this abandons desire and lust without remainder;
By showing the conceiving of personality-view, the conceivings of craving and conceit based on materiality are also shown.
For these take the form of the affection and conceit he arouses for the base he conceives through the conceiving of views.
Or else the conceiving of craving based on materiality is shown by the statements that he conceives the elements as “ mine “ and delights in them, with the conceiving of conceit following it in conformity.
“ When he regards the self as in visible form “: taking the immaterial dhammas such as feeling, etc. to be the self, or all dhammas apart from the visible form base, imagining the visible form base internally or externally as its container , he conceives: “This self of mine is in this visible form base”. Thus he conceives” in the seen.”
“ A section on the attainer “: on the occasion of a jhana pertaining to the fine-material sphere or the immaterial sphere .
Since the jhana occurs in a single mode on a single object, it is called” unity.” The occurrence of the resultant jhana may also be included in the section on the attainer.
“ A section on the non-attainer “: on the occasion of the occurrence of sense sphere dhammas.
For even in access concentration , the mind has not completely attained to unity.
“ Relishing all “: when there is no perception of the danger in all dhammas pertaining to the three planes, due to the absence of disenchantment they are contemplated as satisfaction and craving increases.
For this has been said by the Exalted One: “ For one who dwells contemplating satisfaction in dhammas subject to the fetters, craving increases “ .
“ Conceiving all as created by himself”: through conceit he conceives himself to be the creator, and ranks himself as superior, etc. by conceiving all to be created by him; for such a conceit only arises when he conceives himself to be the creator.
The “etc.” after “all does not exist” indicates that fatalism , etc. should be included.
“ My self is great “: by this he shows the doctrine which regards all as the manifestation of the self .
“The rest should be understood by the method given in the section on earth “: the conceiving which occurs thus: “ I am in all; an obstacle, an impediment, for me is in all; another is in all; an obstacle, an impediment, for another is in all.”
He conceives himself apart “ from all “ when he holds the view that “All this world is made of spirit” , and conceives the origination or emanation of the self to proceed from the all consisting in spirit. The affection and conceit he arouses for the base conceived by the conceiving of views are his conceivings of craving and conceit, respectively.
Conceiving “All is my self, or my creator, or my master,” he conceives “all is mine.” Delighting in it with craving and views,” he delights in all.” Thus the occurrence of the conceivings should be understood here.
Those who hold the doctrine of supreme nibbana here and now conceive the five aggregates which have attained to the ultimate happiness to be nibbana; but in reality, they remain only personality .
The five kinds are the happiness of sense pleasures mentioned in the commentary, and the happiness of the four fine-material sphere jhanas.
“ With distinguished knowledge “: without falling short of the true nature of dhammas and without overshooting the mark, as confused comprehension and wrong understanding do, he knows it with distinguished knowledge which directly confronts the true nature of dhammas without falling away from it. The meaning is: with the full understanding through scrutinization based on the full understanding of the known, and with one section of the full understanding of abandoning.1
Mā maññi: ma= he conceives by way of the unabandoned forms of conceiving; amaññī = he does not conceive by way of the abandoned forms of conceiving. Combined, the two yield mā maññi.
The learner cannot be described as “ one who conceives “ like the worldling who has not abandoned any of the conceivings, nor as “ one who does not conceive “ like the arahat who has abandoned them all.
For him part of the conceivings are abandoned, part unabandoned.
And though the conceivings that are unabandoned have been greatly diminished by him, he still should not conceive through those, much less through the others, due to the absence of a more distinct conceiving.
Since it is possible for him to fully understand that which should be fully understood, conceivings do not arise for him in the way they do for the worldling, who is destitute .
This absence of conceiving is for the purpose of fully understanding the base; it is not an absence of conceiving achieved through the full understanding of the base, as is the case with the arahat.
Or else mā maññī is a command prohibiting an optional action, like “Do not injure, do not hurt,” etc. The meaning is: he should not conceive .
Thus I heard: The Mahāsuññatā Sutta. 
Of Kāḷakhemaka : He was called “Black” because of the colour of his skin; but his name was Khemaka.
Dwelling: a dwelling made in that same Nigrodha’s park, in one part, by erecting a surrounding wall, building a gate house, constructing dwellings like those called haṃsa-vaṭṭaka? , such as a meeting hall, a refectory, and so forth.
Many resting places: bed, chair, mattress, pillow, straw mat, leather mat, spread grass, spread leaves, spread straw and so forth were prepared. They were placed bed touching bed … spread straw touching spread straw, so that it resembled the dwelling place of bhikkhus who have formed themselves into a society.
Do many: The Blessed One has no doubts, because of the complete destruction of all his defilements during the Session of Enlightenment. The question is a rhetorical one, and the word “do” is merely rhetorical.
No one who is uncertain gets to the acme of attainment.
Before this, it seems, the Blessed One had not seen ten or twelve bhikkhus living in one place.
Then it occurred to him: “This social life is developed to the utmost in the round of becoming. As water collects into rivers, so social life is developed by beings in hell, in the animal world, in the realm of ghosts, and in the Asura group; and also in the human world, the divine world, and the Brahma world.
For hell is ten- thousand leagues across and is crammed with beings like a tube packed with bath powder. There is no counting or reckoning the beings in the place of torture by the fivefold binding see MN 129 and 130; likewise in the places of paring with adzes and so forth see MN 129 and 130. Such is the way they roast in society.
As to the animal world there is no counting or reckoning the termites in a single termite hill; and likewise ants in each ants’ nest.
Such is social life in the animal world too.
And there are ghost cities a quarter or half a league across crowded with ghosts.
Such is social life in the ghost realm, too.
The ten-thousand league sphere of Asura demons is like an earring or hole when the needle is put into the ear ? .
Such is social life in the Asura Group too.
As regards the human world, there were 5,700,000 in the large clans living at Sāvatthī, and inside and outside Rājagaha 1,800,000 people 18 koṭis.
Such is social life in certain places of the human world too.
Beginning with the earth deities, there is social life in the divine world and the Brahma world also.
Each deity has two and a half koṭis of dancers, even up to nine koṭis. Also there are ten thousand Brahmas living in one place.”
Thereupon he thought: “For four incalculable ages and a hundred thousand aeons the Perfections have been fulfilled by me for the purpose of undoing living in societies. And as soon as these bhikkhus have formed themselves into a society and get to delight in society, they will act contrary to that.”
Then feeling concern for the Dhamma, he thought again: “If it were possible to announce a training precept that two bhikkhus should not live in one place I would do so; but that is not possible.
So I shall expound the discourse called The Great Way of Voidness which, for training clansmen, will be like an announced training precept, like a full-length looking glass placed at the city gate.
After that, just as Khattiyas nobles and so on, seeing their blemishes in that looking glass get rid of them and become unblemished, so indeed, even for 5,000 years after I have attained complete extinction, clansmen delighting in solitude will make an end of the suffering due to the round of becoming by harkening to this discourse and avoiding society.”
And the number of clansmen who, by harkening to this discourse and avoiding society have, as though fulfilling the Blessed One’s wish, made an end of suffering and attained complete extinction is past reckoning.
For in the Vālikapiṭṭhi Monastery in Ceylon the Abhidhamma scholar called the Elder Abhaya, after reciting this discourse together with a number of bhikkhus on the occasion of taking up residence for the rainy season, exclaimed: “The Fully Enlightened One enjoins us to act thus; and what are we doing?”
And by avoiding society and delighting in solitude all of them attained arahatship within that same rainy season.
This discourse is called the “breaker-up of societies.”
Of Ghatā: of the one so named.
At the dwelling: This dwelling too, was built like Kāḷakhemaka’s dwelling, in a part of Nigrodha’s park.
Making robes: the repairing of those already made by patching, washing, and so forth, old and dirty ones; and it is also the making up of unmade ones by arranging and sewing cloth provided for the purpose of robes. Both are right, but here making up of unmade ones is intended,
for people had given the Elder Ānanda material for robes,
And those bhikkhus, sitting from the time announced for the needle work in the morning, get up from it some time unannounced,
“It is our time for robe making.” The Elder, it seems, thought: “Surely it is those resting places that have not been arranged by those bhikkhus that will have been seen by the Blessed One;
consequently the Master is displeased and desires to give a severe reproof. I will be a, support for those bhikkhus.” That is why he spoke as he did.
But the intention here is this: “Venerable Sir, these bhikkhus are living in this way not just because they delight in being busy, but on account of robe-making.”
A bhikkhu, Ānanda, does not shine forth: “Ānanda, whether it is an instance of being busy or whether it is an instance of robe-making or not, still a bhikkhu who delights in company does not shine forth.
Do not be a support where there is no occasion for support.”
Here, company is gathering with one’s own community;
So whether he delights in company or in society, in either case a bhikkhu who likes the fullness of society, who is bound by the ties of society, does not shine forth.
But it is when a bhikkhu sweeps out his daytime quarters after his meal and, after washing his feet well, takes up his basic meditation subject and devotes himself to delight in solitude, he shines forth in the Enlightened One’s Dispensation.
The bliss of renunciation: the bliss in him who has renounced sense-desires.
The bliss of seclusion is the bliss of seclusion from sense-desires too.
But what leads to the pacification of greed and so forth is the bliss of peace,
Obtain … at will: one who obtains his desire, who obtains his wish without trouble;
Temporary: free from defilement on any occasion of full absorption.
Delectable: agreeable.
Mind deliverance: the mind deliverance of the fine-material and immaterial worlds.
For it is said: “The four absorptions jhāna and the four immaterial attainments, these are the temporary liberation.”
Permanent: not deliverance from defilements occasionally but rather deliverance which is perpetual and supramundane.
For it is said: “The four noble paths and the four fruitions of recluseship, these are the permanent liberation.”
Unshakeable: not to be shaken by defilements.
So far what has been said?
A bhikkhu who delights in company, who is bound by the ties of society, will be unable to produce either mundane or supramundane special qualities. But by avoiding society and delighting in solitude he can do so.
For just as in the case of the Bodhisatta Vipassi, as long as he wandered during seven years surrounded by eighty-four thousand homeless ones, he was unable to produce the special quality of omniscience; but by avoiding society and delighting in solitude he climbed to the summit of enlightenment and produced the special quality of omniscience in seven days.
Also as long as our Bodhisatta wandered with the Group of Five during six years he was unable to produce the special quality of omniscience; but when they left him, by delighting in solitude he climbed the summit of enlightenment and produced the special quality of omniscience.
Having thus pointed out the lack of attainment of special qualities of one who delights in company, he said: I do not see, Ānanda, etc., in order to point out how this flaw arises.
Here, one material form is a physical body.
In him who delights … therein: in him who delights through greed for that material form;
will not cause … to arise: that would not cause these things to arise in him who delights in that material form: “I do not see any such material form.” And then they arise, too, as they did in Sañjaya owing to the changed state of Sāriputta and Moggallāna, called their coming to the discipleship of Him of the Ten Powers see Vinaya Mahā Vagga; as they did in Nātha-puta owing to the changed state of the householder UPali see MN 71; and as they did in the rich man in the “Piyajātika Sutta” see MN 87.
But this … Ānanda, What is the sequence of meaning?
For the purpose of removing the occasion in which any unintelligent bhikkhu newly gone forth should say: “The Fully Enlightened One leads us away from society like cattle sent into a field, and he exhorts us to solitude, but he himself lives surrounded by kings, kings’ ministers, and so on,” he began this part of the teaching in order to show that the Perfect One is alone even when sitting in the midst of a community extending over a world sphere.
His mind tends to seclusion: tends to Nibbāna.
It has put an end to, is without remainder of, unsupported by, dissociated from, states which give rise to cankers.
Associated with dismissal: associated with such words as “You may go.”
But at what periods did the Blessed One speak thus?
Either during the period of activity following the meal, or during the period of activity in the first watch of the night.
For after the meal the Blessed One adopts the lion’s pose in the Perfumed Cell and then he rises and sits absorbed in fruition attainment.
At that time the community gathers for the purpose of hearing the Dhamma.
Then the Blessed One, who knows the time, comes forth from the Perfumed Cell and goes to the Enlightened One’s exalted seat and he teaches the Dhamma. Then, not exceeding the time, like one judging the cooking of a medicinal oil, he dismisses the community with his mind inclining to seclusion.
Also in the first watch of the night, he dismisses the community thus: “The night is well advanced; now it is time to do as you think fit.”
For since reaching enlightenment even the Buddhas’ twofold five-door- consciousness incline to Nibbāna.
Therefore, Ānanda: because dwelling in voidness is peaceful and sublime, therefore.
Internally: only internally as to the range of object .
Possessed of full awareness: fully aware through successfully knowing the meditation subject.
Externally: in regard to another’s five aggregates.
Internally and externally: at one time internally, at another time externally.
The imperturbable āneñjā: this is a term for the four immaterial attainments of the sphere of boundless space, and so forth: he brings to mind the imperturbable immaterial attainment resolving: “I will become one who is Both Ways Released ubhato- bhāga-vimatto, that is, one who has attained both all eight meditative attainments and arahatship”
For when one who has emerged from a basic jhāna which is still unfamiliar, and brings to mind voidness internally, his mind does not enter into voidness.
Thereupon, thinking: “How about another’s continuity of aggregates?” he brings it to mind externally. There also it does not enter into it.
Thereupon thinking: “How about at one time in my own continuity and another time in another’s continuity?” he brings to mind internally and externally. There also it does not enter into it.
Thereupon, desiring to become one who is Both Ways Released, thinking: “How about the immaterial attainment?” he brings to mind the imperturbable. There also it does not enter into voidness.
Now in that case he should not give up his effort and go following after supporters and so on, but the same basic jhāna should be thoroughly brought to mind again and again.
Thus he said “In that same” and so on, in order to point out that it is like a tree cutter’s axe that does not have its effect; but by resharpening the edge the axe may cut. Similarly, his repeatedly bringing to mind the basic jhāna will have its effect in regard to the meditation subject.
Now in order to point out that when one has practised this, his bringing to mind succeeds in respect to whatever he brings to mind, he enters into.
Thus he is possessed of full awareness therein: so, when the meditation subject succeeds while he is walking, he is possessed of full awareness through knowing that his meditation subject has succeeded.
Lies down: stretches himself out.
Thus he is possessed of full awareness: thus he is one who practises full awareness through knowing “I shall not indulge.”
In the second paragraph he is one who practises full awareness through knowing, “In such talk I shall indulge.” This bhikkhu’s serenity and insight are fresh , and for the purpose of guarding them the seven kinds of suitable things are needed:
“Abode, resort, and speech, and person, The food,
This is said for the purpose of pointing these out.
As regards the two paragraphs dealing with thoughts, full awareness should be understood as knowing respectively the not thinking and the thinking of the thoughts.
Having thus stated two of the paths by the abandoning of wrong thoughts, he now said: There are, Ānanda, these five cords of sense-desire, and so on, speaking of the insight for the third path.
Concerned with any source of defilement: concerned with any reason whatever among these five cords of sense- desire for the arising of defilements.
Attachment: unabandoned defilement which appears as attachment.
Then: it being present.
Possessed of full awareness: possessed of full awareness through knowing the insuccess of the meditation subject.
In the second paragraph,
For when he reviews thus: “Is desire and greed in regard to these five cords of sense-desire abandoned in me or not?” and knows that it is not abandoned, this bhikkhu exerts energy and abolishes it by means of the path of Non-Return. Thereupon, when he reviews after emerging from the fruition which follows next upon the path, he knows that it is abandoned. He is possessed of full awareness through knowing that, is what is meant.
Now speaking of the Arahat path, he said, There are, Ānanda, the five aggregates as objects of clinging, and so on.
Is abandoned means that the conceit “I am,” the desire, the inherent tendency to assert “I am” based on materiality, is abandoned;
likewise that based on feeling and so on. Full awareness should be understood as previously stated.
These, Ānanda, are states is said with reference to the states of serenity samatha and insight vipassana and path and fruition set forth above.
Of … profitable origin: come from what is profitable.
For profitable states can be both profitable and derived from the profitable, that is to say, the first jhāna is profitable, the second jhāna is both profitable and derived from the profitable; the sphere of nothingness is profitable and the sphere of neither- perception-nor-non-perception is both profitable and derived from the profitable; the sphere of neither- perception-nor-non-perception is profitable and the path of Stream-entry is both profitable and derived from the profitable; the path of Non-Return is profitable and the path of Arahatship is both profitable and derived from the profitable.
Likewise the first jhāna is profitable and states associated therewith are both profitable and derived from the profitable; the path of Arahatship is profitable and the states associated therewith are both profitable and derived from the profitable.
Noble: free from defilements and purified.
Supramundane: beyond the world and purified.
Inaccessible to the Evil One: inaccessible to Māra, the Evil One.
For Māra does not see the mind of a bhikkhu who sits absorbed in the eight attainments when they are made the basis of insight. Nor is he able to know the consciousness that occurs in dependence on that as object.
That is why “inaccessible” is said.
What do you think. Why did he say this?
He said it in order to point out that there is one advantage in society.
In seeking the Master’s company: in going to, in frequenting.
Now because there are some who dwell alone and who are not successful in getting at the meaning of the scriptures, he therefore said Yet when this is so, ananda and so on, pointing out the disadvantage in solitude with reference to that.
Here, Yet when this is so, Ānanda means when this solitary state exists.
The teacher is a teacher who is a sectarian outside the Dispensation.
By the teacher’s undoing: the undoing of the teacher is by the undoing due to defilements that have arisen inside him.
So with the other kinds of undoing.
He has been struck down: they that is, the unsuitable things have killed him;
But why is it said that the undoing of the dweller in the life of purity has a more painful result, a more bitter result, and it even leads to rebirth in states of woe?
Going into homelessness outside the Dispensation brings small gain; there is no outstandingly great or special quality to be developed there, but only the eight meditative attainments and the five supernormal powers beginning with the miraculous powers.
Accordingly, just as there is no great suffering for one who falls from the back of a donkey , so, since in a sect outside the Dispensation he falls only from worldly special qualities lokiya-guṇa, it is not said in this way of the first two kinds of undoing.
But going into homelessness in the Dispensation brings great gain. Here the outstandingly special qualities are the four paths, the four fruitions, and nibbāna.
Accordingly, just as when a noble youth, wellborn on both parental sides, traversing a city and seated in the place of honour on the back of an elephant, falls from the elephant’s back, he comes to great suffering; so, since in falling away from the Dispensation he falls away from the expectation of the aforesaid nine supramundane special qualities lokuttara-guṇa,
Therefore: the construing should be done both with the preceding meaning and with the following meaning thus: because the undoing of the dweller in the life of purity leads to greater suffering than the other two kinds, because the practice of hostility towards the Blessed One, see the Discourse  for long leads to harm and suffering, but the practice of amity towards the Blessed One leads to welfare.
In amity: by the practice of amity.
In hostility: by the practice of hostility.
Erring, do they turn aside from the Master’s teaching: one who transgresses on purpose even by as much as an offence of wrongdoing dukkata or wrong speech dubbhāsita is called one who “errs, turns aside.”
It is one who does not so transgress that is called one who “does not err, does not turn aside.”
which is why he was doing work on robes there with a number of bhikkhus.
thinking: “When the sewing is finished we shall set our resting places in order.” They had not set them in order, as
society is gathering with different sorts of people.
what leads to the enlightenment due to the path is the bliss of enlightenment.
one who obtains without pain;
one who obtains in abundance.
Any sign: any sign mark of visible objects and so forth of materiality, and so forth.
Internally: internally as regards place of occurrence.
Voidness: fruition attainment through Voidness.
Voidness internally: in himself internally; the meaning is: produced in regard to his own five aggregates.
In that same sign of concentration as before is said with reference to jhāna treated as the basis for insight.
Dwelling in this way: in this way consisting of serenity concentration and insight samatha-vipassanā.
Here, after walking for any given length of time, now knowing, “I am able to walk for so long” he should stand, without breaking the sequence of postures;
and so in each section.
the climate, and posture, Select and cultivate of each The kind that is most suitable.”
possessed of full awareness means possessed of full awareness through knowing the success of the meditation subject.
the death of his special qualities and virtues is stated by this.
it is said in this way of the undoing of the dweller in the life of purity.
I Shall not, Ānanda, treat you as: I shall not behave towards you like. Raw: unbaked.
Damp clay: a raw, not quite dry pot.
For a potter takes the raw, not quite dry, clay pot gently with both hands lest it should break.
Accordingly, I shall not behave towards you as the potter behaves towards the damp clay.
Repeatedly admonishing: after advising once I shall not be silent; I shall advise and instruct by repeatedly admonishing.
Repeatedly testing: by repeatedly testing for flaws.
Just as the potter tests for those that are cracked, split or faulty among the baked pots and puts them aside, and he takes only those that are well-baked after he has tapped them again and again, so I too shall advise and instruct by repeatedly testing.
The rest is clear throughout.
He who is sound will stand the test: he among you thus advised by me, who is sound, through having reached the path and its fruition, will stand the test
Furthermore the worldly special qualities as well are here intended by “sound.”
A disciple, Ānanda, is not: Here, though one who is well-taught who has studied much has been compared by the Blessed One to a soldier possessed of the five weapons in the passage “The well-taught noble disciple, bhikkhus, abandons the unprofitable and develops the profitable, he abandons the reproachable and develops the irreproachable; and so he safeguards himself.” A IV 109
Therefore one who explains the ten examples of talk in this sutta should do so pausing here for that purpose.
So in this sutta, the ten examples of talk that is, talk of wanting little, of contentment, and so forth are given in three places:
he therefore said “a disciple, Ānanda, is not,” and so on, pointing out that he is not justified in seeking his company with that aim alone in view.
but he who does so has them,
Nevertheless, since he, who does not, after learning the scriptures, practise in conformity with them, lacks those weapons,
Now, in order to point out with what aim in view the Master’s company should be sought, he said But such talk as is and so on.
in such talk I shall indulge Paragraph 22 they are given by way of the suitable and the unsuitable; in the passage for the sake of expositions of discourses and stanzas Paragraph 33 they are given as scriptures learned by ear; and in this place Paragraph 33 they are given directly, as something to be fulfilled.
Talk of kings is talk about kings proceeding like this: “Mahāsammata, Mandhātu, Dhammāsoka had so much power” and so on.
So too in the case of robbers, and so on.
As regards these, such talk as “such and such a king is handsome, good looking” and so forth, is both worldly talk and “animal talk” that is, pointless.
But if it proceeds “So and so who was so powerful came to destruction” it keeps within the meditation subject.
And as regards robbers, talk about Mūladeva or Meghamāla being so powerful and about their deeds thus: “Ah, what heroes! ” is worldly talk and “animal talk.”
And as regards battles, it is “animal talk” when it is instigated by satisfaction of sense-desires thus: “In the Bhārata battle, and so forth, so and so was killed thus, was wounded thus”;
Moreover it is wrong to talk about food and so forth according to satisfaction of sense-desires thus: “We chewed, we ate, we drank, we used what looked like this, smelt like this, tasted like this, was like this to touch.” But it is right to talk of it meaningfully thus: “Formerly we gave food, drink, clothing, beds, garlands and perfumes that looked like this and so forth to the virtuous; we made such an offering at the shrine.”
As regards relatives and so on, it is wrong to say, according to satisfaction of sense-desires, “our relatives are brave, capable” or “formerly we went about in vehicles like this.” But it should be said meaningfully thus: “even those relatives of ours have passed away” or “formerly we gave sandals like this to the Order.”
Villages: it is wrong to talk of villages as good or bad to live in, or easy or hard to get alms in, or according to satisfaction of sense-desires thus: “The inhabitants of such and such a village are brave, capable”. But it is right to talk meaningfully thus: “They have faith, they have confidence” or “They have come to destruction and have passed away.”
So too in the case of towns, cities and countries.
Talk of women is wrong when instigated by satisfaction of sense- desires and is about appearance, figure, and so forth; it is right only if it proceeds thus: “they have faith, confidence” or “they have come to destruction.”
Talk of heroes is wrong if it is in accordance with satisfaction of sense-desires thus: “the soldier called Nandamitta was a hero”; it is right only if it proceeds thus: “He had faith” or “He has come to destruction.”
Talk of street inhabitants is wrong if it accords with satisfaction of sense-desires thus: “The people of such and such a street are easy to live with, brave, capable”; it is right only if it proceeds thus: “They have faith” or “They have come to destruction.”
Talk of wells is said of talk of places for getting water, or it is talk of women water-carriers.
It is wrong when concerned with satisfaction of sense-desires thus: “She is pretty, she is clever at dancing and singing”; it is right only if it begins, “She has faith, has confidence.”
Talk of the dead is talk of past relatives;
Talk of trivialities is meaningless talk of different kinds that is not included in those already dealt with and still to be dealt with.
Talk of the origin of the world is talk of the Lokāyatas, sophists vitanḍa and chatter of the kind beginning, “This world was created by whom? It was created by so and so.” “A crow is white because its bones are white.” “A crane is red because its blood is red.”
Talk of the origin of the sea is meaningless talk of the sea’s origin of the kind beginning thus: “Why is it called sea samudda? Because it was excavated by the god Sagara. Because he marked it with the seal muddö of his hand saying, ’The ocean sögara has been excavated by me, it is called sea samudda.’
Whether things are or are not is talk asserting that for some meaningless reason or other there is consequently existence; there is consequently non-existence.
And here “existence” is eternity and “non-existence” is annihilation;
So with this talk on whether things are or are not, “animal talk” is of thirty- two kinds.
but when it proceeds, “even they came to destruction,” then talk in each case conforms to a meditation subject.
the definition here is the same as that for present relatives.
“existence” is increase, “non-existence” is diminution;
“existence” sense-pleasure, “non- existence” is self mortification.
one birth, two births, three, four, five, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, a hundred, a thousand, a hundred thousand lives, many aeons of contrac­tion, of expansion, of contraction and expansion: “Then I was called so-and-so, this was my clan, my caste, I ate this, had these happy and unhappy experiences, lived for so long. And when I passed away from there I was reborn in such- and-such other circumstances. Passing away from there, I was reborn here.”
yet whatever exis­tence889 they have previously experienced, whether in the World of Form or in the Formless World, whether conscious, unconscious or neither-conscious-nor-unconscious,
they re­member the details of those past lives.
and there is the kind that is free of the corruptions and not bound up with attachment, which is called “Ariyan”.
being one, he becomes many — being many, he becomes one; he appears and disappears; he passes through fences, walls and moun­tains unhindered as if through air;
he sinks into the ground and emerges from it as if it were water;
he walks on the water without breaking the surface as if on land;
he flies cross­legged through the sky like a bird with wings;
he even touches and strokes with his hand the sun and moon, mighty and powerful as they are;
and he travels in the body as far as the Brahma world.
and if he wishes: “Let me abide with the non-disgusting feeling disgust”, he can so abide,
also feeling either disgust or non-disgust in the presence of both…
or: “Ignoring both the disgusting and the non-disgusting may I abide in equanimity, mindful and clearly aware”, he can so abide.
The Exalted One is called “the Tathāgata” for eight reasons:
 because he has “thus come” ; because he has “thus gone” ; because he has come to the real characteristic ; because he has awakened to real dhammas in accordance with actuality ; because he is a seer of the real ; because he is a speaker of the real ; because he practices what he teaches ; and in the sense of vanquishing or surpassing .
 Why is the Exalted One called the Tathāgata because he has “thus come”?
Because he has come in the same way that the previous perfectly enlightened Buddhas came, engaged in exertion for the welfare of the whole world, came—that is, as the Exalted Vipassī, Sikhī, Vessabhū, Kakusandha, Koṇāgamana, and Kassapa .253
What is meant?
Our Exalted One has come through the very same aspiration that these Exalted Ones came through.
Or just as the Exalted Vipassī … the Exalted Kassapa came after they had fulfilled the full thirty pāramīs—i.e., the ten basic, ten intermediate, and ten ultimate pāramīs of giving, virtue, renunciation, wisdom, energy, patience, truthfulness, determination, loving kindness, and equanimity; made the five great relinquishings—i.e., the relinquishing of limbs, eyes, wealth, kingdom, and children and wife; fulfilled the preliminary effort, the preliminary conduct, the preaching of the Dhamma, conduct for the good of relatives, etc.; and reached the summit in conduct developing intelligence—exactly thus has our Exalted One come .
Or else, just as the Exalted Vipassī … Kassapa came by developing and cultivating the four foundations of mindfulness, the four right endeavors, the four bases of spiritual success, the five faculties, the five powers, the seven factors of enlightenment, and the Noble Eightfold Path—exactly thus has our Exalted One come.
Hence he is the Tathāgata because he has “thus come.”
As Vipassī in the world, and the other
Thus he, the all-seeing, is called “Tathāgata.”
Why is he called the Tathāgata because he has “thus gone”?
Because as soon as he was born, he went in the same way that the Exalted Vipassī… Kassapa went as soon as they were born.
And how did the Exalted One go?
As soon as he was born he stood with his feet planted evenly on the ground, and then, facing north, went forward with a stride of seven steps.
As it is said: “As soon as the bodhisattva was born, Ānanda, he stood with his feet planted evenly on the ground; then, while a white parasol was held over him, facing north, he went forward with a stride of seven steps. Having surveyed all the directions, he then uttered the roar of the Leader of the Herd: ‘I am the foremost in the world. I am pre-eminent in the world. I am supreme in the world. This is my last birth. There is now no renewal of existence.’” 
not unreal , for it foretokened his numerous achievements of spiritual distinction, as follows.
When, as soon as he was born, he stood with his feet planted evenly on the ground,
When he walked facing north , that was the foretoken of his supremacy in all the world .256
When he stood surveying all the directions after completing the seventh step, that foretokened his obtaining the unobstructed knowledge of omniscience.
And his uttering the roar of the Leader of the Herd was the foretoken of his setting in motion the supreme, irreversible Wheel of the Dhamma.
Just as the previous Exalted Ones went thus, exactly thus did the present Exalted One go . And his way of going was real, not unreal, for it foretokened the above achievements of spiritual distinction.
Hence the ancients have said:
The very moment the master bull was born,
Gotama took a stride of seven steps.
And like a lion poised on a mountain top.
Hence he is the Tathāgata because he has “thus gone.”
Or alternatively, as the Exalted Vipassī … Kassapa went, exactly thus did the present Exalted One go. That is, abandoning sensual desire by renunciation, ill will by benevolence, sloth-and-torpor by the perception of light, restlessness-and-remorse by non-distraction, and perplexity by the defining of dhammas; shattering ignorance with knowledge, dispelling discontent with joy; knocking away the panel of the hindrances with the first jhāna, making applied and sustained thought subside with the second jhāna, making rapture fade away with the third jhāna, and abandoning pleasure and pain with the fourth jhāna; surmounting perceptions of material forms, impingement, and diversity with the attainment of the base of infinite space, the perception of the base of infinite space with the attainment of the base of infinite consciousness, the perception of the base of infinite consciousness with the attainment of the base of nothingness, and the perception of the base of nothingness with the attainment of the base of neither perception nor non-perception.257
In that very same way the Sakyan sage came.
great sages of the past Came to the state of omniscience
His way of going was real ,
that was the foretoken of his obtaining the four bases of spiritual success .
His stride of seven steps foretokened his obtaining the gems of the seven factors of enlightenment;
the golden- staffed chowries that appeared, his defeat of all the sectarian teachers;
the white parasol, his obtaining the stainless white parasol of the supreme deliverance of arahatship.
He stood upon the earth with even feet.
Beneath the parasol the Maruts held.
When he finished taking seven steps,
He surveyed all directions with his gaze,
Uttered his roar complete in factors eight
Then he went abandoning the perception of permanence with the contemplation of impermanence, the perception of pleasure with the contemplation of suffering, the perception of self with the contemplation of non-self, delight with the contemplation of disenchantment, lust with the contemplation of fading away, origination with the contemplation of cessation, grasping with the contemplation of relinquishment, the perception of compactness with the contemplation of destruction, accumulation with the contemplation of fall, the perception of stability with the contemplation of change, the sign with the contemplation of the signless, wish with the contemplation of the wishless, adherence with the contemplation of emptiness, adherence due to grasping at substance with the higher wisdom of insight into dhammas, adherence due to confusion with the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, the adherence due to reliance with the contemplation of danger, non-reflection with the contemplation of reflection, and adherence due to bondage with the contemplation of the round’s end.258 Then he went demolishing the defilements co-existing with wrong view with the path of stream-entry, abandoning the gross defilements with the path of the once-returner, extirpating the defilements accompanied by subtle with the path of the non-returner, and eradicating all defilements with the path of arahatship.259
Thus he is the Tathāgata because he has “thus gone.”
 Why is he called the Tathāgata because he has come to the real characteristics ? : The earth element has the characteristic of hardness—that is real, not unreal ;
the water element, of flowing;
: Material form has the characteristic of deformation;
: The faculty of faith has the characteristic of resolution;
: The power of faith has the characteristic of not wavering because of faithlessness;
: The enlightenment factor of mindfulness has the characteristic of awareness;
: right view has the characteristic of seeing;
: ignorance has the characteristic of unknowing;
The elements have the characteristics of emptiness;
The truths have the characteristic of reality;
The purification of virtue has the characteristic of restraint;
attention, of being the originator;
emancipation, of being the essence; and nibbāna, the plunge into the deathless, of being the consummation. All these characteristics are real, not unreal.
Through the movement of his faculty of knowledge he has come to the real characteristic ; he has reached it without falling away from it, fully arrived at it—therefore he is the Tathāgata.
Thus he is the Tathāgata because he has come to the real characteristic.
the fire element, of heat;
the wind element, of distending;
the space element, of intangibility;
the consciousness element, of cognizing.
feeling, of being felt;
perception, of perceiving;
the mental formations, of forming;
consciousness, of cognizing.
: Applied thought has the characteristic of application of mind;
sustained thought, of continued pressure; rapture, of pervading;
happiness, of gratification;
one-pointedness of mind, of non-distraction;
contact, of touching.261
the faculty of energy, of exertion;
the faculty of mindfulness, of awareness;
the faculty of concentration, of non- distraction;
the faculty of wisdom, of understanding.
the power of energy, of not wavering because of laziness; the power of mindfulness, of not wavering because of forgetfulness;
the power of concentration, of not wavering because of restlessness; the power of wisdom, of not wavering because of ignorance.
the factor of investigation of dhammas, of investigating;
the factor of energy, of exertion;
the factor of rapture, of pervading;
the factor of tranquillity, of subsiding;
the factor of concentration, of non-distraction;
the factor of equanimity, of detached observation.
right intention, of application of mind;
right speech, of embracing;
right action, of originating;
right livelihood, of cleansing;
right effort, of exertion;
right mindfulness, of awareness;
right concentration, of non-distraction.
kamma-formations, of volition;
consciousness, of cognizing;
mentality, of inclining,
and materiality, of deformation;
the six sense bases, of actuating;
contact, of touching;
feeling, of being felt;
craving, of causing;
clinging, of holding;
existence, of accumulating;
birth, of production;
aging, of decaying,
and death, of passing away.
the sense bases, of actuating;
the foundations of mindfulness, of awareness;
the right endeavors, of endeavoring;
the bases of spiritual success, of succeeding;
the faculties, of predominance;
the powers, of unwavering;
the enlightenment factors, of emancipating;
the path, of being a cause.
serenity, of non- distraction;
insight, of contemplation;
serenity and insight, of having a single flavor;
the pairs of complementary opposites,262 of not exceeding one another.
purification of mind, of non-distraction;
purification of view, of seeing.
The knowledge of destruction has the characteristic of eradication;
the knowledge of non-arising has the characteristic of tranquillity.263
Desire has the characteristics of being the root;
contact, of collecting together;
feeling, of convergence;
concentration, of eminence;
mindfulness, of predominance;
wisdom, of supremacy;
 Why is he called the Tathāgata because he awakened to real dhammas in accordance with actuality?
It is the Four Noble Truths that are called “real dhammas.”
As it is said: “These Four Noble Truths, bhikkhus, are real, not unreal, not otherwise .
What four?
‘This is suffering,’ bhikkhus—this is real, not unreal, not otherwise,” and so on, in detail.
The Exalted One awakened to those truths. Therefore, because he awakened to real dhammas, he is called the Tathāgata;
for here the word “gone” has the meaning “awakened” .
Further, the fact that aging and death originate and commence with birth as condition is real, not unreal, not otherwise. : The fact that the kamma-formations originate and commence with ignorance as condition is real, not unreal, not otherwise. The fact that ignorance is the condition for the kamma-formations, the kamma- formations for consciousness … birth for aging and death, is real, not unreal, not otherwise.
All that the Exalted One awakened to. Because he awakened to real dhammas, he is called the Tathāgata.
Hence he is the Tathāgata because he awakened to real dhammas in accordance with actuality.
Why is he called the Tathāgata because he is a seer of the real?
In this world together with its gods, etc., in this generation with its rulers and its men, whatever visible-form object there is that enters the threshold of the eye-door of the innumerable beings throughout the innumerable world systems—that the Exalted One knows and sees in all its modes.
And knowing and seeing it thus, … as desirable or undesirable, etc., and as found under the applicable term among the seen, heard, sensed, and cognized, according to the method given thus:
“What is the material form that is the visible-form base?
The material form derivative upon the four primary elements that is of colored appearance, visible, impinging, blue, yellow,” etc. . …he has analyzed it under numerous names, in thirteen sections, and by fifty-two methods… This is real, not unreal.
The same method applies to sounds entering the threshold of the ear-door .
For the Exalted One has said: “In this world, bhikkhus, together with its gods, etc., in this generation with its rulers and its men, whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, reached, sought after, or examined by the mind—that I know,
that I have directly known. That the Tathāgata has understood. But the Tathāgata does not take a stand upon it” .
Hence he is the Tathāgata because he is a seer of the real.
Here the term “Tathāgata” should be understood to mean a seer of the real.
Why is he called the Tathāgata because he is a speaker of the real?
In the forty-five year interval between the night when the Exalted One, sitting in the invincible posture on the terrace of enlightenment, crushed the heads of the three Māras266 and awakened to the supreme perfect enlightenment, and the night when he attained parinibbāna in the nibbāna-element without residue while lying between the twin Sāl trees, whatever the Exalted One spoke, whether in the first, middle, or final periods following the enlightenment—the discourses, mixed prose and verse, expositions, stanzas, joyous exclamations, sayings, birth stories, wonders, and miscellanies267—all this is irreproachable in meaning and in phrasing, free from excess and deficiency, perfect in all its modes, crushing the vanity of lust, hatred, and delusion.
There is not even as much as a hair’s tip in this that is defective. It all appears as though it had been stamped with a single seal, measured with a single ruler, or weighed upon a single pair of scales. It is all real, not unreal, not otherwise.
As it is said: “Between the night when the Tathāgata awakens to the supreme perfect enlightenment and the night when he attains parinibbāna in the nibbāna-element without residue, whatever he speaks, utters, or expounds—all that is real, not otherwise.
Therefore he is called the Tathāgata” .
For here the word gata has the meaning of enunciation .
Hence he is the Tathāgata because he is a speaker of the real.
Further, the word āgada or āgadana means “pronouncement”; that is, a statement .
His pronouncement is real and undistorted. Thus, changing the letter d to a t; the derivation of the word “Tathāgata” may be understood in this sense.
Why is he called the Tathāgata because he practices what he teaches?
The bodily action of the Exalted One conforms to his speech, and his speech conforms to his bodily action; therefore he is one who practices what he teaches and teaches what he practices.
Since he is of such a nature, his bodily action has “gone thus” , proceeding in accordance with his speech,
As it is said: “As the Tathāgata says, so he does;
Therefore he is called the Tathāgata” .
Hence he is the Tathāgata because he practices what he teaches.
and his speech has “gone thus,” proceeding in accordance with his bodily action; thus he is the Tathāgata.
as he does, so he says.
 Why is he called the Tathāgata in the sense of vanquishing or surpassing ?
From the pinnacle of existence268 downwards, and from the Avīci hell upwards, throughout the innumerable world systems, the Tathāgata surpasses all beings in regard to virtue, concentration, wisdom, emancipation, and knowledge-and-vision of emancipation. There is none his equal or measure. He is unequalled, immeasurable, incomparable—the king of kings, the god of gods, the Sakka above all Sakkas, the Brahmā above all Brahmās.
Thus it is said: “In this world, bhikkhus, together with its gods, etc., in this generation with its rulers and its men, the Tathāgata is the vanquisher, the unvanquished, the universal seer, the wielder of power. Therefore he is called the Tathāgata.”
Here the word-derivation should be understood as follows:
What kind?
His elegance of teaching and his accumulation of merit.
For by means of these, he vanquishes all the rival teachers as well as this world together with its gods in the same way that a powerful physician vanquishes snakes with a divine medicine.
Thus his medicine for vanquishing all the world is his real, undistorted elegance of teaching and his accumulations of merit.
Changing the letter d to a t, the derivation of the word “Tathāgata” may be understood thus: he is the Tathāgata in the sense of vanquishing.
Furthermore,269 he is the Tathāgata because he has “gone through reality” and because he has “really gone” .
Here “gone” has the meanings of undergone , gone beyond , attained , and practiced .
Thus he is the Tathāgata because he has gone through—i.e., undergone—reality by fully understanding the entire world270 through the scrutinization .
He is the Tathāgata because he has gone through—i.e., gone beyond—reality by fully understanding the world through the abandonment of its origin.
He is the Tathāgata because he has gone through—i.e., attained—reality by realizing the cessation of the world.
And he is the Tathāgata because he has really gone along—i.e., practiced—the way leading to the cessation of the world.
Thus the Exalted One has said:
“The world, bhikkhus, has been awakened to by the Tathāgata; the Tathāgata is detached from the world.
The cessation of the world has been awakened to by the Tathāgata; the Tathāgata has realized the cessation of the world.
The way leading to the cessation of the world has been awakened to by the Tathāgata; the Tathāgata has developed the way leading to the cessation of the world.
Whatever there is in this world together with its gods, etc., all that has been awakened to by the Tathāgata.
Therefore he is called the Tathāgata” .
The meaning of the word “Tathāgata” should be understood as given.
But this is the mere introduction to the explanation of the nature of a Tathāgata.
Agada is, as it were, a kind of medicine.
The origin of the world has been awakened to by the Tathāgata; the Tathāgata has abandoned the origin of the world.
For only a Tathāgata himself can explain the nature of a Tathāgata in its completeness.
Though the five great relinquishings belong to the perfection of giving, they are mentioned separately in order to show that they are distinct forms of relinquishing, that they are extremely difficult to practice, and that they are distinct requisites for enlightenment. For the same reasons, the relinquishing of the eyes is mentioned separately from the relinquishing of the limbs. And though they all involve possessions, the relinquishing of children and wife is mentioned separately from the relinquishing of wealth and kingdom.
The “preliminary effort” is the achievement of the meditative attainments and the direct knowledges, together with the preliminary portion of practice for these consisting in the duties of advancing and retreating .
The “preliminary conduct” is the achievement of extraordinary practice in giving, etc., included in the Cariyāpiṭaka.
But some say the preliminary effort is the aspiration, and the preliminary conduct either the practice of giving, etc., or solitary wandering by way of bodily seclusion.
The “preaching of the Dhamma” is talk that establishes and matures beings in the three types of enlightenment by explaining to them the practice of giving, etc., fewness of wishes, etc., the unsatisfactoriness of saṃsāra and the benefit of nibbāna.
“Conduct developing intelligence” is the widening of knowledge by means of the knowledge of the ownership of action , the study of blameless occupations and blameless fields of knowledge, the study of the aggregates, bases, etc., and the scrutinization of the three characteristics. In denotation it is the same as the perfection of wisdom but is mentioned separately in order to show the requisite of knowledge.254
By mentioning the foundations of mindfulness , he shows the way of arrival that has been brought to its climax, for those states can be understood as the constituents of the supramundane paths and fruits. Or the foundations of mindfulness, etc., can be considered only as the accompaniments of insight by taking them as the preliminary portion of practice.255
And here it should be understood that by mentioning the aspiration he shows the beginning of the way of arrival, by mentioning the pāramīs he shows the middle, and by mentioning the four foundations of mindfulness, etc., he shows the consummation.
In the first case, the participle “gone” in the word Tathāgata is explained in the sense of bodily movement. In the second case it is explained in the sense of the movement of knowledge.
Here he first shows the Exalted One’s state of Tathāgatahood distinguished by its movement of knowledge by way of the preliminary practice for the first jhāna, stated as the abandoning of the five hindrances, sensual desire and the rest; next by the eight meditative attainments together with their means; and then by the eighteen principal insights.
Since the perception of impermanence and the rest come to perfection for one established in the full understanding of the known, which drives away the delusion obstructing the discernment of mentality-materiality and the overcoming of doubt, the “shattering of ignorance” is the means for insight. So too, since the jhānas, etc., are easily achieved when discontent is dispelled by joy based on delight in the attainments, the dispelling of discontent is the means for the meditative attainments.
The “contemplation of impermanence” is a name for the insight apprehending the impermanence of the dhammas pertaining to the three planes.
The “perception of permanence” is the wrong perception of conditioned dhammas as permanent or eternal. Under the heading of perception, views and cognition should also be included.
The same method applies to the cases that follow.
The “contemplation of disenchantment” is the contemplation that occurs in the mode of becoming disenchanted with formations.
“Delight” is craving accompanied by rapture.
The “contemplation of fading away” is contemplation that occurs in the mode of fading away.
“Contemplation of cessation” is either the contemplation of the cessation of formations,
or the contemplation that “formations cease only, and do not arise again by way of a future re-origination”;
thus it is said, “by the contemplation of cessation he makes cease and does not originate them.”
This is powerful desire for liberation.
The “contemplation of relinquishment” is contemplation that occurs in the mode of relinquishing;
this is the establishing of reflection.
“Grasping” is the apprehension as permanent, etc.
The “perception of compactness” is the apprehension of identity because of continuity, aggregation, function, or object.
“Accumulation” is the forming .
“Change” is the attainment of distinct stages.
The “perception of stability” is the apprehension of lastingness.
The “sign” is the apprehension of formations as graspable entities, due to the compactness of their aggregation, etc., and to the delimitation of their individual functions.
“Wish” is the wishing of lust, etc.; in denotation it is the inclination towards formations because of craving.
“Adherence” is the settled view of a self.
“Higher wisdom of insight into dhammas” is the scrutinization of all dhammas as impermanent, suffering, etc.
“Adherence due to grasping at substance” is the inversion of apprehending a substance in the insubstantial.
“Adherence due to confusion” is the adherence the world originated through the creative play of God, etc.
“Adherence due to reliance” is the apprehension of formations as a shelter and a haven; the reliance is craving.
The “contemplation of reflection” is the knowledge that “formations of such and such a kind are being relinquished.”
The “ending of the round” is nibbāna, the departure from the round. The “contemplation of the ending of the round” is “change-of-lineage” , the contemplation which occurs taking nibbāna as its object.260
The “adherence due to bondage” is the adherence to formations due to being bound.
“Under numerous names”: the visible form object is described as desirable, undesirable, neutral, inferior, past, future, present, internal, external, seen, cognized, visible form, visible-form base, visible-form element, a colored appearance, visible, impingent, blue, yellow, etc.
“In thirteen sections”: this is said in reference to the thirteen expository sections which have come down in the chapter on material form .
“By fifty-two methods”: this is said in reference to the four methods of defining contained in each of the thirteen sections.265
“This is real”: because of the undistortedness of his vision and the incontrovertible character of his teaching.
The analytical derivation of the word “Tathāgata” should be understood thus: he goes to —i.e., he sees and knows— these dhammas beginning with the visible-form object, in the very way they exist in their specific nature and mode.
is this the mere introduction
Why?
Because the word “Tathāgata,” like the word “diligence”,271 contains the entire practice of the Dhamma as well as all the qualities of a Buddha.
We now undertake a detailed explanation of the pāramīs for clansmen following the suttas who are zealously engaged in the practice of the vehicle to great enlightenment , in order to improve their skillfulness in accumulating the requisites for enlightenment.188
 In what sense are they called pāramīs?
 How many are there?
 What is their sequence?
 What are their characteristics, functions, manifestations, and proximate causes?
 What is their condition?
 What is their defilement?
 What is their cleansing?
 What are their opposites?
 How are they to be practiced?
 How are they analyzed?
 How are they synthesized?
 By what means are they accomplished?
 How much time is required to accomplish them?
 What benefits do they bring?
 What is their fruit?
The answers follow: What are the pāramīs?
The pāramīs are the noble qualities such as giving, etc., accompanied by compassion and skillful means, and untainted by craving, conceit, and views.189
The bodhisattvas, the great beings, are supreme , since they are the highest of beings by reason of their distinguished qualities such as giving, virtue, etc. The pāramīs—the activities of giving, etc.—are their character or their conduct.
Or else: he excels, thus he is supreme . the bodhisattva is the fulfiller and guardian of the noble qualities such as giving, etc.; that which belongs to the supreme—the character or conduct of the one who is supreme —is a pāramī, i.e., the activities of giving, etc.190
In brief there are ten.
These have come down in the texts in their specific character.
As it is said:
And again it is said: “How many dhammas are there, venerable sir, culminating in Buddhahood?”
“There are, Sāriputta, ten dhammas culminating in Buddhahood.
What are the ten?
Giving, Sāriputta, is a dhamma culminating in Buddhahood. Virtue, renunciation, wisdom, energy, patience, truthfulness, determination, loving kindness, and equanimity are dhammas culminating in Buddhahood.”191
Thus spoke the Exalted One. Having spoken thus, the Well-Farer, the Teacher, further said:
Giving, virtue, then renunciation, Wisdom and energy come to five;
This is said by way of their synthesis,
 What is their sequence?
Here “sequence” means sequence of teaching. This sequence is rooted in the order in which the pāramīs are initially undertaken, which in turn is rooted in the order in which they are investigated.193 The quality that is investigated and undertaken at the beginning is taught first.
Therein, giving is stated first, for giving assists virtue and is easy to practice.
Giving accompanied by virtue is abundantly fruitful and beneficial, so virtue is stated immediately after giving.
Virtue accompanied by renunciation … renunciation by wisdom … wisdom by energy … energy by patience … patience by truthfulness … truthfulness by determination … determination by loving kindness … and loving kindness accompanied by equanimity is abundantly fruitful and beneficial; thus equanimity is stated immediately after loving kindness.
Equanimity is accompanied by compassion and compassion by equanimity.
 “How can the bodhisattvas, the great compassionate ones, look upon living beings with equanimity?”
Some teachers say: “Sometimes they show equanimity towards living beings when it is necessary to do so.”
But others say: “They do not show equanimity towards living beings but towards the offensive actions performed by beings.”
Another method may be given: Giving is stated at the beginning: because it is common to all beings, since even ordinary people practice giving; because it is the least fruitful; and because it is the easiest to practice.
Virtue is stated immediately after giving: because virtue purifies both the donor and the recipient; to show that, while giving benefits others, virtue prevents the affliction of others; in order to state a factor of abstinence immediately after a factor of positive activity; and in order to show the cause for the achievement of a favorable state of future existence right after the cause for the achievement of wealth.194
Energy is stated immediately after wisdom: because the function of wisdom is perfected by the arousing of energy; to show the miraculous work the bodhisattva undertakes for the welfare of beings after he has reached reflective acquiescence in their emptiness; to state the causal basis for exertion right after the basis for equanimity; and to state the arousing of energy right after the activity of careful consideration, according to the statement: “The activity of those who have carefully considered brings excellent results.”
 to show that the bodhisattva must patiently endure the suffering created by others even when he is working to the utmost for their welfare. … Patience is mentioned immediately after energy.
Truthfulness is stated immediately after patience: because the determination to practice patience continues long through truthfulness; having first mentioned the patient endurance of wrongs inflicted by others, to mention next fidelity to one’s word to render them help; in order to show that a bodhisattva who through patience does not vacillate in the face of abuse, through truthful speech does not relinquish ; and to show the truthfulness of the knowledge developed through reflective acquiescence in the emptiness of beings.
and to show, right after the veracity of knowledge, the complete accumulation of the requisites of enlightenment ; for one who knows things as they really are determines upon the requisites of enlightenment and brings them to completion by refusing to vacillate in the face of their opposites.197 … - Determination is stated immediately after truthfulness.
Equanimity is mentioned immediately after loving kindness: because equanimity purifies loving kindness; in order to show the indifference one must maintain towards the wrongs inflicted by others when one is providing for their welfare; having mentioned the development of loving kindness, to state next the development of the quality which evolves from it; and to show the bodhisattva’s wonderful virtue of remaining impartial even towards those who wish him well. Thus the sequence of the pāramīs should be understood as explained.
This is the schedule of the questions: What are the pāramīs?
 In what sense are they called “pāramīs”?
 How many are there?
Reflecting then I saw: the first pāramī is giving,
The great way followed by the sages of the past.
Patience, truth, resolution, love, With equanimity, these are ten.192
But some say there are six.
which we will explain below .
Renunciation is mentioned immediately after virtue: because renunciation perfects the achievement of virtue; in order to list good conduct of mind immediately after good conduct of body and speech; because meditation succeeds easily for one who has purified virtue; in order to show that the purification of one’s end through the abandoning of the offensive mental defilements follows the purification of one’s means by the abandoning of offensive actions; and to state the abandoning of mental obsessions immediately after the abandoning of bodily and verbal transgressions.195
Wisdom is mentioned immediately after renunciation: because renunciation is perfected and purified by wisdom; to show that there is no wisdom in the absence of meditation, since concentration is the proximate cause of wisdom and wisdom the manifestation of concentration;
 in order to list the causal basis for equanimity immediately after the causal basis for serenity; and to show that skillful means in working for the welfare of others springs from meditation directed to their welfare.
… because patience is perfected by energy, as it said: “The energetic person, by arousing energy, overcomes the suffering imposed by beings and formations”;
 because patience is an adornment of energy, as it is said: “The patience of the energetic person shines with splendor”;
 in order to state the causal basis for serenity immediately after the basis for exertion, for restlessness due to excessive activity is abandoned through reflective acquiescence in the Dhamma ;196
 in order to show the perseverance of an energetic person, since one who is patient and free from restlessness perseveres in his work;
 in order to show the absence of craving for rewards in a bodhisattva diligently engaged in activity for the welfare of others, for there is no craving when he reflects on the Dhamma in accordance with actuality; and
and because the undertaking proceeds imperturbably only when determination is unshakable. … Loving kindness is mentioned immediately after determination.
 having first shown non-deception in speech, to show next unshakable commitment to one’s word, for a bodhisattva devoted to truth proceeds to fulfill his vows of giving, etc., without wavering;
… because truthfulness is perfected by determination, since abstinence becomes perfect in one whose determination is unshakable;
… because loving kindness perfects the determination to undertake activity for the welfare of others; in order to list the work of actually providing for the welfare of others right after stating the determination to do so, for “one determined upon the requisites of enlightenment abides in loving kindness”;
 What are their characteristics, functions, manifestations, and proximate causes? Firstly, all the pāramīs, without exception, have as their characteristic the benefitting of others; as their function, the rendering of help to others, or not vacillating; as their manifestation, the wish for the welfare of others, or Buddhahood; and as their proximate cause, great compassion, or compassion and skillful means.
Taken separately, the perfection of giving is the volition of relinquishing oneself and one’s belongings, accompanied by compassion and skillful means. The perfection of virtue is good conduct of body and speech, accompanied by compassion and skillful means; in denotation, it is the abstinence from what should not be done, the volition to do what should be done, etc.
The perfection of renunciation is the act of consciousness that occurs renouncing sense pleasures and existence preceded by the perception of their inherent unsatisfactoriness, and accompanied by compassion and skillful means. The perfection of wisdom is the comprehension of the general and particular characteristics of dhammas, accompanied by compassion and skillful means.
The perfection of energy is bodily and mental work for the welfare of others, accompanied by compassion and skillful means. The perfection of patience is the endurance of harm imposed by beings and formations, or the act of consciousness occurring in such a mode, predominated by non-aversion and accompanied by compassion and skillful means. The perfection of truthfulness is non-deceptiveness in speech, analyzed into an abstinence, a volition, etc., accompanied by compassion and skillful means. The perfection of determination is the unshakable determination to undertake , accompanied by compassion and skillful means; or it is the act of consciousness occurring in such a mode. The perfection of loving kindness is the wish to provide for the welfare and happiness of the world, accompanied by compassion and skillful means; in denotation, it is benevolence. The perfection of equanimity is the attitude of impartiality towards desirable and undesirable beings and formations, dispelling attraction and repulsion, accompanied by compassion and skillful means.
 Giving has the characteristic of relinquishing; its function is to dispel greed for things that can be given away; its manifestation is non-attachment, or the achievement of prosperity and a favorable state of existence; an object that can he relinquished is its proximate cause.
Virtue has the characteristic of composing ; coordinating and establishing are also mentioned as its characteristic.
Its function is to dispel moral depravity, or its function is blameless conduct; its manifestation is moral purity; shame and moral dread are its proximate cause.
Renunciation has the characteristic of departing from sense pleasures and existence; its function is to verify their inherent unsatisfactoriness; its manifestation is the withdrawal from them; a sense of spiritual urgency is its proximate cause.
Wisdom has the characteristic of penetrating the real specific nature , or the characteristic of sure penetration, like the penetration of an arrow shot by a skillful archer; its function is to illuminate the objective field, like a lamp; its manifestation is non- confusion, like a guide in a forest; concentration, or the four truths, is its proximate cause.
Energy has the characteristic of striving; its function is to fortify; its manifestation is indefatigability; an occasion for the arousing of energy, or a sense of spiritual urgency, is its proximate cause.
Patience has the characteristic of acceptance; its function is to endure the desirable and undesirable; its manifestation is tolerance or non-opposition; seeing things as they really are is its proximate cause.
Truthfulness has the characteristic of non-deceptiveness in speech; its function is to verify in accordance with fact; its manifestation is excellence; honesty is its proximate cause.
Determination has the characteristic of determining upon the requisites of enlightenment; its function is to overcome their opposites; its manifestation is unshakeableness in that task; the requisites of enlightenment are its proximate cause.
Loving kindness has the characteristic of promoting the welfare ; its function is to provide for their welfare, or its function is to remove resentment; its manifestation is kindliness; seeing the agreeable side of beings is its proximate cause.
Equanimity has the characteristic of promoting the aspect of neutrality; its function is to see things impartially; its manifestation is the subsiding of attraction and repulsion; reflection upon the fact that all beings inherit the results of their own kamma is its proximate cause.
And here it should be mentioned that accompaniment by compassion and skillful means is the distinguishing feature of the characteristic of each virtue—e.g., of relinquishing in the case of giving, etc.
For the virtues such as giving, etc., which occur in the mental continuities of bodhisattvas, are always accompanied by compassion and skillful means. It is this which makes them pāramīs.
 What is their condition?
The condition of the pāramīs is, firstly, the great aspiration .
This is the condition for all the pāramīs without exception.
The aspiration for Buddhahood only succeeds when made by one who has attained to the human state of existence, not when made by one existing as a nāga, supaṇṇa, etc.
The male sex : For one who has attained to the human state, the aspiration only succeeds when made by a man, not when made by a woman, eunuch, neuter, or hermaphrodite.
Why?
For the aforesaid reason , and because there is no fulfillment of the required characteristics .
As it is said: “This is impossible, bhikkhus, this cannot come to pass, that a woman might become a Holy One, a perfectly enlightened Buddha” .
The cause : the achievement of the necessary supporting conditions.
Even for a man, the aspiration only succeeds for one endowed with the necessary supporting conditions, that is, one who has achieved the requisite causal foundation, not for anyone else.
The sight of the Master : the personal presence of the Master.
The aspiration only succeeds when made by one aspiring in the presence of a living Buddha. When made after the Exalted One has passed into parinibbāna—before a shrine, at the foot of the Bodhi Tree, in front of an image, or in the presence of paccekabuddhas or the Buddha’s disciples—the aspiration does not succeed.
Why?
Because the recipient lacks the power .
The aspiration only succeeds when made in the presence of the Buddhas, for they alone possess spiritual power adequate to the loftiness of the aspiration.
The going forth : The aspiration succeeds only when made in the presence of the Exalted Buddha by one who has gone forth , either as a bhikkhu or as an ascetic who maintains the doctrine of kamma and the moral efficacy of action; it does not succeed for one living in the household state.
Why?
Because the household state does not correspond with that of a Buddha .
The great bodhisattvas attain the supreme enlightenment only after they have gone forth into homelessness, not while they are still householders. Therefore, at the time of making the resolution, it is only one who has gone forth, endowed with the appropriate qualities and determination, who can succeed.
The achievement of noble qualities : the achievement of such noble qualities as the direct knowledges, etc.
For the aspiration only succeeds when made by one who has gone forth and gained the eight meditative attainments and the five mundane kinds of direct knowledge;199 it does not succeed for one devoid of these qualities.
Why?
Because one devoid of them is incapable of investigating the pāramīs. It is because he possesses the necessary supporting conditions and the direct knowledges that the Great Man, after he has made the aspiration, is able to investigate the pāramīs by himself.
Extreme dedication : extreme devotion.
The aspiration only succeeds for one endowed with the aforesaid qualities who at the time has such strong devotion for the Buddhas that he is prepared to relinquish his very life for them.
Strong desire : wholesome desire, the wish for accomplishment.
One possessed of the aforesaid qualities must have strong desire, yearning, and longing to practice the dhammas culminating in Buddhahood. Only then does his aspiration succeed, not otherwise.
The following similes illustrate the magnitude of the desire required. If he were to hear: “He alone can attain Buddhahood who can cross a whole world system filled with water and reach the farther shore by the bare strength of his arms”—he would not deem that difficult to do, but would be filled with desire for the task and would not shrink away.
If he were to hear: “He alone can attain Buddhahood who can tread across a whole world system filled with flameless, smokeless red-hot coals, cross over, and reach the other side,” etc….
If he were to hear: “Buddhahood can only be attained after being tortured in hell for four incalculables and a 100,000 aeons”—he would not deem that difficult to do, but would be filled with desire for the task and would not shrink away. Such is the magnitude of the desire required.
The aspiration, made by one endowed with these eight factors, is in denotation the act of consciousness occurring together with the collection of these eight factors.
Its characteristic is rightly resolving to attain the supreme enlightenment.
Its function is to yearn, “Oh, may I awaken to the supreme perfect enlightenment, and bring well-being and happiness to all beings! ” It is manifest as the root cause for the requisites of enlightenment. Its proximate cause is great compassion, or the achievement of the necessary supporting conditions.
Since it has as its object the inconceivable plane of the Buddhas and the welfare of the whole immeasurable world of beings, it should be seen as the loftiest, most sublime, and most exalted distinction of merit, endowed with immeasurable potency, the root cause of all the dhammas culminating in Buddhahood.
Simultaneous with its arising, the Great Man enters upon the practice of the vehicle to great enlightenment. He becomes fixed in his destiny, irreversible, and therefore properly gains the designation “bodhisattva.” His mind becomes fully devoted to the supreme enlightenment in its completeness, and his capacity to fulfill the training in the requisites of enlightenment is established.
For when their aspiration succeeds, the Great Men correctly investigate all the pāramīs with their self-evolved knowledge which prefigures their future attainment of omniscience. Then they undertake their practice, and fulfill them in due order,
as was done by the wise Sumedha when he made his great aspiration.
The aspiration has four conditions , four causes , and four powers .
Therein, what are the four conditions?
First, the Great Man sees a Tathāgata performing a miracle, replete with wonders and marvels, through the great spiritual power of a Buddha.
His mind, taking this display as its object and support, becomes fixed upon the great enlightenment, and he thinks: “This Dhamma-element is indeed endowed with tremendous spiritual power, since by penetrating it the Exalted One has acquired such a wonderful and marvelous nature and such inconceivable spiritual power.”
Taking this display of the Buddha’s spiritual power as condition and support, he resolves upon the supreme enlightenment and fixes his mind on this goal.
In the second case he does not see the great spiritual power of the Tathāgata, but he hears: “The Exalted One is of such and such a nature.”
Taking this as condition and support, he resolves upon the supreme enlightenment and fixes his mind on this goal.
In the third, he neither sees the great spiritual power of the Tathāgata, nor hears about it from another, but he hears someone expounding the Tathāgata’s Dhamma with a discourse concerning the spiritual power of a Buddha, such as a discourse on the ten powers of a Tathāgata .
Taking this as condition and support, he resolves upon the supreme enlightenment and fixes his mind on this goal.
In the fourth case, he neither sees the great spiritual power of the Tathāgata, nor hears about it from another, nor hears the Dhamma of the Tathāgata. But he is a man of lofty temperament and a noble disposition, and he thinks: “I will protect the heritage, lineage, tradition, and law of the Buddhas.” To this end he honors, reveres, esteems, worships, and venerates the Dhamma. Taking this as condition and support, he resolves upon the supreme enlightenment and fixes his mind on this goal.
What are the four causes for the great aspiration?
First, the Great Man is naturally endowed with the necessary supporting conditions , having observed his course of duties under former Buddhas.
The Great Man is naturally endowed with a compassionate temperament and disposition. He desires to alleviate the suffering of beings and is even ready to relinquish his own body and life to do so.
Until he reaches his goal, the Great Man is willing to struggle and strive for an extremely long time along a course involving great hardship, without fear and without becoming disenchanted with all the suffering of the round, all for the sake of the welfare of other beings.
The Great Man relies upon good friends, who restrain him from evil and establish him in what is good.
These are the necessary supporting conditions with which the Great Man is endowed: Just as his temperament slants, slopes, and slides without deviation to full enlightenment, so too it inclines to conduct for the welfare of beings;
Because he is endowed with such supporting conditions, the following traits appear in him, creating a sharp distinction between himself and beings bound for the enlightenment of a disciple or the enlightenment of a paccekabuddha , with regard to their faculties , ways of practice , and skillfulness .
First, the Great Man, endowed with the necessary supporting conditions, possesses lucid faculties and lucid knowledge, but not so the others.
Second, the Great Man practices not for his own welfare but for the welfare of others—
And third, he applies skillfulness to his practice through his ingenuity in creating opportunities and his skill in distinguishing what is possible from what is not possible.
Thus the Great Man is naturally inclined to giving and delights in giving. Whenever he has anything that may be given away he gives it away and does not feel any annoyance on account of giving. He is constantly and continually in the habit of sharing. He gives joyfully, full of solicitude, not with an apathetic mind. Even after giving a large gift he does not become complacent, much less after giving a small gift. To generate zeal in others, he speaks in praise of giving; he delivers discourses concerned with giving; he is elated when he sees others practicing giving; and he gives fearlessness to others in fearful situations. These are some of the Great Man’s traits, indicating the perfection of giving, due to his inclination towards giving.
Again, the Great Man feels shame and moral dread over evil deeds such as taking life, etc. He is benevolent towards living beings. He is meek, good-natured, free from craftiness and hypocrisy, upright, easy to admonish and endowed with qualities which make him easy to admonish, gentle, compliant, and humble. He never takes an article belonging to someone else, not even a blade of grass. If he offers to cover another’s expenses himself, he does not break his word. If someone, through forgetfulness or negligence, leaves some article behind, he reminds him and endeavors to prevent it from falling into another’s hands. He is not lustful, does not arouse even an evil thought over women bound to other men, and avoids misconduct with women from afar. He is a speaker of truth, devoted to truth; one who reconciles those who are at variance and promotes friendships; his speech is endearing, preceded by a smile, congenial; he speaks on the good, speaks on the Dhamma. He is free from covetousness, ill will, and inverted views, possessing the knowledge of the ownership of action and the knowledge in conformity with the Four Noble Truths. He is grateful and thankful, venerates his elders, is completely pure in his livelihood, and a lover of the Dhamma. He exhorts others to undertake the Dhamma, restrains beings in every possible way from doing what is improper, and establishes them in the fulfillment of their duties. He himself endeavors to fulfil his own duties, and if he finds that he has done something he should not have done he immediately desists. These are some of the Great Man’s traits, indicating the perfection of virtue, due to his inclination towards virtue.
Again, his defilements and hindrances are feeble. He inclines towards solitude and is generally free from distraction. Evil thoughts do not invade his mind. When he has gone into solitude he can concentrate his mind with little trouble. Thoughts of loving kindness readily flow from him even towards those who are hostile towards him; how much more then towards others? He is mindful, remembering and recollecting what was done and said long ago, and intelligent, being endowed with wisdom nourished by the Dhamma. He is adroit in the fulfilment of his various duties and energetic in working for the welfare of beings. Through the power of his patience he can endure anything. His determination is unshakable, and he stands firm in his undertakings . And he remains equanimous in all situations requiring equanimity. These are some of the Great Man’s traits, indicating the remaining pāramīs, due to his inclination towards the qualities for which they stand.
When it is said of the Great Man, endowed with these traits indicating the requisites of enlightenment, that “reliance upon good friends is a cause for the great aspiration”
—this, in brief, is the characteristic of the good friend. The good friend possesses faith, virtue, learning, renunciation, energy, mindfulness, concentration, and wisdom.
Through his accomplishment in faith he has faith in the enlightenment of the Tathāgata and in kamma and its fruits; thus he does not abandon his wish for the welfare of beings, the root cause for the supreme enlightenment. Through his accomplishment in virtue he is dear and agreeable to beings, revered and esteemed, an exhorter, a censor of evil, a teacher patient in speech. Through his accomplishment in learning he gives profound discourses, leading to the welfare and happiness of beings. Through his accomplishment in renunciation he is of few wishes, content, secluded, and aloof. Through his accomplishment in energy he is energetic in promoting the welfare of beings. Through his accomplishment in mindfulness his mindfulness is established in blameless states. Through his accomplishment in concentration he is undistracted and concentrated in mind. Through his accomplishment in wisdom he understands things in their undistorted nature. Through mindfulness he examines the consequences of wholesome and unwholesome actions; through wisdom he understands as they really are what is beneficial and harmful for beings; through concentration he unifies his mind on that matter; and through energy he restrains beings from what is harmful and enjoins them in what is beneficial.
Hence it is said:
The talks he gives are deep and profound, He does not enjoin one in improper ways.
Relying on a good friend possessed of these qualities, the Great Man brings to perfection his own achievement of the necessary supporting conditions.
Having fully purified his end and means and come into possession of the four powers, it is not long before he acquires the eight factors, makes the great aspiration, and becomes established in the state of a bodhisattva—irreversible, fixed in destination, bound for full enlightenment.
These are his four powers:
The “external power” is the longing or undeviating inclination for the supreme enlightenment, which is grounded upon consideration for others; through this power the Great Man, dominated by a consideration for the world and upheld by a sense of moral dread,200 forms the aspiration, fulfills the pāramīs, and attains the supreme enlightenment.
The “power of the supporting conditions” is the longing or undeviating inclination for the supreme enlightenment based on the achievement of the necessary supporting conditions; through this power the Great Man, endowed with sharp faculties and a lucid constitution and upheld by mindfulness, forms the aspiration, fulfills the pāramīs, and attains the supreme enlightenment.
The “power of effort” is the Great Man’s endowment with the appropriate effort for supreme enlightenment, that is, his thoroughness and perseverance in his work; through this power the Great Man, with purified effort and uninterrupted work, forms the aspiration, fulfills the pāramīs, and attains the supreme enlightenment.
The aspiration originating by means of the four conditions, the four causes, and the four powers, and succeeding when it becomes endowed with the collection of eight factors, is the condition—the root cause—for the pāramīs.
When it arises, four wonderful and marvellous qualities establish themselves in the Great Man: He develops a heart of love for all living beings in every realm of existence, just as if they were his own dear children;
His inclination and efforts turn towards promoting the welfare and happiness of beings.
The potential Buddha-qualities within himself grow more and more prominent and come to maturity.
Since the Great Man possesses the condition for the loftiest flood of merit and goodness, the very nutriment of happiness, he becomes worthy of gifts, the ultimate receptacle for the reverence of beings, an unequalled field of merit for the world.
It is in this way that the great aspiration, with its numerous noble qualities and benefits, functions as the condition for the pāramīs.
Like the aspiration, great compassion and skillful means are also conditions for the pāramīs.
Therein, “skillful means” is the wisdom which transforms giving into requisites of enlightenment. Through their great compassion and skillful means, the Great Men devote themselves to working uninterruptedly for the welfare of others without any concern for their own happiness and without any fear of the extremely difficult course of conduct that great bodhisattvas must follow. And their nature is such that they are able to promote the welfare and happiness of beings even on occasions when they are merely seen, heard of, or recollected, inspires confidence.
Through his wisdom, the bodhisattva perfects within himself the character of a Buddha, and through his compassion, the ability to perform the work of a Buddha. Through wisdom he brings himself across , through compassion he leads others across. Through wisdom he understands the suffering of others, through compassion he strives to alleviate their suffering. Through wisdom he becomes disenchanted with suffering, through compassion he accepts suffering. Through wisdom he aspires for nibbāna, through compassion he remains in the round of existence. Through compassion he enters saṃsāra, through wisdom he does not delight in it. Through wisdom he destroys all attachments, but because his wisdom is accompanied by compassion he never desists from activity that benefits others. Through compassion he shakes with sympathy for all, but because his compassion is accompanied by wisdom his mind is unattached. Through wisdom he is free from “I-making” and “my- making,” through compassion he is free from lethargy and depression. So too, through wisdom and compassion respectively, he becomes his own protector and the protector of others, a sage and a hero, one who does not torment himself and one who does not torment others, one who promotes his own welfare and the welfare of others, fearless and a giver of fearlessness, dominated by consideration for the Dhamma and by consideration for the world, grateful for favors done and forward in doing favors for others, devoid of delusion and devoid of craving, accomplished in knowledge and accomplished in conduct, possessed of the powers and possessed of the grounds of self- confidence. Thus wisdom and compassion, as the means for attaining each of the specific fruits of the pāramitās, is the condition for the pāramīs.
And the same pair is a condition for the resolution as well.
The four factors—zeal, intelligence, stability, and beneficent conduct—are likewise conditions for the pāramīs. Because they serve as the basis for the arising of Buddhahood, these factors are called “grounds for Buddhahood” .
Herein, “zeal” means energy in striving for the requisites of enlightenment.
“Intelligence” is wisdom in applying skillful means to the requisites of enlightenment.
“Stability” is determination, an unshakable determination of the will.
“Beneficent conduct” is the development of loving kindness and compassion.201
For bodhisattvas, seeing the fault in sense pleasures and in household life, incline to renunciation. Seeing the fault in company, they incline to solitude. Seeing the faults in greed, hatred, and delusion, they incline to non-greed, non-hatred, and non-delusion. Seeing the fault in all the realms of existence, bodhisattvas incline to escape.
Therefore these six inclinations of bodhisattvas are conditions for the pāramīs.
For the pāramīs do not arise without seeing the danger in greed, etc., and the superiority of non-greed, etc. The inclination to non-greed, etc., is the slanting of the mind towards relinquishing, etc., because of the superiority of non-greed, etc.202
For bodhisattvas, through their inclination towards giving, see the fault in its opposite, i.e., in stinginess, and therefore fulfill the perfection of giving.
Through their inclination towards virtue, they see the fault in moral depravity, and therefore fulfill the perfection of virtue.
Through their inclination towards renunciation, they see the fault in sense pleasures and in household life; through their inclination towards knowing things as they really are, they see the faults in ignorance and perplexity; through their inclination towards energy, they see the fault in laziness; through their inclination towards patience, they see the fault in impatience; through their inclination towards truthfulness, they see the fault in deceptive speech; through their inclination towards determination, they see the fault in lack of determination; through their inclination towards loving kindness, they see the fault in ill will; and through their inclination towards equanimity, they see the danger in the vicissitudes of the world. Thus they fulfill the perfection of renunciation, and the other perfections down to equanimity.
In this way, the inclination towards giving, and towards the other nine virtues, by bringing about the achievement of all the pāramīs, serve as their condition.
Reviewing the danger in their opposites and the benefits in their practice is another condition for the pāramīs; e.g., in the case of the perfection of giving, the danger in non-relinquishing and the benefit in relinquishing.
This is the method of reviewing: The perfection of giving should be reflected upon thus: “Possessions such as fields, land, bullion, gold, cattle, buffaloes, slaves, children, wives, etc., bring immense harm to those attached to them. Because they stimulate desire they are wanted by many people; they can be confiscated by kings and thieves; they spark off disputes and create enemies; they are basically insubstantial; to acquire and protect them one has to harass others; when they are destroyed, many kinds of calamities, such as sorrow, etc., follow; and because of attachment to these things, the mind becomes obsessed with the stain of stinginess, and as a result one is reborn in the plane of misery.
On the other hand, one act of relinquishing these things is one step to safety. Therefore one should diligently relinquish them.”
Further, when a suppliant asks for something, a bodhisattva should reflect: “He is my intimate friend, for he divulges his own secret to me. He is my teacher, for he teaches me: ‘When you go, you have to abandon all. Going to the world beyond, you cannot even take your own possessions!’ He is a companion helping me to remove my belongings from this world which, like a blazing house, is blazing with the fire of death. In removing this he helps me to get rid of the worry it costs me. He is my best friend, for by enabling me to perform this noble act of giving, he helps me to accomplish the most eminent and difficult of all achievements, the attainment of the plane of the Buddhas.”
He should further reflect: “He honors me with a lofty task; therefore I should acknowledge that honor faithfully.” And: “Since life is bound to end I should give even when not asked, much more when asked.” And: “Those with a lofty temperament search for someone to give to, but he has come to me on his own accord because of my merit.” And: “Bestowing a gift upon a suppliant will be beneficial to me as well as to him.” And: “Just as I would benefit myself, so should I benefit all the world.” And: “If there were no suppliants, how would I fulfill the perfection of giving?” And: “Everything I acquire should be obtained only to give to others.” And: “When will beggars feel free to take my belongings on their own accord, without asking?” And: “How can I be dear and agreeable to beggars, and how can they be dear and agreeable to me? How can I give, and after giving be elated, exultant, filled with rapture and joy? And how can beggars be so on my account? How can my inclination to giving be lofty? How can I give to beggars even without beings asked, knowing their hearts’ desire?” And: “Since there are goods, and beggars have come, not to give them something would be a great deception on my part.” And: “How can I relinquish my own life and limbs to those who ask for them?”
He should arouse a desire to give things away without concern by reflecting: “Good returns to the one who gives without his concern, just as the boomerang203 returns to the one who threw it without his concern.”
If a dear person asks for something, he should arouse joy by reflecting: “One who is dear is asking me for something.”
If an indifferent person asks for something, he should arouse joy by reflecting: “Surely, if I give him something he will become my friend,
And if a hostile person asks for something he should be especially happy, thinking: “My foe is asking me for something; though he is hostile towards me, by means of this gift he will surely become my dear friend.”
Thus he should give to neutral and hostile people in the same way he gives to dear people, having first aroused loving kindness and compassion.
If, due to their cumulative force, states of greed should arise for things that can be given away, the bodhisattva-aspirant should reflect: “Well now, good man, when you made the aspiration for full enlightenment, did you not surrender this body as well as the merit gained in relinquishing it for the sake of helping all beings? Attachment to external objects is like the bathing of an elephant; therefore you should not be attached to anything.
Suppose there is a great medicine- tree, and someone in need of its roots, takes away its roots; someone in need of its shoots, bark, trunk, limbs, heartwood, branches, foliage, flowers, or fruits, takes away its shoots, bark, trunk, etc. The tree would not be assailed by such thoughts as: ‘They are taking away my belongings.’ In the same way, when I have undertaken to exert myself for the welfare of all the world, I should not arouse even the subtlest wrong thought over this wretched, ungrateful, impure body, which I have entrusted to the service of others.
And besides, what distinction can be made between the internal material elements and the external material elements ? They are both subject to inevitable breaking up, dispersal, and dissolution. This is only confused prattle, the adherence to this body as ‘This is mine, this am I, this is my self.’
I should have no more concern over my own hands, feet, eyes, and flesh, than over external things. Instead I should arouse the thought to surrender them to others: ‘Let those who need them take them away.’
” As he reflects in this way, resolved upon full enlightenment, without concern for his body or life, his bodily, vocal, and mental actions will easily become fully purified.
When his bodily, vocal, and mental actions, along with his livelihood, become purified, he abides in the practice of the true way, and through his skillful means in regard to gain and loss, he is able to benefit all beings to an even greater extent by relinquishing material gifts and by giving the gift of fearlessness and the gift of the true Dhamma. This is the method of reflecting on the perfection of giving.
The perfection of virtue should be reflected upon as follows: “Even the waters of the Ganges cannot wash away the stain of hatred, yet the water of virtue is able to do so. Even yellow sandalwood cannot cool the fever of lust, yet virtue is able to remove it. Virtue is the unique adornment of the good, surpassing the adornments cherished by ordinary people, such as necklaces, diadems, and earrings. It is a sweet-scented fragrance superior to incense as it pervades all directions and is always in place; a supreme magical spell which wins the homage of deities and of powerful khattiyas, etc.; a staircase ascending to the world of the gods, to the heaven of the Four Great Kings,204 etc.; a means for achieving the jhānas and the direct knowledges; a highway leading to the great city of nibbāna; the foundation for the enlightenment of disciples, paccekabuddhas, and perfectly enlightened Buddhas. And as a means for the fulfilment of all one’s wishes and desires, it surpasses the tree of plenty and the wish-fulfilling gem.
And the Exalted One has said: “The heart’s resolution of the virtuous, bhikkhus, succeeds on account of his purity” .
And: “If, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu should wish: ‘May I be dear and agreeable to my companions in the Holy Life, revered and esteemed,’ he should be perfect in fulfilling the rules of conduct” .
And: “Wholesome virtues, Ānanda, lead to freedom from remorse” .
And: “These, householders, are the five benefits of the virtuous man’s endowment with virtue” . Thus the noble qualities of virtue should be reflected upon by way of these suttas,
and the danger in moral depravity by way of such suttas as “The Simile of the Mass of Fire” .
Virtue should be reflected upon as the basis for rapture and joy; as giving immunity from fear of self-reproach, the reproach of others, temporal punishment, and an evil destination after death; as praised by the wise; as the root cause for freedom from remorse; as the basis for security; and as surpassing the achievements of high birth, wealth, sovereignty, long life, beauty, status, kinsmen, and friends.
For great rapture and joy arise in the virtuous man when he reflects on his own accomplishment in virtue: “I have done what is wholesome, I have done what is good, I have built myself a shelter from fear.”
The virtuous man does not blame himself, and other wise men do not blame him, and he does not encounter the dangers of temporal punishment or an evil destination after death.
To the contrary, the wise praise the noble character of the virtuous man,
And virtue is the supreme basis for security, since it is the foundation for diligence, a blessing and a means for achieving great benefits, such as preventing the loss of wealth, etc. Accomplishment in virtue surpasses birth in a good family, since a virtuous man of low birth deserves to be worshipped even by great, powerful khattiyas.
Virtue surpasses material wealth, for it cannot be confiscated by thieves, follows one to the world beyond, produces great fruit, and acts as the foundation for such qualities as serenity, etc.
And because of their virtue, beings attain sovereignty in their respective orders. Virtue is superior even to life, for it is said that a single day in the life of the virtuous is better than a hundred years of life devoid of virtue ; and there being life, the disavowal of the training is called death .
Virtue surpasses the achievement of beauty, for it makes one beautiful even to one’s enemies, and it cannot be vanquished by the adversities of aging and sickness.
As the foundation for distinguished states of happiness, virtue surpasses such distinguished dwellings as palaces, mansions, etc., and such distinguished social positions as that of a king, prince, or general.
Because it promotes one’s highest welfare and follows one to the world beyond, virtue surpasses kinsmen and friends, even those who are close and affectionate.
Again, in accomplishing the difficult task of self-protection, virtue is superior to troops of elephants, horses, chariots, and infantry, as well as to such devices as mantras, spells, and blessings, for it depends on oneself, does not depend on others, and has a great sphere of influence.
Thus it is said: “The Dhamma protects the one who lives by the Dhamma” .
When one reflects in this way upon the numerous noble qualities of virtue, one’s unfulfilled achievement of virtue will become fulfilled, and one’s unpurified virtue will become purified.
If, due to their cumulative force, states antithetical to virtue, such as aversion, should arise from time to time, the aspirant should reflect: “Did you not make the resolution to win full enlightenment? One defective in virtue cannot even succeed in mundane affairs, much less in supramundane matters. You should reach the peak of virtue, for virtue is the foundation for supreme enlightenment, the foremost of all achievements. You should always be well behaved, safeguarding your virtue perfectly, more carefully than a hen safeguarding its eggs.
Further, by teaching the Dhamma you should help beings to enter and reach maturity in the three vehicles.205 But the word of a morally dubious man is no more reliable than the remedy of a doctor who does not consider what is suitable for his patients. How can I be trustworthy, so that I can help beings to enter and reach maturity in the three vehicles? I must be pure in character and in virtue.
How can I acquire the distinguished attainments such as the jhānas, etc., so that I will be capable of helping others and of fulfilling the perfection of wisdom, etc? The distinguished attainments such as the jhānas, etc., are not possible without purification of virtue. Therefore virtue should be made perfectly pure.”
The perfection of renunciation should be reflected upon by first discerning the dangers in household life, according to the text “Household life is constricting, a path for the dust of passions,” etc. ; in sense pleasures, according to the text, “Sense pleasures are like a skeleton,” etc. ; and in sensual desire, according to the text “Suppose a man borrowed a loan and undertook work,” etc. . Then, in the opposite way, one should reflect upon the benefits in going forth,206 according to the text “Going forth is like open space,” etc. .
This is a brief statement. For details one should consult such suttas as “The Great Mass of Suffering” or “The Simile of the Venomous Snakes” .
For the perfection of wisdom, the noble qualities of wisdom should be considered, as follows: “Without wisdom, the virtues such as giving do not become purified and cannot perform their respective functions.
Just as, without life, the bodily organism loses its luster and cannot perform its proper activities, and as without consciousness, the sense faculties cannot exercise their functions in their respective spheres, just so, without wisdom, the faculties such as faith, etc., cannot perform their functions. Wisdom is the chief cause for the practice of the other pāramīs.
By means of wisdom, the act of relinquishing, exercised with skillful means and practiced for the welfare of others, attains the status of a pāramī;
Again, without wisdom, virtue cannot be severed from the defilements of craving, etc., and therefore cannot even reach purification, much less serve as the foundation for the qualities of an omniscient Buddha.
Only the man of wisdom clearly recognizes the dangers in household life, in the strands of sense pleasure, and in saṃsāra, and sees the benefits in going forth, in attaining the jhānas, and in realizing nibbāna; and he alone goes forth into homelessness, develops the jhānic attainments, and directed towards nibbāna, establishes others therein.
“Energy devoid of wisdom does not accomplish the purpose desired since it is wrongly aroused, and it is better not to arouse energy at all than to arouse it in the wrong way.
But when energy is conjoined with wisdom, there is nothing it cannot accomplish, if equipped with the proper means.
Again, only the man of wisdom can patiently tolerate the wrongs of others, not the dull-witted man.
In the man lacking wisdom, the wrongs of others only provoke impatience; but for the wise, they call his patience into play and make it grow even stronger.
The wise man, having understood as they really are three noble truths,207 their causes and opposites, never speaks deceptively to others.
So too, having fortified himself with the power of wisdom, the wise man in his fortitude forms an unshakable determination to undertake all the pāramīs.
Only the man of wisdom is skillful in providing for the welfare of all beings, without discriminating between dear people, neutrals, and enemies.
And only by means of wisdom can he remain indifferent to the vicissitudes of the world, such as gain and loss, without being affected by them.”
In this way one should reflect upon the noble qualities of wisdom, recognizing it to be the cause for the purification of all the pāramīs.
Furthermore, without wisdom there is no achievement of vision, and without the achievement of vision there can be no accomplishment in virtue. One lacking virtue and vision cannot achieve concentration, and without concentration one cannot even secure one’s own welfare, much less the lofty goal of providing for the welfare of others. Therefore a bodhisattva, practicing for the welfare of others, should admonish himself: “Have you made a thorough effort to purify your wisdom?”
For it is by the spiritual power of wisdom that the Great Beings, established in the four foundations, benefit the world with the four bases of beneficence, help beings enter the path to emancipation, and bring their faculties to maturity.208
“Without energy a man cannot even achieve success in worldly works directed to visible ends. But there is nothing the energetic, indefatigable man cannot achieve.
One lacking energy cannot undertake to rescue all beings from the great flood of saṃsāra;
But one bristling with energy can achieve perfection in all he undertakes.” The perfection of energy should be reflected upon thus .
The noble qualities of energy should be further reviewed as follows: “One intent on rescuing himself alone from the mire of saṃsāra cannot fulfil his ideal if he relaxes his energy; how much less one who aspires to rescue the entire world?” And: “Through the power of energy such wrong thoughts as the following are kept away: ‘It is quite right for you to escape from the suffering of saṃsāra by yourself alone; for so long as you are a foolish worldling the host of defilements is as difficult to restrain as a herd of mad elephants, the kamma caused by them is like a murderer with drawn sword, the evil destinations based on these actions stand constantly before you with open doors, and evil friends are always around to enjoin you in those actions and admonish you to practice them.’ ” And: “If even full enlightenment can be achieved by one’s own energy, what can be difficult?”
The perfection of patience should be considered next: “Patience is the unimpeded weapon of the good in the development of noble qualities, for it dispels anger, the opposite of all such qualities, without residue. It is the adornment of those capable of vanquishing the foe; the strength of recluses and brahmins; a stream of water extinguishing the fire of anger; the basis for acquiring a good reputation; a mantra for quelling the poisonous speech of evil people; the supreme source of constancy in those established in restraint. Patience is an ocean on account of its depth; a shore bounding the great ocean of hatred; a panel closing off the door to the plane of misery; a staircase ascending to the worlds of the gods and Brahmās; the ground for the habitation of all noble qualities; the supreme purification of body, speech, and mind.”
Patience should be further strengthened by reflecting: “Those who lack patience are afflicted in this world and apply themselves to actions that will lead to their affliction in the life to come.” And: “Although this suffering arises through the wrong deeds of others, this body of mine is the field for that suffering, and the action which is its seed was sown by me alone.” And: “This suffering will release me from the debt of that kamma.” And: “If there were no wrongdoers, how could I accomplish the perfection of patience?” And: “Although he is a wrongdoer now, in the past he was my benefactor.” And: “A wrongdoer is also a benefactor, for he is the basis for the developing of patience.” And: “All beings are like my own children. Who becomes angry over the misdeeds of his own children?” And: “He wrongs me because of some residue of anger in myself; I should remove this residue.” And: “I am just as much the cause as he is for the wrong on account of which this suffering has arisen.” And: “All those dhammas by which wrong was done, and those to whom it was done—all those, at this very moment, have ceased. With whom, then, should you now be angry, and by whom should anger be aroused? When all dhammas are non-self, who can do wrong to whom?”
If, due to its cumulative force, anger caused by the wrongs of others should continue to overpower the mind, one should reflect: “Patience is the contributive cause for rendering help to others in return for their wrongs.” And: “This wrong, by causing me suffering, is a condition for faith, since suffering is said to be the decisive support for faith, and it is also a condition for the perception of discontent with all the world.” 209 And: “This is the nature of the sense faculties—to encounter desirable and undesirable objects.
How, then, is it possible not to encounter undesirable objects?” And: “Under the control of anger, a person becomes mad and distraught, so why retaliate?” And: “All these beings are watched over by the Buddha as if they were his own dear children. Therefore I should not be angry with them.” And: “When the wrongdoer is endowed with noble qualities, I should not be angry with him. And when he does not have any noble qualities, then I should regard him with compassion.” And: “Because of anger my fame and noble qualities diminish, and to the pleasure of my enemies I become ugly, sleep in discomfort, etc.” And: “Anger is the only real enemy, for it is the agent of all harm and the destroyer of all good.” And: “When one has patience one has no enemies.” And “Because of his wrong, the wrongdoer will meet suffering in the future, but so long as I remain patient I will not.” And: “Enemies are the consequence of my angry thought. When I vanquish anger by patience, my foe, who is the by-product of my anger, will also be vanquished.” And: “I should not relinquish the noble quality of patience because of a little anger. Anger is the antithesis and obstruction to all noble qualities, so if I become angry, how can my virtue, etc., reach fulfilment? And when those qualities are absent, how can I devote myself to helping other beings and attain the ultimate goal in accordance with my vows.” And: “When there is patience, the mind becomes concentrated, free from external distraction. With the mind concentrated, all formations appear to reflection as impermanent and suffering, all dhammas as non-self, nibbāna as unconditioned, deathless, peaceful, and sublime, and the Buddha-qualities as endowed with inconceivable and immeasurable potency.
Then, established in acquiescence in conformity,210 the groundlessness of all ‘I-making’ and ‘mine-making’ becomes evident to reflection thus: ‘Mere dhammas alone exist, devoid of a self or of anything pertaining to a self. They arise and pass away in accordance with their conditions. They do not come from anywhere; they do not go anywhere; they are not established anywhere. There is no agency in anything whatsoever.’ In this way a bodhisattva becomes fixed in his destiny, bound for enlightenment, irreversible.” This is the method of reflecting upon the perfection of patience.
The perfection of truthfulness should be reviewed thus: “Without truthfulness, virtue, etc., is impossible, and there can be no practice in accordance with one’s vows. All evil states converge upon the transgression of truth. One who is not devoted to truth is unreliable and his word cannot be accepted in the future. On the other hand, one devoted to truth secures the foundation of all noble qualities. With truthfulness as the foundation, he is capable of purifying and fulfilling all the requisites of enlightenment. Not deceived about the true nature of dhammas, he performs the functions of all the requisites of enlightenment and completes the practice of the bodhisattva path.”
The perfection of determination should be reviewed thus: “Without firmly undertaking the practice of giving , maintaining an unshakable determination in the encounter with their opposites, and practicing them with constancy and vigor, the bases of enlightenment—i.e., the requisites such as giving, etc.—do not arise.”
The noble qualities of loving kindness should be reflected upon as follows: “One resolved only upon his own welfare cannot achieve success in this world or a happy rebirth in the life to come without some concern for the welfare of others; how, then, can one wishing to establish all beings in the attainment of nibbāna succeed without loving kindness? And if you wish to ultimately lead all beings to the supramundane achievement of nibbāna, you should begin by wishing for their mundane success here and now.” And: “I cannot provide for the welfare and happiness of others merely by wishing for it. Let me put forth effort to accomplish it.” And: “Now I support them by promoting their welfare and happiness; afterwards they will be my companions in sharing the Dhamma.” And: “Without these beings, I could not acquire the requisites of enlightenment. Since they are the cause for the manifestation and perfecting of all the Buddha-qualities, these beings are for me a supreme field of merit, the incomparable basis for planting wholesome roots, the ultimate object of reverence.” Thus one should arouse an especially strong inclination towards promoting the welfare of all beings. And why should loving kindness be developed towards all beings? Because it is the foundation for compassion.
For when one delights in providing for the welfare and happiness of other beings with an unbounded heart, the desire to remove their affliction and suffering becomes powerful and firmly rooted.
And compassion is the first of all the dhammas culminating in Buddhahood—their footing, foundation, root, head, and chief.
The perfection of equanimity should be considered thus: “When there is no equanimity, the offensive actions performed by beings cause oscillation in the mind. And when the mind oscillates, it is impossible to practice the requisites of enlightenment.” And: “Even though the mind has been softened with the moisture of loving kindness, without equanimity one cannot purify the requisites of enlightenment and cannot dedicate one’s requisites of merit along with their results to furthering the welfare of beings.” Moreover, the undertaking, determination, fulfilment, and completion211 of all the requisites of enlightenment succeed through the power of equanimity. For without equanimity, the aspirant cannot relinquish something without making false discriminations over gifts and recipients. Without equanimity, he cannot purify his virtue without always thinking about the obstacles to his life and to his vital needs. Equanimity perfects the power of renunciation, for by its means he overcomes discontent and delight. It perfects the functions of all the requisites to examine them according to their origin. When energy is aroused to excess because it hasn’t been examined with equanimity, it cannot perform its proper function of striving. Forbearance and reflective acquiescence are possible only in one possessed of equanimity. Because of this quality, he does not speak deceptively about beings or formations. By looking upon the vicissitudes of worldly events with an equal mind, his determination to fulfil the practices he has undertaken becomes completely unshakable. And because he is unconcerned over the wrongs done by others, he perfects the abiding in loving kindness. Thus equanimity is indispensable to the practice of all the other pāramīs. Such is the reflection on the perfection of equanimity.
Thus reviewing the danger in their opposites and the benefits in their practice is a condition for the pāramīs.
Another condition for the pāramīs consists in the fifteen dhammas comprising right conduct and the five mundane kinds of direct knowledge, together with their requisites.212
The thirteen ascetic practices214 and the qualities such as fewness of wishes are the requisites for the four states beginning with restraint by virtue.
Among the seven good dhammas, the requisites for faith are: the seven recollections—of the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Saṅgha, of virtue, generosity, the deities, and peace; the avoidance of mean people and association with affectionate people; reflection upon things inspiring confidence; and the disposition towards faith.
The requisites for shame and moral dread are: reflection upon the danger in immoral conduct; reflection upon the danger in the plane of misery; reflection on the fortifying character of wholesome states; the avoidance of people devoid of shame and moral dread and association with people endowed with these qualities; and the disposition towards shame and moral dread.
The requisites for learning are: previous effort; interrogation; application to the true Dhamma; the study of blameless branches of knowledge; maturity of the faculties; remoteness from the defilements; the avoidance of ignorant people and association with learned people; and the disposition towards erudition.
The requisites for energy are: reflection upon the fearfulness in the plane of misery; reflection upon the course to be followed; reflection upon the greatness of the Dhamma; the dispelling of sloth and torpor; the avoidance of lazy people and association with energetic people; reflection upon right endeavor; and the disposition towards energy.
The requisites for mindfulness are: mindfulness and clear comprehension; the avoidance of people with confused mindfulness and association with people with established mindfulness; and the disposition towards mindfulness.
And the requisites for wisdom are: interrogation; the cleansing of the bases ; the harmonization of the faculties;215 the avoidance of dull-witted people and association with wise people; reflection upon the profound course of knowledge; and the inclination towards wisdom.
The requisites for the four jhānas are: the four factors beginning with restraint by virtue; the development of meditation in the preliminary portion with a certain object among the thirty-eight objects of meditation; and the five achievements of mastery.216
But we do not adduce it at length for fear of getting caught up in excessive details.
So too, the “wheels of achievement,” etc., are also conditions for the pāramīs.
This is the aspiration supported by the eight qualifications , which occurs thus: “Crossed I would cross, freed I would free, tamed I would tame, calmed I would calm, comforted I would comfort, attained to nibbāna I would lead to nibbāna, purified I would purify, enlightened I would enlighten!”
The human state :
the human state, the male sex, the cause, the sight of the Master,
the going forth, the achievement of noble qualities, extreme dedication, and strong desire.198
- The eight qualifications through which the aspiration succeeds are .
Because these other states do not correspond with the state of a Buddha .
Why?
If he were to hear: “He alone can attain Buddhahood who can tread across a whole world system that has become a solid mass of sharp pointed sword-stakes, cross over, and reach the other side,” etc….
If he were to hear: “He alone can attain Buddhahood who can cut through a whole world system that has become a jungle of thorny creepers covered by a solid thicket of bamboo, cross over, and reach the other side,” etc….
for in the presence of former Buddhas he has made the resolution for full enlightenment, declaring mentally or verbally: “I too would become a perfectly enlightened Buddha and promote the welfare and happiness of all beings.”
for the welfare and happiness of the many, out of compassion for the world, for the good, welfare, and happiness of gods and men, but not so the others.
He is dear, revered, and esteemed, A teacher patient in speech.
The “internal power” is the longing or undeviating inclination for the supreme enlightenment which is grounded upon personal ideals and in reverence for the Dhamma; through this power the Great Man, dominated by his personal ideals and upheld by a sense of shame, forms the aspiration, fulfills the pāramīs, and attains the supreme enlightenment.
yet his mind does not become defiled by worldly affection for children.
Another set of conditions is the six inclinations—the inclinations towards renunciation, solitude, non-greed, non-hatred, non-delusion, and escape.
So too, for bodhisattvas striving for enlightenment, the inclination towards each of the ten pāramīs is a condition for the practice of each.
since giving to those who ask wins their affection.”
and the virtuous man is not subject to the remorse which arises in the immoral man when he thinks: “I have committed evil, wicked, sinful deeds.”
Because it enables one to achieve supreme sovereignty over one’s own mind, virtue surpasses the sovereignty of khattiyas, etc.
For when their wisdom-eyes open up, the great bodhisattvas give even their own limbs and organs without extolling themselves and disparaging others. Like medicine-trees, they give devoid of discrimination, filled with joy throughout the three times.
but giving for one’s own benefit is like an investment.
Through the power of wisdom, again, they are devoted to the investigation of the aggregates, sense bases, etc., fully comprehend the processes of origination and cessation in accordance with actuality, develop the qualities of giving, etc., to the stages of distinction and penetration, and perfect the training of bodhisattvas. Thus the perfection of wisdom should be reinforced by determining the noble qualities of wisdom with their numerous modes and constituents.
even if his energy is only moderate he will give up in the middle.
Herein, the dhammas comprising right conduct are: restraint by virtue, guarding the doors of the sense faculties, moderation in eating, application to wakefulness, the seven good dhammas,213 and the four jhānas.
The way the factors of right conduct, etc., serve as conditions for the requisites of enlightenment , can be adduced as follows: “He is capable of offering the gift of fearlessness to beings through the purification of his means by virtue, etc.; of offering material gifts through the purification of his end ; and of offering the gift of the Dhamma through the purification of both,” and so on, as is appropriate in each case.
What is their defilement ?
In general, being misapprehended by craving, etc., is the defilement of all the pāramīs.
Taken separately, discriminating thoughts over gifts and recipients are the defilement of the perfection of giving. Discriminating thoughts over beings and times are the defilement of the perfection of virtue. Discriminating thoughts of delight in sense pleasures and existence, and of discontent with their pacification, are the defilement of the perfection of renunciation. Discriminating thoughts of “I” and “mine” are the defilement of the perfection of wisdom; discriminating thoughts leaning to listlessness and restlessness, of the perfection of energy; discriminating thoughts of oneself and others, of the perfection of patience; discriminating thoughts of avowing to have seen what was not seen, etc., of the perfection of truthfulness; discriminating thoughts perceiving flaws in the requisites of enlightenment and virtues in their opposites, of the perfection of determination; discriminating thoughts confusing what is harmful with what is beneficial, of the perfection of loving kindness; and discriminating thoughts over the desirable and undesirable, of the perfection of equanimity. Thus the defilements should be understood.
What is their cleansing ?
Their cleansing is the removal of the taints of craving, etc., and the absence of the aforementioned discriminations.
For the pāramīs become pure and luminous when untainted by such defilements as craving, conceit, views, anger, malice, denigration, domineering, envy, stinginess, craftiness, hypocrisy, obstinacy, presumption, vanity, and negligence, and when devoid of the discriminating thoughts over gifts and recipients, etc.
Further, giving is opposed to greed, hatred, and delusion, since it applies the qualities of non-greed, non- hatred, and non-delusion, to gifts, recipients, and the fruits of giving, respectively. Virtue is opposed to greed, hatred, and delusion, since it removes crookedness and corruption in bodily conduct, etc. Renunciation is opposed to these three corruptions since it avoids indulgence in sense pleasures, the affliction of others, and self- mortification. Wisdom opposes them in so far as greed, etc., create blindness, while knowledge restores sight. Energy opposes them by arousing the true way free from both listlessness and restlessness. Patience opposes them by accepting the desirable, the undesirable, and emptiness. Truthfulness is their opposite because it proceeds in accordance with fact whether others render help or inflict harm. Determination is the opposite of these three defilements since, after vanquishing the vicissitudes of the world, it remains unshakable in fulfilling the requisites of enlightenment in the way they have been undertaken. Loving kindness is the opposite of greed, hatred, and delusion, through its seclusion from the hindrances. And equanimity is their opposite by dispelling attraction and repulsion towards desirable and undesirable objects, respectively, and by proceeding evenly under varying circumstances.
 What are their opposites ?
In general, all the defilements and all unwholesome dhammas are their opposites. Taken separately, stinginess is the opposite of giving, and so on, as mentioned earlier.217
 How are they to be practiced?
The perfection of giving, firstly, is to be practiced by benefitting beings in many ways—by relinquishing one’s happiness, belongings, body, and life to others, by dispelling their fear, and by instructing them in the Dhamma.
Herein, giving is threefold by way of the object to be given: the giving of material things , the giving of fearlessness , and the giving of the Dhamma .
Among these, the object to be given can be twofold: internal and external.
The external gift is tenfold: food, drink, garments, vehicles, garlands, scents, unguents, bedding, dwellings, and lamps.
These gifts, again, become manifold by analyzing each into its constituents, e.g., food into hard food, soft food, etc.
The sense objects, such as visible forms, become manifold when analyzed into blue, etc.
He gives generously, not ungenerously. He gives sufficiently, not insufficiently, when there is something to be given.
And when there is not enough to give sufficiently to all, he distributes evenly whatever can be shared.
But he does not give things that bring affliction to others, such as weapons, poisons, and intoxicants. Nor does he give amusements that are harmful and lead to negligence.
And he does not give unsuitable food or drink to a person who is sick, even though he might ask for it, and he does not give what is suitable beyond the proper measure.
Again, when asked, he gives to householders things appropriate for householders, and to monks things appropriate for monks. He gives to his mother and father, kinsmen and relatives, friends and colleagues, children, wife, slaves, and workers, without causing pain to anyone. Having promised an excellent gift, he does not give something mean. He does not give because he desires gain, honor, or fame, or because he expects something in return, or out of expectation of some fruit other than the supreme enlightenment. He does not give detesting the gift or those who ask. He does not give a discarded object as a gift, not even to unrestrained beggars who revile and abuse him. Invariably he gives with care, with a serene mind, full of compassion. He does not give through belief in superstitious omens; but he gives believing in kamma and its fruit. When he gives he does not afflict those who ask by making them do homage to him, etc.; but he gives without afflicting others. He does not give a gift with the intention of deceiving others or with the intention of injuring; he gives only with an undefiled mind. He does not give a gift with harsh words or a frown, but with words of endearment, congenial speech, and a smile on his face. Whenever greed for a particular object becomes excessive, due to its high value and beauty, its antiquity, or personal attachment, the bodhisattva recognizes his greed, quickly dispels it, seeks out some recipients, and gives it away. And if there should be an object of limited value that can be given and a suppliant expecting it, without a second thought he bestirs himself and gives it to him, honoring him as though he were an uncelebrated sage.
Asked for his own children, wife, slaves, workers, and servants, the Great Man does not give them while they are as yet unwilling to go, afflicted with grief. But when they are willing and joyful, then he gives them.
But if he knows that those who ask for them are demonic beings—ogres, demons, or goblins—or men of cruel disposition, then he does not give them away. So too, he will not give his kingdom
to those intent on the harm, suffering, and affliction of the world, but he would give it away to righteous men who protect the world with Dhamma.
This, firstly, is the way to practice the giving of external gifts.
The internal gift should be understood in two ways.
How?
Just as a man, for the sake of food and clothing, surrenders himself to another and enters into servitude and slavery, in the same way the Great Man, wishing for the supreme welfare and happiness of all beings, desiring to fulfil his own perfection of giving, with a spiritually oriented mind, for the sake of enlightenment, surrenders himself to another and enters into servitude, placing himself at the disposal of others.
Whatever limbs or organs of his might be needed by others— hands, feet, eyes, etc.—he gives them away to those who need them, without trembling and without cowering. He is no more attached to them, and no more shrinks away than if they were external objects. Thus the Great Man relinquishes an internal object in two ways: for the enjoyment of others according to their pleasure; or, while fulfilling the wishes of those who ask, for his own self-mastery. In this matter he is completely generous, and thinks: “I will attain enlightenment through non-attachment.”
Thus the giving of the internal gift should be understood.
Herein, giving an internal gift, he gives only what leads to the welfare of the recipient, and nothing else.
The Great Man does not knowingly give his own body, limbs, and organs to Māra or to the malevolent deities in Māra’s company, thinking: “Let this not lead to their harm.”
And likewise, he does not give to those possessed by Māra or his deities, or to madmen.
But when asked for these things by others, he gives immediately, because of the rarity of such a request and the difficulty of making such a gift.
The giving of fearlessness is the giving of protection to beings when they have become frightened on account of kings, thieves, fire, water, enemies, lions, tigers, other wild beasts, dragons, ogres, demons, goblins, etc.
This is the method: In brief, he gives a talk on giving, on virtue, and on heaven, on the unsatisfactoriness and defilement in sense pleasures, and on the benefit in renouncing them.
In detail, to those whose minds are disposed towards the enlightenment of disciples, he gives a discourse establishing and purifying them by elaborating upon the noble qualities of whichever among the following topics is appropriate: going for refuge, restraint by virtue, guarding the doors of the sense faculties, moderation in eating, application to wakefulness, the seven good dhammas; application to serenity by practicing meditation on one of the thirty-eight objects ; application to insight by contemplating the objects of insight- interpretation such as the material body; the progressive stages of purification, the apprehension of the course of rightness, the three kinds of clear knowledge, the six direct knowledges, the four discriminations, and the enlightenment of a disciple.218
Thus the Great Man gives the gift of the Dhamma to beings.
When he gives a material gift, the Great Man gives food thinking: “May I, by this gift, enable beings to achieve long life, beauty, happiness, strength, intelligence, and the supreme fruit of unsullied bliss.” He gives drink wishing to allay the thirst of sensual defilements; garments to gain the adornments of shame and moral dread and the golden complexion ; vehicles for attaining the modes of psychic potency and the bliss of nibbāna; scents for producing the sweet scent of virtue; garlands and unguents for producing the beauty of the Buddha-qualities; seats for producing the seat on the terrace of enlightenment; bedding for producing the bed of a Tathāgata’s rest; dwellings so he might become a refuge for beings; lamps so he might obtain the five eyes.219 He gives visible forms for producing the fathom-wide aura ; sounds for producing the Brahmā-like voice ; tastes for endearing himself to all the world; and tangibles for acquiring a Buddha’s elegance. He gives medicines so he might later give the ageless and deathless state of nibbāna. He gives slaves the gift of freedom so he might later emancipate beings from the slavery of the defilements. He gives blameless amusements and enjoyments in order to produce delight in the true Dhamma. He gives his own children as a gift in order that he might adopt all beings as his children by granting them an ariyan birth. He gives his wife as a gift in order that he might become master over the entire world. He gives gifts of gold, gems, pearls, coral, etc., in order to achieve the major marks of physical beauty , and gifts of the diverse means of beautification in order to achieve the minor features of physical beauty.220 He gives his treasuries as a gift in order to obtain the treasury of the true Dhamma; the gift of his kingdom in order to become the king of the Dhamma; the gift of monasteries, parks, ponds, and groves in order to achieve the jhānas, etc.; the gift of his feet in order that he might approach the terrace of enlightenment with feet marked with the auspicious wheels; the gift of his hands in order that he might give to beings the rescuing hand of the true Dhamma to help them across the four floods221; the gift of his ears, nose, etc., in order to obtain the spiritual faculties of faith, etc.; the gift of his eyes in order to obtain the universal eye; the gift of his flesh and blood with the thought: “May my body be the means of life for all the world! May it bring welfare and happiness to all beings at all times, even on occasions of merely seeing, hearing, recollecting, or ministering to me! ” And he gives the gift of his head in order to become supreme in all the world.
Giving thus, the Great Man does not give unwillingly, nor by afflicting others, nor out of fear, moral shame, or the scolding of those in need of gifts. When there is something excellent, he does not give what is mean. He does not give extolling himself and disparaging others. He does not give out of desire for the fruit, nor with loathing for those who ask, nor with lack of consideration. Rather, he gives thoroughly, with his own hand, at the proper time, considerately, without discrimination,
filled with joy throughout the three times.222 Having given, he does not become remorseful afterwards.
The external gift can also become sixfold when analyzed by way of sense object : visible forms, sounds, smells, tastes, tangibles, and non-sensory objects.
So too, the external gift is manifold by way of the divers valuables and belongings, such as gems, gold, silver, pearls, coral, etc.; fields, lands, parks, etc.; slaves, cows, buffaloes, etc.
When the Great Man gives an external object, he gives whatever is needed to whomever stands in need of it; and knowing by himself that someone is in need of something, he gives it even unasked, much more when asked.
He does not give because he expects something in return.
The giving of the Dhamma is an undistorted discourse on the Dhamma given with an undefiled mind; that is, methodical instruction conducive to good in the present life, to good in the life to come, and to the ultimate good. By means of such discourses, those who have not entered the Buddha’s Dispensation enter it, while those who have entered it reach maturity therein.
So too, for beings whose minds are disposed towards the enlightenment of paccekabuddhas and of perfectly enlightened Buddhas, he gives a discourse establishing and purifying them in the two vehicles by elaborating upon the greatness of the spiritual power of those Buddhas, and by explaining the specific nature, characteristic, function, etc., of the ten pāramīs in their three stages.
He does not become either conceited or obsequious in relation to the recipients, but behaves amiably towards them. Bountiful and liberal, he gives things together with a bonus.
For when he gives food, thinking: “I will give this along with a bonus,” he gives garments, etc., as well.
And when he gives garments, thinking: “I will give this along with a bonus,” he gives food, etc., as well.
And when he gives a gift of one of the sense objects, such as visible forms, he gives the other sense objects also as a bonus.
The gift of visible forms should be understood thus. Having gained something, such as a flower, garment, or relic of a blue, yellow, red, or white color, etc., considering it in terms of its visible form, thinking to make a gift of a visible form, he offers it to a worthy recipient together with its base.
The gift of sounds should be understood by way of the sounds of drums, etc.
It is certainly not possible to give a sound as one gives a cluster of lotuses, tearing it out by its bulb and roots and placing it in the hands. But one gives a gift of sound by giving its base.
Thus he makes a gift of sound by presenting a musical instrument, such as drums or tom toms, to the Triple Gem;
The gift of scents is made when, after getting a delightfully scented object, such as scented roots, powdered scent, etc., considering it in terms of its scent, thinking to make a gift of scent, he offers it to the Triple Gem. He relinquishes a scented object such as agaru or sandalwood, for the purpose of making an offering of scent.
The gift of tastes is made when, after getting a delightfully flavored object, such as flavored roots, etc., considering it in terms of its taste, thinking to make a gift of taste, he gives it to worthy recipients. Or he relinquishes a flavorful object, such as grain, cows, etc.223
The gift of tangibles should be understood by way of beds, chairs, etc., and by way of coverlets and mantels, etc.
The gift of mental objects 224 should be understood by way of nutriment, drink, and life, since it is the mental-object base that is intended here.
Having gained a delightful object such as nutriment, considering it as part of the mental-object base, thinking to make a gift of a non-sensory object, he gives nutriment—i.e., ghee, butter, etc;
This entire accomplishment in giving he dedicates to the welfare and happiness of the whole world, and to his own unshakable emancipation through supreme enlightenment.
He dedicates it to the attainment of inexhaustible desire ,225 inexhaustible concentration, ingenuity, knowledge, and emancipation.
In practicing the perfection of giving the Great Being should apply the perception of impermanence to life and possessions. He should consider them as shared in common with many, and should constantly and continuously arouse great compassion towards beings.
Just as, when a house is blazing, the owner removes all his property of essential value and himself as well without leaving anything important behind, so does the Great Man invariably give, without discrimination and without concern.
This is the method of practicing the perfection of giving.
Now comes the method of practicing the perfection of virtue. Since the Great Man desires to adorn beings with the adornment of the virtue of the omniscient, at the beginning he must first purify his own virtue.
Herein, virtue is purified in four modes: by the purification of one’s inclinations ; by the undertaking of precepts ; by non-transgression ; and by making amends for transgressions .
For someone who is dominated by personal ideals is naturally disgusted with evil through the purity of his own inclinations and purifies his conduct by arousing his inward sense of shame.
Someone else, who is dominated by a consideration for the world, afraid of evil, purifies his conduct by receiving precepts from another person and by arousing his sense of moral dread.
Both establish themselves in virtue through non- transgression.
But if, due to forgetfulness, they sometimes break a precept,
Virtue is twofold as avoidance and performance .
Herein, this is the method by which virtue as avoidance should be practiced. A bodhisattva should have such a heart of sympathy for all beings that he does not feel any resentment towards anyone, even in a dream.
Because he is dedicated to helping others, he would no more misappropriate the belongings of others than he would take hold of a poisonous water-snake.
If he is a monk, he should live remote from unchastity, abstaining from the seven bonds of sexuality, not to speak of adultery.226
When he speaks, his statements should be truthful, beneficial, and endearing, and his talk measured, timely, and concerned with the Dhamma. His mind should always be devoid of covetousness, ill will, and inverted views. He should possess the knowledge of the ownership of kamma, and have settled faith and affection for recluses and brahmins who are faring and practicing rightly.
Because he abstains from unwholesome states and from the unwholesome courses of kamma leading to the four planes of misery and the suffering of the round, and because he is established in the wholesome courses of kamma leading to heaven and liberation, through the purity of his end and the purity of his means the Great Man’s wishes for the welfare and happiness of beings succeed immediately, exactly in the way they are formed,
Since he desists from injuring others, he gives the gift of fearlessness to all beings. He perfects the meditation on loving kindness without trouble, and enjoys the eleven benefits of loving kindness . He is healthy and robust, attains longevity, abundant happiness, and distinguished characteristics, and eradicates the mental impression of hatred.227
So too, because he desists from taking what is not given, his possessions cannot be confiscated by thieves, etc.
By desisting from unchastity he becomes unexcitable, peaceful in body and mind, dear and agreeable, unsuspicious to beings. A good report circulates concerning him. He is without lust or attachment to women, is devoted to renunciation, achieves distinguished characteristics, and eradicates the mental impression of greed.
By desisting from false speech his word comes to be authoritative for others. He is regarded as reliable and trustworthy, one whose statements are always accepted. He is dear and agreeable to deities. His mouth gives off a sweet fragrance and his bodily and vocal conduct are protected. He achieves distinguished characteristics, and eradicates the mental impressions of the defilements.
By desisting from slander he obtains a retinue and following that cannot be divided by the attacks of others. He possesses unbreakable faith in the true Dhamma. He is a firm friend, as exceedingly dear to beings as though they were acquainted with him in the last existence. And he is devoted to non-defilement.
By desisting from harsh speech he becomes dear and agreeable to beings, pleasant in character, sweet in speech, held in esteem. And he develops a voice endowed with eight factors.228
By desisting from idle chatter he becomes dear and agreeable to beings, revered, held in esteem. His statements are accepted and his talk is measured.
He acquires great influence and power, and becomes skillful in answering the questions of others with the ingenuity that creates opportunities . And when he reaches the plane of Buddhahood, he becomes capable of answering the numerous questions of beings, speaking numerous languages all with a single reply.
Through his freedom from covetousness he gains what he wishes and obtains whatever excellent possessions he needs. He is honored by powerful khattiyas. He can never be vanquished by his adversaries, is never defective in his faculties, and becomes the peerless individual.
Through his freedom from ill will he gains a pleasant appearance. He is esteemed by others, and because he delights in the welfare of beings, he automatically inspires their confidence. He becomes lofty in character, abides in loving kindness, and acquires great influence and power.
Through his freedom from wrong view he gains good companions. Even if he is threatened with the guillotine, he will not perform an evil deed. Because he holds to the ownership of kamma, he does not believe in superstitious omens. His faith in the true Dhamma is established and firmly rooted. He has faith in the enlightenment of the Tathāgatas, and no more delights in the diversity of outside creeds than a royal swan delights in a dung heap. He is skillful in fully understanding the three characteristics , and in the end gains the unobstructed knowledge of omniscience. Until he attains final enlightenment he becomes the foremost in whatever order of beings , and acquires the most excellent achievements.
Thus, esteeming virtue as the foundation for all achievements—as the soil for the origination of all the Buddha-qualities, the beginning, footing, head, and chief of all the dhammas culminating in Buddhahood—and recognizing gain, honor, and fame as a foe in the guise of a friend, a bodhisattva should diligently and thoroughly perfect his virtue as a hen guards its eggs: through the power of mindfulness and clear comprehension in the control of bodily and vocal action, in the taming of the sense faculties, in purification of livelihood, and in the use of the requisites.
This, firstly, is the method of practicing virtue as avoidance.
The practice of virtue as performance should be understood as follows: Herein, at the appropriate time, a bodhisattva practices paying homage, rising up, making reverential salutations, and courteous conduct towards good friends worthy of reverence. At the appropriate time he renders them service, and he waits upon them when they are sick.
When he receives well-spoken advice he expresses his appreciation. He praises the noble qualities of the virtuous and patiently endures the abuse of antagonists. He remembers help rendered to him by others, rejoices in their merits, dedicates his own merits to the supreme enlightenment, and always abides diligently in the practice of wholesome dhammas. When he commits a transgression he acknowledges it as such and confesses it to his co-religionists. Afterwards he perfectly fulfils the right practice.
He is adroit and nimble in fulfilling his duties towards beings when these are conducive to their good. He serves as their companion.
When beings are afflicted with the suffering of disease, etc., he prepares the appropriate remedy.
He dispels the sorrow of those afflicted by the loss of wealth, etc. Of a helpful disposition, he restrains with Dhamma those who need to be restrained, rehabilitates them from unwholesome ways, and establishes them in wholesome courses of conduct.
He inspires with Dhamma those in need of inspiration.
And when he hears about the loftiest, most difficult, inconceivably powerful deeds of the great bodhisattvas of the past, resulting in the ultimate welfare and happiness of beings, by means of which they reached perfect maturity in the requisites of enlightenment, he does not become agitated and alarmed, but reflects: “Those Great Beings were only human. But by developing themselves through the orderly fulfilment of the training they attained the loftiest spiritual power and the highest perfection in the requisites of enlightenment. I, too, should practice the same training in virtue, etc. In that way I, too, will gradually fulfil the training and in the end attain the same state.”
Then, with unflagging energy preceded by this faith, he perfectly fulfils the training in virtue, etc. Again, he conceals his virtues and reveals his faults. He is few in his wishes, content, fond of solitude, aloof, capable of enduring suffering, and free from anxiety. He is not restless, puffed up, fickle, scurrilous, or scattered in speech, but calm in his faculties and mind. Avoiding such wrong means of livelihood as scheming, etc., he is endowed with proper conduct and a suitable resort . He sees danger in the slightest faults, and having undertaken the rules of training, trains himself in them, energetic and resolute, without regard for body or life. He does not tolerate even the slightest concern for his body or life but abandons and dispels it; how much more, then, excessive concern?
He abandons and dispels all the corruptions such as anger, malice, etc., which are the cause for moral depravity.
He does not become complacent over some minor achievement of distinction and does not shrink away, but strives for successively higher achievements.
In this way the achievements he gains do not partake of diminution or stagnation. The Great Man serves as a guide for the blind, explaining to them the right path. To the deaf he gives signals with gestures of his hands, and in that way benefits them with good. So too for the dumb.
To cripples he gives a chair, or a vehicle, or some other means of conveyance.
He strives that the faithless may gain faith, that the lazy may generate zeal, that those of confused mindfulness may develop mindfulness, that those with wandering minds may become accomplished in concentration, and that the dull-witted may acquire wisdom.
He strives to dispel sensual desire,
Out of gratitude to those who have helped him, he benefits and honors them with a similar or greater benefit in return, congenial in speech and endearing in his words.
He is a companion in misfortune.
Understanding the nature and character of beings, he associates with whatever beings need his presence, in whatever way they need it;
But he proceeds only by rehabilitating them from the unwholesome and establishing them in the wholesome, not in other ways.
For in order to protect the minds of others, bodhisattvas behave only in ways which increase the wholesome.229
He does not criticize those who are dear to others in front of them, nor praise those who are resented by them.
He is not intimate with those who are not trustworthy.
He does not refuse a proper invitation,
He encourages those endowed with faith with a discourse on the benefits of faith;
If the bodhisattva has attained to the direct knowledges, he may inspire a sense of spiritual urgency in the negligent by showing them the fate of those in hell, etc., as is fit. Thereby he establishes the faithless in faith .
and brings to maturity those already endowed with these qualities.
In this way, through his virtuous conduct, the Great Man’s immeasurable flood of merit and goodness ascends to ever increasing heights.
The detailed explanation of virtue is given in diverse ways in the Visuddhimagga in the passage beginning: “Virtue is the states beginning with volition, present in one who abstains from the destruction of life, etc. or in one who fulfills the practice of the duties” . All that should be brought in here.
The same method with gifts of vehicles, etc.
or by giving medicine for the voice, such as oil and molasses, to preachers of the Dhamma; or by announcing a lecture on the Dhamma, chanting the scriptures, giving a discourse on the Dhamma, holding a discussion, or expressing appreciation for the good deeds of others.
For having gained some soft, delightful, blameless tangible object, such as a bed, chair, cushion, pillow, undergarment, or upper garment, considering it in terms of its tangible qualities, thinking to make a gift of a tangible item, he gives it to worthy recipients;
having gained the aforesaid tangible objects, he relinquishes them.
or a drink—i.e., the eight kinds of drink such as mango juice, etc.; or, considering it a gift of life, he gives a ticket-meal or a fortnightly meal, etc., gets doctors to wait upon the sick and afflicted, liberates animals from a net, has a fishing net or bird-cage destroyed, releases prisoners from prison, causes an injunction to be given forbidding the slaughter of animals, or undertakes any action of a similar nature for the sake of protecting the life of beings.
through their sense of shame and moral dread, respectively, they quickly make amends for it through the proper means of rehabilitation.
If he is a householder, he should never arouse even an evil thought of lust for the wives of others.
and his pāramīs reach fulfilment, for such is his nature.
He is unsuspicious to others, dear and agreeable, trustworthy, unattached to prosperity and success, inclined to relinquishing, and he eradicates the mental impression of greed.
ill will, sloth-and-torpor, restlessness-and-worry, and perplexity in those obsessed by these hindrances,
and to dispel wrong thoughts of sensuality, ill will, and aggression in those subjugated by these thoughts.
and he practices together with whatever beings need to practice with him, in whatever way of practice is necessary for them.
So too, because his inclination is to benefit others, he should never harm them, abuse them, humiliate them, arouse remorse in them, or incite them to act in ways that should be avoided. Nor should he place himself in a higher position than those of inferior conduct. He should be neither altogether inaccessible to others, nor too accessible, and he should not associate with others at the wrong time.230
He associates with beings whom it is proper to associate with at the appropriate time and place.
or engage in persuasion, or accept excessively.
and he encourages as well those endowed with virtue, learning, generosity, and wisdom with a discourse on the benefits of those qualities.
He makes them enter the Buddha’s Dispensation
Only there is this distinction: in that work the discussion of virtue has come down for beings who seek the enlightenment of disciples ; but here, because the discussion is intended for great bodhisattvas , it should be explained making compassion and skillful means the forerunners.
Just as the Great Man does not dedicate the merits from his practice of virtue to his own release from affliction in the unfortunate destinations, or to his own achievement of kingship in the fortunate destinations, or to becoming a world-ruling monarch, a god, Sakka, Māra, or Brahmā, so too he does not dedicate it to his own attainment of the threefold knowledge, the six direct knowledges, the four discriminations, the enlightenment of a disciple, or the enlightenment of a paccekabuddhas. But rather he dedicates it only for the purpose of becoming an omniscient Buddha in order to enable all beings to acquire the incomparable adornment of virtue.
This is the method of practicing the perfection of virtue.
The perfection of renunciation is the wholesome act of consciousness that occurs renouncing sense pleasures and existence, preceded by the perception of their inherent unsatisfactoriness and accompanied by compassion and skillful means. The bodhisattva should practice the perfection of renunciation by first recognizing the unsatisfactoriness in sense pleasures, etc., according to the following method: “For one dwelling in a home there is no opportunity to enjoy the happiness of renunciation, etc., because the home life is the dwelling place of all the defilements, because a wife and children impose restrictions , and because the diverse crafts and occupations such as agriculture and trade lead to numerous entanglements. And sense pleasures, like a drop of honey smeared over the blade of a sword, give limited satisfaction and entail abundant harm. They are fleeting like a show perceived in a flash of lightning; enjoyable only through an inversion of perception like the adornments of a madman; a means of vengeance like a camouflaged pit of excrement; unsatisfying like a thin drink or water moistening the fingers; afflictive like food inwardly rotten; a cause for calamity like a baited hook; the cause of suffering in the three times like a burning fire; a basis for bondage like monkey’s glue; a camouflage for destruction like a murderer’s cloak; a place of danger like a dwelling in an enemy village; food for the Māra of the defilements like the supporter of one’s foes; subject to suffering through change like the enjoyment of a festival; inwardly burning like the fire in the hollow of a tree; fraught with danger like a ball of honey suspended from bīrana grass in an old pit; intensifying thirst like a drink of salt water; resorted to by the vulgar like liquor and wine; and giving little satisfaction like a chain of bones.” Having recognized the unsatisfactoriness in sense pleasures in accordance with this method, he should then, by the reverse method, contemplate the benefits in renunciation, with a mind slanting, sloping, and inclining towards the happiness of renunciation, solitude, and peace.
Since renunciation is rooted in the going forth , the going forth should be undertaken.
If the Great Being is living at a time when no Buddha has arisen in the world, he should go forth under ascetics or wanderers who maintain the doctrine of kamma and the moral efficacy of action.
But when the perfectly enlightened Buddhas appear in the world, he should go forth only in their Dispensation.
Having gone forth, he should establish himself in virtue, as described above, and in order to cleanse his virtue, should undertake the ascetic practices.
For Great Men who undertake the ascetic practices and maintain them properly become content and few in their wishes. The stains of their defilements are washed off in the waters of such noble qualities as effacement, solitude, aloofness from society, the arousal of energy, and ease of maintenance, and all their conduct becomes purified through their blameless rules, observances, and noble qualities. Established in three of the ancient traditions of the ariyans,231 they are able to achieve the fourth of the ariyan traditions, i.e., delight in meditation, entering and abiding in jhāna, both access and absorption, through whichever among the forty subjects of meditation are appropriate.
Thus they completely fulfil the perfection of renunciation.
At this point it would be proper to explain in detail the thirteen ascetic practices and the forty meditation subjects for the development of concentration, i.e., the ten kasiṇa-devices, the ten impurities, the ten recollections, the four divine abodes, the four immaterial states, the one perception, and the one analysis.
But since all these are explained in complete detail in the Visuddhimagga, it should be understood in the way stated there.
Only there is this distinction: in that work the subject is explained for beings who seek the enlightenment of disciples. But here, because it is intended for great bodhisattvas, it should be explained making compassion and skillful means the forerunners.
This is the method of practicing the perfection of renunciation.
Just as light cannot co-exist with darkness, wisdom cannot co-exist with delusion. Therefore a bodhisattva wishing to accomplish the perfection of wisdom should avoid the causes of delusion.
These are the causes of delusion: discontent, languor, drowsiness, lethargy, delight in company, attachment to sleep, irresoluteness, lack of enthusiasm for knowledge, false over-estimation of oneself, non- interrogation, not maintaining one’s body properly, lack of mental concentration, association with dull-witted people, not ministering to those possessed of wisdom, self-contempt, false discrimination, adherence to inverted views, athleticism, lack of a sense of spiritual urgency, and the five hindrances;
Avoiding these causes of confusion, one should apply effort to learning as well as to the jhānas, etc.
So too, out of his wish for the welfare of others, the bodhisattva should develop the wisdom of ingenuity in creating opportunities to fulfil his various duties to his fellow beings, and the skillful means in understanding their happiness and misery.
Then he should develop wisdom born of reflection by first reflecting upon the specific nature of the dhammas such as the aggregates, and then arousing reflective acquiescence in them.
Next, he should perfect the preliminary portion of the wisdom born of meditation by developing the mundane kinds of full understanding through the discernment of the specific and general characteristics of the aggregates, etc.233
To do so, he should fully understand all internal and external dhammas without exception as follows: “This is mere mentality-materiality , which arises and ceases according to conditions. There is here no agent or actor. It is ‘impermanent’ in the sense of not being after having been; ‘suffering” in the sense of oppression by rise and fall; and ‘non-self’ in the sense of being insusceptible to the exercise of mastery.” Comprehending them in this way, he abandons attachment to them, and helps others to do so as well. Entirely out of compassion, he continues to help his fellow beings enter and reach maturity in the three vehicles, assists them to achieve mastery over the jhānas, deliverances, concentrations, attainments, and mundane direct knowledges, and does not desist until he reaches the very peak of wisdom and all the Buddha-qualities come within his grasp.
The wisdom born of meditation may be divided into two groups. The first comprises the mundane direct knowledges, together with their accessories; namely, the knowledge of the modes of psychic power, the knowledge of the divine ear-element, the knowledge of penetrating other minds, the knowledge of recollecting past lives, the knowledge of the divine eye, the knowledge of kammic retribution, and the knowledge of the future.234 The second comprises the five purifications—purification of view, purification by overcoming doubt, purification by knowledge and vision of what is and what is not the path, purification by knowledge and vision of the way, and purification by knowledge and vision. The first four of these are mundane, the last is supramundane. After acquiring through study and interrogation a knowledge of the dhammas such as the aggregates, etc., constituting the soil of wisdom, he should establish himself in the two purifications constituting its roots, purification of virtue and purification of mind, and then accomplish the five purifications just mentioned which constitute the trunk of wisdom. Since the method for accomplishing these, along with the analysis of their objective sphere, is explained in complete detail in the Visuddhimagga, it should be understood in the way given there.235
Only in that work the explanation of wisdom has come down for beings seeking the enlightenment of disciples. But here, because it is intended for the great bodhisattvas, it should be explained making compassion and skillful means the forerunners. One further distinction must also be made: here insight should be developed only as far as purification by knowledge and vision of the way, without attaining purification by knowledge and vision.236
A Great Being who has formed his aspiration for supreme enlightenment should, for the sake of fulfilling his pāramīs, always be devoted to what is proper and intent upon service.237 Therefore he should be zealous in providing for the welfare of beings, and from time to time, day by day, should reflect: “Have I accumulated any requisites of merit and knowledge today? What have I done for the welfare of others?”
In order to help all beings he should surrender some possession of his with a mind unconcerned with body or life.
Whatever action he does, bodily or vocal, all should be done with a mind slanting towards full enlightenment; all should be dedicated to enlightenment.
He should turn his mind away from sense pleasures whether superior or inferior
He should work energetically for the welfare of beings, be capable of enduring everything, whether desirable or undesirable, and should speak without deception.238
Whatever causes suffering for beings, all that he should be ready to take upon himself;
He should frequently reflect upon the greatness of the Buddhas and the greatness of their spiritual power.
Whatever action he does by body or speech, all should be preceded with a mind slanting towards full enlightenment.
In this way, the Great Being, the bodhisattva, devoted to what is proper, endowed with strength, firm in striving, day by day accumulates immeasurable requisites of merit and knowledge through the practice of the pāramīs.
Further, having relinquished his own body and life for the use and protection of beings, the bodhisattva should seek out and apply the antidotes to the various kinds of suffering to which beings are exposed—hunger, thirst, cold, heat, wind, sun, etc.
This, firstly, is the method for a bodhisattva not yet established on the plane of concentration.
One established on the plane of concentration bestows upon beings the rapture, tranquillity, happiness, concentration, and true knowledge produced in the achievements of distinction as they are experienced by himself. He procures them and dedicates them to all.
Such a bodhisattva should contemplate the whole world of sentient beings immersed in the great suffering of saṃsāra and in the sufferings of the defilements and kamma- formations at its base. He should see the beings in hell experiencing violent, racking, agonizing pains uninterruptedly over long periods, produced as they are cut up, dismembered, split, pulverized, and roasted in scorching fires; the great suffering of the animals due to their mutual hostility, as they afflict, harass, and kill one another, or fall into captivity at the hands of others; and the suffering of the various classes of ghosts, going about with their bodies aflame, consumed and withered by hunger, thirst, wind, and sun, weeping and wailing as their food turns into vomit and spittle. He should contemplate as well the suffering experienced by men, which is often indistinguishable from the suffering in the plane of misery: the misery and ruin they encounter in their search ; the various punishments they may meet, such as the cutting off of their hands, etc.; ugliness, deformity, and poverty; affliction by hunger and thirst; being vanquished by the more powerful, pressed into the service of others, and made dependent upon others; and when they pass away, falling over into the hells, the realm of ghosts, and the animal kingdom. He should see the gods of the sense-sphere being consumed by the fevers of lust as they enjoy their sense objects with scattered minds; living with their fever unextinguished like a mass of fire stoked up with blasts of wind and fed with a stock of dry wood; without peace, dejected, and dependent on others. And he should see the gods of the fine-material and immaterial spheres, after so long a life span, in the end succumb to the law of impermanence, plunging from their heights back down into the round of birth, aging, and death, like birds swooping swiftly down from the heights of the sky or like arrows shot by a strong arm descending in the distance. And having seen all his, he should arouse a sense of spiritual urgency and suffuse all beings universally with loving kindness and compassion.
Accumulating the requisites of enlightenment in this way by body, speech, and mind without interruption, he should fulfil the perfection of energy, arousing zeal while working thoroughly and perseveringly and acting without cowering, in order that all the pāramīs may reach fulfilment.
While striving for the state of Buddhahood, the store and repository of inconceivable, immeasurable, vast, lofty, stainless, incomparable, undefiled qualities, he should encourage the arising of energy; for such energy is endowed with inconceivable spiritual power, which common people cannot even hear about, much less practice.
It is entirely through the spiritual power of energy that the practice of all the requisites of enlightenment succeeds—the threefold arising of the great aspiration, the four grounds for Buddhahood, the four bases of beneficence, the single flavor of compassion, the reflective acquiescence which is the specific condition for the realization of the Buddha-qualities, being untainted amidst all things, the perception of all beings as his own dear children, not being fatigued by all the sufferings of saṃsāra, the relinquishing of everything that may be given away, delight in so giving, the determination upon the higher virtue, etc., unshakeableness therein, rapture and exultation in wholesome actions, the inclination towards seclusion, application to the jhānas, being insatiable in blameless states, teaching the Dhamma to others as he has learned it out of the wish for their welfare, firm initiative in setting beings upon the true path, sagacity and heroism, being imperturbable in face of the abusive speech and wrongs of others, the determination upon truth, mastery over the meditative attainments, the attainment of power through the direct knowledges, the comprehension of the three characteristics, the accumulation of the requisites for the supramundane path by practicing meditation in the foundations of mindfulness, etc., and the descent on to the nine supramundane dhammas239. Thus from the time of forming the aspiration until the great enlightenment, a bodhisattva should perfect his energy thoroughly and uninterruptedly, without surrendering, so that it might issue in higher and higher states of distinction.
And when this energy succeeds, all the requisites of enlightenment—patience, truthfulness, determination, etc., as well as giving, virtue, etc.—will succeed; for all these occur in dependence on energy. The practice of patience and the rest should be understood in accordance with the same method.
Thus through giving, relinquishing his own happiness and belongings to others, he practices the benefitting of others in many ways; through virtue, the protection of their lives, property, and wives, the non-breach of his word, endearing and beneficial speech, non- injury, etc.; through renunciation, many kinds of beneficial conduct such as giving the gift of the Dhamma in return for their material gifts; through wisdom, skillful means in providing for their welfare; through energy, the arousing of zeal in his work without slacking off; through patience, the enduring of the wrongs of others; through truthfulness, not breaking his pledge to help others without deception; through determination, remaining unshakable in rendering them help even when encountering difficulties; through loving kindness, concern for their welfare and happiness; and through equanimity, remaining imperturbable whether others render help or inflict harm. This is the practice that the great bodhisattva, compassionate for all beings, undertakes for the sake of incalculable beings, by means of which he accumulates immeasurable requisites of merit and knowledge not shared by worldlings.
Their condition has been stated. They should be accomplished thoroughly.
or, in brief, any states which, when indulged in, prevent the unarisen wisdom from arising and cause the arisen wisdom to diminish.
This is an analysis of the sphere of learning: the five aggregates, the twelve sense bases, the eighteen elements, the four truths, the twenty-two faculties, the twelve factors of dependent origination, the foundations of mindfulness, etc., the various classifications of dhammas such as the wholesome, etc., as well as any blameless secular fields of knowledge that may be suitable for promoting the welfare and happiness of beings, particularly grammar.232 Thus, with wisdom, mindfulness, and energy preceded by skillful means, a bodhisattva should first thoroughly immerse himself in this entire sphere of learning—through study, listening, memorization, learning, and interrogation; then he should establish others in learning. In this way the wisdom born of learning can be developed.
and should apply skillful means to the fulfilment of his various duties.
He should suffuse all beings with universal loving kindness and compassion.
and he should rejoice in the merits of all beings.
And whatever happiness he himself gains by alleviating these kinds of suffering, and the happiness he gains when his own bodily and mental afflictions subside in delightful parks, gardens, mansions, pools, and forest abodes, and the happiness of the blissful jhānic attainments he hears are experienced by the Buddhas, their enlightened disciples, paccekabuddhas, and great bodhisattvas, established in the practice of renunciation—all that he seeks to procure universally for all beings.
How are they analyzed? 
They are analyzed into thirty pāramīs: ten pāramīs, ten intermediate pāramīs , and ten ultimate pāramīs .
Herein, some teachers say that the ten basic pāramīs are the intermingled bright and dark dhammas practiced by a bodhisattva who has just formed his aspiration, whose end is the welfare of others, and whose means are directed towards working for this end; the intermediate pāramīs are the bright dhammas untainted by any darkness; and the ultimate pāramīs are the dhammas which are neither dark nor bright.
Others say that the basic pāramīs are being filled at the time of the commencement;240 the intermediate pāramīs are filled on the plane of bodhisattvahood; and the ultimate pāramīs reach perfect fulfilment in all modes on the plane of Buddhahood.
Or alternatively, the basic pāramīs involve working for the welfare of others on the plane of bodhisattvahood; the intermediate pāramīs, working for one’s own welfare; and the ultimate pāramīs, the fulfilment of the welfare of both oneself and others with the achievement of the Tathāgata’s powers and grounds of self-confidence on the plane of Buddhahood.
Thus they analyze the pāramīs according to the beginning, middle, and consummation by way of the resolution , the undertaking , and their completion, respectively.
Still others analyze them according to the division in the accumulation of merit of those who are by nature compassionate and free from hate, according to whether they have attained to the happiness of existence, the happiness of emancipation, or the ultimate happiness.
Again, some say that among those upheld by a sense of shame, mindfulness, and self-esteem, who give predominance to the supramundane Dhamma and revere virtue, concentration, and wisdom, the pāramīs are analyzed according to their ability to facilitate the attainment of the three types of enlightenment—the basic pāramīs issuing in the enlightenment of a disciple who requires the help to cross , the intermediate pāramīs in the enlightenment of a paccekabuddha who crosses over himself , and the ultimate pāramīs in the enlightenment of a supreme Buddha who helps others across.
Others hold that the basic pāramīs are the requisites occurring from the time of the mental resolution until the resolution by speech; the intermediate, those which occur from the time of the spoken resolution until the resolution by body; and the ultimate, those which occur following the resolution by body.
But still others explain that the basic pāramīs are the requisites which occur by rejoicing in the merits of others; the intermediate, those which occur by exhorting others to practice; and the ultimate, those which occur through one’s own practice.
So too, some say the basic pāramīs are the requisites of merit and knowledge issuing in a happy state of existence; the intermediate, those issuing in the happiness of nibbāna for oneself; and the ultimate, those issuing in both kinds of happiness for others.
The basic perfection of giving is the relinquishing of one’s children, wife, and belongings, such as wealth; the intermediate perfection of giving , the relinquishing of one’s own limbs; and the ultimate perfection of giving , the relinquishing of one’s own life.
The three stages in the perfection of virtue should be understood as the non-transgression on account of the three— children and wife, limbs, and life; the three stages in the perfection of renunciation, as the renunciation of those three bases after cutting off attachment to them; the three stages in the perfection of wisdom, as the discrimination between what is beneficial and harmful to beings, after rooting out craving for one’s belongings, limbs, and life;
 How are they synthesized?
Just as the ten pāramīs become thirtyfold through analysis, so they become sixfold through their specific nature: as giving, virtue, patience, energy, meditation, and wisdom.241
One part of the perfection of truthfulness, i.e., its aspect of truthful speech or abstinence from falsehood, is included in the perfection of virtue, and one part, i.e., its aspect of truthful knowledge, in the perfection of wisdom.
The perfection of loving kindness is included in the perfection of meditation,
The perfection of determination is included by all.
These six pāramīs fall into at least fifteen pairs of complementary qualities which perfect fifteen other pairs of qualities.
How? The pair—giving and virtue—perfects the pair of doing what is beneficial for others and abstaining from what is harmful to them. The pair—giving and patience—perfects the pair of non-greed and non-hatred. The pair—giving and energy—perfects the pair of generosity and learning. The pair—giving and meditation—perfects the abandoning of sensual desire and hatred.
The pair giving and wisdom, the ariyan vehicle and burden. The dyad of virtue and patience, the purification of means and the purification of the end. The dyad of virtue and energy, the dyad of meditative development . The dyad of virtue and meditation, the abandoning of moral depravity and of mental obsession. The dyad of virtue and wisdom, the dyad of giving.242 The dyad of patience and energy, the dyad of acceptance and heat.243 The dyad of patience and meditation, the abandoning of opposing and favoring. The dyad of patience and wisdom, the acceptance and penetration of emptiness. The dyad of energy and meditation, the dyad of exertion and non-distraction. The dyad of energy and wisdom, the dyad of refuges. The dyad of meditation and wisdom perfects the dyad of vehicles . The triad of giving, virtue, and patience perfects the abandoning of greed, hatred, and delusion. The triad of giving, virtue, and energy perfects the giving of wealth, life, and bodily vitality. The triad of giving, virtue, and meditation perfects the three bases of meritorious deeds. The triad of giving, virtue, and wisdom perfects the triad of giving material gifts, fearlessness, and the Dhamma.
In the same way, the other triads and tetrads may be applied to one another as is appropriate in each case.
These six pāramīs are also included in the four foundations, which provide a synthesis of all the pāramīs.244
What are they? The foundations of truth, the foundation of relinquishment, the foundation of peace, and the foundation of wisdom.
Here is the word explanation: it is a foundation because it is founded by this, or it is founded upon this, or it itself is a foundation. It is truth and it is a foundation, or it is the foundation for truth, or truth is the foundation for this—thus it is the foundation of truth.
The same with the rest.
Therein, taking them first without distinction: after making his aspiration for the supramundane qualities, the Great Being, filled with compassion for all beings, establishes the foundation of truth by acquiring all the pāramīs in conformity with his vow;
Taken separately, giving is a proximate cause for the four foundations of wholesome dhammas as follows: since one vows to give to those who ask without deceiving them, gives without violating one’s vows, and rejoices without deceiving them about the gift; through the relinquishing of the opposite qualities such as stinginess, etc.; through the pacification of greed, hatred, delusion, and fear, in regard to the objects to be given, the recipients, the act of giving, and the loss of the objects to be given, respectively; through giving according to desert, at the proper time, in the appropriate manner, and through the pre-eminence of wisdom.
Virtue is a proximate cause for the four foundations, thus: through non- transgression of the restraint undertaken; through the relinquishing of moral depravity; through the pacification of misconduct; and through the pre-eminence of wisdom.
Patience is a proximate cause for the four foundations, thus: through patient acceptance in accordance with one’s vow; through the relinquishing of discrimination against others on account of their wrongs; through the pacification of the obsession of anger; and through the pre- eminence of wisdom.
Energy is a proximate cause for the four foundations: through working for the welfare of others in accordance with one’s vows; through the relinquishing of dejection; through the pacification of unwholesome dhammas; and through the pre-eminence of wisdom.
Meditation is a proximate cause for the four foundations: through concern for the welfare of the world in accordance with one’s vow; through the relinquishing of the hindrances; through the pacification of the mind; and through the pre-eminence of wisdom.
And wisdom is a proximate cause for the four foundations: through skillful means in promoting the welfare of others in accordance with one’s vow; through the relinquishing of unskillful activity; through the pacification of the fevers springing from delusion; and through the attainment of omniscience.
The foundation of truth is practiced by acting in accordance with one’s vow and understanding;245
The foundation of truth is embraced by the threefold truth and opposed to the three corruptions .
The foundation of relinquishing is embraced by the threefold relinquishment and opposed to the three corruptions.
The foundation of peace is embraced by the threefold pacification and opposed to the three corruptions.
And the foundation of wisdom is embraced by the threefold knowledge and opposed to the three corruptions.
The foundation of truth embraces the foundations of relinquishment, peace, and wisdom through non-deceptiveness and through acting in accordance with one’s vow. The foundation of relinquishment embraces the foundations of truth, peace, and wisdom through the relinquishing of their opposites and as the fruit of relinquishing everything. The foundation of peace embraces the foundations of truth, relinquishment, and wisdom, through the pacification of the fever of defilement and the fever of kamma.246 And the foundation of wisdom embraces the foundations of truth, relinquishment, and peace, since they are all preceded and accompanied by knowledge. Thus all the pāramīs are grounded in truth, clarified by relinquishment, intensified by peace, and purified by wisdom.
For truth is the cause for their genesis,
In the beginning truth is the foundation, since his vow is made in accordance with truth. In the middle, relinquishment is the foundation, since after forming his aspiration the bodhisattva relinquishes himself for the welfare of others.
In the end, peace is the foundation, since the consummation is the attainment of perfect peace.
And in every phase—the beginning, the middle, and the end—wisdom is the foundation, since the entire career originates when wisdom is present, does not exist when it is absent, and because the nature accords with the vow.
Through the foundations of truth and relinquishment, which promote one’s own and others’ welfare and create reverence and love, the Great Men, as laymen, benefit others with material gifts.
And through the foundations of peace and wisdom, which likewise promote one’s own and others’ welfare and create reverence and love, the Great Men, as monks, benefit others with the gift of the Dhamma.
The fulfilment of the four foundations takes place in the bodhisattva’s last existence.
Some say that rebirth into the final existence takes place when the four foundations are fulfilled.
 the bodhisattva descends into his mother’s womb, remains there, and emerges mindfully and clearly comprehending through his commencement of the foundation of wisdom. Through his fulfilment of the foundations of truth,247 as soon as he is born he goes forward with a stride of seven steps facing north, surveys all the directions, and with a voice encompassed by truth, roars his lion’s roar three times: “I am the foremost in the world, I am pre-eminent in the world, I am supreme in the world.”
Through the commencement of the foundation of peace, when he sees the old man, the sick man, the corpse, and the monk, skilled in a section of the four truths, his intoxication with youth, health, and life becomes pacified.
And through the commencement of the foundation of relinquishment, he is able to relinquish without concern a great circle of relatives and the sovereignty of a world-ruling monarch that lay within his grasp.
Others hold, as a second position, that the four foundations are fulfilled with the enlightenment.
For through the commencement of the foundation of truth in accordance with his vow, he penetrates the Four Noble Truths; thus the foundation of truth is fulfilled.
Through the commencement of the foundation of relinquishment, he relinquishes all the defilements and corruptions; thus the foundation of relinquishment is fulfilled.
Through the commencement of the foundation of peace, he attains the supreme peace; thus the foundation of peace is fulfilled.
And through the commencement of the foundation of wisdom, he obtains the unobstructed knowledge; thus the foundation of wisdom is fulfilled.
But despite the ultimacy of the enlightenment, this position is untenable.
Others hold, as a third position, that the four foundations are fulfilled with the setting in motion of the Wheel of the Dhamma.
For having commenced the foundation of truth, he fulfils the foundation of truth by teaching the Four Noble Truths in their twelve modes.
Having commenced the foundation of relinquishment, he fulfils the foundation of relinquishment by making the great offering of the true Dhamma.
Having himself attained the supreme peace through his commencement of the foundation of peace, he fulfils the foundation of peace by to others.
And having commenced the foundation of wisdom, he fulfils the foundation of wisdom by understanding the propensities, etc., of the people to be trained.
This position, too, is not tenable, for even at this point the function of a Buddha has not yet been concluded.
Still others hold, as a fourth position, that the four foundations are fulfilled with the parinibbāna.
For with the parinibbāna, the foundation of truth is fulfilled by the attainment of the ultimate truth;
The virtue of one who has commenced the foundation of truth is to be known by living together with him.
The honesty of one who has commenced the foundation of relinquishment is to be known through intercourse with him.
The fortitude of one who has commenced the foundation of peace is to be known on occasions of misfortune.
And the wisdom of one who has commenced the foundation of wisdom is to be known through discussion with him.
Thus his purification of virtue, livelihood, mind, and view should be known.
Again, through his commencement of the foundation of truth, he does not follow a wrong course out of hatred, since he is free from deceptiveness.
Through his commencement of the foundation of relinquishment, he does not follow a wrong course out of greed, since he is without attachment.
Through his commencement of the foundation of peace, he does not follow a wrong course out of fear, since he is without obstruction.
And through his commencement of the foundation of wisdom, he does not follow a wrong course out of delusion, since he comprehends things as they really are.
Thus through the first foundation he tolerates without hatred: through the second he uses without greed: through the third he avoids without fear; and through the fourth he dispels without delusion.
Through the first he attains the happiness of renunciation, and through the others, the happiness of solitude, of peace, and of enlightenment, respectively.
So too, through the four foundations he attains, respectively, the rapture and happiness born of seclusion, the rapture and happiness born of concentration, the bodily happiness unaccompanied by rapture, and the happiness of equanimity born of the purification of mindfulness.
Thus it should be understood how the body of the pāramīs is included in the four foundations, which are adorned with numerous noble qualities.
And just as the pāramīs are all included in the four foundations, they are also included in wisdom and compassion.
For all the requisites of enlightenment can be included in wisdom and compassion,
 By what means are they accomplished?
The means by which the pāramīs are accomplished is the four- factored method: the accumulation without omission of all the requisites of merit, etc., for the sake of supreme enlightenment, by performing them without deficiency; performing them thoroughly with respect and high esteem; performing them perseveringly without interruption; and enduring effort over a long period without coming to a halt half-way.
We will explain the length of time later.
For the sake of the supreme enlightenment, the Great Being, striving for enlightenment, should first of all surrender himself to the Buddhas, thus: “I offer myself up to the Buddhas.”
And whenever he obtains any possession, he should first of all resolve upon it as a potential gift:
When he has made a mental determination to completely relinquish whatever possessions come his way, whether animate or inanimate, there are four shackles to giving , namely: not being accustomed to giving in the past, the inferiority of the object to be given, the excellence and beauty of the object, and worry over the loss of the object. When the bodhisattva possesses objects that can be given and suppliants are present, but his mind does not leap up at the thought of giving and he does not want to give,
he should conclude: “Surely, I have not been accustomed to giving in the past, therefore a desire to give does not arise now in my mind.
So that my mind will delight in giving in the future, I will give a gift. With an eye for the future let me now relinquish what I have to those in need.” Thus he gives a gift— generous, open-handed, delighting in relinquishing, one who gives when asked, delighting in giving and in sharing.
In this way the Great Being destroys, shatters, and eradicates the first shackle to giving.
Again, when the object to be given is inferior or defective, the Great Being reflects: “Because I was not inclined to giving in the past, at present my requisites are defective. Therefore, though it pains me, let me give whatever I have as a gift even if the object is low and inferior. In that way I will, in the future, reach the peak in the perfection of giving.”
Thus he gives whatever kind of gift he can— generous, open-handed, delighting in relinquishing, one who gives when asked, delighting in giving and in sharing.
In this way the Great Being destroys, shatters, and eradicates the second shackle to giving.
When a reluctance to give arises due to the excellence or beauty of the object to be given, the Great Being admonishes himself: “Good man, haven’t you made the aspiration for the supreme enlightenment, the loftiest and most superior of all states? Well then, for the sake of enlightenment, it is proper for you to give excellent and beautiful objects as gifts.”
Thus he gives what is excellent and beautiful—generous, open-handed, delighting in relinquishing, one who gives when asked, delighting in giving and in sharing.
In this way the Great Man destroys, shatters, and eradicates the third shackle to giving.
When the Great Being is giving a gift, and he sees the loss of the object being given, he reflects thus: “This is the nature of material possessions, that they are subject to loss and to passing away.
Moreover, it is because I did not give such gifts in the past that my possessions are now depleted. Let me then give whatever I have as a gift, whether it be limited or abundant. In that way I will, in the future, reach the peak in the perfection of giving.”
Thus he gives whatever he has as a gift—generous, open-handed, delighting in relinquishing, one who gives when asked, delighting in giving and in sharing.
In this way the Great Being destroys, shatters, and eradicates the fourth shackle to giving.
Reflecting upon them thus in whatever way is appropriate is the means for dispelling the harmful shackles to the perfection of giving.
The same method used for the perfection of giving also applies to the perfection of virtue and the other perfections.
Further, self-surrender to the Buddhas is also a means for the complete accomplishment of the pāramīs.
For when the Great Man, straining and striving for the fulfilment of the requisites of enlightenment, encounters troubles difficult to endure, depriving him of happiness and his means of support, or when he encounters injuries imposed by beings and formations—difficult to overcome, violent, sapping the vitality—then, since he has surrendered himself to the Buddhas, he reflects: “I have relinquished my very self to the Buddhas. Whatever comes, let it come.” For this reason he does not waver, does not quake, does not undergo the least vacillation, but remains absolutely unshaken in his determination to undertake the good.
For by fully understanding all dhammas in accordance with their nature, the Great Being who has formed the resolution to attain the supreme enlightenment remains untainted by them, and his self-love thereby becomes eliminated and exhausted. Then, since through the repeated practice of great compassion he has come to regard all beings as his dear children, his loving kindness, compassion, and affection for them increase. In conformity with this stage the Great Man, having expelled the defilements such as stinginess, etc., opposed to the requisites of enlightenment, and dispelled greed, hatred, and delusion in regard to himself and others, further causes people to enter and reach maturity in the three vehicles by benefitting them to the utmost with the four bases of beneficence which accompany the four foundations, namely: giving, loving speech, beneficent conduct, and equality of treatment.
For the great compassion and the great wisdom of the Great Beings are adorned by giving. Their giving is adorned and accompanied by loving speech, loving speech by beneficent conduct, and beneficent conduct by equality of treatment.
When the bodhisattvas are practicing the requisites of enlightenment, they treat all beings without exception as equal with themselves, and perfect their sense of equality by remaining the same under all circumstances, pleasant or painful.
And when they become Buddhas, their ability to train people is perfected by benefitting them to the utmost with these same four bases of beneficence brought to fulfilment by the four foundations.
For the perfectly enlightened Buddhas, the base of giving is brought to fulfilment by the foundation of relinquishment, the base of loving speech by the foundation of truth, the base of beneficent conduct by the foundation of wisdom, and the base of equal treatment by the foundation of peace.
For in regard to parinibbāna, all the disciples and paccekabuddhas are completely equal to the Tathāgatas;
Thus it is said: “There is no diversity among them in regard to emancipation” .
He is truthful, generous, and peaceful, Endowed with wisdom and sympathy,
He is the great compassionate Teacher, Equanimous yet seeking the welfare of all,
Still he abides devoted to their welfare, Oh, how wonderful is the Conqueror!
Always engaged in work promoting The welfare and happiness of all living beings,
the three stages in the perfection of energy, as striving for the relinquishing of the aforementioned things; the three stages in the perfection of patience, as the endurance of obstacles to one’s belongings, limbs, and life; the three stages in the perfection of truthfulness, as the non- abandoning of truthfulness on account of one’s belongings, limbs, and life; the three stages in the perfection of determination, as unshakable determination despite the destruction of one’s belongings, limbs, and life, bearing in mind that the pāramīs ultimately succeed through unflinching determination; the three stages in the perfection of loving kindness, as maintaining loving kindness towards beings who destroy one’s belongings, etc; and the three stages in the perfection of equanimity, as maintaining an attitude of impartial neutrality towards beings and formations whether they are helpful or harmful in regard to the aforementioned three bases . In this way the analysis of the pāramīs should be understood
When this set is considered, the perfection of renunciation, as the going forth into homelessness, is included in the perfection of virtue; as seclusion from the hindrances, in the perfection of meditation; and as a generally wholesome dhamma, in all six pāramitās.
and the perfection of equanimity in the perfections of meditation and of wisdom.
the foundation of relinquishment by relinquishing their opposites;
the foundation of peace by pacifying their opposites with all the qualities of the pāramīs;
and the foundation of wisdom by skillful means in promoting the welfare of others through those same qualities.
the foundation of relinquishment by relinquishing objects of sense enjoyment and the defilement of sensuality;
the foundation of peace by the pacification of hatred and suffering;
and the foundation of wisdom by understanding and penetration.
relinquishment the cause for their acquisition, peace the cause for their growth, and wisdom the cause for their purification.
the foundation of relinquishment, by the relinquishing of all the strata of existence;
the foundation of peace, by the pacification of all formations;
Herein, after he has commenced the foundation of truth, the Great Man’s fulfilment of the foundation of truth is particularly evident at his birth, which is the field for his loving kindness. After he has commenced the foundation of wisdom, his fulfilment of the foundation of wisdom is particularly evident at his enlightenment, which is the field for his compassion. After he has commenced the foundation of relinquishment, his fulfilment of the foundation of relinquishment is particularly evident when he sets in motion the Wheel of the Dhamma, which is the field for his sympathetic joy. And after he has commenced the foundation of peace, his fulfilment of the foundation of peace is particularly evident at his parinibbāna, which is the field for his equanimity.
and the foundation of wisdom, by the completion of the purpose of wisdom.248
and the noble qualities such as giving , accompanied by wisdom and compassion, are the requisites for the great enlightenment culminating in the perfection of Buddhahood.
“Whatever requisite of life comes my way, that I will give to those who need it, and I myself will only use what remains over from this gift.”
In brief, the destruction of self-love and the development of love for others are the means for the accomplishing of the pāramīs.
they are identical, without any distinction.
Complete in all the requisites, What good can he not achieve?
Free from concern on all occasions, Oh, how wonderful is the Conqueror!
Dispassionate towards all dhammas, And towards all beings of equal mind,
He never ceases on account of the trouble— Oh, how wonderful is the Conqueror!
The Blessed Lord is able, here and now,894 to enjoy the surpassing895 happiness of dwelling in the four jhanas.
and there will be in the future, Arahant Buddhas equal in enlightenment to myself.’
when being endowed with such power and influence he does not make a display of himself!
How much time is required to accomplish them?
As a minimum, four incalculables and a hundred thousand great aeons ; as a middle figure, eight incalculables and a hundred thousand great aeons; and as a maximum, sixteen incalculables and a hundred thousand great aeons.249
For those in whom wisdom is predominant, faith is weakest and wisdom keenest; for those in whom faith is predominant, wisdom is middling ; and for those in whom energy is predominant, wisdom is weakest . But supreme enlightenment must be achieved by the power of wisdom; so it is said in the commentary.
But others say that the classification of the time required for bodhisattvas obtains by way of the keen, middling, and tender quality of their energy.
Still others say that without distinction the three divisions of time correspond to the time required for their requisites of enlightenment to reach fulfilment, which in turn is determined by the keen, middling, and tender quality of their factors maturing towards emancipation .
Bodhisattvas also become threefold at the moment they form the aspiration, according to their division into those who comprehend through a condensed teaching , those who comprehend through an elaborated teaching , and those who are capable of training .250
The second has such supporting conditions that, if he were disposed towards the enlightenment of a disciple, he could attain arahatship together with the six direct knowledges while listening to a four-line stanza from the lips of the Exalted One, even while the fourth line has not yet been concluded.
And the third has the supporting conditions to attain arahatship together with the six direct knowledges when the four-line stanza he hears from the Exalted One has been concluded.
These three types, who form their aspirations without any allotted division of time, receive predictions directly from the Buddhas.
Then they fulfil the pāramīs in order and reach the supreme enlightenment according to the aforementioned time allotted to each type. But that these Great Beings—day by day giving great gifts like those given by Vessantara,251 accumulating all the other pāramīs in the same way, making the five great relinquishings, reaching the summit in conduct for the good of relatives, conduct for the good of the world, and conduct developing intelligence—should become perfectly enlightened Buddhas before the time allotted to their respective types is fulfilled, this is not possible.
Why?
Because their knowledge is not yet mature enough and their accumulation of the factors culminating in Buddhahood not yet complete.
For just as grain ripens only after the lapse of the time required , so too the supreme enlightenment is perfected only after the lapse of the aforementioned periods of time. Before then, even though striving with all his might, the bodhisattva cannot attain enlightenment. The pāramīs are fulfilled according to the aforementioned distinction of time. Thus it should be understood.
 What benefits do they bring?
The benefits obtained by bodhisattvas who have formed their aspirations are explained thus:
They never appear as tawny titans Or ghosts consumed by hunger and thirst.
Though reborn in the plane of woe, They do not take on minor forms,
Their hearing is intact from birth, Nor are they dumb or lame of limb.
They never become of female sex, Eunuchs or hermaphrodites.
Those men bound for enlightenment
They never hold inverted views But recognize the law of kamma.
They are born at times in heavenly worlds, But not in the insentient
Those true men bent on renunciation, Detached from all the planes of existence,
Some other benefits of the pāramīs are the following: the sixteen wonderful and marvellous qualities that begin: “Mindful and clearly comprehending, Ānanda, the bodhisattva passes away from the Tusita heaven and descends into his mother’s womb” ; the thirty- two portents, such as “cold disappears and heat is allayed,” and “when the bodhisattva is born, this ten-thousandfold world system shakes, trembles, and quakes,” etc. ; and the other qualities shown here and there in the Jātakas, the Buddhavaṃsa, etc., such as the fulfilment of the bodhisattva’s wishes, his mastery over kamma, and so forth.
Other benefits are the pairs of complementary qualities such as non- greed and non-hatred already discussed.
Moreover, from the time that he makes the aspiration, the bodhisattva becomes like a father to all beings, wishing for their welfare. By reason of his distinguished qualities he is worthy of offerings, worthy of reverence, worthy of esteem, a supreme field of merit.
He is generally dear to humans and to non-humans alike, and is protected by deities.
Because his mind is grounded in loving kindness and compassion, he cannot be harmed by wild beasts, etc. Whatever order of beings he is reborn in, on account of his distinguished merit, he surpasses the other beings there in his superior beauty, fame, happiness, strength, and dominion. He is healthy and robust. His faith is very pure and lucid. His energy, mindfulness, concentration, and wisdom are also very pure and lucid. His defilements, disturbances, and passions are weak. Because his defilements are weak, he is easy to admonish, adroit, patient, meek, congenial, and hospitable. He is free from anger, malice, denigration, domineering, envy, stinginess, craftiness, hypo- crisy, obstinacy, pride, presumption, and negligence. He endures torments at the hands of others but never torments anyone himself. Whenever he enters a village area, the unarisen dangers and calamities facing the beings there generally do not arise, and those that have arisen subside. And whenever he is reborn in the planes of misery, unlike the common inhabitants there, he is not oppressed by excessive suffering but acquires an even greater sense of spiritual urgency.
Therefore these distinguished qualities of the Great Man—such as being like a father to beings, being worthy of offerings, etc.—found in this or that state of existence, are the benefits of the pāramīs.
Further, the accomplishment of life span, the accomplishment of form, the accomplishment of family, the accomplishment of sovereignty, credibility, and greatness of spiritual power are also benefits of the Great Man’s pāramīs.
Therein, the “accomplishment of life span” is length of life or longevity in whatever state of exist- ence he takes rebirth in; by this means he concludes whatever wholesome undertakings he began and accumulates many wholesome qualities.
The “accomplishment of form” is beauty of form, comeliness, or loveliness; by this means he inspires confidence and esteem in beings who take physical form as their standard.
The “accomplishment of family” is rebirth in excellent families; by this means he is to be worth approaching and ministering to by beings who are intoxicated with the vanity of birth, etc.
“Credibility” means trustworthiness, reliability; by this means he becomes an authority for beings, and his command cannot be disregarded.
“Greatness of spiritual power” means magnitude of spiritual power; by this means he cannot be vanquished by others, but he himself invari- ably vanquishes them—by Dhamma, by righteousness, and by his genuine noble qualities. Thus the accomplishment of life span and the rest are benefits of the Great Man’s pāramīs. These are the cause for the growth of his own boundless requisites of merit, and the means by which he leads other beings to enter and reach maturity in the three vehicles.
 What is their fruit?
Their fruit is, in brief, the state of perfect Buddhahood. In detail, it is the acquisition of the form-body resplendent with the multitude of meritorious qualities such as the thirty-two characteristics of a Great Man, the eighty minor marks of physical beauty, the fathom-wide aura, etc.; and, founded upon this, the glorious Dhamma- body radiant with its collection of infinite and boundless meritorious qualities—the ten powers, the four grounds of self-confidence, the six kinds of knowledge not held in common with others, the eighteen unique Buddha-dhammas, and so forth.252
And so numerous are the Buddha-qualities that even a perfectly enlightened Buddha could not finish describing them, even after many aeons. This is their fruit.
And it is said:
If a Buddha were to speak in praise of a Buddha, Speaking nothing else through the duration of an aeon,
This threefold division obtains by way of those in whom wisdom is predominant, those in whom faith is predominant, and those in whom energy is predominant, respectively.
Among these, he who comprehends through a condensed teaching has such supporting conditions that, if he were disposed towards the enlightenment of a disciple, he could attain arahatship together with the four discriminations and the six direct knowledges while listening to a four-line stanza from the lips of a perfectly enlightened Buddha, even while the third line has not yet been concluded.
Those men in all factors complete, Bound for perfect enlightenment,
Though wandering through the round of births For countless aeons yet to come
Never arise in Avīci hell, Nor in the intermundane voids.
And when reborn in the world of men They never come deprived of sight.
Never commit the five dark deeds. Always pure in their way of life,
or pure abodes.
Plough their course for the good of the world, Striving to fulfil the pāramīs.
The “accomplishment of sovereignty” is great- ness of power, greatness of influence, and greatness of retinue; by means of these he is able to benefit with the four bases of beneficence those who need to be benefited and to restrain with Dhamma those who need to be restrained.
Sooner would the long-standing aeon reach its end, But the praise of the Tathāgata would not reach its end.
that the Blessed Lord
does not make display of himself! ‘
so it is.
he does not make a display of himself.’
“that one will, by following instructions, by the complete destruction of three fetters and the reduction of greed, hatred and delusion, become a Once-Retumer, and having returned once more to this world, will put an end to suffering”;
“that one will, by following instructions, by the complete destruction of the five lower fetters, be spontaneously reborn,885 and there will reach Nibbana without returning from that world”;
“that one will, by following instructions, by the destruction of the corrup­tions, gain in this very life the deliverance of mind, the de­liverance through wisdom which is uncorrupted, and which one has understood and realised by one’s own super-know­ledge.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Sakyans in the mansion in the mango grove of the Sakyan family called Vedhañña Archer.
And on that occasion Nigaṇṭha Nāṭaputta had just died in Pāvā.
On his death, the Nigaṇṭhas had split into two factions. They kept arguing, quarreling, & disputing, stabbing one another with weapons of the mouth: “You don’t understand this Dhamma-Vinaya. I understand this Dhamma-Vinaya. How could you understand this Dhamma-Vinaya?
You practice wrongly. I practice rightly.
I’m consistent. You’re inconsistent.
What should be said first, you said last. What should be said last, you said first.
What you cogitated so long has been turned inside out. Your position has been overthrown. You’re trapped, so go try to release your position or disentangle yourself if you can!”
Nothing but slaughter, as it were, was being committed among the Nigaṇṭha Nāṭa-sons.
Even the lay disciples of Nigaṇṭha Nāṭaputta, dressed in white, seemed disenchanted, disgusted, & repelled by the Nigaṇṭha Nāṭa-sons, and at how that poorly proclaimed Dhamma-Vinaya was poorly expounded, not leading out, not conducive to calming, expounded by one who was not rightly self-awakened, its foundation now broken, without an arbiter.1
Then Cunda the novice, who had spent the Rains at Pāvā, went to Ven. Ānanda at Sāmagāma and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven. Ānanda, “Venerable sir, Nigaṇṭha Nāṭaputta has just died in Pāvā.
On his death, the Nigaṇṭhas have split into two factions. They keep arguing, quarreling, & disputing, stabbing one another with weapons of the mouth: ‘You don’t understand this Dhamma-Vinaya. I understand this Dhamma-Vinaya. How could you understand this Dhamma-Vinaya? You practice wrongly. I practice rightly. I’m consistent. You’re inconsistent. What should be said first, you said last. What should be said last, you said first. What you cogitated so long has been turned inside out. Your position has been overthrown. You’re trapped, so go try to release your position or disentangle yourself if you can!’ Nothing but slaughter, as it were, is being committed among the Nigaṇṭha Nāṭa-sons. Even the lay disciples of Nigaṇṭha Nāṭaputta, dressed in white, seem disenchanted, disgusted, & repelled by the Nigaṇṭha Nāṭa-sons, and at how that poorly proclaimed Dhamma-Vinaya was poorly expounded, not leading out, not conducive to calming, expounded by one who was not rightly self-awakened, its support now broken, without an arbiter.”
When this was said, Ven. Ānanda said to Cunda the novice, “Friend Cunda, there is warrant here for talking to the Blessed One.
Let’s go to the Blessed One and, on arrival, report this matter to him.”
“As you say, venerable sir,” Cunda the novice responded to Ven. Ānanda.
Then Ven. Ānanda & Cunda the novice went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, Ven. Ānanda said to the Blessed One, “Lord, Cunda the novice, here, has said that Nigaṇṭha Nāṭaputta has just died in Pāvā. … Even the lay disciples of Nigaṇṭha Nāṭaputta, dressed in white, seem disenchanted, disgusted, & repelled by the Nigaṇṭha Nāṭa-sons, and at how that poorly proclaimed Dhamma-Vinaya was poorly expounded, not leading out, not conducive to calming, expounded by one who was not rightly self-awakened, its support broken, without an arbiter.”
“That’s the way it is, Cunda, with a poorly proclaimed Dhamma-Vinaya, poorly expounded, not leading out, not conducive to calming, expounded by one who is not rightly self-awakened.
“There is the case, Cunda, where a teacher is not rightly self-awakened, and his Dhamma-Vinaya is poorly proclaimed, poorly expounded, not leading out, not conducive to calming, expounded by one who is not rightly self-awakened. A disciple of that Dhamma does not dwell practicing the Dhamma in accordance with that Dhamma, practicing masterfully, living in line with that Dhamma, but deviates from it.
He is to be told, ‘It is a gain for you, friend, well-gained by you, that—when your teacher is not rightly self-awakened, and his Dhamma-Vinaya is poorly proclaimed, poorly expounded, not leading out, not conducive to calming, expounded by one who is not rightly self-awakened—
There, Cunda, the teacher is to be criticized, the Dhamma is to be criticized, but the disciple is to be thus praised.
“Whoever might say to such a disciple, ‘Come, friend, practice in line with the Dhamma as taught and formulated by your teacher’:
Why is that?
That’s the way it is, Cunda, with a poorly proclaimed Dhamma-Vinaya, poorly expounded, not leading out, not conducive to calming, expounded by one who is not rightly self-awakened.
“There is the case, Cunda, where a teacher is not rightly self-awakened, and his Dhamma-Vinaya is poorly proclaimed, poorly expounded, not leading out, not conducive to calming, expounded by one who is not rightly self-awakened. A disciple of that Dhamma dwells practicing the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma, practicing masterfully, living in line with the Dhamma, and acts to conform to it.
He is to be told, ‘It is no gain for you, friend, poorly-gained by you, that—when your teacher is not rightly self-awakened, and his Dhamma-Vinaya, is poorly proclaimed, poorly expounded, not leading out, not conducive to calming, expounded by one who is not rightly self-awakened—
There, Cunda, the teacher is to be criticized, the Dhamma is to be criticized, and the disciple is to be thus criticized.
“Whoever might say to such a disciple, ‘Yes, friend, practicing the right way, you will succeed in the right way’:
Why is that?
That’s the way it is, Cunda, with a poorly proclaimed Dhamma-Vinaya, poorly expounded, not leading out, not conducive to calming, expounded by one who is not rightly self-awakened.
“There is the case, Cunda, where a teacher is rightly self-awakened, and his Dhamma-Vinaya, is well-proclaimed, well-expounded, leading out, conducive to calming, expounded by one who is rightly self-awakened. A disciple of that Dhamma does not dwell practicing the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma, practicing masterfully, living in line with the Dhamma, but deviates from it.
He is to be told, ‘It is no gain for you, friend, poorly-gained by you, that—when your teacher is rightly self-awakened, and his Dhamma-Vinaya is well-proclaimed, well-expounded, leading out, conducive to calming, expounded by one who is rightly self-awakened—
There, Cunda, the teacher is to be praised, the Dhamma is to be praised, but the disciple is to be thus criticized.
“Whoever might say to such a disciple, ‘Come, friend, practice in line with the Dhamma as taught and formulated by your teacher’:
Why is that?
That’s the way it is, Cunda, with a well-proclaimed Dhamma-Vinaya, well-expounded, leading out, conducive to calming, expounded by one who is rightly self-awakened.
“There is the case, Cunda, where a teacher is rightly self-awakened, and his Dhamma-Vinaya, is well-proclaimed, well-expounded, leading out, conducive to calming, expounded by one who is rightly self-awakened. A disciple of that Dhamma dwells practicing the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma, practicing masterfully, living in line with the Dhamma, and acts to conform to it.
He is to be told, ‘It is a gain for you, friend, well-gained by you, that—when your teacher is rightly self-awakened, and his Dhamma-Vinaya is well-proclaimed, well-expounded, leading out, conducive to calming, expounded by one who is rightly self-awakened—
There, Cunda, the teacher is to be praised, the Dhamma is to be praised, and the disciple is to be thus praised.
“Whoever might say to such a disciple, ‘Yes, friend, practicing the right way, you will succeed in the right way’:
Why is that?
That’s the way it is, Cunda, with a well-proclaimed Dhamma-Vinaya, well-expounded, leading out, conducive to calming, expounded by one who is rightly self-awakened.
“There is the case, Cunda, where a teacher has appeared in the world, worthy & rightly self-awakened. And the Dhamma is well-proclaimed, well-expounded, leading out, conducive to calming, expounded by one who is rightly self-awakened. But his disciples have not been instructed in the meaning/goal of the True Dhamma,2 nor has the complete holy life been entirely disclosed to them, made plain, with all its steps collected, complete with miracles,3 well-proclaimed as far as human beings & devas.
Then their teacher disappears.
When a teacher of that sort has died, it is a matter of regret for his disciples.
Why is that?
Because: ‘A teacher has appeared in the world, worthy & rightly self-awakened. And the Dhamma is well-proclaimed, well-expounded, leading out, conducive to calming, expounded by one who is rightly self-awakened. But we have not been instructed in the meaning/goal of the True Dhamma, nor has the complete holy life been entirely disclosed to us, made plain, with all its steps collected, complete with miracles, well-proclaimed as far as human beings & devas,
When a teacher of that sort has died, it is a matter of regret for his disciples.
“But then there is the case, Cunda, where a teacher has appeared in the world, worthy & rightly self-awakened.
And the Dhamma is well-proclaimed, well-expounded, leading out, conducive to calming, expounded by one who is rightly self-awakened.
His disciples have been instructed in the meaning/goal of the True Dhamma, and the complete holy life has been entirely disclosed to them, made plain, with all its steps collected, complete with miracles, well-proclaimed as far as human beings & devas.
Then their teacher disappears.
When a teacher of that sort has died, it is a matter of no regret for his disciples.
Why is that?
Because: ‘A teacher has appeared in the world, worthy & rightly self-awakened.
And the Dhamma is well-proclaimed, well-expounded, leading out, conducive to calming, expounded by one who is rightly self-awakened.
And we have been instructed in the meaning/goal of the True Dhamma, and the complete holy life has been entirely disclosed to us, made plain, with all its steps collected, complete with miracles, well-proclaimed as far as human beings & devas,
When a teacher of that sort has died, it is a matter of no regret for his disciples.
“Now, if a holy life is endowed with those factors, yet there is no teacher who is an elder, of long standing, long gone forth, senior, attained to old age,
But when a holy life is endowed with those factors, and there is a teacher who is an elder, of long standing, long gone forth, senior, attained to old age,
“But if a holy life is endowed with those factors, and there is a teacher who is an elder, of long standing, long gone forth, senior, attained to old age, yet there are no elder monk disciples of his that are experienced, trained, mature, attained to security from the yoke,
But when a holy life is endowed with those factors, and there is a teacher who is an elder, of long standing, long gone forth, senior, attained to old age, and there are elder monk disciples of his who are experienced, trained, mature, attained to security from the yoke,
“But if a holy life is endowed with those factors, and there is a teacher who is an elder, of long standing, long gone forth, senior, attained to old age, and there are elder monk disciples of his who are experienced, trained, mature, attained to security from the yoke,
“But when a holy life is endowed with those factors, and there is a teacher who is an elder, of long standing, long gone forth, senior, attained to old age, and there are elder monk disciples of his who are experienced, trained, mature, attained to security from the yoke,
“Cunda, I am now a teacher who has appeared in the world, worthy & rightly self-awakened.
And the Dhamma is well-proclaimed, well-expounded, leading out, conducive to calming, expounded by one who is rightly self-awakened.
My disciples have been instructed in the meaning/goal of the True Dhamma, and the complete holy life has been entirely disclosed to them, made plain, with all its steps collected, complete with miracles, well-proclaimed as far as human beings & devas.
I am now a teacher who is an elder, of long standing, long gone forth, senior, attained to old age.
“There are now elder monk disciples of mine who are experienced, trained, mature, attained to security from the yoke,
There are now monk disciples of mine of middle standing. There are now junior monk disciples of mine. There are now elder nun disciples of mine… nun disciples of mine of middle standing… junior nun disciples of mine… male lay disciples of mine, householders wearing white, following the celibate life… male lay disciples of mine, householders wearing white, partaking of sensuality… female lay disciples of mine, householders wearing white, following the celibate life. There are now female lay disciples of mine, householders wearing white, partaking of sensuality; and my holy life has now become powerful, prosperous, detailed, well-populated, wide-spread, proclaimed among devas & human beings.
“Cunda, to the extent that I am now a teacher who has appeared in the world, I do not see any other teacher who has attained supremacy in terms of gains & supremacy in terms of status equal to what I have.
And to the extent that my community or group has appeared in the world, I do not see any other community that has attained supremacy in terms of gains & supremacy in terms of status, equal to what the Saṅgha of monks has.
“If one speaking rightly were to say, ‘a well-expounded, entirely complete, well-proclaimed holy life, consummate in all its aspects, complete in all its aspects, with nothing lacking & nothing in excess,’
“Udaka Rāmaputta5 once made this statement: ‘Seeing, one doesn’t see.’
And what is it that, ‘seeing, one doesn’t see’?
One sees the blade of a well-sharpened razor, but not the edge of the razor.
This, Cunda, is called, ‘seeing, one doesn’t see.’
But this statement of Uddaka Rāmaputta is base, vulgar, common, ignoble, unprofitable, dealing only with a razor.
“But how would one, speaking rightly, say, ‘Seeing, one doesn’t see’? One speaking rightly, would say just this: ‘Seeing, one doesn’t see.’
And what is it that, ‘seeing, one doesn’t see’?
Such a well-expounded, entirely complete, well-proclaimed holy life, consummate in all its aspects, complete in all its aspects, with nothing lacking and nothing in excess: This is what one sees.
One doesn’t see, ‘If this were taken away from here, it would become purer.’
One doesn’t see, ‘If this were added here, it would become more complete.’
This is called, ‘seeing, one doesn’t see.’
“Cunda, if one speaking rightly were to say, ‘a well-expounded, entirely complete, well-proclaimed holy life, consummate in all its aspects, complete in all its aspects, with nothing lacking and nothing in excess,’
“Therefore, Cunda, with regard to the qualities I have taught, having directly known them, you should all, having assembled & gathered together, recite & compare6 meaning with meaning, expression with expression, so that this holy life may long endure & remain steadfast for the benefit, welfare, & happiness of the multitude; out of sympathy for the world; for the benefit, welfare, & happiness of human beings & devas.
And which are the qualities I have taught that you should all, having assembled & gathered together, recite & compare meaning with meaning, expression with expression, so that this holy life may long endure & remain steadfast for the benefit, welfare, & happiness of the multitude; out of sympathy for the world; for the benefit, welfare, & happiness of human beings & devas?
The four establishings of mindfulness, the four right exertions, the four bases of power, the five faculties, the five strengths, the seven factors for awakening, the noble eightfold path.7
that you should all, having assembled & gathered together, recite & compare meaning with meaning, expression with expression, so that this holy life may long endure & remain steadfast for the benefit, welfare, & happiness of the multitude; out of sympathy for the world; for the benefit, welfare, & happiness of human beings & devas. In them, you should train yourselves harmoniously, cordially, without dispute.
“If one of your fellows in the holy life should speak of the Dhamma in the Saṅgha,
you should express neither delight nor scorn. Neither delighting nor scorning, you should say to him, ‘With regard to this meaning, friend, there are these expressions or those expressions. Which are the more pertinent? And with regard to these expressions, there is this meaning or that meaning. Which is the more pertinent?’
“If he should say, ‘Friends, with regard to this meaning, these expressions are more pertinent than those; and with regard to these expressions, this meaning is more pertinent than that,’ then he is neither to be praised nor disparaged.
Neither praising nor disparaging him, you should show him how to examine that meaning & those expressions.
“If another one of your fellows in the holy life should speak of the Dhamma in the Saṅgha,
you should express neither delight nor scorn. Neither delighting nor scorning, you should say to him, ‘With regard to these expressions, there is this meaning or that meaning. Which is the more pertinent?’
“If he should say, ‘Friends, with regard to these expressions, this meaning is more pertinent than that,’ then he is neither to be praised nor disparaged.
Neither praising nor disparaging him, you should show him how to examine that meaning.
“If another one of your fellows in the holy life should speak of the Dhamma in the Saṅgha,
you should express neither delight nor scorn. Neither delighting nor scorning, you should say to him, ‘With regard to this meaning, friend, there are these expressions or those expressions. Which are the more pertinent?’
“If he should say, ‘Friends, with regard to this meaning, these expressions are more pertinent than those,’ then he is neither to be praised nor disparaged.
Neither praising nor disparaging him, you should show him how to examine those expressions.
“If another one of your fellows in the holy life should speak of the Dhamma in the Saṅgha,
saying, ‘Excellent,’ you should express delight & rejoice in his statement. Expressing delight & rejoicing in his statement, saying, ‘Excellent,’ you should say to him, ‘It’s a gain for us, friend, a great gain, that we see a venerable one like you who has entered into the meaning and the expression in this way.’
“Cunda, I don’t teach you the Dhamma only for the restraint of effluents in the present life,
I teach you the Dhamma both for the restraint of effluents in the present life and for the warding off of effluents in the afterlife.
“Therefore, the robe I have allowed you is enough simply to counteract cold, to counteract heat, to counteract the touch of flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, & reptiles; simply for the purpose of covering the parts of the body that cause shame.
“The alms food I have allowed you is enough simply for the survival & continuance of this body, for ending its afflictions, for the support of the holy life, thinking, ‘Thus will I destroy old feelings and not create new feelings . I will maintain myself, be blameless, & live in comfort.’
“The lodgings I have allowed you are enough simply to counteract cold, to counteract heat, to counteract the touch of flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, & reptiles; simply for protection from the inclemencies of weather and for the enjoyment of seclusion.
“The medicinal requisites used for curing the sick that I have allowed you are enough simply to counteract any pains of illness that have arisen and for maximum freedom from disease.
“Now, it’s possible, Cunda, that wanderers of other sects might say, ‘The Sakyan-son contemplatives live devoted to the devotion to pleasure.’
When they are saying that, the wanderers of other sects should be told, ‘Which devotion to pleasure, friends?
—for devotion to pleasure has many modes, many permutations.’
8 “There are four devotions to pleasure, Cunda, that are base, vulgar, common, ignoble, unprofitable, that do not lead to disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, calming, direct knowledge, self-awakening, or unbinding.
Which four?
“There is the case where a certain fool finds pleasure & rapture for himself in killing living beings.
This is the first devotion to pleasure.
“Further, there is the case where a certain person finds pleasure & rapture for himself in taking what is not given.
“Further, there is the case where a certain person finds pleasure & rapture for himself in telling lies.
This is the third devotion to pleasure.
“Further, there is the case where a certain person goes about endowed & provided with the five strings of sensuality.
This is the fourth devotion to pleasure.
“These are the four devotions to pleasure, Cunda, that are base, vulgar, common, ignoble, unprofitable, that do not lead to disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, calming, direct knowledge, self-awakening, or unbinding.
“Now, it’s possible that wanderers of other sects might say, ‘The Sakyan-son contemplatives live devoted to these four devotions to pleasure.’
They are to be told, ‘Not so!’
They would not be speaking rightly of you. They would be slandering you with what is unfactual & untrue.
“There are four devotions to pleasure, Cunda, that lead exclusively to disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, calming, direct knowledge, self-awakening, & unbinding.
Which four?
“There is the case where a monk, quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters & remains in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
This is the first devotion to pleasure.
“Further, Cunda, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, the monk enters & remains in the second jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation—internal assurance.
This is the second devotion to pleasure.
“Further, Cunda, with the fading of rapture, the monk remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body. He enters & remains in the third jhāna, of which the noble ones declare, ‘Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.’
This is the third devotion to pleasure.
“Further, Cunda, with the abandoning of pleasure & pain—as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress—the monk enters & remains in the fourth jhāna: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
This is the fourth devotion to pleasure.
“These are the four devotions to pleasure that lead exclusively to disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, calming, direct knowledge, self-awakening, & unbinding.
“Now, it’s possible, Cunda, that wanderers of other sects might say, ‘The Sakyan-son contemplatives live devoted to these four devotions to pleasure.’
They are to be told, ‘That is so!’
They would be speaking rightly of you. They would not be slandering you with what is unfactual & untrue.
“It’s possible that wanderers of other sects might say, ‘Living devoted to these four devotions to pleasure, friends, what fruits, what rewards can be expected?’
“The wanderers of other sects saying that are to be told, ‘Living devoted to these four devotions to pleasure, friends, four fruits, four rewards can be expected.
Which four?
“‘Friends, there is the case where a monk, with the wasting away of three fetters, is a stream-enterer, certain, never again destined for the lower realms, headed for self-awakening.
This is the first fruit, the first reward.
“‘Further, friends, the monk—with the wasting away of three fetters, and with the attenuation of passion, aversion, & delusion—is a once-returner; who, on returning only once more to this world, will make an ending to stress.
This is the second fruit, the second reward.
“‘Further, the monk—with the wasting away of the five lower fetters—is due to arise spontaneously , there to totally unbind, destined never again to return from that world.
This is the third fruit, the third reward.
“‘Further, the monk—with the ending of effluents—enters & remains in the effluent-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having directly known & realized it for himself right in the here & now.
“‘Living devoted to these four devotions to pleasure, friends, these four fruits, these four rewards can be expected.’
“Now, it’s possible, Cunda, that wanderers of other sects might say, ‘The Sakan-son contemplatives live without an established Dhamma.’
The wanderers of other sects saying that should be told, ‘There are, friends, Dhammas taught & formulated by the Blessed One—the one who knows, the one who sees, worthy, & rightly self-awakened—that are not to be transgressed throughout life.
Just like a gate post or iron post that is deeply buried, well-planted, immovable, unshakable,
“‘Friends, an arahant monk whose effluents are ended, who has reached fulfillment, done the task, laid down the burden, attained the true goal, totally destroyed the fetter of becoming, and who is released through right gnosis, cannot possibly transgress nine principles:
“‘ It is impossible for a monk whose effluents are ended to intentionally deprive a living being of life. It is impossible for a monk whose effluents are ended to take, in the manner of stealing, what is not given. It is impossible for a monk whose effluents are ended to engage in sexual intercourse. It is impossible for a monk whose effluents are ended to tell a conscious lie. It is impossible for a monk whose effluents are ended to consume stored-up sensual things as he did before, when he was a householder. “‘ It is impossible for a monk whose effluents are ended to follow a bias based on desire. It is impossible for a monk whose effluents are ended to follow a bias based on aversion. It is impossible for a monk whose effluents are ended to follow a bias based on fear. It is impossible for a monk whose effluents are ended to follow a bias based on delusion.
“‘An arahant monk whose effluents are ended, who has reached fulfillment, done the task, laid down the burden, attained the true goal, totally destroyed the fetter of becoming, and who is released through right gnosis, cannot possibly transgress nine principles.’
“Now, it’s possible, Cunda, that some wanderers of other sects might say, ‘Gotama the contemplative describes unlimited knowledge & vision with regard to the past, but doesn’t describe unlimited knowledge & vision with regard to the future. What is this? How is this?’
Those wanderers of other sects construe the sort of knowing that is not knowledge & vision9 to be the sort of knowing that is knowledge & vision, just like inexperienced fools.
The Tathāgata’s memory-&-recollection knowledge with regard to the past is such that he recollects whatever he wants.
The Tathāgata’s knowledge with regard to the future arises born from his awakening: ‘This is the last birth. There is now no further becoming.’
“With regard to what is past: If it is unfactual, untrue, & unbeneficial, the Tathāgata does not declare it.
If it is factual, true, but unbeneficial, the Tathāgata does not declare it.
If it is factual, true, & beneficial, the Tathāgata has a sense of the proper time for giving the answer to that question.
“With regard to what is future…
“With regard to what is present: If it is unfactual, untrue, & unbeneficial, the Tathāgata does not declare it.
If it is factual, true, but unbeneficial, the Tathāgata does not declare it.
If it is factual, true, & beneficial, the Tathāgata has a sense of the proper time for giving the answer to that question.10
“Thus, Cunda, with regard to things that are past, future, & present, the Tathāgata is one who speaks at the proper time, speaks what is true, speaks what is factual, speaks the meaning, speaks Dhamma, speaks Vinaya. Thus he is called the Tathāgata.
“Cunda, whatever in this world—with its devas, Māras, & Brahmās, this generation with its contemplatives & brahmans, its royalty & common people—is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, pondered by the intellect, that has been fully awakened to by the Tathāgata. Thus he is called the Tathāgata.
“From the night the Tathāgata fully awakens to the unsurpassed right self-awakening until the night he totally unbinds in the unbinding property with no fuel remaining,11 whatever the Tathāgata has said, spoken, explained
is just so tatha and not otherwise. Thus he is called the Tathāgata.
“The Tathāgata is one who does in line with tatha what he teaches, one who teaches in line with what he does.
Thus he is called the Tathāgata.
“In this world with its devas, Māras, & Brahmās, this generation with its contemplatives & brahmans, its royalty & common people, the Tathāgata is the unconquered conqueror, all-seeing, the wielder of power. Thus he is called the Tathāgata.12
“It’s possible, Cunda, that wanderers of other sects might say, ‘How is it, friends? Is it the case that “after death a Tathāgata exists: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless”?’
The wanderers of other sects who say this should be told, ‘Friends, it is undeclared by the Tathāgata that “after death a Tathāgata exists: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless.”
’ “It’s possible that wanderers of other sects might say, ‘How is it, friends? Is it the case that “after death a Tathāgata does not exist…”…
The wanderers of other sects who say this should be told, ‘Friends, it is undeclared by the Tathāgata that “after death a Tathāgata neither does nor does not exist: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless.” ’
“It’s possible that wanderers of other sects might say, ‘But why, friends, is this undeclared by Gotama the contemplative?’
The wanderers of other sects who say this should be told, ‘Friends, it isn’t connected with the goal, isn’t connected with the Dhamma, isn’t fundamental to the holy life. It doesn’t lead to disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, calming, direct knowledge, self-awakening, unbinding. That’s why it’s undeclared by the Blessed One.’ 13
“It’s possible that wanderers of other sects might say, ‘But what, friends, is declared by Gotama the contemplative?’
The wanderers of other sects who say this should be told, ‘“This is stress,” is declared by the Blessed One. “This is the origination of stress,” is declared by the Blessed One. “This is the cessation of stress,” is declared by the Blessed One. “This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress,” is declared by the Blessed One.’
“It’s possible that wanderers of other sects might say, ‘And why, friends, is this declared by Gotama the contemplative?’
The wanderers of other sects who say this should be told, ‘This is connected with the goal, is connected with the Dhamma, is fundamental to the holy life. It leads to disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, calming, direct knowledge, self-awakening, unbinding.
That’s why it’s declared by the Blessed One.’
“Cunda, the view-dependencies diṭṭhi-nissayā14 concerning beginning-points that I have declared as they are to be declared
And the view-dependencies concerning endpoints that I have declared as they are to be declared
“And which are the view-dependencies concerning beginning-points that I have declared as they are to be declared and as they are not to be declared? 15
“There are certain contemplatives & brahmans who are of this view, this opinion, ‘The self & the cosmos are eternal: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless.’
There are certain contemplatives & brahmans who are of this view, this opinion, ‘The self & the cosmos are not eternal: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless.’ … ‘The self & the cosmos are both eternal & not eternal’ … ‘The self & the cosmos are neither eternal nor not-eternal’ … ‘The self & the cosmos are self-made’ … ‘The self & the cosmos are other-made’ … ‘The self & the cosmos are both self-made & other-made’ … ‘Without self-making or other-making, the self & the cosmos are spontaneously arisen: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless.’
“There are certain contemplatives & brahmans who are of this view, this opinion, ‘Pleasure & pain are eternal: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless.’ … ‘Pleasure & pain are not eternal: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless.’ … ‘Pleasure & pain are both eternal & not eternal’ … ‘Pleasure & pain are neither eternal nor not-eternal’ … ‘Pleasure & pain are self-made’ … ‘Pleasure & pain are other-made’ … ‘Pleasure & pain are both self-made & other-made’ … ‘Without self-making or other-making, pleasure & pain are spontaneously arisen: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless.’
“As for the contemplatives & brahmans who are of this view, this opinion, ‘The self & the cosmos are eternal: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless’: I, going to them,
When they say, “Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless,”
Why is that?
Because with regard to that, there are some beings who are percipient otherwise.16
In fact, my doctrine is the better one.
Similarly with the remaining views.
“These, Cunda, are the view-dependencies concerning beginning-points that I have declared as they are to be declared
and as they are not to be declared. Would I simply declare them to you?
“And which are the view-dependencies concerning endpoints that I have declared as they are to be declared and as they are not to be declared? 17
“There are certain contemplatives & brahmans who are of this view, this opinion, ‘After death, the self is possessed of form & free from disease: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless.’
There are certain contemplatives & brahmans who are of this view, this opinion, ‘After death, the self is formless: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless.’ … ‘After death, the self is both possessed of form & formless’ … ‘After death, the self is neither possessed of form nor formless’ … ‘After death, the self is percipient’ … ‘After death, the self is not percipient’ … ‘After death, the self is both percipient & not percipient’ … ‘After death, the self is neither percipient nor not percipient’ … ‘The self is annihilated, destroyed, & does not exist after death: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless.’
“As for the contemplatives & brahmans who are of this view, this opinion, ‘After death, the self is possessed of form & free from disease: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless’: I, going to them,
When they say, “Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless,”
Why is that?
Because with regard to that, there are some beings who are percipient otherwise.
And I do not see that this doctrine is even equal to mine, so how better?
In fact, my doctrine is the better one.
Similarly with the remaining views.
“These, Cunda, are the view-dependencies concerning endpoints that I have declared as they are to be declared
and as they are not to be declared. Would I simply declare them to you?
“It’s for the abandoning & transcending of these view-dependencies concerning beginning-points and view-dependencies concerning endpoints that I have thus taught & formulated the four establishings of mindfulness.
Which four?
“There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself—ardent, alert, & mindful—subduing greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings in & of themselves—ardent, alert, & mindful—subduing greed & distress with reference to the world. He remains focused on the mind in & of itself—ardent, alert, & mindful—subduing greed & distress with reference to the world. He remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves—ardent, alert, & mindful—subduing greed & distress with reference to the world.18
“It’s for the abandoning & transcending of these view-dependencies concerning beginning-points and view-dependencies concerning endpoints
Now on that occasion Ven. Upavāṇa19 was standing behind the Blessed One, fanning him.
He said to the Blessed One, “It’s amazing, lord. It’s astounding—
how inspiring this Dhamma-sequence is, how very inspiring this Dhamma-sequence is. What is the name of this Dhamma-sequence?”
“In that case, Upavāṇa, you may remember this Dhamma-sequence simply as ‘The Inspiring.’ ”
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, Ven. Upavāṇa delighted in the Blessed One’s words.
Thus I heard. On one occasion the Blessed One was living near Sävatthi in Jeta’s Wood, Anäthapindika’s Park.
A certain deity then in the night’s last extreme, the extreme of whose brilliance set the whole of Jeta’s Wood aglow, approached the Blessed One, and, after showing respect to him, stood at one side.
And so standing, the deity addressed the Blessed One in verses thus:
Gods and men there are full many That have tried to find good omens
Which, they hope, will bring them safety: Tell, then, the supreme good omen.
Not consorting with the foolish, Rather with the wise consorting,
Honouring the honourable: This is a supreme good omen.
Living in befitting places, Having in the past made merit,
Right direction in self-guidance: This is a supreme good omen,
Ample learning, and a craft, too, With a well-trained disciplining,
Any speech that is well spoken: This is a supreme good omen.
Aid for mother and for father, And support for wife and children,
Spheres of work that bring no conflict: This is a supreme good omen.
Giving, True-Ideal conduct, With support for kin provided,
Unexceptionable actions: This is a supreme good omen.
Shrinking, abstinence, from evil, From besotting drink refraining,
Diligence in True Ideals: This is a supreme good omen.
Then respect, and humble manner, With content, and grateful bearing,
Hearing Truth when it is timely: This is a supreme good omen.
Patience, meekness when corrected, Seeing monks,
and then discussion Of the Truth when it is timely: This is a supreme good omen.
Ardour, a Divine Life leading, Seeing Truths that are called Noble,
Realization of Extinction: This is a supreme good omen.
Though by worldly ideas tempted Ne’er his cognizance shall waver,
Sorrowless, secure, stainless: This is a supreme good omen.
Since by working suchlike omens Men are everywhere unvanquished
And go everywhere in safety, That is their supreme good omen.
Whatever beings are assembled here So be they native to the earth or sky—
Let beings each and all have peace of mind And also listen closely to these words.
Therefore, o beings, give attention all: Work lovingkindness for the race of men;
By day, by night, their offerings they bring, Wherefore protect them well with diligence.
Whatever to be prized, what rarest jewel, Is found here or beyond or in the heavens,
None is there equal to a Perfect One: This jewel rare is in the Enlightened One;
So may there by this very truth be safety.
Such waning, fading, as is deathless, rarest, The Sakyan Sage in concentration found;
That True Ideal no equal has at all: This jewel rare is in the True Idea;
So may there by this very truth be safety.
The Enlightened One, most high, a Pureness praised, Calling it ‘Concentration straight-resulting ‘,
No equal is there to such concentration: This jewel rare is in the True Idea;
So may there by this very truth be safety.
Whom those at Peace extol are the Eight Persons, Which are Four Pairs,
they merit offerings, And they are the Sublime One’s true disciples; Gifts given them repay a rich reward:
This jewel rare is in the Community; So may there by this very truth be safety.
Such as by strength of mind in true vocation Desireless dwell in Gotama’s Dispensation,
Their goal they reached encountering the Deathless; They savour without loss the quenching gained:
This jewel rare is in the Community;So by this very truth may there be safety.
As a locking-post deep-planted in the earth Would stand unshaken by the four winds’ blast,
So too, indeed, is the True Man, I say, That sees the Noble Truths by undergoing:
This jewel rare is in the Community; So by this very truth may there be safety.
Such as clearly evince the Noble Truths Well taught by Him Profound in Understanding,
Although they may be mightily neglectful, Still they can never take an eighth existence:
This jewel rare is in the Community ;So may there by this very truth be safety.
Along, too, with his excellence in seeing He comes to have abandoned three ideas:
View of embodiment, uncertainty,Misapprehending virtue and duty, all;
Immune from the four states of deprivation, He cannot do the major six wrongdoings:
This jewel rare is in the Community; So may there by this very truth be safety.
Though he can still perform an evil actionBy body even, or by speech or mind,
Yet he cannot conceal it, and this fact Proclaims him that has seen the State of Peace:
This jewel rare is in the Community; So may there by this very truth be safety.
As a tall forest tree with blossom crowned In the warm summer month, the early heat,
Such the glorious Ideal he displayed, Extinction-leading, for the weal supreme:
This jewel rare is in the Enlightened One; So may there by this very truth be safety.
Glorious knower, giver, bringer of glory, Peerless, he taught the glorious True Ideal:
This jewel rare is in the Enlightened One; So may there by this very truth be safety.
Consumed the old, the new no more gives being, From cognizance lust faded for new being,
The germ consumed, they have no more zeal for growth, And steadfast, they go out, as did this lamp:
This jewel rare is in the Community; So may there by this very truth be safety.
Whatever beings are assembled here So be they native to the earth or sky,
Come, let us laud the Enlightened One, thus-gone, Honoured of gods and men: May there be safety.
Whatever beings are assembled here So be they native to the earth or sky,
Come, let us laud the True Ideal, thus-gone, Honoured of gods and men: May there be safety.
Whatever beings are assembled here So be they native to the earth or sky,
Come, let us laud the Community, thus-gone,Honoured of gods and men: May there be safety.
What should be done by one with skill in good The State of Peace to have attained is this.
He would be able, right, upright, And meek and gentle and not proud,
Contented, easy to support, Unbusy, frugal,
and serene In faculties, prudent, modest, Not fawning upon families.
He would no slight thing do at all That other wise men might deplore.
Then he would think ‘ Joyful and safe’ Let every creature’s heart rejoice.
Whatever breathing beings there are, No matter whether frail or firm With none excepted
, long or big’ Or middle-sized or short or small Or thick,
or those seen or unseen,’ Or whether dwelling far or near,
That are or that yet seek to be, Let every creature’s heart rejoice
Let none another one undo, Or slight him at all anywhere;
Let them not wish each other ill With provocation or resistive thought.
Thus, as a mother with her life Might guard her son, her only child,
Would he maintain unboundedly His thought for every living being.
His thought of love for all the world He would maintain unboundedly,
Above, below, and all around, Unchecked, no malice with or foe.
Standing or walking, seated too, Or lying down the while undrowsing,
He would pursue this mindfulness: This is Divine Abiding here, they say.
But he that traffics not with views Is virtuous with perfected seeing
Till, purged of greed for sense-desires, He will surely come no more to any womb.
you are one who does not dwell practicing the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma, practicing masterfully, living in line with the Dhamma, but deviates from it.’
The person who urged him, the thing urged, and the person who practiced in line with what was urged
would all produce much demerit.
you are one who dwells practicing the Dhamma in accordance with that Dhamma, practicing masterfully, living in line with that Dhamma, and acts to conform to it.’
The person who praised him, the thing praised, and the person who, being praised, aroused even greater persistence
would all produce much demerit.
you are one who does not dwell practicing the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma, practicing masterfully, living in line with the Dhamma, but deviates from it.’
The person who urged him, the thing urged, and the person who practiced in line with what was urged
would all produce much merit.
Then the Teacher, manifesting the infinite power of a Buddha, began to preach the Law,
you are one who dwells practicing the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma, practicing masterfully, living in line with the Dhamma, and acts to conform to it.’
The person who praised him, the thing praised, and the person who, being praised, aroused even greater persistence
would all produce much merit.
and now our teacher has disappeared.’
and now our teacher has disappeared.’
Because he is free from lust through the destruction of lust.
then a holy life of that sort is incomplete with regard to that factor.
then a holy life of that sort is complete with regard to that factor.
able to teach the True Dhamma, able to trap with the True Dhamma any opposing doctrines that have arisen and—having trapped them—to teach the Dhamma complete with miracles,
then a holy life of that sort is incomplete with regard to that factor.
able to teach the True Dhamma, able to trap with the True Dhamma any opposing doctrines that have arisen and—having trapped them—to teach the Dhamma complete with miracles,
then a holy life of that sort is complete with regard to that factor.
able to teach the True Dhamma, able to trap with the True Dhamma any opposing doctrines that have arisen and—having trapped them—to teach the Dhamma complete with miracles,
yet there are no monk disciples of his of middle standing… there are monk disciples of his of middle standing, yet no junior monk disciples of his… there are junior monk disciples of his, yet no elder nun disciples of his… there are elder nun disciples of his, yet no nun disciples of his of middle standing… there are nun disciples of his of middle standing, yet no junior nun disciples of his… there are junior nun disciples of his, yet no male lay disciples of his, householders wearing white, following the celibate life… there are male lay disciples of his, householders wearing white, following the celibate life, yet no male lay disciples of his, householders wearing white, partaking of sensuality… there are male lay disciples of his, householders wearing white, partaking of sensuality, yet no female lay disciples of his, householders wearing white, following the celibate life… there are female lay disciples of his, householders wearing white, following the celibate life, yet no female lay disciples of his, householders wearing white, partaking of sensuality… there are female lay disciples of his, householders wearing white, partaking of sensuality, yet his holy life has not become powerful, prosperous, detailed, well-populated, wide-spread, proclaimed among devas & human beings… his holy life has become powerful, prosperous, detailed, well-populated, wide-spread, proclaimed among devas & human beings, yet has not attained supremacy in terms of gains & supremacy in terms of status,
then a holy life of that sort is incomplete with regard to that factor.
able to teach the True Dhamma, able to trap with the True Dhamma any opposing doctrines that have arisen and—having trapped them—to teach the Dhamma complete with miracles;
and there are monk disciples of his of middle standing; there are junior monk disciples of his; there are elder nun disciples of his… nun disciples of his of middle standing… junior nun disciples of his… male lay disciples of his, householders wearing white, following the celibate life…
male lay disciples of his, householders wearing white, partaking of sensuality… female lay disciples of his, householders wearing white, following the celibate life; there are female lay disciples of his, householders wearing white, partaking of sensuality; and his holy life has become powerful, prosperous, detailed, well-populated, wide-spread, proclaimed among devas & human beings, and has attained supremacy in terms of gains & supremacy in terms of status,
then a holy life of that sort is complete with regard to that factor.
able to teach the True Dhamma, able to trap with the True Dhamma any opposing doctrines that have arisen and—having trapped them—to teach the Dhamma complete with miracles.
he would, speaking rightly, say it of this: ‘a well-expounded, entirely complete, well-proclaimed holy life, consummate in all its aspects, complete in all its aspects, with nothing lacking & nothing in excess.’
he would, speaking rightly, say it of this: ‘a well-expounded, entirely complete, well-proclaimed holy life, consummate in all its aspects, complete in all its aspects, with nothing lacking and nothing in excess.’
These are the qualities I have taught
and if the thought occurs to you, ‘Friends, this venerable one has grasped the wrong meaning and picked up the wrong expression,’
and if the thought occurs to you, ‘Friends, this venerable one has grasped the wrong meaning but picked up the right expression,’
and if the thought occurs to you, ‘Friends, this venerable one has grasped the right meaning but picked up the wrong expression,’
and if the thought occurs to you, ‘Friends, this venerable one has grasped the right meaning and picked up the right expression,’
nor do I teach you the Dhamma only for the warding off of effluents in the afterlife.
This is the second devotion to pleasure.
in the same way there are Dhammas taught & formulated by the Blessed One—the one who knows, the one who sees, worthy, & rightly self-awakened—that are not to be transgressed throughout life.
“both exists & does not exist…”…
“neither does nor doesn’t exist: Only this is true, anything otherwise is worthless”?’
and as they are not to be declared: Would I simply declare them to you?
and as they are not to be declared: Would I simply declare them to you?
say, ‘Friends, is it the case that this is said, “The self & the cosmos are eternal”?
I don’t grant their point.
And I do not see that this doctrine is even equal to mine, so how better?
say, ‘Friends, is it the case that this is said, “After death, the self is possessed of form & free from disease”?
I don’t grant their point.
that I have thus taught & formulated these four establishings of mindfulness.”
there are the six internal and external sense-bases:859
eye and visible objects, ear and sounds, nose and smells, tongue and tastes, body and tactiles, mind and mind-objects.
one year,…
He who renounced his possessions at the feet of (Buddha) Dīpaṅkara,
Wishing for Perfect Awakening: I worship his hair (relics).
He who fulfilled the conditions for unsurpassed Awakening,
And attained the state of Awakening: his noble hair relics I revere.
After attaining the state of Awakening he announced at the sixth place,
The King’s Stead Tree, (his) liberation: his noble hair (relics) I revere.
There he partook of the betel leaves and myrobalan given by (Lord) Sakka,
And the water from (Lake) Anotatta: I worship his hair (relics).
Then the green rock bowl was given by the (Four) Great Kings.
The one who is Lord sought the benefit of the world: him I revere.
Then sweet rice balls were given by the two brothers,
And he also enjoyed milk-rice: his splendid head I revere.
He who then gave the two refuges to Tapussa and Bhallika,
The foremost of all in the world: his noble head I revere.
Then he gave to those supporters there eight of his hairs,
The one who is Lord, desiring the benefit of the world: him I revere.
After bringing them, they built at Pokkharabbati
The hair shrine endowed with life: I revere all this in former times.
On every one of the Fast Days dark rays are emitted,
The Fortunate One surely brings benefit to the world: I rever him always.
In time the Crest-Jewel and the Clothes Shrine of the Buddha-to-be (was built),
In a Buddha-period this is the foremost of all: I revere it.
I revere, I worship, I honour the hair (relics),
May the merit (of writing these verses) be a condition for me (to attain) the destruction of the pollutants.
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time, amongst many monks,
after returning from the alms-round after the meal,
assembling together, and sitting in the Round Hall,
this conversation arose:
“Now who, venerable friends, knows a craft?
Who has trained in what craft?
Which craft is the greatest of the crafts?”
Then some said this: “Elephant-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Horse-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Chariot-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Bow-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Sword-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Finger-calculation-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Abacus-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Accountancy-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Writing-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Poetry-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Natural philosophy-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Political science-craft is the greatest of the crafts.”
Now this conversation that arose amongst those monks was left unfinished.
Then the Fortunate One, having risen from seclusion in the evening time,
went to the Round Hall,
and after going, he sat down on the prepared seat.
Having sat down the Fortunate One addressed the monks, (saying):
“What is the talk about, monks, amongst those who have assembled at present,
and what is the conversation amongst you that was left unfinished?”
“Here, reverend Sir, after returning from the alms-round after the meal,
assembling together, and sitting in the Round Hall,
this conversation arose:
“Now who, venerable friends, knows a craft?
Who has trained in what craft?
Which of the crafts is the greatest of the crafts?”
Then some said this: “Elephant-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Horse-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Chariot-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Bow-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Sword-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Finger-calculation-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Abacus-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Accountancy-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Writing-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Poetry-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Natural philosophy-craft is the greatest of the crafts,”
some said this: “Political science-craft is the greatest of the crafts.”
This is the conversation, reverend Sir, that we left unfinished,
then the Fortunate One arrived.”
“This is certainly not suitable, monks, for you
sons of good family who through faith have gone forth from the home to homelessness,
that you should talk such talk.
When you have assembled together, monks, there are two things that you ought to do:
talk about the Dhamma, or maintain noble silence.”
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“One who lives without craft, light, desiring (others') welfare,
With restrained faculties, completely free in every way,
Who wanders homeless, unselfish, not yearning,
Having given up conceit, solitary - he is a monk.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Uruvelā,
on the bank of the river Nerañjarā, at the root of the Goatherds’ Banyan tree, in the first (period) after attaining Awakening.
Then at that time the Fortunate One
was sitting in one cross-legged posture for seven days experiencing the happiness of freedom.
Then with the passing of those seven days, the Fortunate One
arose from that concentration.
Then a certain brāhmaṇa who was by nature a grumbler
went to the Fortunate One,
and after going, he exchanged greetings with the Fortunate One.
After exchanging courteous talk and greetings, he stood on one side.
While stood on one side that brāhmaṇa said this to the Fortunate One:
“To what extent, dear Gotama, is one a brāhmaṇa?
And again what things make one a brāhmaṇa?”
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“That brāhmaṇa who has removed bad things,
Not grumbling, free from blemish, self-restrained,
With perfect understanding, (and) the spiritual life accomplished,
Righteously he might speak a word about the Brahman,
For him there is no arrogance anywhere in the world.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time venerable Saṅgāmajī
had arrived at Sāvatthī to see the Fortunate One.
Venerable Saṅgāmajī’s former wife heard:
“Master Saṅgāmajī it seems has arrived at Sāvatthī”,
and taking her little boy she went to Jeta’s Wood.
Then at that time venerable Saṅgāmajī
was dwelling for the day sat at the root of a certain tree.
Then venerable Saṅgāmajī’s former wife
went to venerable Saṅgāmajī,
and after going, she said to venerable Saṅgāmajī:
“I have a little son, ascetic, you must take care of me.”
After that was said, venerable Saṅgāmajī was silent.
For a second time venerable Saṅgāmajī’s former wife
said to venerable Saṅgāmajī:
“I have a little son, ascetic, you must take care of me.”
For a second time venerable Saṅgāmajī was silent.
For a third time venerable Saṅgāmajī’s former wife
said to venerable Saṅgāmajī:
“I have a little son, ascetic, you must take care of me.”
For a third time venerable Saṅgāmajī was silent.
Then venerable Saṅgāmajī’s former wife
having put the boy down in front of venerable Saṅgāmajī, went away, (saying):
“This is your son, ascetic, you must take care of him.”
But venerable Saṅgāmajī did not look at the boy, nor did he speak (to him).
Then venerable Saṅgāmajī’s former wife,
having gone not far away, looking round saw that venerable Saṅgāmajī
was neither looking at the boy, nor was he speaking (to him).
Having seen (that) this occured to her:
“This ascetic does not even have need of a son.”
Therefore, after turning back and taking the boy, she went away.
The Fortunate One saw with the divine-eye
which is purified, and surpasses that of (normal) men,
that venerable Saṅgāmajī’s former wife had such bad manners.
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“In (her) coming he does not rejoice, ~ in (her) leaving he does not grieve,
Saṅgāmajī ‘Victorious in Battle’, free from the shackle: ~ him I call a brāhmaṇa.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time many young boys
who were between Sāvatthī and Jeta’s Wood were catching little fish.
Then the Fortunate One, having dressed in the morning time,
after picking up his bowl and robe, was entering Sāvatthī for alms.
The Fortunate One saw those many young boys
who were between Sāvatthī and Jeta’s Wood catching fish.
Having seen (that), he went to those young boys,
and after going, he said this to those young boys:
“Are you afraid, boys, of suffering? Is suffering unpleasant to you?”
“Yes, reverend Sir, we are afraid of suffering, suffering is unpleasant to us.”
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“If you have fear of suffering, ~ if suffering is unpleasant to you,
Don't do (any) bad deeds, ~ whether in the open or in secret.
But if you will do, or (now) do do bad deeds,
For you there is no freedom from suffering, ~ even after going, while running away.”
Thus I heard:
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time the Fortunate One was instructing, rousing, enthusing, and cheering
the monks with a Dhamma talk connected with Emancipation.
Those monks, after making it their goal, applying their minds,
considering it with all their mind, were listening to Dhamma with an attentive ear.
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“There is, monks, an unborn, unbecome, unmade, unconditioned.
If, monks there were not that unborn, unbecome,
unmade, unconditioned, you could not know an escape here
from the born, become, made, and conditioned.
But because there is an unborn, unbecome,
unmade, unconditioned, therefore you do know an escape
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
was living near Suppāraka, on the bank of the ocean,
being venerated, respected, revered, honoured, esteemed,
in receipt of robes, almsfood, dwellings, and medicinal requisites to help when sick.
Then when Bāhiya of the Bark Robe had gone into hiding, into seclusion,
this reflection arose in his mind:
“Among those in the world who are Worthy Ones,
or have entered the path to Worthiness, I am one of them.”
Then a devatā, who was a former blood-relative of Bāhiya of the Bark Robe,
being compassionate and desiring his welfare,
knowing with his mind the reflection in the mind of Bāhiya of the Bark Robe,
went to Bāhiya of the Bark Robe,
and after going, he said this to Bāhiya of the Bark Robe:
“You are certainly not a Worthy One, Bāhiya.
Nor have you entered the path to Worthiness.
This practice of yours is not one whereby you could be a Worthy One,
or one who has entered the path to Worthiness.”
“Then who now in this world with its devas are Worthy Ones,
or have entered the path to Worthiness?”
“There is, Bāhiya, in the northern countries a city by the name of Sāvatthī.
There the Fortunate One dwells at the present time who is a Worthy One, a Perfect Sambuddha.
He, Bāhiya, the Fortunate One, is certainly a Worthy One, and teaches the Dhamma for (attaining) Worthiness.”
Then Bāhiya of the Bark Robe being greatly moved by that devatā,
immediately went away from Suppāraka, and staying (for only) one night in every place,
went to Sāvatthī, Jeta’s Wood, and to Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time many monks were walking (in meditation) in the open air.
Then Bāhiya of the Bark Robe went to those monks,
and after going, he said this to those monks:
“Where, reverend Sirs, is the Fortunate One living at present,
the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha? We have a desire to see
the Fortunate One, the Worthy One, the Perfect Sambuddha.”
“The Fortunate One, Bāhiya, has entered among the houses for alms.”
Then Bāhiya of the Bark Robe having hurriedly
left Jeta’s Grove and having entered Sāvatthī,
saw the Fortunate One walking for alms in Sāvatthī,
confident, inspiring confidence, with (sense) faculties at peace, mind at peace,
having attained supreme self-control and calm,
controlled, guarded, with restrained faculties, a (true) nāga.
After seeing (him), he went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and prostrating himself with his head at the Fortunate One’s feet,
he said this to the Fortunate One:
“Let the Fortunate One preach the Dhamma to me, reverend Sir, let the Happy One preach the Dhamma,
that will be for my benefit and happiness for a long time.”
After that was said, the Fortunate One said this to Bāhiya of the Bark Robe:
“It is the wrong time for you, Bāhiya, we have entered among the houses for alms.”
For a second time Bāhiya of the Bark Robe said this to the Fortunate One:
“But it is hard to know, reverend Sir, the dangers to the Fortunate One’s life,
or the dangers to my life!
Let the Fortunate One preach the Dhamma to me, reverend Sir, let the Happy One preach the Dhamma,
that will be for my benefit and happiness for a long time.”
For a second time the Fortunate One said this to Bāhiya of the Bark Robe:
“It is the wrong time for you, Bāhiya, we have entered among the houses for alms.”
For a third time Bāhiya of the Bark Robe said this to the Fortunate One:
“But it is hard to know, reverend Sir, the dangers to the Fortunate One’s life,
or the dangers to my life!
Let the Fortunate One preach the Dhamma to me, reverend Sir, let the Happy One preach the Dhamma,
that will be for my benefit and happiness for a long time.”
“In that case, Bāhiya, you should train yourself thus:
in what is heard there must be only what is heard,
in what is sensed there must be only what is sensed,
in what is cognized there must be only what is cognized.
This is the way, Bāhiya, you should train yourself.
And since for you, Bāhiya, in what is seen there will be only what is seen,
in what is heard there will be only what is heard,
in what is sensed there will be only what is sensed,
in what is cognized there will be only what is cognized,
therefore, Bāhiya, you will not be with that;
and since, Bāhiya, you will not be with that, therefore, Bāhiya, you will not be in that;
and since, Bāhiya, you will not be in that, therefore, Bāhiya, you
- just this is the end of suffering.”
Then through the Fortunate One’s brief teaching of this Dhamma
Bāhiya of the Bark Robe’s mind was immediately
freed from the pollutants, without attachment.
Then the Fortunate One, having advised
Bāhiya of the Bark Robe with this brief advice, went away.
Then not long after the Fortunate One had gone
a cow with a young calf, having attacked Bāhiya of the Bark Robe, deprived him of life.
Then the Fortunate One after walking for alms in Sāvatthī,
while returning from the alms-round after the meal,
after going out from the city with many monks,
saw that Bāhiya of the Bark Robe had died.
After seeing (him), he addressed the monks, (saying):
“Monks, take up Bāhiya of the Bark Robe’s body,
and after putting it on a bier, carrying it away, and burning it, make a memorial mound for him,
your fellow in the spiritual life, monks, has died.”
“Yes, reverend Sir,” said those monks, and after replying to the Fortunate One,
putting Bāhiya of the Bark Robe’s body on a bier,
carrying it away, burning it, and making a memorial mound for him,
they went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and worshipping the Fortunate One, they sat down on one side.
While sat on one side those monks said this to the Fortunate One:
“Burnt, reverend Sir, is Bāhiya of the Bark Robe’s body, and the memorial mound for him has been made.
What is his destination? What is his future state?”
“A wise man, monks, was Bāhiya of the Bark Robe,
who practiced Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma,
and did not trouble me on account of the Dhamma.
Completely emancipated, monks, is Bāhiya of the Bark Robe.”
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“In the place where the water, earth, ~  fire, and wind find no footing,
There the stars do not shine, ~ nor does the sun give light,
There the moon does not glow, ~ there darkness is not found.
And when the sage, the brāhmaṇa, has experienced (nibbāna) through his own sagacity,
Then from both form and formless, ~ happiness and suffering, he is free.”
This exalted utterance was also said by the Fortunate One, so I have heard.
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time venerable Sāriputta
was sitting not far away from the Fortunate One,
after folding his legs crosswise, and setting his body straight,
and was attending to mindfulness at the front.
The Fortunate One saw that venerable Sāriputta was sitting not far away,
after folding his legs crosswise, and setting his body straight,
and was attending to mindfulness at the front.
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“Just like a mountain rock, ~ unagitated, well established,
So is the monk, through the destruction of delusion ~ - like a mountain he does not shake.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Uruvelā,
on the bank of the river Nerañjarā, at the root of the Mucalinda (tree), in the first (period) after attaining Awakening.
Then at that time the Fortunate One
was sitting in one cross-legged posture for seven days experiencing the happiness of freedom.
Then at that time a great cloud arose out of season,
(bringing) seven days of rainy weather, cold winds, and overcast days.
Then the Nāga King Mucalinda, after leaving his domicile,
and surrounding the Fortunate One’s body seven times with his coils,
stood with his great hood stretched out above his head, (thinking):
“May the Fortunate One not be cold, may the Fortunate One not be hot,
may the Fortunate One not be affected by gadflies, mosquitoes, wind, the heat (of the sun), and serpents.”
Then with the passing of those seven days, the Fortunate One
arose from that concentration.
Then the Nāga King Mucalinda,
having understood that the sky was now clear without a cloud,
having unravelled his coils from the Fortunate One’s body,
and after withdrawing his own form, and creating the appearance of a young brāhmaṇa,
stood in front of the Fortunate One, revering the Fortunate One with raised hands.
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“There is happiness and detachment for the one who is satisfied, ~ who has heard the Dhamma, and who sees,
There is happiness for him who is free from ill-will in the world, ~ who is restrained towards breathing beings.
The state of dispassion in the world is happiness, ~ the complete transcending of sense desires,
(But) for he who has removed the conceit ‘I am’ ~ - this is indeed the highest happiness.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time venerable Subhūti
was sitting not far away from the Fortunate One,
after folding his legs crosswise, and setting his body straight,
having attained a concentration free from thought.
The Fortunate One saw venerable Subhūti sat not far away,
after folding his legs crosswise, and setting his body straight,
who had attained a concentration free from thought.
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“For he who has dispelled thoughts,
Totally cut (them) off within himself without remainder,
Perceiving the formless (nibbāna), beyond the shackle,
Having overcome the four yokes - he surely does not come (to birth again).”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Uruvelā,
on the bank of the river Nerañjara, at the root of the Awakening tree, in the first (period) after attaining Awakening.
Then at that time the Fortunate One
was sitting in one cross-legged posture for seven days experiencing the happiness of freedom.
Then with the passing of those seven days the Fortunate One,
after rising from that concentration, looked around the world with his Buddha-eye.
The Fortunate One looking around the world with his Buddha-eye saw
beings being tormented with many torments,
and being burned with many fevers,
born from passion, and born from hatred, and born from delusion.
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“This world, overcome by contact, is tormented,
It speaks of a disease as the self,
For with whatever it conceives
Hereafter it becomes otherwise.
Continually becoming other, the world is shackled by continuity, overcome by continuity,
It greatly rejoices in continuity,
What it rejoices in, that is fearful,
What it fears, that is suffering.
This spiritual life is lived for the complete giving up of continuity.
For whatever the ascetics or brāhmaṇas
say about freedom from continuity being through (further) continuity,
all of them are not free from continuity, I say.
Or whatever the ascetics or brāhmaṇas
say about the escape from continuity being through discontinuity,
all of them have not escaped from continuity, I say.
Conditioned by cleaving this suffering originates,
through the destruction of all attachment there is no origination of suffering.
See this world overcome by many kinds of ignorance,
beings, who delight in beings, are not free from continuity.
Whatever continuities (in existence) there are, everywhere, in every respect,
all those continuities are impermanent, suffering, changeable things.
Seeing it like this, as it really is, with right wisdom,
Craving for continuity is given up, ~ and he does not rejoice in discontinuity.
From the complete destruction of craving there is a fading away (of ignorance) without remainder, cessation, and Emancipation.
For that monk who is emancipated,
Without attachment, there is no continuity in existence.
He has vanquished Māra, is victorious in battle,
He is such a one who has overcome all continuations (in existence).”
at one time the Fortunate One was walking on walking tour amongst the Kosalans,
together with a great Community of monks.
Then the Fortunate One, having gone down from the road,
went to the root of a certain tree,
and after going, he sat down on the prepared seat.
Then a certain cowherd went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and worshipping the Fortunate One, he sat down on one side.
While sitting on one side the Fortunate One
instructed, roused, enthused, and cheered that cowherd with a Dhamma talk.
Then that cowherd, having been instructed,
roused, enthused, and cheered by the Fortunate One with a Dhamma talk,
said to the Fortunate One:
“May the Fortunate One consent, reverend Sir, to me
(offering him) a meal on the morrow, together with the Community of monks.”
The Fortunate One consented by maintaining silence.
Then that cowherd, having understood the Fortunate One’s consent,
after rising from his seat, worshipping and circumambulating the Fortunate One, went away.
Then with the passing of that night, that cowherd, in his own residence,
having had an abundance of rich milk-rice and fresh ghee made ready,
announced the time to the Fortunate One, (saying): “It is time, reverend Sir, the meal is ready.”
Then the Fortunate One, having dressed in the morning time,
after picking up his bowl and robe, together with the Community of monks,
went to that cowherd’s residence,
and after going, he sat down on the prepared seat.
Then that cowherd with his own hand, served and satisfied
the Community of monks with the Buddha at its head with rich milk-rice and fresh ghee.
Then that cowherd, when the Fortunate One had eaten and washed his hand and bowl,
having taken a low seat, sat down on one side.
While sat on one side the Fortunate One,
after instructing, rousing, enthusing, and cheering
that cowherd with a Dhamma talk, having risen from the seat, went away.
Then not long after the Fortunate One had gone,
while between the boundaries (of the villages), a certain man deprived that cowherd of life.
Then many monks went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and worshipping the Fortunate One, they sat down on one side.
While sat on one side those monks said this to the Fortunate One:
“Today, reverend Sir, the Community of monks with the Buddha at its head,
was served and satisfied by a cowherd with rich milk-rice and fresh ghee,
now it seems that cowherd, reverend Sir,
while between the boundaries (of the villages), was deprived of life by a certain man.
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“Whatever an enemy might do to an enemy, ~  or a foe to a foe,
A wrongly directed mind ~ may do (more) harm to him than that.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Kuṇḍiya, at Kuṇḍadhāna Wood.
Then at that time the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā
While she was affected by painful, sharp, harsh, and bitter feelings,
she consented to three thoughts: “For sure the Fortunate One is a Perfect Sambuddha,
who teaches the Dhamma for the giving up of suffering such as this;
for sure the Fortunate One’s Community of disciples are good in their practice,
who practice for the giving up of suffering such as this;
it is sure that Emancipation is truly happy,
where suffering such as this is not found.”
Then the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā addressed her husband, (saying):
“Come, Master, you must go to the Fortunate One,
and after going, in my name you should worship the Fortunate One’s feet with your head,
and ask (if he is) free from affliction, free from sickness, in good health, strong, and living comfortably, (and say):
‘The Koliyan lady Suppavāsā, reverend Sir, worships the Fortunate One’s feet with her head,
and asks (if you are) free from affliction, free from sickness,
in good health, strong, and living comfortably?’
And please say this: ‘The Koliyan lady Suppavāsā, reverend Sir,
has been with child for seven years, and for seven days it has been lost in the womb.
While she is affected by painful, sharp, harsh, and bitter feelings,
she consents to three thoughts: “For sure the Fortunate One is a Perfect Sambuddha,
who teaches the Dhamma for the giving up of suffering such as this;
for sure the Fortunate One’s Community of disciples are good in their practice,
who practice for the giving up of suffering such as this;
it is sure that Emancipation is truly happy,
where suffering such as this is not found.” ' ”
“(That is) the best thing” said the Koliyan gentleman,
and after replying to Suppavāsā the Koliyan lady,
he went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and worshipping the Fortunate One, he sat down on one side.
While sat on one side that Koliyan gentleman said this to the Fortunate One:
“The Koliyan lady Suppavāsā, reverend Sir, worships the Fortunate One’s feet with her head,
and asks (if you are) free from affliction, free from sickness,
in good health, strong, and living comfortably?
And she says this: ‘The Koliyan lady Suppavāsā, reverend Sir,
has been with child for seven years, and for seven days it has been lost in the womb.
While she is affected by painful, sharp, harsh, and bitter feelings,
she consents to three thoughts: “For sure the Fortunate One is a Perfect Sambuddha,
who teaches the Dhamma for the giving up of suffering such as this;
for sure the Fortunate One’s Community of disciples are good in their practice,
who practice for the giving up of suffering such as this;
it is sure that Emancipation is truly happy,
where suffering such as this is not found.” ' ”
“Happy may the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā be, and healthy,
and may she give birth to a healthy son.”
And with this word of the Fortunate One, the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā
became happy and healthy, and gave birth to a healthy son.
“Yes, reverend Sir” said the Koliyan gentleman,
and after greatly rejoicing and gladly receiving this word of the Fortunate One,
rising from his seat, worshipping and circumambulating the Fortunate One,
he returned to his own home.
The Koliyan gentleman saw that the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā was happy and healthy,
and had given birth to a healthy son. Having seen (that), it occured to him:
“Surely it is wonderful, surely it is marvellous,
the Realised One’s great power and great majesty,
in as much as this Koliyan lady Suppavāsā,
with this word of the Fortunate One,
became happy and healthy, and to a healthy son gave birth”,
and he was elated, gladdened, joyful and happy.
Then the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā addressed her husband, (saying):
“Come, Master, you must go to the Fortunate One,
and after going, in my name you should worship the Fortunate One’s feet with your head, (and say):
‘The Koliyan lady Suppavāsā, reverend Sir, worships the Fortunate One’s feet with her head.’
And please say this: ‘The Koliyan lady Suppavāsā, reverend Sir,
was with child for seven years, and for seven days it was lost in the womb,
but now she is happy and healthy, and has born a healthy son.
For seven days she invites the Community of monks, with the Buddha at its head, for a meal.
May the Fortunate One consent, reverend Sir, to seven meals from the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā
together with the Community of monks.’ ”
“(That is) the best thing”, said the Koliyan gentleman, and after replying to Suppavāsā the Koliyan lady,
he went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and worshipping the Fortunate One, he sat down on one side.
While sat on one side the Koliyan gentleman said this to the Fortunate One:
“The Koliyan lady Suppavāsā, reverend Sir, worships the Fortunate One’s feet with her head.
And she says this: ‘The Koliyan lady Suppavāsā, reverend Sir,
was with child for seven years, and for seven days it was lost in the womb,
but now she is happy and healthy, and has born a healthy son.
For seven days she invites the Community of monks, with the Buddha at its head, for a meal.
May the Fortunate One consent, reverend Sir, to seven meals from the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā
together with the Community of monks.’ ”
Then at that time a certain lay follower
had invited the Community of monks with the Buddha at its head to a meal on the morrow.
Now that lay follower was venerable Mahāmoggallāna’s supporter.
Then the Fortunate One addressed venerable Mahāmoggallāna, (saying):
“ Come, Moggallāna, you must go to that lay follower,
and after going, please say this to that lay follower:
‘Friend, the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā
was with child for seven years, and for seven days it was lost in the womb,
but now she is happy and healthy, and has born a healthy son.
For seven days she has invited the Community of monks, with the Buddha at its head, for a meal,
please let the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā make her seven meals.’
Afterwards he can make (his) - he is your supporter.”
“Yes, reverend Sir,” said venerable Mahāmoggallāna, and after replying to the Fortunate One,
he went to that lay follower,
and after going, he said this to that lay follower:
“Friend, the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā
was with child for seven years, and for seven days it was lost in the womb,
but now she is happy and healthy, and has born a healthy son.
For seven days she has invited the Community of monks, with the Buddha at its head, for a meal.
Let the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā make her seven meals, and afterwards you can make (yours).”
“If, reverend Sir, master Mahāmoggallāna
is my surety for three things - for wealth, for life, and for faith -
the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā may make her seven meals,
and afterwards I will make (mine).”
“For two things, friend, I am your surety -
for wealth and for life - but for faith you are the surety.”
“If, reverend Sir, master Mahāmoggallāna
is my surety for two things - for wealth and for life -
the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā may make her seven meals,
and afterwards I will make (mine).”
Then venerable Mahāmoggallāna, after conciliating that lay follower,
went to the Fortunate One,
and after going, he said this to the Fortunate One:
“That lay follower has been conciliated by me, reverend Sir,
let the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā make her seven meals, and afterwards he can make (his).”
Then the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā
for seven days with her own hand served and satisfied the Community of monks
with the Buddha at its head with excellent comestibles and edibles.
Then she made the little boy worship the Buddha, and the whole Community of monks.
Then venerable Sāriputta said this to that little boy:
“Can you bear up, little boy? Can you carry on?
Do you have any pain?”
“How, reverend Sāriputta, can I bear up? How can I carry on?
For seven years I have been living in a bloodbath.”
Then (it occured) to the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā:
“My son is consulting with the general of the Dhamma,”
and she became elated, gladdened, joyful and happy.
Then the Fortunate One after seeing that the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā
was elated, gladdened, joyful and happy,
said this to the Koliyan lady Suppavāsā:
“Suppavāsā, do you long for another such son?”
“Fortunate One, I long for another seven such sons.”
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“The disagreeable in an agreeable form, ~ the unlovely in a lovely form,
The painful in the form of pleasure, ~ overcome the heedless one.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time venerable Sāriputta
was sitting not far away from the Fortunate One,
after folding his legs crosswise, and setting his body straight,
with few longings, satisfied, completely secluded, unattached,
with energy aroused, applying (himself) to the higher mind.
The Fortunate One saw venerable Sāriputta, who was sitting not far away,
after folding his legs crosswise, and setting his body straight,
with few longings, satisfied, completely secluded, detached,
with energy aroused, applying (himself) to the higher mind.
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“For he with higher mind, for the heedful one,
For the sage who is training in the path of sagacity,
There are no griefs for such a one,
For a peaceful one - he is one who is always mindful.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
at the Eastern Monastery in Migāra’s mother’s mansion.
Then at that time the Fortunate One
was sitting surrounded by the Community of monks on the Observance Day.
Then venerable Ānanda, when the night had passed,
when the first watch of the night had gone, after rising from his seat, arranging his robe on one shoulder,
and raising his hands in respectful salutation, said this to the Fortunate One:
“The night has passed, reverend Sir, the first watch of the night has gone,
for a long time the Community of monks has been sitting,
may the Fortunate One recite the Pātimokkha for the monks.”
When that was said, the Fortunate One was silent.
For a second time venerable Ānanda, when the night had passed,
when the middle watch of the night had gone, after rising from his seat, arranging his robe on one shoulder,
and raising his hands in respectful salutation, said this to the Fortunate One:
“The night has passed, reverend Sir, the middle watch of the night has gone,
for a long time the Community of monks has been sitting,
may the Fortunate One recite the Pātimokkha for the monks.”
For a second time the Fortunate One was silent.
For a third time venerable Ānanda, when the night had passed,
when the last watch of the night had gone, when dawn had risen, when the night had a joyful appearance,
after rising from his seat, arranging his robe on one shoulder,
and raising his hands in respectful salutation, said this to the Fortunate One:
“The night has passed, reverend Sir, the last watch of the night has gone,
dawn has risen, the night has a joyful appearance, for a long time the Community of monks has been sitting,
may the Fortunate One recite the Pātimokkha for the monks.”
“The assembly is not completely pure, Ānanda.”
Then it occurred to venerable Mahāmoggallāna:
“With regard to which person did the Fortunate One say this:
‘The assembly is not completely pure, Ānanda’? ”
Then venerable Mahāmoggallāna
applied his mind and encompassed fully the whole of that Community of monks with his mind.
Venerable Mahāmoggallāna saw that person who was lacking in virtue,
of bad character, of impure and doubtful conduct, who covered up his deeds,
who was not an ascetic, though making it known he was an ascetic, who was not living the spiritual life, though making it known he was living the spiritual life,
who was filthy inside, polluted, and gone rotten,
sat in the middle of the Community of monks.
Having seen (him), after rising from his seat he went to that person,
and after going, he said this to that person:
“Get up, friend, you have been seen by the Fortunate One,
there is no longer communion for you with the monks.”
Then that person was silent.
For a second time venerable Mahāmoggallāna said this to that person:
“Get up, friend, you have been seen by the Fortunate One,
there is no longer communion for you with the monks.”
For a second time that person was silent.
For a third time venerable Mahāmoggallāna said this to that person:
“Get up, friend, you have been seen by the Fortunate One,
there is no longer communion for you with the monks.”
For a third time that person was silent.
Then venerable Mahāmoggallāna, having taken that person by the arm,
having expelled him outside the doorway, and drawn the lock,
went to the Fortunate One,
and after going, he said this to the Fortunate One:
“I have expelled that person, reverend Sir, the assembly is (now) completely pure,
may the Fortunate One, venerable Sir, recite the Pātimokkha for the monks.”
“It is wonderful, Moggallāna, it is marvellous, Moggallāna,
how that foolish person waited until he was grabbed by the arm.”
Then the Fortunate One addressed the monks:
“From now onwards, monks, I will not hold the Observance,
or recite the Pātimokkha.
From now onwards, monks, you must hold the Observance,
and recite the Pātimokkha.
This is impossible, monks, it is not permitted,
that the Realised One should hold the Observance in an assembly that is not completely pure,
and should recite the Pātimokkha.
There are these eight wonderful and marvellous things about the great ocean, monks,
which, having seen and considered, the Asuras delight in the great ocean.
Which eight?
The great ocean, monks, gradually inclines, gradually slopes,
gradually slants, certainly does not have an abrupt falling away.
That the great ocean, monks, gradually inclines, gradually slopes,
gradually slants, certainly does not have an abrupt falling away,
monks, is the first wonderful and marvellous thing
about the great ocean,
which, having seen and considered, the Asuras delight in the great ocean.
Furthermore, monks, the great ocean is a steady thing,
which doesn't transgress the shoreline.
That the great ocean, monks, is a stable thing, which doesn't transgress the shoreline,
monks, is the second wonderful and marvellous thing
about the great ocean,
which, having seen and considered, the Asuras delight in the great ocean.
Furthermore, monks, the great ocean
does not endure a dead corpse,
and when there is a dead corpse in the great ocean
it quickly carries it to the bank, throws it up on dry ground.
That the great ocean, monks, does not endure a dead corpse,
and when there is a dead corpse in the great ocean
it quickly carries it to the bank, throws it up on dry ground,
monks, is the third wonderful and marvellous thing
about the great ocean,
which, having seen and considered, the Asuras delight in the great ocean.
Furthermore, monks, whatever great rivers there are, that is to say:
The Gaṅgā, the Yamunā, the Aciravatī, the Sarabhū, and the Mahī,
having arrived at the great ocean, they give up their former lineages and names,
and are then designated as the great ocean.
That, monks, whatever great rivers there are, that is to say:
The Gaṅgā, the Yamunā, the Aciravatī, the Sarabhū, and the Mahī,
having arrived at the great ocean, give up their former lineages and names,
and are then designated as the great ocean,
monks, is the fourth wonderful and marvellous thing
about the great ocean,
which, having seen and considered, the Asuras delight in the great ocean.
Furthermore, monks, the streams in the world
flow into the great ocean, and showers fall from the sky,
but it is not known that there is a depletion or filling of the great ocean by that.
That, monks, the streams in the world flow into the great ocean,
and showers fall from the sky,
but it is not known that there is a depletion or filling of the great ocean by that,
monks, is the fifth wonderful and marvellous thing
about the great ocean,
which, having seen and considered, the Asuras delight in the great ocean.
Furthermore, monks, the great ocean has one taste, the taste of salt.
That, monks, the great ocean has one taste, the taste of salt,
monks, is the sixth wonderful and marvellous thing
about the great ocean,
which, having seen and considered, the Asuras delight in the great ocean.
Furthermore, monks, the great ocean has many precious things,
countless precious things, and therein are these precious things, that is to say:
pearls, crystals, lapis lazuli, mother-of-pearl, quartz,
coral, silver, gold, ruby, and cat’s eyes.
That, monks, the great ocean has many precious things,
countless precious things, and therein are these precious things, that is to say:
pearls, crystals, lapis lazuli, mother-of-pearl, quartz,
coral, silver, gold, ruby, and cat’s eyes,
monks, is the seventh wonderful and marvellous thing
about the great ocean,
which, having seen and considered, the Asuras delight in the great ocean.
Furthermore, monks, the great ocean
is a dwelling place for great beings, and therein are these beings:
Timis, Timiṅgalas, Timirapiṅgalas, Asuras, Nāgas, Gandhabbas,
and there are in the great ocean individuals of a hundred leagues,
and individuals of two hundred leagues, and individuals of three hundred leagues,
and individuals of four hundred leagues, and individuals of five hundred leagues.
That, monks, the great ocean
is a dwelling place for great beings, and therein are these beings:
Timis, Timiṅgalas, Timirapiṅgalas, Asuras, Nāgas, Gandhabbas,
and there are in the great ocean individuals of a hundred leagues,
and individuals of two hundred leagues, and individuals of three hundred leagues,
and individuals of four hundred leagues, and individuals of five hundred leagues,
monks, is the eighth wonderful and marvellous thing
about the great ocean,
which, having seen and considered, the Asuras delight in the great ocean.
These are these eight wonderful and marvellous things about the great ocean,
which, having seen and considered, the Asuras delight in the great ocean.
In the same way, monks, there are eight wonderful and marvellous things
about this Dhamma and Discipline,
which, having seen and considered, the monks delight in this Dhamma and Discipline.
Which eight?
Just as the great ocean, monks,
gradually inclines, gradually slopes,
gradually slants, certainly does not fall away abruptly,
so, monks, in this Dhamma and Discipline
there is a gradual training, a gradual performance,
a gradual practice, it certainly does not have an abrupt penetration of knowledge.
That, monks, in this Dhamma and Discipline
there is a gradual training, a gradual performance,
a gradual practice, and it certainly does not have an abrupt penetration of knowledge,
is the first wonderful and marvellous thing, monks,
about this Dhamma and Discipline,
which, having seen and considered, the monks delight in this Dhamma and Discipline.
Just as, monks, the great ocean is a steady thing,
which doesn't transgress the shoreline, so, monks,
those training rules which are laid down by me for my disciples,
my disciples do not transgress even for the sake of life.
That, monks, those training rules which are laid down by me for my disciples,
my disciples do not transgress even for the sake of life,
is the second wonderful and marvellous thing, monks,
about this Dhamma and Discipline,
which, having seen and considered, the monks delight in this Dhamma and Discipline.
Just as, monks, the great ocean
does not endure a dead corpse,
and when there is a dead corpse in the great ocean
it quickly carries it to the bank, throws it up on dry ground,
so, monks, that person who is lacking in virtue,
of bad character, of impure and doubtful conduct, who covers up his deeds,
who is not an ascetic, though making it known he is an ascetic, who is not living the spiritual life, though making it known he is living the spiritual life,
who is filthy inside, polluted, and gone rotten, the Community does not endure that (person),
but quickly having assembled together, suspend him,
and whoever was sitting in the midst of the Community of monks
is then far from the Community, and the Community from him.
That, monks, that person who is lacking in virtue,
of bad character, of impure and doubtful conduct, who covers up his deeds,
who is not an ascetic, though making it known he is an ascetic, who is not living the spiritual life, though making it known he is living the spiritual life,
who is filthy inside, polluted, and gone rotten, the Community does not endure that (person),
but quickly having assembled together, suspend him,
and whoever was sitting in the midst of the Community of monks,
is then far from the Community, and the Community from him,
is the third wonderful and marvellous thing, monks,
about this Dhamma and Discipline,
which, having seen and considered, the monks delight in this Dhamma and Discipline.
Just as, monks, whatever great rivers there are, that is to say:
The Gaṅgā, the Yamunā, the Aciravatī, the Sarabhū, and the Mahī,
having arrived at the great ocean, give up their former lineages and names,
and are then designated as the great ocean,
so, monks, there are these four classes:
Khattiyas, Brāhmaṇas, Vessas, and Suddas, who, having gone forth
from the home to homelessness in the Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
give up their former lineages and names,
and are then designated as Sakyan ascetics.
That, monks, there are these four classes:
Khattiyas, Brāhmaṇas, Vessas, and Suddas, who, having gone forth
from the home to homelessness in the Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
give up their former lineages and names,
and are then designated as Sakyan ascetics,
is the fourth wonderful and marvellous thing, monks,
about this Dhamma and Discipline,
which, having seen and considered, the monks delight in this Dhamma and Discipline.
Just as, monks, the streams in the world
flow into the great ocean, and showers fall from the sky,
but it is not known that there is a depletion or filling of the great ocean by that,
so, monks, even if many monks,
are completely emancipated in the Emancipation-element which has no basis for attachment remaining,
it is not known that the Emancipation-element is either depleted or filled by that.
That, monks, even if many monks,
are completely emancipated in the Emancipation-element which has no basis for attachment remaining,
it is not known that the Emancipation-element is either depleted or filled by that,
is the fifth wonderful and marvellous thing, monks,
about this Dhamma and Discipline,
which, having seen and considered, the monks delight in this Dhamma and Discipline.
Just as, monks, the great ocean has one taste, the taste of salt,
so, monks, this Dhamma and Discipline
has one taste, the taste of freedom.
That, monks, this Dhamma and Discipline has one taste, the taste of freedom,
is the sixth wonderful and marvellous thing, monks,
about this Dhamma and Discipline,
which, having seen and considered, the monks delight in this Dhamma and Discipline.
Just as, monks, the great ocean has many precious things,
countless precious things, and therein are these precious things, that is to say:
pearls, crystals, lapis lazuli, mother-of-pearl, quartz,
coral, silver, gold, ruby, and cat’s eye,
so, monks, this Dhamma and Discipline
has many precious things, countless precious things, and therein are these precious things, that is to say:
the four ways of attending to mindfulness, the four right efforts,
the four paths to power, the five faculties, the five strengths,
the seven factors of Awakening, the eight-fold noble path.
That, monks, this Dhamma and Discipline has many precious things, countless precious things,
and therein are these precious things, that is to say:
the four ways of attending to mindfulness, the four right efforts,
the four paths to power, the five faculties, the five strengths,
the seven factors of Awakening, the eight-fold noble path,
is the seventh wonderful and marvellous thing, monks,
about this Dhamma and Discipline,
which, having seen and considered, the monks delight in this Dhamma and Discipline.
Just as, monks, the great ocean,
is a dwelling place for great beings and therein are these beings:
Timis, Timiṅgalas, Timirapiṅgalas, Asuras, Nāgas, Gandhabbas,
and there are in the great ocean individuals of a hundred leagues,
and individuals of two hundred leagues, and individuals of three hundred leagues,
and individuals of four hundred leagues, and individuals of five hundred leagues,
so, monks, this Dhamma and Discipline
is a dwelling place for great beings, and therein are these beings:
the stream-enterer, and he who is practising for the direct realisation of the fruit of stream-entry,
the once-returner, and he who is practising for the direct realisation of the fruit of once-returning,
the non-returner, and he who is practising for the direct realisation of the fruit of non-returning,
the Worthy One, and he who is practising for the direct realisation of the fruit of Worthiness.
That, monks, this Dhamma and Discipline
is a dwelling place for great beings, and therein are these beings:
the stream-enterer, and he who is practising for the direct realisation of the fruit of stream-entry,
the once-returner, and he who is practising for the direct realisation of the fruit of once-returning,
the non-returner, and he who is practising for the direct realisation of the fruit of non-returning,
the Worthy One, and he who is practising for the direct realisation of the fruit of Worthiness,
is the eighth wonderful and marvellous thing, monks,
about this Dhamma and Discipline,
which, having seen and considered, the monks delight in this Dhamma and Discipline.
These are the eight wonderful and marvellous things
about this Dhamma and Discipline,
which, having seen and considered, the monks delight in this Dhamma and Discipline.”
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“On what is covered (defilement) pours down, ~ on what is open it does not pour down,
Therefore what is covered open up, ~ so that it does not pour down on you.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time
a certain monk was sitting not far away from the Fortunate One,
and after folding his legs crosswise, and setting his body straight,
he was bearing painful, sharp, harsh, and bitter feelings, that had arisen as a result of former (unwholesome) deeds,
mindfully, with full awareness, and without being troubled.
The Fortunate One saw that monk sitting not far away,
who after folding his legs crosswise, and setting his body straight,
was bearing painful, sharp, harsh, and severe feelings, that had arisen as a result of former (unwholesome) deeds,
mindfully, with full awareness, and without being troubled.
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“For the monk who has given up all deeds,
For he who is throwing off the dust of what was done before,
For he who is unselfish, stable, such-like,
There is no need to speak to people.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time a certain lay follower from Icchānaṅgala
had arrived at Sāvatthī with some business or other.
Then that lay follower, having concluded that business in Sāvatthī,
went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and worshipping the Fortunate One, he sat down on one side.
While sat on one side the Fortunate One said this to that lay follower:
“At long last, lay follower, you have made arrangements,
so to say, for coming here.”
“For a long time, reverend Sir, I have desired to come to see the Fortunate One,
but I have been engaged with some sort of duty and business or another,
and I have thus been unable to come to see the Fortunate One.”
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“For he who has nothing there is happiness indeed,
For the one who has discerned the Dhamma, for the learned,
See how one who has something is troubled,
He is a person who is in a state of bondage in regard to (other) people.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time a certain lay follower’s
only son, who was beloved and dear, had died.
Then many lay followers, with wet clothes and hair,
in the middle of the day went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and worshipping the Fortunate One, they sat down on one side.
While sat on one side the Fortunate One said this to those lay followers:
“Now why are you lay followers, with wet clothes and hair,
coming here in the middle of the day?”
When that was said, that lay follower said this to the Fortunate One:
“My only son, who was beloved and dear, reverend Sir, has died.
That is why we, with wet clothes and hair, are coming here in the middle of the day.”
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“Hosts of devas and many men are tied by the satisfaction in forms that are loved,
Miserable and worn out, ~ they come under the power of the King of Death.
For sure those who are heedful day and night, give up forms that are loved -
They surely dig up the root of misery ~ (which is) Death’s bait, so difficult to transcend.”
Thus I heard:
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time venerable Sāriputta,
venerable Mahāmoggallana, venerable Mahākassapa,
venerable Mahākaccāyana, venerable Mahākoṭṭhita,
venerable Mahākappina, venerable Mahācunda,
venerable Anuruddha, venerable Revata,
and venerable Nanda went to the Fortunate One.
The Fortunate One saw those venerable ones coming while still far away,
and having seen (them), he addressed the monks (saying):
“These brāhmaṇas are coming, monks;
these brāhmaṇas are coming, monks.”
After that was said, a certain monk who was a brāhmaṇa by birth,
said to the Fortunate One:
“To what extent, dear Gotama, is one a brāhmaṇa?
And again what things make one a brāhmaṇa?”
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“Those who, having removed bad things, live always mindful,
The Buddhas who have destroyed the fetters, ~ truly they are brāhmaṇas in the world.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time the Fortunate One
was venerated, respected, revered, honoured, esteemed, and in receipt of
robes, almsfood, dwellings, and medicinal requisites to help when sick;
also the Community of monks was venerated, respected, revered, honoured, esteemed, and in receipt of
robes, almsfood, dwellings, and medicinal requisites to help when sick.
But wanderers from other sects
were not venerated, not respected, not revered, not honoured, not esteemed, nor were they in receipt of
robes, almsfood, dwellings, and medicinal requisites to help when sick.
Then those wanderers from other sects,
being unable to bear the veneration of the Fortunate One and the Community of monks,
after seeing the monks in the village or the wilderness,
with vulgar and rough words scolded, abused, annoyed, and troubled them.
Then many monks went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and worshipping the Fortunate One, they sat down on one side.
While sat on one side those monks said this to the Fortunate One:
“At present, reverend Sir, the Fortunate One is venerated, respected, revered, honoured, esteemed, and in receipt of
robes, almsfood, dwellings, and medicinal requisites to help when sick;
also the Community of monks is venerated, respected, revered, honoured, esteemed, and in receipt of
robes, almsfood, dwellings, and medicinal requisites to help when sick.
But wanderers from other sects
are not venerated, not respected, not revered, not honoured, not esteemed, nor are they in receipt of
robes, almsfood, dwellings, and medicinal requisites to help when sick.
Then those wanderers from other sects, reverend Sir,
being unable to bear the veneration of the Fortunate One and the Community of monks,
after seeing the monks in the village or the wilderness,
with vulgar and rough words scold, abuse, annoy, and trouble them.”
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“Affected by pleasure and pain in the village or wilderness,
you should certainly not consider it as due to oneself or another.
Contacts affect one with cleaving as condition,
How could contacts affect one without cleaving?”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time venerable Nanda,
the Fortunate One’s brother, his mother’s sister’s son,
confessed this to many monks:
“I have no great delight, venerable friends, living the spiritual life,
I am not able to endure the spiritual life,
having disavowed the training, I will return to what is inferior.”
Then a certain monk went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and worshipping the Fortunate One, he sat down on one side.
While sat on one side that monk said this to the Fortunate One:
“Venerable Nanda, reverend Sir, the Fortunate One’s brother, his mother’s sister’s son,
confesses this to many monks:
‘I have no great delight, venerable friends, living the spiritual life,
I am not able to endure the spiritual life,
having disavowed the training, I will return to what is inferior.’ ”
Then the Fortunate One addressed a certain monk, (saying):
“Please go, monk, and with my word address the monk Nanda, (saying):
‘The Teacher, venerable friend Nanda, calls you.’ ”
“Yes, reverend Sir,” said that monk, and after replying to the Fortunate One,
he went to venerable Nanda,
and after going, he said this to venerable Nanda:
“The Teacher, venerable friend Nanda, calls you.”
“Yes, venerable friend,” said venerable Nanda, and after replying to that monk,
he went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and worshipping the Fortunate One, he sat down on one side.
While sat on one side, the Fortunate One said this to venerable Nanda:
“Is it true, as it seems, Nanda, that you confessed this to many monks, (saying):
“I have no great delight, venerable friends, living the spiritual life,
I am not able to endure the spiritual life,
having disavowed the training, I will return to what is inferior.’ ”
“Yes, reverend Sir.”
“But why do you, Nanda, have no great delight living the spiritual life,
are not able to endure the spiritual life,
and having disavowed the training, will return to what is inferior?”
“As I was leaving from home, reverend Sir, a Sakyan girl, the most beautiful woman in the country,
with her hair half-combed, having looked round, said this to me:
‘Master, may you quickly return.’
Remembering that, reverend Sir,
I have no great delight living the spiritual life,
I am not able to endure the spiritual life,
and having disavowed the training, I will return to what is inferior.”
Then the Fortunate One, having taken venerable Nanda by the arm,
just as a strong man might stretch out a bent arm,
or bend in an outstretched arm,
in the same way did he disappear from Jeta’s Wood, and reappear amongst the Tāvatiṁsa devas.
Then at that time five hundred celestial dove-footed nymphs
had come to attend to Sakka, the lord of the devas.
Then the Fortunate One addressed venerable Nanda, (saying):
“Do you see, Nanda, these five hundred celestial dove-footed nymphs?”
“Yes, reverend Sir.”
“What do you think about this, Nanda,
who has the most perfect form, is the most fair to behold, is the most pleasing,
the Sakyan girl, the most beautiful woman in the country,
or these five hundred celestial dove-footed nymphs?”
“Like a disfigured monkey, reverend Sir, with its ears and nose cut off,
so is the Sakyan girl, reverend Sir, the most beautiful woman in the country,
compared with these five hundred celestial nymphs she does not count,
she is not even a fraction, she is not even half a fraction, she is not even to be compared!
These five hundred celestial nymphs
certainly have the most perfect form, are the most fair to behold, are the more pleasing.”
“Take delight, Nanda! Take delight, Nanda! I am your surety
for gaining five hundred celestial dove-footed nymphs!”
“If, reverend Sir, the Fortunate One is my surety
for gaining five hundred celestial dove-footed nymphs,
I will take great delight, reverend Sir, in (living) the spiritual life under the Fortunate One.”
Then the Fortunate One, having taken venerable Nanda by the arm,
just as a strong man might stretch out a bent arm,
or bend in an outstretched arm,
in the same way did they disappear from amongst the Tāvatiṁsa devas, and reappear in Jeta’s Wood.
The monks heard: “Venerable Nanda, it seems,
the Fortunate One’s brother, his mother’s sister’s son,
is living the spiritual life for the sake of celestial nymphs,
the Fortunate One, it seems, is his surety
for gaining five hundred celestial dove-footed nymphs!”
Then venerable Nanda’s monk-friends accosted venerable Nanda
with words about a hireling, with words about a lackey, (saying):
“It seems venerable Nanda is a hireling, it seems venerable Nanda is a lackey,
he is living the spiritual life for the sake of celestial nymphs,
the Fortunate One, it seems, is his surety
for gaining five hundred celestial dove-footed nymphs!”
Then venerable Nanda, at his monk-friends'
words about a hireling, words about a lackey,
was distressed, ashamed, and disgusted,
and while dwelling solitary, secluded, heedful, ardent, and resolute,
after no long time (attained) that good for which sons of good family
rightly go forth from the home to homelessness,
that unsurpassed conclusion to the spiritual life,
and dwelt having known, having directly experienced, and having attained (nibbāna) himself in this very life:
“Destroyed is birth
accomplished is the spiritual life
done is what ought to be done
there is no more of this mundane state” - this he knew.
And venerable Nanda became another of the Worthy Ones.
Then a certain devatā, when the night had passed,
having lit up the whole of Jeta’s Wood with his surpassing beauty,
went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and worshipping the Fortunate One, he stood on one side.
While standing on one side that devatā said this to the Fortunate One:
“Venerable Nanda, reverend Sir, the Fortunate One’s brother, his mother’s sister’s son,
through the destruction of the pollutants, without pollutants, freed in mind, freed through wisdom,
dwells having known, having directly experienced, and having attained (nibbāna) himself in this very life.”
And this knowledge arose to the Fortunate One:
“Nanda, through the destruction of the pollutants, without pollutants, freed in mind, freed through wisdom,
dwells having known, having directly experienced, and having attained (nibbāna) himself in this very life.”
Then venerable Nanda, when that night had passed,
went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and worshipping the Fortunate One, he sat down on one side.
While sat on one side venerable Nanda said this to the Fortunate One:
“That, reverend Sir, for which the Fortunate One was my surety
- for gaining five hundred celestial dove-footed nymphs -
I free the Fortunate One, reverend Sir, from that promise.”
“Nanda, having encompassed your mind fully with my mind, I understood:
‘Nanda, through the destruction of the pollutants, without pollutants, freed in mind, freed through wisdom,
dwells having known, having directly experienced, and having attained (nibbāna) himself in this very life.’
Also a devatā announced that matter to me, (saying):
‘Venerable Nanda, reverend Sir, the Fortunate One’s brother, his mother’s sister’s son,
through the destruction of the pollutants, without pollutants, freed in mind, freed through wisdom,
dwells having known, having directly experienced, and having attained (nibbāna) himself in this very life.’
When, Nanda, your mind was freed from the pollutants without attachment,
then was I freed from that promise.”
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“He who has got out of the quagmire, ~ who has crushed the thorn of sense desire,
Who has arrived at the destruction of delusion, ~ that monk does not shake in regard to pleasure and pain.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Rājagaha,
in Bamboo Wood, at the Squirrels’ Feeding Place.
Then at that time the leper known as Suppabuddha (Wide Awake) was in Rājagaha,
a poor man, a wretched man, a miserable man.
Then at that time the Fortunate One
was sitting teaching Dhamma surrounded by a great assembly.
The leper Suppabuddha saw
while still far away that great crowd of people assembled together.
Having seen (that), this occurred to him:
“Undoubtedly in this place
some comestibles and edibles will be distributed.
Well now, I could go to that great crowd of people,
perhaps I will get some comestibles or edibles in this place.”
Then the leper Suppabuddha went to that great crowd of people.
The leper Suppabuddha saw the Fortunate One
sat teaching Dhamma surrounded by a great assembly.
Having seen (that), this occurred to him:
“Here there are no comestibles or edibles being distributed,
this ascetic Gotama is teaching Dhamma to the assembly.
Perhaps I also could hear the Dhamma”, and he sat down right there (and then), (thinking):
“I will also listen to the Dhamma.”
Then the Fortunate One, applied his mind and encompassed fully the whole of that assembly with his mind, (thinking):
“Who here is able to understand the Dhamma?”
The Fortunate One saw the leper Suppabuddha
sat in that assembly, and having seen (him), this occurred to him:
“This one here is able to understand the Dhamma”,
and having regard to the leper Suppabuddha he related a gradual talk,
that is to say: talk on giving, talk on virtue, talk on heaven,
the danger, degradation, and defilement of sensual desires,
and the advantages in renunciation - (these) he explained.
When the Fortunate One knew that the leper Suppabuddha
was of ready mind, malleable mind, unhindered mind, uplifted mind, trusting mind,
then he explained the Dhamma teaching the Awakened Ones have discovered themselves:
suffering, origination, cessation, path.
Just as it is known that a clean cloth without a stain
would take the dye well,
so to the leper Suppabuddha
on that very seat, the dust-free, stainless Vision-of-the-Dhamma arose:
“Whatever has the nature of arising, all that has the nature of ceasing.”
Then the leper Suppabuddha having seen the Dhamma, attained the Dhamma,
understood the Dhamma, penetrated the Dhamma, crossed over uncertainty, being without doubts,
attained full confidence, having become independent of others in the Teacher’s teaching,
after rising from his seat went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and worshipping the Fortunate One, he sat down at one side.
While he was sitting on one side the leper Suppabuddha said this to the Fortunate One:
“Excellent, reverend Sir! Excellent reverend Sir!
Just as, reverend Sir, one might set upright what has been overturned,
or open up what has been closed, or show a path to one who is lost,
or bear an oil lamp in the darkness so that those with vision can see forms,
just so has the Dhamma been explained by the Fortunate One in countless ways.
I go, reverend Sir, to the Fortunate One for refuge,
and to the Dhamma, and to the Community of monks.
Please bear it in mind, reverend Gotama, that I am a lay follower
who has gone for refuge from today forward for as long as I am furnished with life.”
Then the Fortunate One instructed, roused,
enthused, and cheered the leper Suppabuddha with a Dhamma talk,
and after greatly rejoicing and gladly receiving this word of the Fortunate One,
after rising from his seat, worshipping and circumambulating the Fortunate One, he went away.
Then not long after the leper Suppabuddha had gone
a cow with a young calf having attacked him, deprived him of life.
Then many monks went to the Fortunate One,
and after going and worshipping the Fortunate One, they sat down on one side.
While sat on one side those monks said this to the Fortunate One:
“That leper called Suppabuddha, reverend Sir, who was instructed, roused, enthused, and cheered
by the Fortunate One with a Dhamma talk - he has died.
What is his destination? What is his future state?”
“A wise man, monks, was Suppabuddha,
who practiced Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma,
and did not trouble me on account of the Dhamma.
The leper Suppabuddha, monks, through the destruction of three fetters,
is a stream-enterer, not subject to the fall, and is assured of arriving at Full Awakening.”
When that was said, a certain monk said this to the Fortunate One:
“What was the reason, reverend Sir, what was the cause, through which the leper Suppabuddha became
a poor man, a wretched man, a miserable man?”
“Formerly, monks, the leper Suppabuddha
was a son of a wealthy merchant in this very Rājagaha.
While going to his pleasure park he saw the Independent Buddha Tagarasikkhī
entering the city for alms, and having seen (him), this occurred to him:
“Who is this leper roaming around with his leper’s robe?”
And having spat, and circumambulated him (disrespectfully) on the left side, he went away.
As a result of that deed of his for many years, for many hundreds of years,
for many thousands of years, for many hundreds of thousands of years, he boiled in the nether regions.
And as a result of the remaining part of that deed of his
he became a leper in this very Rājagaha,
a poor man, a wretched man, a miserable man.
(But) he came to the Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
and obtained faith, obtained virtue, obtained learning,
obtained liberality, obtained wisdom.
After coming to the Dhamma and Discipline taught by the Realised One,
and obtaining faith, obtaining virtue, obtaining learning,
obtaining liberality, obtaining wisdom,
at the break up of the body, after death, he arose in a happy destiny, in the world of Heaven,
in the companionship of the Tāvatiṁsa devas.
And there he surely outshines the other devas with his beauty and repute.”
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“As a man with vision, while he is endeavouring, (would avoid) dangerous paths,
(So) a wise man in the world of the living, ~ should avoid bad deeds.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time many young boys
who were between Sāvatthī and Jeta’s Wood were attacking a snake with a stick.
Then the Fortunate One, having dressed in the morning time,
after picking up his bowl and robe, was entering Sāvatthī for alms.
The Fortunate One saw (those) many young boys
between Sāvatthī and Jeta’s Wood attacking a snake with a stick.
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“He who, while seeking happiness for himself, harms with a stick
(Other) beings who desire happiness, ~ will not find happiness after passing away.
He who, while seeking happiness for himself, does not harm with a stick
(Other) beings who desire happiness, ~ will find happiness after passing away.”
Thus I heard:
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time the Fortunate One was instructing, rousing, enthusing, and cheering
the monks with a Dhamma talk connected with Emancipation.
Those monks, after making it their goal, applying their minds,
considering it with all their mind, were listening to Dhamma with an attentive ear.
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“There is that sphere, monks,
where there is no earth, no water, no fire, no air,
no sphere of infinite space, no sphere of infinite consciousness,
no sphere of nothingness, no sphere of neither perception nor non-perception,
no this world, no world beyond, neither Moon nor Sun.
There, monks, I say there is surely no coming,
no going, no persisting, no passing away, no rebirth.
It is quite without support, unmoving, without an object,
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time the Fortunate One was sitting reflecting on his own
abandonment of countless bad, unwholesome things,
and how through development countless wholesome things had come to fulfilment.
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“Before it was, then it wasn't; ~ before it wasn't, then it was;
It was not, and it will not be, ~ and at present it is not found.”
Thus I heard:
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time venerable Aññātakoṇḍañña (Koṇḍañña, he-who-knows)
was sitting not far away from the Fortunate One,
after folding his legs crosswise, and setting his body straight,
reflecting on his own freedom through the complete destruction of craving.
The Fortunate One saw venerable Aññātakoṇḍañña
sat not far away, after folding his legs crosswise, and setting his body straight,
reflecting on his own freedom through the complete destruction of craving.
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“For he who has no roots, no ground, ~ and no leaves, how then creepers?
That firm one free from bonds ~ - who is worthy (enough) to blame him?
The devas praise him, ~ and he has also been praised by Brahma.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time venerable Kaṅkhārevata (Doubting Revata)
was sitting not far away from the Fortunate One,
after folding his legs crosswise, and setting his body straight,
reflecting on his own purification through crossing over doubt.
The Fortunate One saw venerable Kaṅkhārevata
sat not far away, after folding his legs crosswise, and setting his body straight,
reflecting on his own purification through crossing over doubt.
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“Whatever doubts there are (about) here or hereafter,
Understandable by oneself, or understandable by another,
The meditators give up all these,
The ardent ones living the spiritual life.”
on the bank of the river Nerañjarā, at the root of the Awakening tree, in the first (period) after attaining Awakening.
Then at that time the Fortunate One
was sitting in one cross-legged posture for seven days experiencing the happiness of freedom.
Then with the passing of those seven days, the Fortunate One,
after arising from that concentration, for the first watch of the night,
applied his mind thoroughly to conditional origination in forward order:
“This being so, that is; from the arising of this, that arises,
that is to say: with ignorance as condition there are (volitional) processes,
with (volitional) processes as condition: consciousness,
with consciousness as condition: mind and bodily form,
with mind and bodily form as condition: the six sense spheres,
with the six sense spheres as condition: contact,
with contact as condition: feeling,
with feeling as condition: craving,
with craving as condition: attachment,
with attachment as condition: continuation,
with continuation as condition: birth,
with birth as condition: old age, death,
grief, lamentation, pain, sorrow, and despair (all) arise,
and so there is an origination of this whole mass of suffering.”
Then the Fortunate One, having understood the significance of it,
on that occasion uttered this exalted utterance:
“When (the nature of) things becomes really manifest
To the ardent meditating brāhmaṇa,
Then all his doubts disappear,
Since he knows (the nature of a) thing and its cause.”
at one time the Fortunate One was dwelling near Sāvatthī,
in Jeta’s Wood, at Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Then at that time the Fortunate One
was venerated, respected, revered, honoured, esteemed, and in receipt of
robes, almsfood, dwellings, and medicinal requisites to help when sick;
also the Community of monks was venerated, respected, revered, honoured, esteemed, and in receipt of
robes, almsfood, dwellings, and medicinal requisites to help when sick.
But wanderers from other sects
were not venerated, not respected, not revered, not honoured, not esteemed, nor were they in receipt of
robes, almsfood, dwellings, and medicinal requisites to help when sick.
Then those wanderers from other sects
being unable to bear the veneration of the Fortunate One and the Community of monks,
went to the female wanderer Sundarī (Beautiful),
and after going, they said this to the female wanderer Sundarī:
“Sister, what would you venture to do for your kinsmens’ welfare?”
“What can I do, Masters, what am I unable to do?
I have given up my life for my kinsmens’ welfare.”
“Then, sister, you must frequently go to Jeta’s Wood.”
“Yes, Masters”, said the female wanderer Sundarī,
and after replying to those wanderers from other sects,
she frequently went to Jeta’s Wood.
When those wanderers from other sects knew:
“The female wanderer Sundarī has been seen by many people
frequently going to Jeta’s Wood”,
then having deprived her of life,
and buried her into a trench-pit right there in Jeta’s Wood,
they went to the Kosalan King Pasenadi,
and after going, they said this to the Kosalan King Pasenadi:
“Great King, we no longer see the female wanderer Sundarī.”
“But where do you suspect (she is)?”
“In Jeta’s Wood, Great King.”
